Authors
Walter Frith
Number of Reviews
333

Title
Review for Michael (1996)
One thing or another kept me from seeing 'Michael' around the hoidays and
after finally getting around to see it I was pleasantly surprised.  I
expected it to be just another picture about and angel doing good deeds for
the sake of his eternal home but this is an offbeat picture which dwells on
the characters that matter and has a touching and good natured feeling.  A
group of tabloid newspaper employees from Chicago (William Hurt, Andie
MacDowell and Roberet Pastorelli) travel to small town Iowa with the paper's
mascot, a little dog named Sparky and investigate the claim by a kindly
elderly woman (Jean Stapleton --- yes, 'Edith Bunker') of an angel living
with her.  She tells the newspaper that her prayers were answered when she
asked for help and that Michael is her saviour.  At first the reporters are
humourously skeptical and doubt the claim is true but....well, without giving
away too much of the movie my plot description stops here.  As for the
analysis, John Travolta has made a wise choice in his career which continues
to grow and Travolta is remaining diverse since his comeback role in 'Pulp
Fiction' from 1994 and he has an amazing amount of droll charisma which women
find sexy and men find appealing.  'Michael' has all the makings for a
sensitive and moving holiday picture which plays amazingly well whenever you
view it.  There's a strange message of destiny in Travolta's character as the
movie's purpose is revealed in the end to a magical and heartfelt conclusion.
 Director Nora Ephron ('Sleepless in Seattle') uses a sure footed approach to
the material she co-wrote and blends it with tenderness and personality.
  Micheal isn't a great film but it never set out to be and is a picture that
knows it limits and deserves praise for that alone.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
Meet Jerry Fletcher (Mel Gibson).  He's a New York City cab driver who is
obsessed with conspiracies at every level.  Whether it's in government, big
business or anywhere else you can be sure that Jerry has a theory on it if
there is indeed any conspiracy at all.  Jerry lives in a very small apartment
which he has turned into a shrine complete with walls decorated with pictures
and news articles on such things as the assassinations of JFK and John Lennon
and the list goes on and on.  Jerry padlocks his refrigerator and has the
food and other articles inside it in containers with miniature padlocks while
his shelf food around the kitchen is kept behind an anti-burglar cage.  This
guy is really paranoid and believes that the drinking water contains
ingredients to make people slaves to the state.  He even sleeps at night with
multiple locks on his front door and balances a beer bottle on the top of his
inside doorknob which will tumble to the floor and break if anyone tries to
break in.
Jerry is in love with Alice Sutton (Julia Roberts).  She is a U.S. Department
of Justice attorney and as the story unfolds we learn that he saved her from
being mugged by two thieves and the two of them become friends while he
thinks it's more than platonic, she likes him as only a friend.  The two of
them become embroiled in a fight for their lives as one of Jerry's theories
apparently seems to be true but he doesn't know which one and the audience is
caught in the middle of it as the film looks for answers.
'Conspiracy Theory' is a film that has to be viewed to its conclusion in
order to judge it fairly. It is an extremely uneven motion picture which is
uneventful at times with a sense of muddled plot and a lack of focus but
there are genuine moments of action and excitement which are compelling and
the film has a sense of appeal to both men and women who will be equally
catered to in the film's running time which is a bit too long but prepare to
sit still and avoid making trips to the pay phone, rest room or snack bar as
it needs to be followed in extreme detail.
Uncanny as it may seem, Patrick Stewart plays a sharply unique villain and
the film would be obtuse and flat without his presence.  
'Conspiracy Theory' is a good film in a summer lacking in quality and
original ideas and with Julia Roberts involved, you may draw parallels to
1993's 'The Pelican Brief' but this one should entertain most people even if
you walk away trying to figure out exactly what happened.

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
     'Absolute Power' is another testament to Clint Eastwood's ability as a
talented filmmaker.  What makes Eastwood so good is not only his diversity in
subject matter from 'Play Misty for Me' (1971) to 'Unforgiven' (1992) but his
uncanny ability to take films with relatively long scenes and stretch them
into the most absorbing films made anywhere by anyone.
     'Absolute Power' is an extremely powerful motion picture filled with
intrigue (both political and social) that manages to construct its plot line
in a manner suitable for building to a daring climax but also in a way for
serious discussion after you leave the theatre.
     A life long criminal who specializes in high profile burglaries
(Eastwood) forces his way into a mansion one evening and upon committing a
routine heist is forced to hide in seclusion when others arrive.  From his
viewpoint he witnesses a sexual escapade which leads to a murder involving a
billionaire's wife and the most powerful man in the world, the President of
the United States (Gene Hackman).  Also involved in the clandestine crime are
two Secret Service agents (Scott Glenn and Dennis Haysbert) and the
President's Chief of Staff (Judy Davis).
     The investigating homicide officer who tracks Eastwood to the scene of
the crime (Ed Harris) is the film's protagonist who is the key to the film's
central focus.  Eastwood has an estranged daughter (Laura Linney) who gets
dangerously close to the investigation not necessarily for her own good.
 Rounding out the film's cast is veteran character actor E.G. Marshall as a
billionaire and political king maker.  It's his wife who is murdered.
     Oscar winning screen writer William Goldman ('All the President's Men')
is credited with this clever screenplay based on the novel by David Baldacci.
     What makes 'Absolute Power' so enjoyable to a large extent is seeing
Eastwood gradually move into parts that fit his age.  He is well seasoned in
this film (Eastwood is 66)
and he doesn't perform any silly physical stunts and the film isn't filled
with unnecessary violence.  Instead it relies on heightened scenes of keeping
the audience guessing what's to come next.
     This is a smart film brimming with conniving wit that manages to remain
highly entertaining and credible throughout its entire running time.

Title
Review for Odd Couple II, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When I first saw 'The Odd Couple', it was the television series starring
Tony Randall and Jack Klugman.  A brilliant show that I read somewhere
never cracked the top 10 on television in its run between 1970 and
1975.  It won Emmy awards for its two leading men throughout that period
and provided some of the most uproarious belly laughs in the history of
sitcoms.  The show was brash, frank and uncompromising in its portrayal
of two New York City roommates, Oscar Madison (Klugman) and Felix Unger
(Randall).  The t.v. series was inspired by the 1968 movie which came
about from an earlier play written by Neil Simon (as was the film) in
which Oscar and Felix were portrayed by Walter Matthau and Jack Lemmon.
That movie didn't have the in-your-face fast pace and high spirited
hilarity of the sitcom but its basic good nature and original idea were
to be admired.  To tell you the truth, I've always preferred Klugman and
Randall to the other two but that is intended to take nothing away from
the talents of Lemmon and Matthau.
Everyone knows Oscar's the sloppy one and Felix is the "clean freak" or
as Matthau refers to him this time as "a human vacuum cleaner".  Thirty
years have passed and I'm sorry to say that the fire has gone out on any
idea Simon may have had for a sequel.  As 'The Odd Couple II' progresses
in the early stages, Oscar receives a phone call from his son, informing
him that he plans to be married to who else....Felix's daughter?!
Matthau is surprised to say the least.  After getting the details of the
wedding plans, Felix and Oscar meet at the airport in California and
haven't seen each other in 17 years?  I don't know about you but I don't
get in contact with people I met previously in my life and haven't
spoken to in 17 years and while you would think it to be natural that
the future in-laws would have to see each other at the wedding, what are
the chances that Oscar's son and Felix's daughter would meet and want to
get married?  Let's see, 6 billion people in the world and that's about
three billion men and three billion women, right?  The odds would be 3
billion to 1 that they would meet each other.  You have a better chance
of seeing two royal flushes come up in the same hand at a poker game.
Who does Neil Simon think he's fooling with this preposterous story?
Anyway, after they do meet, they encounter one disaster after another
and end up in a small town sheriff's office several times after being
caught in the wrong place at the wrong time, suspected of committing
offenses but in each case, the sheriff finds there was a freak
misunderstanding like you would find in a Laurel and Hardy movie and
releases Oscar and Felix each time.  Other mishaps in the film include
Oscar and Felix leaving the airport with Felix's suitcase getting left
behind with almost $20,000 in wedding presents inside, their car rolls
over a desert cliff and explodes, they get busted for an association
with illegal immigrants, get pesticide dumped on them and even manage to
pick up two girls whose boyfriends are rednecks and want to do them in.
These scenarios all look just a little too written and don't seem
natural and that along with the film's one liners look like a series of
amateur night comedy sketches at a local theatre featuring local talent.
There are countless attempts to poke fun at the senior citizen's way of
life which I found to be a little tasteless and unfunny (and I'm only
32) and while I'm sure it's intended to be in good taste and while some
seniors will find it funny (my parents probably will), others will be
crossing their fingers for a third 'Grumpy Old Men' film.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Bonnie and Clyde (1967)
Thirty years after its release, the debate continues over Arthur Penn's
simple, truthful and hardcore look at American criminal violence.  When it
was released in 1967, 'Bonnie and Clyde' stirred up quite a debate over
whether or not it "glamourized" violence.  Quite simply, it was a straight
forward telling of two lonely, mixed up people, Clyde Barrow and Bonnie
Parker (yes, they were real figures in history) portrayed with poetic
brilliance by Warren Beatty and Faye Dunaway and how they threw their lives
away in the pursuit of a criminal life.  They were a pair of lovers who
terrorized and robbed their way across the heartland of America in the
1930's.  
In fact, staggering performances were abound in this stylish film that would
receive 5 Oscar nominations for acting, Beatty and Dunaway for Best Actor and
Actress, Gene Hackman as Best Supporting Actor along with Michael J. Pollard
and someone who would win Best Supporting Actress, Estelle Parsons.  Hackman,
in one of his first films, plays Clyde's brother Buck Barrow and Michael J.
Pollard is C.W., the getaway driver in the mob and Estelle Parsons rounded
out the cast as the noisy and frumpy wife of Buck, a preacher's daughter
caught in the fight for her life from authorities as they closed in on Bonnie
and Clyde.  In recent memory, only a handful of films would receive 5 Oscar
nominations for acting.  Grasping cinematography by Burnett Guffey would also
cop an Oscar and 'Bonnie and Clyde' would be shut out for almost every major
Oscar it was nominated for including Best Picture and Best Director for
Arthur Penn.
Warren Beatty's film debut in 1961 with 'Splendor in the Grass' would prove
enormously successful and it wasn't long before Beatty would turn to
producing and he did so with 'Bonnie and Clyde'.  'Bonnie and Clyde' does
what its supposed to do like every other classic film; it draws the audience
in from the opening minutes as it centres on being a two character study for
the first several minutes.  Just moments after they meet and are immediately
attracted to each other, we find out that Clyde has just been released from
jail and to immediately impress Bonnie, he robs a grocery store and the story
continues from there all the way to its conclusion which was very
controversial in 1967 when audience's jaws dropped in view of it.  Certainly
a timely film in view of the social changes of the 1960's, 'Bonnie and Clyde'
will leave an impression on audiences for all time with its message of
anti-violence stemming from violence spawned by the poverty of the great
depression. 

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Watching 'Bulworth' feels like having somebody punch you in the face and
as you turn around to recover and regain your balance, there's somebody
waiting that throws a bucket of cold water where you've just been
punched.  In other words, the film is a double whammy of intended satire
but comes off more as a series of condescending failed scenes which do
nothing to advance the nature of the movie's characters and
caricatures.  Caricatures are usually the least interesting thing about
a film that centres on people because they never get developed beyond
the realm of their first scene(s), hence, their given name.  'Bulworth'
has more than its share of unnecessary players and the centre piece of
the movie's main personality is a man with a pretty unattractive
personality named Jay Billington Bulworth (Warren Beatty).
I understood completely where Beatty was trying to go with this film but
rather than churn out a political satire, Beatty has instead made a film
where Bulworth rambles about our unbalanced society without telling us
anything about how he intends to improve it.  That is often the true
nature of politicians and if the movie wants to do that, what exactly is
its point beyond anything we've seen before?  It doesn't take a genius
to do a simple turning of the tables and make a fibbing politician, who
doesn't believe in the things he's saying and turn him into a suicidal
and supposedly conscience stricken self redeemer who becomes suicidal
and says what's really on his mind.
The film opens with a rehearsed speech Billington intends to give where
the opening line is heard over and over and over again and is the usual
*blah*blah*blah* he will use in an upcoming campaign.  We soon begin to
see Bulworth's mental breakdown as he displays his suicidal tendencies
and takes out a large insurance policy on himself before hiring a
contract killer to knock himself off?!  I didn't believe it for a
second.  The idea is too simple to be believable and even if you accept
the premise, the movie's core issue hasn't even surfaced yet.
As Bulworth is speaking to a large audience of African-Americans in
South Central L.A., he makes some rather blunt comments that he believes
are true, putting aside the political line for an unexpected dose of
what many will accept as reality.  Next his comments turn to the Jewish
community and these two outbursts cause a media carnage where Bulworth
is asked to explain exactly what he meant by these two incidents.
Somewhere in the middle of all this, he begins saying what he really
feels is the trouble with American society.  His remarks make the U.S.A.
sound instead like the Corporate States of America, perhaps a good
theory and while reasonably admirable and truthful, his execution of
these ideas are awkward and sound more like the ramblings of a paranoid
fanatic.
During his outburst in South Central L.A., he meets Nina (Halle Berry),
a young woman from the community whom he fancies and he tries to
understand her world and express himself through it by a transformation
of image.  It's a world Bulworth doesn't understand because the words he
hears and the problems he sees, he repeats them when interviewed on
television and the execution this time isn't only awkward, its phony and
self indulgent on Beatty's part.
What's even more astonishing about this film is the way that Beatty
presents not only the other characters in the film, but his own.  The
other characters played by such wonderful actors as Jack Warden, Paul
Sorvino, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle and Christine Baranski are never
given any real focus or development and when the fate of Beatty's
character is decided, you will NOT care.
Beatty is more concerned with presenting his story too quickly and as
you figure out that his film lacks depth and insight, you'll be amazed
at what little foundation is built around the the rest of the story.
Beatty directs and is the co-author of 'Bulworth' and for a man who has
been a part of classics like 'Bonnie and Clyde', 'Shampoo', ' Heaven Can
Wait' and his most ambitious film for which he won a Best Director
Oscar, 1981's 'Reds', Beatty has made an abysmal failure of a film the
has absolutely no after thought and is as stimulating as frozen silly
putty.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
'Wild Wild West' saturates the screen with intense silliness and
deliberately attempts to be the ultimate summer movie.  Noisy, filled
with special effects, and full of in jokes from other aspects of pop
culture, the film begins rather poorly but picks up steam (including
using a train as a major prop) and has a villain as pleasing and as
charismatic as most seen in the movies in a very long time.  Barry
Sonnenfeld injects his jack-in-the-box style direction and his film
wobbles with a dizziness that works almost as well here as it did in his
1997 triumph, 'Men in Black'.  Much of 'Men in Black' will become dated
in the years to come, particularly the scene where the audience plays
witness to the secret observation room and on a giant projection screen
they observe many celebrities on Earth whom we discover in an irreverent
and joking way that they are actually aliens.  Borrowing from many
cheesy and low budget sci-fi movies from years gone by, Barry Sonnenfeld
used them in 'MIB' and uses many metaphors from classic stereotyped
westerns to do the same in 'Wild Wild West'.
Will Smith (James T. West) and Kevin Kline (Artemus Gordon) star as two
federal agents in post Civil war America, around 1870, who team up for
President Grant (also played by Kline and an in joke from 1993's 'Dave'
where Kline played a regular guy and a fictional U.S. president) to find
out who is kidnapping scientists involving a possible plot to bring down
the government.  Their investigation takes them to New Orleans where
they come in contact with Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh).  Loveless
is a former member of the confederacy who wants revenge on the Union
after losing his legs in the war and is forced to get around in a high
tech (for its time) wheelchair.  Loveless' symbol (like the Riddler's
question mark) is the spider.  It's on Loveless' flag, other personal
belongings, and he sends a few of the creatures with a gift for the
president enclosed in glass.  Dressed in dark clothing with a beard
trimmed to give you the true impression of evil, Branagh's villain
steals the show as many villains do on many occasions at the movies.  He
wants to overthrow the U.S. government and give the land back (for a
fee, of course) to Great Britain, France, Spain, Mexico and a couple of
others.
Joining West and Gordon in their adventure is Rtia Escobar (Salma
Hayek), who claims to be the daughter of one of the scientists kidnapped
and wants to tag along in the quest to find her father.  Naturally, both
men take a shine to her and vie for her affections.  Other members of
the cast include M. Emmet Walsh and Ted Levine.
It's entirely possible to dislike 'Wild Wild West' for all the right
reasons.  There is little chemistry between its two leads, the plot is
riddled with uneven qualities, contrivances and many scenes of
convoluted logic.  Aside from this (for me at least) is the feeling of a
guilty pleasure.  You know, one of those films you hate to admit you
like but you find that the movie works for you and you alone.  This is
the way the film struck me.
Will Smith articulates himself quite well this time.  Unlike his role in
'Men in Black' where his character was a little wet behind the ears in
his training by the elder Tommy Lee Jones as an agent chasing aliens,
Smith is completely cool and in charge as Jim West.  Kevin Kline plays
his role in the manner of an aristocrat.  Sort of like an American Dr.
Watson, full of dapper expressions in a surprisingly cool manner.  The
screenplay by Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman and S.S.
Wilson makes you wonder why it took four people to write it because in a
film where special effects take over in such an obvious way, this seems
to be a puzzle.  One thing I'm almost certain of is that for fans of the
western genre who are purists, this film isn't for them.  It's too high
tech for its era to please fans of the western but is still a good ride
full of mindless fun for the rest of us.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
Filled with the worst kind of popular tripe, 'Never Been Kissed' is the
ultimate focus group movie.  Every detail of the film's script, and other
(for lack of a better term) academics have been scrutinized and marketed to
an audience where only one core group, high school senior girls, will
appreciate it.  The film's wardrobe, high school atmosphere, teenage and
teacher stereotypes as well as a totally unbelievable story make this movie
more than a waste of time and that is an understatement.  It runs 110
minutes but feels more like two and a half hours.
Drew Barrymore plays Josie Geller, a 25 year old copy editor at the Chicago
Sun Times (I wonder what Roger Ebert will think of this movie), who goes
undercover as a 17 year old to do a story of high school life in 1999.  But
there is much more to the plot than that.  Josie is a virgin and has never
been kissed.  She was ridiculed throughout her time in high school by class
mates who played cruel and unusual jokes on her.  In those days, she wore
her hair like a cave woman, had braces on her teeth and wore baggy overall
dresses.  Even her supposed date for the high school prom showed up at her
front door by passing by in a fully equipped limo and stuck his head through
the sun roof, producing a stunning female companion next to him and they
hurled eggs at Josie in her prom dress and laughed as they continued to
drive by.  This assignment by the paper sort of gives Josie a second chance
to "fit in".
The pranks come fast and furiously upon her return to school as three
conceited Barbie doll wannabes (Jessica Alba, Marley Shelton, Jordan Ladd)
make fun of her using guys at the school that they have trained to obey them
and they accuse Josie of wearing an outfit that became extinct in 1983.
Josie falls for her English teacher (Michael Vartan) who is one of only
three appealing characters in the film.  The other two are Josie's brother
(David Arquette) and a girl who befriends her at school (Leelee Sobieski).
The other characters in the film are a complete throwaway.  They are Josie's
head boss (Garry Marshall?), her other superior (John C. Reilly) and the
office tramp (Molly Shannon).
'Never Been Kissed', for those who will like it, will probably find it
comparable later in life to a record you bought when you were in high school
but hated it when you were well into your adult years.  The film is also
extremely tasteless in many scenes.  It makes fun of high school metal
detectors, getting high, alleged safe sex involving bananas as a demo, and
drug use among some minority groups.  Drew Barrymore, who served as
executive producer, also looked very confusing in this film.  Her weight
seemed to shift from scene to scene.  In one scene she had a double chin and
her clothes made her look plump.  At other times she looked fine but these
factors kept switching back and fourth throughout the run of the movie.
Director Raja Gosnell ('Home Alone 3'), photographs the film in an extremely
ordinary way.  The pace Gosnell gives the film is like wading through heavy
snow.  There is no real focus to the story.  This mess looks and feels like
a series of out takes from a bad movie.
There is a movie from 1985 entitled 'Just One of the Guys' where an
extremely attractive female high school reporter proves she can be taken
seriously when she assumes the disguise of a boy, transfers to another
school and does her job.  That film knew how to enter the appealing side of
your mind and having seen it when I was 19, I still enjoy it at 33.  'Never
Been Kissed' is de facto entertainment.  And a couple of guys in the back
row of the theatre where I saw it were actually hurling humourous insults at
the screen which was the best part of the film.  The film is like many other
recent teenage rumblings getting more and more popular in film and making a
mockery of the greatest medium in the world and infecting it like a cancer.
Unlike promotional materials for 'I Still Know What You Did Last Summer' and
'Cruel Intentions', where Jennifer Love Hewitt and Sarah Michelle Gellar's
breasts were used as shameful marketing tools, 'Never Been Kissed' at least
looked appealing going in.  Too bad its execution was a total failure.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
Tom Cruise recently won the Best Actor prize bestowed by The National
Society of Film Critics for his frenzied and poignant portrayl of a
sports agent who develops a conscience in a very unethical business
where the almighty dollar is sometimes put above the health and well
being of professional athletes and where kids are turned away from
receiving autographs from their sports icons because the icons are
under contract to only sign specified merchandise.  After distributing
a manual venting his frustration with the business he is dropped like a
hot potato by his boss at the agency where he works and manages to
retain only one client who's a second string wide receiver with hopes
of a big NFL contract.  The wide receiver is played in a supporting
role by Cuba Gooding Jr. who along with lead actor Cruise should be
Oscar bound for his selfish portrayal of a man with an enormous chip on
his shoulder and whose attitude is keeping him from fitting in with the
big leagues.  After losing his job Cruise is dumped by his girlfriend
and soon to be wife from hell (Kelly Preston) and becomes involved with
a young widow (Renee Zellweger) who has an adorable six year old son.
Director Cameron Crowe ('Say Anything') has crafted a special film with
touching aspects suited for both men and women.  The balance found in
the sports and the relationship aspects of the film make this a great
date movie and in particular a great first date movie.  Tom Cruise
gives his most uplifting performance to date and no one can argue about
Cruise's diversity and talent as an actor after seeing this movie.
>From his roles in 'The Color of Money' (1986) to 'Rain Man' (1988) to
'A Few Good Men' (1992) where fellow actors Paul Newman, Dustin Hoffman
and Jack Nicholson have all praised Cruise for his ability.  Jerry
Maguire paints a very real picture of present day sports where
integrity and ethics do have a place and where hard work and
determination can make a difference.  It's all in the desperation and
Cruise convinces us of that.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
The reason why the movie industry continues to set box office records
every year is due to one thing: tradition.  Motion pictures have not
lost their way in telling stories that are set in the present while
mixing them perfectly with stories from the past. Look at all of the
films to win the Best Picture Oscar in the 1990's.  Only one film, 'The
Silence of the Lambs', is set in the present day and of all the films to
win the award in the 1980's, only two, 'Ordinary People' and 'Rain Man',
are set totally in the present day.  People were fascinated to learn the
story of 'Titanic' and while that film had a fictional backdrop, it
still managed to put forward a harrowing climax, detailing the final
hours of the great ship's demise.  It has become the highest grossing
film of all time and shares the most Oscars ever won, 11, with 1959's
'Ben-Hur'.
The only film I've ever seen that I really liked Antonio Banderas in was
1996's 'Evita'.  Banderas didn't have a large enough part in 1993's
'Philadelphia' to really make an impact and he has found true stardom
with 'The Mask of Zorro'.  I was struck by the fact that in a recent
interview with Banderas, he stated that he is the first Spanish actor to
play the swashbuckling hero and that lends even more credibility to the
part and in fact, the entire cast is excellent in a film that follows a
Hollywood formula of good guys vs. bad guys and the film makes certain
that there is a beautiful woman involved.
The film opens in 1821, and Don Diego De La Vega (Anthony Hopkins) wears
the mask of Zorro, defender of Mexico, and battles the corrupt forces of
Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson).  Don Rafael has selected three
innocent men from the town square to be executed, all for the sake of
drawing Zorro out in public so his soldiers can kill him.  The men are
of course saved and the scene has enthralling energy and grand style as
the hero shows up the villains but not all is pretty.  As Don Rafael
seeks out the true identity of Zorro later in the day, he finds it is
Don Diego and in a terrible accident, Diego's wife is killed during his
apprehension and Don Raphael takes the infant daughter of Don Diego away
and claims her for himself and raises the little girl on his own.  Don
Diego returns some twenty years later after his time in prison, and his
daughter is now a grown woman (Catherine Zeta Jones) and Don Diego seeks
revenge against Don Rafael and a reunion with his daughter.  He may have
found it in Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas), a man who as a child
along with his brother, saved Zorro's life.  Murrieta's brother is
cornered by Captain Harrison Love (Matt Letscher) and takes his own life
instead of being captured and eventually tortured.  Captain Love is
working directly with Don Rafael in a gold mining plot swindle that will
mean both their lives if they are exposed.  Murietta as every reason to
want the same revenge as Don Diego.
Banderas and Hopkins work well together in this film.  Too old to truly
be the dashing hero he once was, Hopkins trains Banderas to be the new
generation of justice and eventually wear the mask of Zorro for his very
own.  My only complaint with the film is that it seemed that Banderas
learned the art of Zorro's defence just a little too quickly and while
eventually convincing, the film does balance this by showing him in
battle at times being a little wet behind the ears with an aloof sense
of duty in his first couple of tries.
Director Martin Campbell ('GoldenEye', 'No Escape') doesn't trivialize
the characters for the sake of action and adventure.  There is a good
human story contained within the film and one of the movie's executive
producers is Steven Spielberg and the old time historical significance
in the film and the straight action scenes put me in mind at times of
'Raiders of the Lost Ark'.  I was truly impressed with all members of
the cast and the seasoned qualities of Anthony Hopkins are again
diversified as he is the foundation of the film and continues to
solidify his reputation as both a movie star and truly great actor.
'The Mask of Zorro' is a dazzling and highly entertaining movie and what
a pleasure to watch a film that is completely loaded with action without
any computerized special effects.  If there are any in the film, they
certainly don't need to be there as the film would have been capable of
generating its own sense of wonder and tension without them.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Save the Tiger (1973)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
As a testament to questionable business ethics, 'Save the Tiger' works.  As a
testament to the most extreme of human conditions, 'Save the Tiger' works.
 As a testament to some of the finest screen acting ever, 'Save the Tiger'
works magnificently.  Don't mistake it as a preachy, self-indulgent guilt
trip on the part of its main characters.  What the film is really about is
one man's longing for the past to a happier time in his life as he sees his
marriage crumble, his business decline and his sanity tested.
Jack Lemmon who has been a shining example of screen acting in its purest
form won a Best Actor Oscar for this film which has all the subtlety of a
traffic jam and twice the ulcer inducing lifestyle of a common businessman.
 Lemmon stars as Harry Stoner, a clothing manufacturer facing bankruptcy,
foreclosure and the most important moral decision of his life.  He and his
partner (Jack Gilford) have to decide whether or not to hire the services of
a professional arsonist to set fire to their main building in order to
collect badly needed money from an insurance settlement for a corporate
diversion of funds.
Locked in a heated exchange of moral justification for their opposite
positions, Lemmon and Gilford are a great pair of actors looking at times as
if they are acting in a stage play and making the most of their roles.
 Lemmon is in favour of torching the building while Gilford is not.  Lemmon's
secret desire as we find out in the course of the film was to be a big league
baseball player.  As a veteran of war, there is one emotionally gut wrenching
scene where Lemmon is delivering a speech before a large audience and in his
mind sees the combat beaten bodies of soldiers in the crowd instead of the
real people who are there.  While his wife is away, he has a brief fling with
a young hippie flower girl who is the complete opposite of his cultural
perspective on life.  
'Save the Tiger' is a film that doesn't jump all over the place.  It has
focus and is set primarily over the course of two days in the life of a
tormented individual who is very human, a little bit sad and even though he
is going to commit a criminal act to save his business, a strange sense of
sympathy is generated for his character.  Written by Steve Shagan and
directed by John G. Avildsen ('Rocky'), 'Save the Tiger' is a film that
doesn't strain its convictions, it presents them honestly.  

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
'Vampires' a.k.a. John Carpenter's 'Vampires' (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
John Carpenter's vision of the undead is very lively in his latest film
entitled 'Vampires'.  The film is based on the novel 'Vampire$' by John
Steakley and is written for the screen by Don Jakoby.  In the ads for
the film, it is labeled John Carpenter's 'Vampires'.  It is admirable
for a director to want his name on the head of a film because after all,
he IS supposed to be proud of his work but what puzzled about the film
was Carpenter's lack of restraint which is filled with an unusual amount
of gore for a John Carpenter film.  For a vampire flick, the film looks
heavily influenced by 1996's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' which had enough wild
bloody gore to fill a dozen movies.
James Woods, who likes to make up many of his own 'in your face' remarks
in improvised dialogue, stars as a vampire killer, raised and trained by
the Catholic church to destroy vampires moving around all parts of the
globe.  The film tries to cast off stereotypes that have carried
vampires throughout film history.  Woods says that crosses don't work
and other stereotypes are cast off as well.  There is a new breed of
vampire on the loose that can walk around in the daylight.
Traveling through New Mexico as the film opens, Woods and his gang of
vampire killers include an army of "soldiers" and Daniel Baldwin plays
Woods' right hand man and Gregory Sierra plays a priest re-cruited by
the church to aid Woods on his hunt to destroy the unholy beasts.
Thomas Ian Griffith plays Valek, the First Vampire who has lived for 600
years and who has been the influence for all vampires created throughout
history.  No vampire film I've ever seen has taken on such a powerful
presence of the villain's profile as this film does.  Valek and his army
of the undead are after a relic in the form of a black cross that will
give them special power.  The vampires in this film are extremely hard
to kill and Valek is practically invincible.
One night, at a victory party of sorts after Woods and his army destroy
a nest belonging to Valek, Valek rises to literally crash the party and
kill almost all the vampire slayers.  Valek sinks his fangs into a young
prostitute at the party played by Sheryl Lee and her transformation will
not take place right away and Baldwin sort of falls for her and tries to
protect her from the transformation.
Two other characters are key to the film's outcome and wild but
predictable climax.  Maximilian Schell plays a high ranking Cardinal in
the church who oversees Woods' assignment and Tim Guinee plays a priest
who is rather timid in his initial work with Woods.
'Vampires' uses an over-the-top approach to win over the audience and
its timing to open at Halloween is no doubt a good marketing strategy
but the film comes up short.  Its problem is that it's static and
suffers from a one track mind in its approach to the subject matter.
Francis Ford Coppola's vision of 'Bram Stoker's Dracula' in 1992 was
stunning and captured an enormous amount of erotica contained in the
novel.  Even Robert Rodriguez's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' used its first
half as a crime drama and took a bizarre turn in the second half.  A
young person's vampire flick in 1985 called 'Fright Night' had Chris
Sarandon as a ghoulish type of vampire who wore designer clothes and
romped about with an obnoxious personality.
'Vampires' becomes very tiresome after its first 45 minutes and it
eventually runs out of steam and its lack of good character development
is further complicated by repetitive scenes of visual gore and Carpenter
has always been a visual director whose talents, like Brian De Palma and
Peter Hyams, might have been better served on weekly formula television
shows or the world of music videos because these directors and their
lack of sub text are below average at best.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
     If you're looking for a movie that lampoons references to many other
films and in particular, one t.v. show and if you're looking for an original
and at times pleasantly shocking delight then 'Men in Black' is the movie for
you.  Executive produced by Steven Spielberg and directed by Barry Sonnenfeld
('Get Shorty', 'The Addams Family'), 'Men in Black' stars Tommy Lee Jones as
a secret undercover agent working to protect the Earth from 'the scum of the
universe.'  His elderly partner is about to retire and Jones' boss (Rip Torn)
seeks a replacement and finds it in a sharp and clever NYC cop played in a
gleefully daffy manner by Will Smith.
     Based on the Malibu comic of the same name, 'Men in Black' works so well
in particular because of Jones' deadpan and loosely charismatic performance
as the agent who will do whatever it takes to get the job done.  Aside from
Smith in contrast to Jones' portrayal of the straight man is a campy and
tongue-in-cheek story of an alien landing in upstate New York whose passenger
is a giant insect, sort of a cross between a cockroach and an ant played by
Vincent D'Onofrio who assumes the identity of a dead farmer and 'borrows' his
skin and his presence could spell the end of the world for the Earth.
 D'Onofrio is hilarious as his haunting and wildly over the top performance
is reminiscent of one of the zombies from 'Night of the Living Dead' (1968),
(forget about the 1990 remake), and Linda Fiorentino rounds out the cast as a
doctor with the coroner's office who becomes entangled in a strange autopsy
she performs and discovers alien life on Earth.  
     The clever but not always instantly recognizable references to 'Pulp
Fiction', 'The X-Files', 'Ghostbusters', 'The Blob' and 'Close Encounters'
are funny enough to give 'Men in Black' extra marks for not making them so
obvious and while it establishes an identity of its own, its ability to not
takes itself seriously is what ultimately saves it.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
'The Haunting' was originally a small budgeted film from 1963 with the
same name.  In 1999, this version of 'The Haunting' is such a
stupendously bad film that it's tough to know where I should begin. 
It's written in wooden fashion by David Self, based on the novel 'The
Haunting of Hill House' by Shirley Jackson.  I didn't think that camera
man turned academic director Jan DeBont could make a worse film than
1997's 'Speed 2: Cruise Control' but he has.  'The Haunting' is a gothic
style of film making that is protracted, muddled, and doesn't seem to
know where its high points are and to make the most of them when they
try and come up.
My parents took me to Disney World in Florida in 1976 for the first time
when I was eleven and there was a ride called 'The Haunted Mansion'. 
You sit in one of those carnival cars and ride through a simulated
haunted house and as you do so, a tricky light show makes you believe
that you are seeing ghosts everywhere.  At one point you even pass by a
mirror and it seems that a ghost is sitting between you and your
companion.  That five minute ride was more entertaining than this film.
In 'The Haunting', it's tag line is...SOME HOUSES ARE BORN BAD.  Maybe
they knew when they had their finished project that it was such an
abysmal accomplishment, they decided to blame it on the house where most
of the setting takes place.  : - )  You could also make the argument
that the film is entirely disrespectful to anyone who loves horror
movies.
Lili Taylor plays Eleanor Vance, a woman who took care of her mother for
the last eleven years before the sick woman died.  After her death, mom
left her property to her other daughter who seemingly did nothing to
serve her mother in her final years and she and her husband want Eleanor
out of the house.  Eleanor's sister and husband are horrid people who
are materialistic, cut throat and devious.  
Eleanor answers an ad in the paper that will pay her nine hundred
dollars per week (she needs the money now that she's homeless) where a
doctor (Liam Neeson) needs people to fill a study depicting the effects
and causes of insomnia.  Others who answer the ad are a trendy babe
named Theodora (Catherine Zeta Jones), a woman who aches to be a fashion
victim and brags about her huge spending habits and is every credit
card's nightmare. Last there is Luke (Owen Wilson), a character that is
completely wasted as we never get to know anything about him or who he
really is.
The wasted cast gather at an old mansion with a sinister past, its
former owner more than a century ago employed children in a sweat shop
operation and their abuse led to their deaths and the house is
supposedly haunted with their troubled souls.  The characters find that
instead of being studied for their insomnia, they are tricked into be
studied for the effects of fear that plays upon them.  There is a
mythological explanation of the house's history and what the religious
overtones are meant to be and the film looks like a cross between a rare
bad episode of 'The X-Files' and out takes from the achievement a first
year film student.  The entire film spends too much time building up its
climax and when it's supposed to pay off here and there, it relies too
much on convincing the audience that special effects will work better
than the story and this is a major miscalculation.
The fate of the characters in the film's last act is the true testament
as to just how bad this film is.  You can always judge a good or bad
film by how much you care about what happens to the major players.  You
won't care a bit about anything when this film is over.  It looks more
like an instructional film shown to upcoming film technicians on how to
use special effects than it does an actual motion picture with any
redeeming qualities.  A shocking disappointment, especially coming from
Dreamworks, started and owned in part by Steven Spielberg!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Network (1976)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Uggh, tabloid t.v.  Catering to the lowest common denominator.  That's
nothing new.  Before the trashy antics of these sleaze profiteers there
were other, more innocuous attempts to get people hooked on boob tube
entertainment of a low class nature.  'The Gong Show' perhaps?  The
'Unknown Comic', 'Gene, Gene, the dancing machine' and that curly haired
host were all bad enough but 20 years ago who would have thought that
during a television talk show, fights would break out.  Now it seems
that during fights on these shows, audiences keep waiting for a talk
show to break out.  When Geraldo had his nose broken some years ago,
many thought that sort of thing was the exception rather than the rule
and while few people get injured on these shows, at least what the
audience sees first hand, I truly believe that these scenarios are
REAL!  Perhaps not all the time, but surely the famous incident
involving the murder of a young man by another man as an alleged result
of appearing on one of these shows, makes you wonder how much is staged
and how much is indeed real.  In case you don't know what I'm talking
about, there was an incident a couple of years ago where a certain trash
talk show had people on stage waiting to meet their secret admirers.
Each person greeted a member of the opposite sex except one, a man, who
had another man admit he had a crush on him, causing him great
embarrassment.  You can guess the rest.
In 1976, when the film 'Network' came out, it was about a fourth place
network, UBS, and ABC, NBC, and CBS all finishing ahead of it in the
ratings each week.  Desperate to get ratings and offset huge annual
financial losses, they luck into something.  A washed up television
anchor man named Howard Beale (Peter Finch, in his Oscar winning role as
Best Actor), has his employment terminated because of low ratings and
announces during a live broadcast that he will commit suicide on live
television in the near future before he leaves for good.  Causing panic
among the executives watching, they remove him by force and after some
thought, Beale convinces another executive and his best friend, Max
Schumacher (William Holden), to put him back on to rectify the
embarrassing statement.  Given this opportunity, he causes more
embarrassment for the network by using the word "bull****" and the
ratings jump 5 points during that broadcast.  Taking advantage of this
situation, a ruthless female executive named Diana Christensen (Faye
Dunaway in her Oscar winning role as Best Actress), convinces her boss
in charge of programming, Frank Hackett (Robert Duvall) to put Howard
Beale back on the air and keep him on despite the irresponsible nature
of his content and the shocking nature of his messages.  He agrees and
thus 'The Howard Beale Show' is born.  He is described and an 'angry
prophet, denouncing the hypocrisies of our time'.  His show influences
the network to include other tabloid segments and this shocking new
brand of television causes a fury among angry broadcast regulators and
government officials who want the show stopped.
Screenwriter Paddy Chayefsky, who won his third Oscar for the scathing
script of 'Network' was a true genius way ahead of his time.  He
predicted back then that television standards would get lower and lower
and they most definitely have.  In addition to tabloid talk shows,
people have to contend with sitcoms that all look the same, recycled
from ideas of the past without a clue in proper execution or hint of
original thought.  '3rd Rock from the Sun'/'Mork and Mindy',
'Frasier'/'Cheers'.  Even highly charged dramas such as 'ER' and 'NYPD
Blue' bring up memories of 'St. Elsewhere' and 'Hill Street Blues'.
Chayefsky's observations of television programming are not cynical, just
the thoughts of a realist.  For all of you doubting Thomas' out there,
ask yourself why many shows debut in the fall while only two or three
survive after the first year.
Misery loves company and the high ratings enjoyed by tabloid trash
television shows are in large part, a  reflection of people with similar
lives.
Nominated for 10 Oscars in 1976, including Best Picture and Best
Director (Sidney Lumet), 'Network', as I mentioned, won Best Actor and
Actress Oscars for Peter Finch and Faye Dunaway.  Finch died before the
awards were given out and received his award posthumously.  In addition
to the acting awards won by Finch and Dunaway, Beatrice Straight won the
Best Supporting Actress Oscar as Max Schumacher's tortured wife living
with the reality that her husband is in love with and is having an
affair with another woman.  Straight's performance is an example of why
the Supporting acting categories were created.  She only appears in a
couple of scenes but they are brimming with talent and a convincing
portrayal of her character.  The most unique performance in 'Network'
comes from Ned Beatty who plays the top executive in the television
company who delivers his philosophy of the corporate world like a
television evangelist.  He received a Best Supporting Actor nomination
and finally, William Holden was nominated along side Finch for Best
Actor.  Not many films get the distinction of having five cast members
nominated for Oscars, and as of 1997, 'Network' and 1951's 'A Streetcar
Named Desire' remain the only two films to receive three Academy Awards
for acting.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association' at:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
I was reminded throughout 'Twilight' that with all of the
accomplishments the creators of this film have had that none of them
turn in their best work and they didn't intend to.  With an Elmer
Bernstein score to keep things running, if you closed your eyes, you
would swear that a film from the 1940's or 50's was being played out,
with the exception of a few four letter words of unnecessary choice for
the tone of this movie's intended audience.  It isn't limited to only
fans of those old gumshoe adventures involving murder, sex, seduction,
blackmail, or otherwise, but it is a film more suited to those who know
the history of its leading actors and the dangling intrigue of suspense
thrillers.
At 73 years young, Paul Newman has the masculine prowess of a man 15
years younger and although he sports an unwanted mustache (women will
like it), he still manages to give it all he can and succeeds
magnificently.  Newman stars as a former police officer and former
private investigator who now dabbles in the occasional assignment,
mostly for his friends, a couple of former Hollywood stars, portrayed by
Gene Hackman and Susan Sarandon.
At the beginning of the film, Newman is in Mexico to bring Hackman and
Sarandon's daughter (a minor at 17) back to the States and he encounters
a rough time as the girl knocks his gun loose and nearly shoots off
his....*ahem*, you figure it out.
Newman is asked by Hackman to deliver a package and encounters a few 9mm
rounds fired at him in the attempt.  Newman later discovers that someone
could be blackmailing his friends as they are possibly implicated in the
mysterious death of Sarandon's first husband and that is all I will tell
you about the inner complexities plot.
Almost 70 himself, Gene Hackman plays his role with a sense of
simplistic style, naive of his wife's infidelities and his health begins 
to fail.  He collapses one night from assumed heart failure and tries to
contact Newman who hears him on his answering machine and Sarandon jumps
out of Newman's bed, complete with his recognizable polo shirt on and
comes to Hackman's aid, exposing the affair.
Susan Sarandon is sultry in the role of the cheating wife and throw in
James Garner for good measure as a cop turned high paid security chief
and you have the makings for all the conflicting elements of human
nature and the mix for a great set of actors to recite some snappy
dialogue written by Robert Benton and Richard Russo and directed by
Benton who last directed Newman in 'Nobody's Fool', from 1994.  Benton 
is the owner of three Oscars including his writing and directing efforts
on 1979's 'Kramer vs. Kramer', which also won Best Picture.
Not a classic film but a film done with class, 'Twilight' is a fitting 
title bestowed upon a cast whose best work is probably behind them and 
they can now choose work more subtle because they don't need 
the challenges of motion pictures and their past work shows they have
nothing left to prove.  A mild success which many may mistake as
being unnecessarily tame.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Pest, The (1997)
     Since Jim Carrey started earning twenty million dollars per film, there
has been a fever running through Hollywood to try and do the same.  For most
comedians, the more you try, the more you will fail because Carrey is a
unique if somewhat unoriginal comedian.  John Leguizamo falls flat on his
face with an unfunny farce of a totally unbelievable nature called 'The
Pest'.
     Leguizamo parades his way through this movie invoking almost every
cultural stereotype and while the film intends to be humourous, it ends up as
a racist and unacceptably lame movie.  A Miami con man (Leguizamo) who is in
debt fifty thousand dollars to the 'Scottish' mob, acepts an invitation to an
exotic island by a German businessman (Jeffrey Jones).  He is told there is
an opportunity for a special scholarship but in reality he's the target for
Jones who is a hunter and enjoys collecting the heads of every race of people
on Earth.
     Get this.  Leguizamo picks his nose, farts, barfs and is barfed on (IN
THE FACE!)  This movie is an insult to anyone above the age of twelve and for
any adult who shells out money for this, you will come away angry, insulted,
offended and seeing red.
     Leguizamo has emerged in recent years as an up and coming bright actor
but has taken a sharp turn towards ending his career with 'The Pest'.  
     Hollywood certainly lacks fresh and original ideas these days but its
comedies have become pathetic insults on many levels and they have become
self defeating in serving a purpose which is to make people laugh.  This one
will make you sick.  That's all.  I'm too angry to write about this movie
anymore.

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Robert Richardson's familiar light filled cinematography showers scenes of
close up intimacy the way they have in many other films but it is
particularly startling in the case of 'Bringing Out the Dead'.  Set in the
early 90's in New York City, Nicolas Cage stars as a paramedic named Frank
Pierce, a man haunted by the people he couldn't save and has a re-occurring
vision of one particular young woman whom he sees while driving in his
ambulance every time he looks at some of the city's derelicts.  Richardson's
photography echoes the notion of spirituality as those who believe in the
spiritual nature of mankind will connect with the striking camera effects
that give way to believing the soul leaves the body at the moment of death.
Cage's performance as the paramedic is brilliant.  Sort of an up tempo
variation on his performance in 'Leaving Las Vegas'.  In that film from 1995
for which Cage won the Best Actor Oscar, he played an alcoholic L.A. writer
who was determined to move to Las Vegas and drink himself to death within 30
days.  In 'Bringing Out the Dead', Cage looks like he did in the above
mentioned film.  Pale, stressed out with bad hair, bags under his eyes and
an overall structure of a man not in good physical health.  Only this time
the characterization that Cage has brought to the screen is frenzied rather
than sedated.  His colleagues in the paramedic business who travel with him
from time to time are Larry (John Goodman), Marcus (Ving Rhames) and Tom
(Tom Sizemore).  All are men of different personalities.  Larry is the
straight shooter, Marcus envisions himself as sort of an evangelical saviour
of those requiring his services and Tom is the foul and nasty individual who
hates his job and acts like a jerk every step of the way.
Director Martin Scorsese has made a relentless and lacerating film and this
film is vintage Scorsese.  It reaps with scenes of hollow urban destitution
like 'Mean Streets', and 'Taxi Driver'.  When Scorsese is on target with his
visuals, he photographs and cuts his films with mesmerizing accuracy.
Scorsese keeps 'Bringing Out the Dead' from being just another NYC story of
grit and keeps a re-occurring theme elevated for the film's entire running
time.  Frank Pierce (Cage) is seen at the beginning of the film responding
to a call where an elderly man has had a heart attack.  Frank befriends his
daughter (Patricia Arquette) and keeps checking on her father's progress
throughout the course of the film.
The film is also like a big screen version of television's 'ER'.  The
emergency room at the hospital has all the characters you would expect to
find in a big city hospital.  There is the stern security guard wearing
sunglasses who is determined to keep order, the head nurse who questions
people as to why the hospital should help people like drug addicts when they
brought these problems on themselves, the head physician who complains that
there is a constant need for space and the repeat patient who is strapped to
a table on wheels in the hallway, going out of his mind because he can't get
his drug fix.
'Bringing Out the Dead' is anything but conventional film making.  Believe
it or not, from all of the problems its characters face as true examples of
human beings, the film has a surprising sense of humour.  Writer Paul
Schrader, whom I have always disliked in most cases and who made the most
depressing film I've ever seen as both writer and director of 1998's
'Affliction', does an excellent job as author of the 'Bringing Out the Dead'
screenplay.  He constructs the film in a manner that grabs your attention
right away from the opening scene and never lets up.  However, a lot of the
credit for this belongs to Joe Connelly, who wrote the novel on which this
film is based.  The only thing that prevents this movie from being a five
star accomplishment is that it is not an entirely new version of events from
either Scorsese, Cage of Schrader.  As good as the film is, it is the
definition of re-invention.  You can see that all involved are doing a
variation on past work and consequently, it just misses being a great film
but is excellent film making but won't bring Scorsese the long awaited Oscar
he deserves and may some day win.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
     Three in a row.  'Reservoir Dogs', 'Pulp Fiction' and now 'Jackie
Brown'.  An impressive string of films over five years for Quentin Tarantino
who proves he's the director of his generation with 'Jackie Brown'.  This is
another examination of colourful, low-life characters in the big city
(Tarantino likes the L.A. area) and the amount of violence is restrained and
the innuendo the film uses is brilliantly amplified by its cast.  A
relatively small cast this time as well.  Twelve actors and their characters
were the focus of 'Pulp Fiction' and 'Jackie Brown' has half that number.
John Travolta's first movie after 'Pulp Fiction' came out in 1994 was 'Get
Shorty' in 1995 and that film was based on the novel by Elmore Leonard.  I
wonder if it's just a co-incidence that 'Jackie Brown', Tarantino's first
film as a director since 'Pulp Fiction' is also based on an Elmore Leonard
novel, this one entitled 'Rum Punch'. 
     Pam Grier, a 70's actress is resurrected in the same manner in which
Tarantino brought back John Travolta probably hoping he could salvage
another lost talent.  I don't think this film will do as much for Pam
Grier's career compared to what 'Pulp Fiction' did for John Travolta but she
is a fascinating and strong protagonist who holds her own with the other
actors. 
     Samuel L. Jackson is an illegal gun dealer with Robert De Niro is his
sidekick and 
pseudo partner just released from prison.  Bridget Fonda is Jackson's
live-in girlfriend, Michael Keaton is an ATF (A lcohol, T obacco and F
irearms) agent and Robert Forster has the film's most cleverly under played
role as a bail bondsman helping Grier execute the perfect scam. 
     Grier is a flight attendant with a criminal past who now works for a
bottom rate airline and she's caught in illegal trafficking before boarding
by Keaton and another agent and has to make a deal to help catch Jackson.
Jackson, meanwhile, is attempting to get a friend out of jail using Forster
as his bail bondsman.  Grier works out a scam to get rich, rid Jackson from
her life as he is trying to kill her to prevent her from giving the police
information about his business and she wants to walk away from the
authorities free and clear all at the same time.  It's a very complicated
double cross which can't and for the purposes of spoiling the picture, won't
be explained here. 
     As I'm sure you recall if you've seen the film, 'Pulp Fiction' used a
brilliant patch of returning to previous story lines and didn't tell its
story in total sequence. Tarantino does something similar in retracing a
scene near the film's last half hour which shows many different ways the
characters split and then divulges the consequences of their actions.  I
suppose this format of story telling will be Tarantino's trademark in the
future. 
     I can't stress the point strongly enough that although parallels can be
drawn between any two films just as they've been drawn in this review of
'Jackie Brown' to the points in 'Pulp Fiction', that it is only fair to
judge any movie on its own merit and if you forget about 'Pulp Fiction' and
relax and follow the trappings of 'Jackie Brown', it will be a much more
satisfying experience. 
     The entire cast has just the right amount of spotlight to match their
importance in the film's story line and Tarantino proves again that he has
the perfect skill for making the most important part of any film, the
script, crackle and vibrate with the most memorable dialogue written by
anyone working in today's film industry.  
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
How many people remember when Bill Clinton, soon after being elected in
1992, appeared in the spring of 1993 mingling with a group of working
folks, complete with a hard-hat, tool belt and work boots.  Clinton took
it upon himself, after the meeting, to discipline an aide using
profanity after the aide supposedly stepped out of line during the
address.  This was evident as the President's microphone was still on
and the media had a field day.  In fairness to Clinton, every politician
has two faces, one for the cameras, and one for the private
confrontations with staff, family members and advisers.  What's the
point of all this?  Simple, 'Primary Colors' gives us an insight into
the REAL people running for office.
In 1995's 'The American President', Michael Douglas portrayed a stable
and popular President who was seen spending time with his daughter over
her school work, playing pool in private with his chief of staff and
courting a young woman with all the style, personality and conflict of
regular people.  Although 'Primary Colors' takes a deeper and more
iconoclastic look at politics on a much different scale, it has
chronological scenes of strategic planning necessary to win a political
campaign and it manages to entertain and inform while being precariously
off beat.
The major players are John Travolta, simulating brilliantly, a very
Clinton-like Presidential candidate, complete with the right hair,
weight and upbeat, pleasant southern accent.  Given the name Jack
Stanton by screenwriter Elaine May, 'Primary Colors' is based on the
novel by Anonymous, now revealed to be former Newsweek writer Joe Klein
and Stanton's mannerism is that of a man who cares about the people,
even in private as his campaign candidly admits that their political
tricks are a defensive mechanism to prevent the status quo from stealing
the election.  One scene has Stanton sitting alone in a doughnut shop
talking to a doughnut baker and night server, an employee who works long
hours for little money.  Stanton realizes that these are the real
people, the majority avoiding the trappings of special interest.  It's a
very memorable scene.
At his side is Stanton's wife and aspiring first lady, portrayed
impressively by Emma Thompson who loses her English accent completely to
play an American.  Stanton is joined in his quest for the White House by
Henry Burton (Adrian Lester), who is the grandson of a civil rights
leader and the story is told largely from his point of view.  Billy Bob
Thornton ('Sling Blade') is an adviser to Stanton who never lets his
true redneck colors interfere with the strategy of winning the people
over.  Rounding out the perennial cast of memorable players is Kathy
Bates as a political spin doctor, brought in to counter the dirty tricks
of Stanton's opponents.  Her contribution to the film is of the highest
calibre and she is already a candidate for a Supporting Actress Oscar
next year.
'Primary Colors' asks us to believe nothing,.  Using very adult language
and situations, it only intends to expose the inner workings of a
presidential campaign as its running time of 2 hours and 23 minutes is a
swift one as director Mike Nichols re-invents the characters situations
many times to seem like their fresh when they are really relevant to the
previous scenes of vigour, reality and determination to conquer the only
cherished object of politics.....power.  And while the film lacks a
certain amount of depth, it makes up for it by itemizing the true nature
of what politicians are, fallible human beings like the rest of us.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
'Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil'
     In its running time of 153 minutes, I'm sure there is a fairly decent
movie contained within 'Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil'.  The
problem is that it has so many plodding scenes of irrelevancy that it makes
it difficult to appreciate the film fully.  Beginning in Savannah, Georgia
in 1981, it looks at southern culture, not stereotypes as some may think and
has a broad range of characters like the title suggests.  Some good, some
evil and some whose intentions remain unclear by the end of the film.  It
makes no secret of the fact that at its core it is not just a morality tale
but first and above all else it is a character study.
     John Berendt's novel is now a big screen motion picture directed by the
master 
of drawn out film making, Clint Eastwood.  Don't misunderstand, I love
Eastwood as much as the next person but in almost every one of his films
where he serves as director, there is a need to tighten up his film's
midsection badly.  It looks as if Eastwood feels it is necessary to show an
audience every single frame of his films and doesn't know what to leave on
the cutting room floor.  
     John Cusack is a writer for a New York City magazine who travels to
Savannah to write an article on the town's high society while attending a
party held by a dapper southern gentleman (Kevin Spacey).  He mingles, mixes
and observes the people in their genuine surroundings in perfect fashion and
comes to the conclusion that he will write a book instead.  He comes to this
conclusion after leaving the party and heading back to the scene later when
police and emergency vehicles surround Spacey's mansion and question the
party's host about the shooting of a man with whom Spacey has had an
unsuccessful confrontation about personal affairs.    
     Involved in Cusack's life before, during and after the murder trail
that follows 
are a young southern belle played by Alison Eastwood (Clint's daughter), the
town's transvestite (Lady Chablis) and a symbolic character named Minerva
(the wonderful Irma P. Hall) who is a voodoo worshipper and tries to
foretell spiritual clashes between this world and the next as the film
digests its plot line with an outcome debating whether or not justice was
done while mixing in religious overtones and shades of satire at the same time.
     In summing up the film best it would be appropriate to say that it is
painfully 
slow at times and has many scenes of dialogue not very interesting to the
film's central focus but after seeing the whole thing you'll find that the
film packs a peculiar power despite its shortcomings.  I'm just not sure you
would want to sit through it a second time.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Paulie (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When 'Babe' came out in 1995, it surprised critics with its stunning
quantity of special effects which enabled farm animals to talk by
simulating lip movement through computers and the magic went farther
than that by combining mechanical creatures with real ones.  Seven
Academy Award nominations were inspired by that film (including Best
Picture) and it won one for Visual Effects.  No doubt inspired by the
antics of 'Babe', 'Paulie' is a clever little film in its own right.
No doubt cynics will attack it for its simplicity, forgetting that
children are the main audience and many will trash the film as a direct
copy of 'Babe', when in fact it stands on its own merit by using
primarily one animal to carry the film instead of many.  There are a
couple of brief scenes involving a few talking creatures, but one
character dominates in the end.
Paulie is a little talking parrot.  All parrots can talk, you say?
Maybe, but how many can carry a conversation, think like and concoct
their own words like a human?  Only in the movies.  The first time we
see Paulie is in the basement of a scientific institute where he sort of
befriends a janitor, a Russian immigrant named Misha (Tony Shalhoub).
They talk and Paulie tells his story of how he ended up there in the
first place.  He comes in to the world and is cared for by a little girl
named Marie, a child with a serious speech impediment.  The girl's
parents begin to worry that the little girl is starting to confuse the
fantasy world with the real one, after she claims the bird can talk like
a human and the parents send the bird away breaking Marie's heart.
Paulie one day hopes to be reunited with her.
Paulie ends up in a New York City pawn shop whose owner (Buddy Hackett)
puts a high price on selling Paulie and he is eventually cared for by a
kindly old lady (Gena Rowlands) who takes Paulie to find Marie in Los
Angeles.  Paulie eventually pushes himself to fly after convincing
himself for ages that he couldn't.  He ends up in Los Angeles and
befriends a Spanish musician (Cheech Marin) and Paulie ends up working
for a con man (Jay Mohr), but later realizes that what he's doing is
wrong.   The interesting thing is that Mohr, in addition to playing the
con man, also provides Paulie's voice in the film.
Kids were extremely well behaved at the matinee performance which I
attended and that has to say something about the quality of the film.
No animal makes for better entertainment in movie jokes than a parrot.
I'm thinking of the peg legged Peter Sellers in one of the Pink Panther
movies where the inflatable bird he had on the shoulder of his pirate
costume popped off after being over inflated and the scene where a
parrot laughs at Clouseau and goes to the bathroom on his shoulder after
Clouseau sticks his finger in a light bulb socket and feels the effects
of lethal electrocution.
This is such a simple movie that I don't want to say too much and ruin
it for kids who may be reading this except to say that 'Paulie' is a
truly touching film that entertained me more than the most recent heart
warming animal feature I saw last year, 'Air Bud', and if you thought
3.5 out of 5 was a high rating for 'Air Bud', look out cynics, 'Paulie'
is better.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
Who was the most annoying character in 1995's 'Babe'?  Farmer Arthur
Hoggett's wife, of course, as portrayed by Magda Szubanski.  Just our
luck that she is the main human character in this sequel to the Oscar
nominated film and this movie is protracted, dark, idiotic and lame
brained.  What made 'Babe' such a big hit in 1995 is that the
computerized special effects (which won as Oscar), made the animals seem
like they were REALLY talking!  I'm glad this film is failing at the box
office because money was the only motivation behind this mess of a movie
that will make you despise monkeys, loathe hotels and never desire to
see Mickey Rooney in another movie.  He is a true screen legend and I
can't figure out why he would degrade himself in a film like this in a
part that is clearly intended for a no name actor staggering off of the
unemployment line.  The film has no script, mechanized direction and
screeching slapstick that falls flat on its face.
Farmer Hoggett (James Cromwell) is injured in an accident on the farm
and Babe and Mrs. Hoggett make a trip to the big city because Babe is in
demand right now for making guest appearances all over the world since
he won the sheep herding contest at the end of the last film.  The
reason for the trip is that it will mean a big pay day for the Hoggett's
and the money will save their farm from its creditors.  James Cromwell
appears for about five minutes at the beginning of the sequel and five
minutes at the end.  Since he was nominated as Best Supporting Actor for
the first film, I would say this is a big let down for the audience.
Upon arriving in "the city", it is a combination of all the cities in
the world as things devised by computer for the film as seen from the
hotel window view are the Eifel tower in Paris, the Statue of Liberty in
New York City, the HOLLYWOOD sign in California and the CN tower in
Toronto Canada.
Mrs. Hoggett meets the Olive Oyl type landlady of the hotel (Mary Stein)
who is also an annoying character.  Babe has a run in with a troupe of
monkeys who live in the hotel with a seemingly drunken circus clown
(Mickey Rooney) who doesn't utter a word for the two minutes or so that
he's seen on screen.  The monkeys are mean spirited and they hold Babe
against his will for an appearance in their circus and children may find
this a bit frightening as the whole circus routine is done in extremely
bad taste ending in a fire at a children's hospital???!!!
Babe befriends a bull terrier, meets other oddities from the animal
world and the film goes around and around in circles without a real pay
off and anyone above the age of 4 who enjoys this film is in serious
trouble.  This film tries to be different from the first movie but in
its attempt, it is disorganized, clumsy, and has no charm at all.
The film's climax has too many humans in it and the human characters as
a whole are given too much screen time in this one and while Babe
remains a cute and likable character, the only redeeming quality this
film has is the rascally duck from the first film and the message that a
lot of animals are indeed more likable than a lot of people.  Big deal.
We already know that!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
     Despite popular belief, director James Cameron's first film was not
'The Terminator' (1984) but was in fact a lousy and ultimately
forgettable effort in 1981 entitled 'Piranha II: The Spawning'.
Although 'The Terminator' did put Cameron on the map as a major player
in the motion picture industry, his progress was swift and captivating
and his vision was clearly that of a perfectionist attempting to better
himself with each project.  His heart pounding sequel to 1979's 'Alien'
had the same title but was cleverly billed in plural fashion entitled
'Aliens'.  A subtle little message that struck the public as sounding
better than the original and it was.  His films that followed included
'The Abyss' (1989) which was technically efficient but now has dated
special effects with a pretentious ending and 'Terminator 2: Judgment
Day' which had superior technology compared with 'The Terminator' but
had less edge.   'True Lies' (1994) was a ridiculously smug film with a
midsection that dragged in a manner unsuitable for a Cameron film.
James Cameron is no longer measured only as a director caught up in the
advancements of movie technology but has struck a nerve with his ability
to measure and balance academic creativity, emotion and tremendously
chilling special effects in 'Titanic'.
     A landmark film in every sense of the word, 'Titanic' will do
several things to revolutionize film after having done things that have
already made history.  To date, it is the most expensive film ever
produced at a cost of 200 million dollars.  It was criticized heavily by
the mainstream media as being too much for its own good to be successful
but Cameron insisted on nurturing the film drastically and avoided the
planned release for the summer of 1997 and has instead held off until
the Christmas season.  The computerized visual effects are brilliant and
are the best to date in any film using them.  I saw 'Titanic' in a brand
new movie theatre built in my area recently and witnessed it on a 65
foot screen and I couldn't spot one crop mark in the computer
enhancements of major scenes.  To its advantage, much of the movie takes
place at night so spotting the crop marks is hard but it does things new
in blending computers, reality and good old fashioned elbow grease on
the part of the film's crew.  It will also make superstars out of its
two leading characters played by Leonardo DiCaprio and Kate Winslet and
it will put Cameron on the map as a serious director of stamina and
sheer talent who has the potential of  holding his own with Steven
Spielberg, Oliver Stone, Martin Scorsese and other important directors
and creative artists of his generation.
     Also written by Cameron, 'Titanic' is a film that is so attractive
and mesmerizing simply because it thrives to visualize detail in every
capacity of the famous historic tragedy.  It is a true story.  Dubbed as
an unsinkable vessel by its creators and promoted through the corporate
arrogance that built it and eventually destroyed it through sheer
excess, on April 15, 1912, the luxury liner 'Titanic' on its maiden
voyage hit an iceberg in the North Atlantic Ocean, cracked in two pieces
down the middle and sank, killing 1,500 people while 700 survived.  The
breakdown of law and order, the display of cruelty sheltering the
wealthy to safety first while middle class and lower class passengers
die in larger numbers and the reigning chaos of the overall climax make
'Titanic' a classic film destined for a special place in film history.
It looks and feels like nothing Hollywood has ever produced before.
It's historical accuracy and significance are mixed with a fictional
story taking place in the mix of things.
     It begins in the present day with a salvage team attempting to
recover some of the ship's preserved treasure.  Among their find is a
drawing of a beautiful woman posing nude on a sofa.  Parts of the
picture suitable for television broadcast are made public and a 100 year
old survivor of that fateful night (Gloria Stuart) comes forward
claiming to be the woman in the picture.  She meets with the salvage
team and its leader (Bill Paxton) and tells them her story of the events
leading up to her encounter with history.  The film then flashes back in
time as she is shown as a young woman (Kate Winslet), getting on the
ship as a lady of high society with the man she is planning to marry
(Billy Zane, the film's villain and rich snob you want to see die).  She
meets a peasant with a heart of dignity and splendidly down to Earth
qualities (Leonardo DiCaprio) with whom she falls in love.
     And that's the key to the film's success.  A love story with real
impact and credible shades of passion, it is the most important blend of
movie making since the love story in 1965's 'Doctor Zhivago' set against
another historical event, the Russian revolution of 1917.  At a running
time of 194 minutes (3 hours and 14 minutes) 'Titanic' does something
uncanny and something I've never seen before.  It begins its climax at
exactly the 100 minute (1 hour and 40 minute) mark which is
approximately only halfway through as the ship hits the iceberg with the
results that follow.  It is impossible for an audience to be put to
sleep at anytime as the film spends every minute of its running time
telling the tale that needs to be told and leaving nothing out and
including nothing irrelevant.  It is all set to an incredible and moody
music score that is deeply moving courtesy of James Horner who has done
some of his best work that ranks with his classic scores of 'Field of
Dreams', 'Apollo 13' and 'Braveheart'.  Momentum is built slowly and in
an eerie manner that plays out like a nightmare with moral choices being
made every step of the way by the film's characters.
     'Titanic' has an emotionally crushing and yet strangely
satisfactory conclusion which is memorable and avoids the status quo.
It is an early and very serious contender for the Best Picture Academy
Award and its recognition in that category would be significant as it
will find a positive place with historians, film critics and both
general and rabid movie patrons and that appeal is hard to ignore.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
Kevin Bacon usually does his best work as a character actor. His three best
performances are in 'Sleepers' (1996) where he played a sexually abusive and
brutally violent reform school guard.  In 'Murder in the First' (1995), he
played a man driven to the brink of insanity after being locked in the
solitary confinement wing of prison for too long and in 'JFK', he played a
male prostitute with a passion for wanting to tell the truth and his low
rent state of mind displayed a protracted passion for political ignorance.
Despite his great work, Bacon has never been nominated for an Academy award.
Some of my friends liked his work in 1992's 'A Few Good Men' and 1994's 'The
River Wild' and it's hard to ignore him in those films as well.
"We bury our dead alive, don't we?"  This is a quote from an episode of
television's 'The X-Files'.  An observation is made in that episode that
conscience is really the dead talking to us, those who have died violent
deaths and cry out for justice.  An interesting theory and the idea of
paranormal intrigue involving the dead has long been a fascinating part of
going to the movies.  But how many film makers and actors get it right?
Hypnosis.  How much do we really know about it?  According to what we learn
in 'Stir of Echoes', only about 8 per cent of the population can really go
under its influence.  If this is true, Tom Witzky (Kevin Bacon in a good
leading role) is one of the 8 per cent.  Tom and his wife Maggie (Kathryn
Erbe) attend a house party in their Chicago neighbourhod one evening where
the subject of hypnosis comes up and Tom agrees to be put under the spell by
his sister-in-law Lisa (Ileana Douglas).  Shortly after he is in a complete
trance, Tom begins to experience flashes of psychic visions involving a dead
teenage girl and her spirit roaming about in his home and around the
neighbourhood.  This is a part of the plot carried out for the entire film.
We learn that the Witzky's son Jake (Zachary David Cope) can see the ghost
of dead people.  And now dad begins to exhibit some of the same
characteristics.  A clever way to portray this in the movie.  Usually, in
other films, we see the eldest members of the family with this sense come
forward first and then the children but in this case it comes naturally to
the child while dad has it buried in his sub conscious mind and has it
brought out by the magic of hypnosis.
'Stir of Echoes' is a mind numbing and adrenalin pumping thriller that uses
the supernatural, a thrilling sub text and crime as its main elements of
entertainment.  As the film progresses, it appears to make no sense
whatsoever, a merry go round of unpleasant images that don't seem to tell us
anything.  But then it clicks in in an anti-climactic manner to illustrate
why it kept stringing us along from the start.
The film is based on the novel 'A Stir of Echoes' by Richard Matheson whose
other novel 'What Dreams May Come', was brought to the big screen in 1998
starring Robin Williams as a man who goes to heaven but learns his wife is
in hell and strives to bring her back with him to eternal paradise.
Matheson has a fascination with fantasy but 'Stir of Echoes' is more than
that.  It's an honest and genuine thriller that sends shivers down one's
spine and I was very impressed with writer/director David Koepp's ability to
keep the chills coming and keep the whole thing seem credible to feed the
notion that things displayed in this film are possible if you believe the
ideas of some theologians and people who make a habit documenting the
paranormal experience.
I immediately drew comparisons from this film to 1983's 'The Dead Zone' and
this year's 'The Sixth Sense'.  Those films have a more human look to them
that 'Stir of Echoes'.  A more calculating sense of emotion if you will.
But for all of its effort, 'Stir of Echoes' stops just short of being a
great character study.  It seems more concerned with the chills than with
developing great characters all around.  It still manages to haunt us with
the miraculous wonder of great storytelling and it may be one of the year's
defining films that keeps in check with the definition of "on the edge of
your seat".
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
Kevin Costner was on top of the world at the end of the 1980's.  He had 'The
Untouchables', 'Bull Durham' and 'Field of Dreams' all on his list of
accomplishments and he still would win two Oscars for directing and
co-producing 'Dances With Wolves' in 1990 and would give his best
performance ever in 1991's 'JFK'.  How things change.  By the end of the
1990's, Costner has had a string of turkeys and/or lukewarm projects far
below his potential.  'Waterworld' and 'The Postman' would bring him severe
ridicule (although I thoroughly enjoyed and rated 'The Postman' highly).
All actors struggle at some point in their career but it's been an 8 year
struggle for Costner now and things don't get any better with 'For Love of
the Game'.
In this film, Costner plays Billy Chapel, a 19 year pitching veteran of the
Detroit Tigers.  The opening credits show newspaper headlines and home
movies of Chapel's early life throwing the ball around with his father and
his rise from the little leagues to the minor leagues to the major leagues.
Set for a place in the hall of fame, Chapel is about to come face to face
with his most important game ever as he takes the mound at the loneliest
place in baseball, as a visiting player at Yankee Stadium.
As he is the midst of pitching a perfect game, Chapel reflects on his past,
predominantly on his 5 year relationship with a writer named Jane Aubrey
(Kelly Preston) and her teenage daughter (Jena Malone).  Costner's
reflection on the past is not an easy one since he met face to face with
Jane on this game day and she tells him she is ending their relationship and
moving to London to accept a better job.
When I first read about the plot for this film where Chapel reflects on his
past while possibly pitching a perfect game, I assumed we would see Billy
Chapel in his glory days as a player and the many things that a pitcher
remembers.  Winning his first World Series, hitting his first batter, being
involved in his first bench clearing brawl and his overall relationship with
baseball and his fellow team mates.  Instead, the film takes a shallow and
overly repetitive turn and reflects only on Costner's romantic past with the
woman in his life so the film turns out to be more about the needless
romantic sub plot instead of about the game that Costner says he loves.
This is a major disappointment, especially to people such as myself who
truly love baseball.
Using baseball as a metaphor for 'Field of Dreams' worked because that film
possessed a dream like quality about life's transcending moments of regret,
the desire to fulfill dreams and the question of whether there is another
world after this one.  It was a film that had hypnotic beauty and looked
very original.  'Bull Durham' was an authentic look at life on the road in
the minor leagues but the film was riddled with too much sexual innuendo and
I have never really enjoyed it very much as it failed to nail down what it
was REALLY about.
'For Love of the Game' is written by Dana Stevens based on the novel by
Michael Shaara and is directed with ordinary tendencies by Sam Raimi who
made 1998's 'A Simple Plan' which was very depressing but was better film
making than this movie which has absolutely no memorable qualities
whatsoever and is just another exercise in telling another love story which
neither convinces us that the people involved really care about each other
nor does it do anything for the game of baseball.  Incidentally, if you've
seen a particular clip from the advertising spots for the film and know the
plot going in, it won't be too hard for you to figure out whether or not
Chapel gets his perfect game.  If Costner is smart, maybe he will make a
truly authentic baseball movie to celebrate the game he is crazy about.
Maybe a biography of a famous player would be a good idea.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When Robert Redford won the Academy award for his direction of 'Ordinary
People' in 1980, I was surprised.  Not because of any lacking talent on
Redford's part, because his nurturing of each character in that film was
nothing short of brilliant.  What surprised me was that the director's
branch of the Academy would actually choose someone who primarily stood
out as an actor.  I suppose if you count 1948's 'Hamlet' in which
Laurence Olivier starred and also directed, it would not be something
entirely new because for that film, Olivier was nominated for directing
himself and the other actors and scored the Oscar prize for his
performance in that film and in the last several years, in 1990, 1992,
and 1995, we have seen actors such as Kevin Costner, Clint Eastwood and
Mel Gibson all come away with the Academy Award as Best Director for
directing themselves in their films.  Redford has now directed himself.
Surprisingly, in all of Redford's other films, 'Ordinary People', 'The
Milagro Beanfield War', and 'Quiz Show', Redford has been absent in
front of the camera.
In 'The Horse Whisperer', Redford stars as an expert horseman who runs a
ranch in Montana and is contacted by a New York City magazine editor
(Kristin Scott Thomas) for some help in dealing with an injured horse
and the trauma of her thirteen year old daughter (Scarlett Johansson)
who has lost half of her right leg in a horrible riding accident.
Redford senses by the telephone conversation he's having with Thomas
that there isn't much he can do to help her and he hangs up on her
rather abruptly but not rudely and she is determined to seek help for
her daughter.  She travels from NYC to Montana with her daughter (who
rides in the back seat) and the horse is transported in a hitched
trailer.  The daughter is not only bitter about her situation but by the
loss of her friend's life in the accident and by her naive certainty
that her mother is just doing this for her own selfish benefit and
believes her mother cares little for her injuries or for the horse.
Their arrival in Montana is somewhat awkward as Redford is not expecting
them and Thomas doesn't know what to expect from him.  Upon seeing the
horse for the first time, Redford's keen instinct and feel for the
animal give the film its emotional core as the feelings for this grand
beast are made to seem, and, frankly, they are as important as the
feelings we have for the human characters.  Redford uses effective shots
of the horse's one eye on the screen from time to time.  Sometimes the
left, sometimes the right and sometimes both of them and along with
little glimpses of the horse's ears perking up at the right moment and
its galloping in both rehabilitation and in its own maverick tendencies,
the film remains solid.
A mild romance develops between Redford and Thomas but rather than turn
the film into a soap opera by opening the audience's chest and massaging
our hearts openly with his bare hands, Redford uses a more hypnotic and
imaginative style of presentation that stays within the traditions of
pure generational film making.  'The Horse Whisperer' is easily a film
that could have been made anytime in the last 70 years of movie making
and that is its strongest quality.  It's for all ages.  A grandparent
will enjoy it as much as their grandson or granddaughter.  The factory
worker will like it as much as a doctor or lawyer.  Its appeal is as
broad as its story.
Director of photography Robert Richardson (Oscar winner for 1991's
'JFK'), deserves high praise for his towering images.  Richardson is a
patient cameraman, waiting for the right clouds to pass, the right
illumination of light, the right light to bend and bounce and he
captures much of the landscape from high aerial shots which are perfect
in matching the film's visual style to its highly charged dramatic
story.  The last shot is a classic.  You'll remember it long after you
leave the theatre.  You can't say that about too many movies.  The film
is also crisply edited for a real thrust in dealing with the flavour of
a western story.
Screenwriters Eric Roth ('Forrest Gump') and Richard LaGravenese ('The
Fisher King') have adapted the film from the novel by Nicholas Evans and
while I have not read the novel, I understand Redford has changed its
ending.  Less than 5% per cent of the population read books and less
than 20% read newspapers so if changing the ending of a book works for
the creation of a motion picture, I see nothing wrong with it.
Redford directs himself very well in this film and gets a performance
from Kristin Scott Thomas that has real edge and she really moved me.
I, personally, have found her to be a very frigid actress in other
films.  I had no sympathy for her self destructive character in 'The
English Patient' but the real magic in this film is from young Scarlett
Johansson.  Her transformation in personality from a bitter, traumatized
accident victim to a spirited youth, as she was at the beginning of the
film, before the accident, is truly great screen acting which I hope
brings her an Oscar nomination.
I remember predicting in May of 1995 that 'Braveheart' would make it all
the way to the Academy Awards and now in May of 1998, I am predicting
the same for 'The Horse Whisperer'.  Will it win Best Picture?  It's too
early to tell but if it isn't on the list of the final five, that will
be a shame.  Its running time of 169 minutes makes it a frontier epic
which strikes at the heart of the human condition and it leaves no stone
unturned and not a single frame of film is mishandled.  This is
Redford's best film.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ben-Hur (1959)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
     Made for 15 million dollars in 1959, 'Ben-Hur' stands the test of
time and is an example of how the screen epic must be presented.  Lavish
in its presentation, it ranks highly as a favourite among fans of the
biblical genre while critics over the years have had mixed feelings
about it.  'Gone With the Wind' and 'Lawrence of Arabia' probably rival
it as the greatest spectacle of all time and 1997's 'Titanic' has won
the same number of Oscars, 11, giving these two films the distinction of
being the most honoured films of all time among their peers.  Some
critics seem to regard 'Ben-Hur' as corny at times, with a phony
emotional tone throughout and I suppose that isn't entirely without
merit.
     Nominated for 14 Oscars and winning 11, 'Titanic' lost in three
categories, Best Actress for Kate Winslet, Best Supporting Actress for
Gloria Stuart and Best Make-Up.  Nominated for 12 Oscars, 'Ben-Hur'
didn't win an Oscar for its screen writer, Karl Tunberg but came away
victorious in every other field of achievement, including Best Picture,
Best Actor (Charlton Heston), Best Supporting Actor (Hugh Griffith) and
Best Director (William Wyler).
     Legendary filmmaker William Wyler had already won two Oscars for
his meticulous direction of such films as 1942's 'Mrs. Miniver' and
1946's 'The Best Years of Our Lives' when he received a third trophy for
handling the hectic panoramic scale of directing 'Ben-Hur'.
     Historians will know that the Roman empire ruled the Earth at the
time Christ was born and that's how 'Ben-Hur' begins its story.  I wish
ABC television would show this film every year at Easter instead of the
inferior 'The Ten Commandments' which has nothing to do with Christ
while 'Ben-Hur's' climax takes place on Good Friday during Christ's
crucifixion and ends with a triumphant re-birth of the human spirit for
the mortals in the film.
     As the year's progress after the birth of the Jesus, Prince Judah
Ben-Hur (Charlton Heston) is re-united with his boyhood friend Messala
(Stephen Boyd) and the two of them would soon become mortal enemies.
The scene where they meet for the first time and embrace each other as
friends is a scene that director Wyler had them do over and over again
and a rumoured 140 takes is said to have been collected.  The Roman
empire's persecution of the Jews leads the Jewish prince himself to
plead for freedom for his people, much to the resistance of Messala,
whose only goal is power and to end up at the side of Caesar.
     There is a central theme of noble family love in 'Ben-Hur' as
Ben-Hur's mother and sister are the most important things in his life.
After breaking off his friendship with Messala, an accident occurs which
injures a high ranking Roman official and Ben-Hur and his family are
accused of attempted assassination and without a trial, the mother and
sister are imprisoned  to an underground dungeon and eventually develop
leprosy while Ben-Hur is sentenced as a prisoner to serve as a slave on
the Roman galley ships, chained to the floor and forced to row the ship
with other slaves.  During a fierce battle, Ben-Hur saves the life of a
Roman officer, played by Jack Hawkins who adopts him as a son and he
returns to his life of nobility and continues his search for his mother
and sister.
     In the time after his re-birth, Ben-Hur meets an Arab sheik (Hugh
Griffith) with a magnificent stable of four Arabian white horse that
will compete in the annual chariot race which Messala has won
consecutively for the past four years.  Griffith is an example of how
actors can contribute a relatively small part to a film but still be
memorable and Griffith won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar as the film's
comic relief and ally to Ben-Hur.  The scene where he negotiates a bet
with the Romans and a scene where he talks tenderly to his horses,
earned Griffith the well deserved honour he received.  It is the chariot
race that makes 'Ben-Hur' the spectacular film that it is as errors
during the filming of it were left in as a convincing example of what
might have been and were appropriate for inclusion into the film's final
cut.  There is, however, the continuity error of one of the cast
actually wearing a gold watch during this scene, giving away its 20th
century identity and the scene where Charlton Heston flies out of the
chariot and then climbs back in was said to be "unrehearsed".
     The film's religious sub-text is tastefully presented as we see
Jesus only from the back, as no mortal knows what he truly looks like
and his two scenes of confrontation with Ben-Hur will bring a tear to
the eye of even the least sentimental movie fan.
     At a running time of 212 minutes (3 hours and 32 minutes) 'Ben-Hur'
manages to tell a story without including too much of a romantic
sub-plot and it makes its mark as a film of epic proportions not only
with its scale of production but by the size of its historical
importance, a part of history not recognized by all, but for others, it
can be observed as a part of religious culture with debate among all.

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
     If you watch Wolfgang Petersen's 1993 film 'In the Line of Fire'
starring Clint Eastwood as a veteran Secret Service agent you will see in the
closing credits that the film crew actually had support from the authentic
United States Secret Service in making that film.  I want to say from the
start that Wolfgang Petersen's latest film 'Air Force One' is a decent one
and while it isn't a let down, it certainly wasn't as good as some of the
advance reviews I read and the hype that was built up around it.
     Having said that, 'Air Force One' looks to be in contradiction with 'In
the Line of Fire' in the sense that the breakdown of security is a suspicious
one in dealing with the preservation and safety of the world's most powerful
man, the President of the United States.  Certainly it is possible for the
President of any country to fall victim to the violent actions of one or many
predators but you won't believe the ease with which the President's life is
put in danger in this film.
     Harrison Ford plays the President with integrity and credibility and his
plane, Air Force One, is hijacked by a Russian terrorist squad whose leader
(Gary Oldman) is a vengeful squirt who blames the U.S. for the decaying moral
fibre in the now capitalist Russia as well as what he feels are many of the
other unjust situations around the world.  The President's staff and his
family are in constant danger as well and the entire situation is monitored
back at the White House by the Vice President (Glenn Close) and a staff of
military brass, bureaucrats and other observers.  
     I wanted to see Harrison Ford battle the terrorists with his brain
rather than with his muscle (and a few automatic weapons to be sure) and the
cliches the film shows are somewhat tiresome and not very exciting.  Some how
when you see a film like this you know the outcome before the first half hour
is up and 'Air Force One' overall lacks freshness in its presentation.  
     With all that in mind, it is a decent way to spend two hours in a movie
theatre as long as your expectations aren't too high and I can't think of too
many other actors in their mid 50's (Ford is 55) that could pull off the role
of a President with the physical prowess that Ford has since his character is
also a combat veteran and medal of honor winner.  Everyone else in the cast
is good and you'll probably like 'Air Force One' better when it's been over
for five minutes in comparison to thinking about it an hour later.

Title
Review for Great Santini, The (1979)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
He won the Best Actor Oscar in 1983 for 'Tender Mercies' and few actors have
the diversity of Robert Duvall.  Whether or not he uses make-up, accents,
different posturing or anything abundantly coherent to his profession, he
rarely misses the mark.  Duvall got noticed in is film debut as Boo Radley in
'To Kill a Mockingbird' in 1962 and throughout the 60's he took bit parts
here in there in such films as 'Captain Newman, M.D.', 'Countdown', 'Bullitt'
and 'True Grit'.  His big break came in 1972 in a film that launched many
careers, 'The Godfather'.  He received his first Oscar nomination for that
film as Best Supporting Actor and continued throughout the 70's and to this
day perhaps his most under rated role is in Sidney Lumet's 'Network' in 1976
in which he played a ruthless corporate television executive.  Duvall has
perhaps one of the most famous lines in movie history from 1979's 'Apocalypse
Now' in which he proclaims "I love the smell of napalm in the morning".
The next year in 1980, Duvall would truly come into his own as a leading
actor with his first Best Actor Oscar nomination in 'The Great Santini'.
 Adapted for the screen by writer/director Lewis John Carlino from the novel
by Pat Conroy, this intense character study examines a gung ho Marine officer
(Duvall) and the relationship he has with his family in the American south in
1962 which is rocky at times especialy with his eldest son (Michael O'Keefe).
 O'Keefe held his own with Duvall in the film receiving a Best Supporting
Actor nomination for it and what is most interesting about this film is that
the conflicts which arrive in Duvall's life with those around him are so
intense that it's easy to miss the conflict Duvall has with himself in the
picture.  His superior officer tells him he's well on is way to becoming an
alcoholic and one scene has Duvall taking O'Keefe out for his 18th birthday
to celebrate by going on a drinking binge which is a comic point in the film.
 In fact, the opening scene in Spain contains one of the sickest yet
delightful military pranks you will ever see.
What's really important in the film's storyline is the expectation by Duvall
that his son will one day follow in his footsteps but it's not clear if the
boy wants to or not.  There are great differences in their personalities and
it's a hard road in a father/son relationship.  The film contains some sub
plots which make it more diverse and worthwhile.  It has some very funny
moments (military style) and is a film industry buried treasure.  Other
members of the cast include Stan Shaw, Blythe Danner and David Keith.  'The
Great Santini' is Duvall's nickname in the film, a film which strives to
leave the audience with a bigger heart as it comes to a conclusion.

Title
Review for Deliverance (1972)
It's hard to imagine that director John Boorman's harrowing and
hauntingly symmetrical film 'Deliverance' is actually a quarter of a
century old.  Released in 1972 and nominated for three Academy Awards,
Best Picture, Best Director and Best Film Editing (I can't believe
there were no acting nominations), it tells the story of four Georgia
businessmen (Burt Reynolds, Jon Voight, Ned Beatty and Ronny Cox) out
for a weekend of fresh air and the best that nature has to offer and
instead they encounter the worst it has to offer.  The film builds
momentum slowly like a roller coaster riding its tracks to the top and
then releases its fury of adventure and nightmarish commentary on the
human conscience.
The quartet of actors mentioned (it was the film debut of Beatty and
Cox) set out on an expedition to enjoy each other's company and the
company of the outdoors and all is well until they become separated and
Voight and Beatty are left to the tender mercies of two sadistic
mountain men who aspire to violently beat, humiliate and rape them.
Rescued by Reynolds and Cox, one of the mountain men is killed in the
process and the main characters have to decide what to do with the
body.  From that point on they really get to know each other's killer
instinct for survival and primal weakness to be preyed upon.  The real
star of this picture of Reynolds.  Void of a moustache and the
trappings of a 'Smokey and the Bandit' atmosphere Reynolds proved his
acting ability head and shoulders above the rest of the cast as his
portrait of a man who will do anything to survive is both chilling and
brave in the same breath.
Jon Voight is a rather sombre character in the film, perfect to match
Reynolds' personality and Beatty and Cox are equally impressive in
their film debuts as a rape victim and a man lacking the intestinal
fortitude of surviving the conflict of man vs. man.  If you can find a
widescreen version of this true American classic, rent it.  Its scenery
needs to be fully enjoyed to appreciate the entire film and
'Deliverance' is about as realistic a picture as any I have ever seen.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
Canadian comedian Mike Myers is a genuine talent to be relished for his
tactful presentation of comedy both on television and in the movies.  His
humour is gleefully obtuse and sometimes aimed at the very essence of pop
culture and the way he tells a story is interesting not because of the
punchlines he delivers but because of the memories he sometimes invokes.  He
is barely recognizable in his latest film, 'Austin Powers: International Man
of Mystery'.
Myers plays a super duper British spy agent who is frozen in 1967 by science
using cryogenics and is thawed out in 1997 to face his mortal enemy, Dr.
Evil, in the exact same position.  To escape destruction in 1967, Evil used
cryogenics to freeze himself to escape justice.  The movie has a campy and
old fashioned plot of world destruction which literally recognizes its own
absurdity by reference.
Visual gags are multiple in this comical farce which isn't as funny as it
should be at times and has the look of a James Bond movie, t.v.'s classic
series 'Get Smart' and a Mel Brooks deadpan quality to it all rolled into
one.  There are even similarities to television's  'The Man From U.N.C.L.E.'
and 'Mission Impossible'.  There is an unusual amount of sexual references in
'Austin Powers' and that's unusual for a Mike Myers movie but I guess Myers
wanted to escape the trappings of becoming a repetitive comedian and decided
to branch out into more than one dimension of comedy.
Other members of the cast include Elizabeth Hurley, Mimi Rogers and Robert
Wagner.  'Austin Powers' will appeal to a wide audience but its likability
will be restricted to those open minded enough to accept strange occurances
and styles of off beat comedy done with a flair for the obvious.

Title
Review for Chill Factor (1999)
Buddy action movies.  I turned on 'Hooper' with Burt Reynolds the other
night, and he, along with Jan Michael Vincent, portray two stunt men who
aren't exactly close friends, but they respect each other's role in the same
profession.  The good ol' boy movies that Reynolds made famous in the 70's
affected and continue to affect action movies today.
No better example of this is the 'Lethal Weapon' series, which are the buddy
action genre's example of how great a formula can work if it's done
properly.  New and inventive situations eventually run out but flourish when
the ideas are fresh and well in hand.
Sometimes fate chooses us and not the other way around.  In 1996's 'Broken
Arrow', two air men in the military split up a long standing friendship.
One is the good guy (Christian Slater), the other (John Travolta) is the bad
guy.  Travolta's character becomes involved in a plot to steal nuclear
weapons and sell them back to the government while Slater's character tries
to stop him.  Three years later, with 'Chill Factor' we have a movie with
the same type of plot.
Cuba Gooding Jr. is such a great actor.  His Oscar winning role in 'Jerry
Maguire' hasn't seen him in a great role since.  Like Rod Steiger and George
Kennedy, he may suffer from the Oscar curse which plagues people with no
great role after winning the award.  In 'Chill Factor', set in Montana (but
filmed in Utah and South Carolina), Gooding Jr. plays an ice cream delivery
man named Arlo who becomes involved in a plot along with diner shop server
Tim (Skeet involved) to stop a vengeful military man named Capt. Andrew
Brynner (Peter Firth) who is looking for payback after serving a long prison
sentence and is now planning to use a deadly chemical weapon on innocent
people.
Sent to prison a decade earlier, blamed for letting a military experiment go
wrong, Capt. Brynner wants quick cash by holding the deadly weapon and
threatening to use it.  Shades of 1996's 'The Rock' come to mind.  Also, the
chemical that will cause the catastrophe, nicknamed Elvis, will unleash its
fury if it drops below 50 degrees.  Kind of like that bus in 1994's 'Speed'
that would explode with a bomb attached to it if it dropped below 50 miles
per hour.
The movie is layered with a pretty entertaining pace for a film of its kind,
probably the only thing that will save it from being a totally abysmal
failure for something done before and now seen over and over again.  Part
action, part comedy, all complete hokum, 'Chill Factor' suffers from the old
adage that the odds are not in its favour.
The scenery is under used in 'Chill Factor'.  A golden opportunity is wasted
to use the spectacular mountain scenery of a very visual state like Montana.
The action scenes are close up and well edited but not from a lot of
different angles you would expect to really make a movie move.  Virtually
every mode of transportation construction way is used.  There are scenes on
bridges, highways, and rivers.
Making his big screen debut as a director is Hugh Johnson.  His vision shows
some promise.  The characterizations in 'Chill Factor', although stereotyped
on the part of some, are clearly defined.  The film's screenplay by Drew
Gitlin and Mike Cheda is nothing more than a novelty with many plot holes.
A cell phone even works in a tunnel in this movie!!!  I also wondered while
viewing it if it was little more than a marketing tool to boost the career
of Skeet Ulrich.  He has had some small roles in a few movies and this was
perhaps an attempt to break him into the big time.  He has had noticeable
roles roles in 'The Craft', 'The Newton Boys' and 'As Good As It Gets' and
hasn't quite found the star making role he is striving for.
The plot holes that make 'Chill Factor' impossible to recommend are simple.
Two ordinary guys are not going to be able to stop a vicious military man
and his gang where all of them are highly trained experts in weaponry, hand
to hand combat and military strategy.  At least for many of those involved,
it won't exactly end their careers but it won't do anything to advance them
at the same time in a film that is almost impossible to review where the
ways to describe it seem to be repetitive.  The film makers drew first blood
in that category.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Mercury Rising (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
The easiest noun to use in describing 'Mercury Rising' would be
"routine".  It's a simple description but it fits.  I have to say up
front that the movie is mildly entertaining on a trashy sort of level in
the sense that it's best not to think about it too much after you leave
the theatre.  You can't fault movie critics too much for repeating
themselves because it's only due to the fact that films keep repeating
themselves and critics comment on what they see.  It's sort of like a
quarterback who sticks with the plays that work.  If it's a winning
formula, stick with it and as long as people keep dishing out enough
money to see action stars in their repetitive vehicles, Hollywood will
keep making them.
The problem with Bruce Willis is that he fails to connect in finding a
different personality for each character he plays.  Clint Eastwood made
Dirty Harry different from Josey Wales and his gunslinger in
'Unforgiven' was quite different from the drill sergeant he played in
'Heartbreak Ridge'.  All the recent characters that Bruce Willis has
played have looked and felt the same.  1997's 'The Fifth Element' was
like watching John McClane (Willis' character in the 'Die Hard' trilogy)
wake up after being in a chamber of cryogenic technology for three
hundred years, thawed out to strut his stuff with futuristic bad guys
and it failed with most critics except those radical science fiction
fans who refuse to knock even the worst of that genre.  I really haven't
seen Willis in a top notch role since his 1994 attempt at serious stuff
such as 'Pulp Fiction' and 'Nobody's Fool'.  I wish he'd go back to the
stuff he has the potential with and earn a respectable name for himself
but he's becoming a stereotyped performer like Sylvester Stallone and
Wesley Snipes.
The plot line in 'Mercury Rising' concerns a nine year old autistic boy
who has cracked a secret government code which will be used to protect
the covert operations of secret U.S. agents all over the world.  He got
the code from a puzzle book and it just so happens that two government
computer programmers put the code in the book on purpose, testing its
reliability, knowing (or at least counting on the fact) that no one will
be able to crack it but not understanding that the human brain will
always remain a mystery.  Their boss, an evil government stooge (Alec
Baldwin), is outraged that his employees would pull such a stunt and
Baldwin takes steps to eliminate all traces of the boy's involvement
with the code and the government office that created it.  This includes
killing the boy's parents and Willis plays a demoted FBI agent who
investigates the murder of the boy's parents and eventually ends up the
boy's protector when things get more and more dangerous.
Director Harold Becker ('The Onion Field', 'Taps', 'Sea of Love',
'Malice') has used his typical style of stretching a story out to be
much more than it really is, spreading the plot too thin in an attempt
to cover up plot holes and while it hasn't worked for him in the past,
it doesn't work here.  Based on the novel 'Simple Simon' by Ryne Douglas
Pearson and written by Lawrence Konner, Ryne Douglas Pearson and Mark
Rosenthal, 'Mercury Rising' isn't a film I can recommend for its
originality, but it has some decent action sequences as the film is
evenly paced and it is touching in a certain way as Willis plays the
responsible role of the boy's protector and while that may be no big
deal to cynics, the film has a style with an average intention to please
audiences and because of that it does have some merit.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Fathers' Day (1997)
'FATHERS' DAY' IS A PLEASANT ENOUGH FORMULA FOR WILLIAMS AND CRYSTAL
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
Film buffs have waited for quite sometime to see the teaming of two of
Hollywood's funniest men.  Robin Wiliams and Billy Crystal have finally
pulled it off with hilarious results in 'Father's Day'.  This film reportedly
took about thirteen agents between the two stars to close the deal and their
names appear on screen at the same time during the opening credits and while
Robin Williams' career seems to be sagging a little bit lately, it's Crystal
who needs a hit.
Crystal plays a high powered California lawyer while Williams plays a failed
writer on the verge of suicide.  They don't know each other until each one of
them is contacted by a former girlfriend (Nastassja Kinski) who tells them
separately that they are each the father of her sixteen year old son.  The
meet under bizarre circumstances while searching for the boy and they soon
work together in trying to find him.  
The screenplay by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel ('Splash', 'Gung Ho',
'Parenthood', 'City Slickers', 'Greedy') contains enough of their jokes which
some find offensive but others find their humour squirmingly funny.  Director
Ivan Reitman ('Stripes', 'Ghostbusters', 'Twins') finds a formula good enough
to make this comic escapade work as he relies on allowing the two leads to
improvise many scenes which make them such brilliant comedians.  
Seventy per cent of the movie's laughs come from Robin Williams but I'm sure
if you ask him about the film's success he'll tell you that the success of a
lot of comedy films depends largely on the straight man which Crystal plays
in a professional manner almost without blinking.  
A word of caution.  You may never use an outhose again after seeing this
movie and look quickly for an almost unrecognizable Mel Gibson!
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
The town of Tullymore, Ireland, population 52, yes, fifty two, has among
it, a winner in the latest lottery draw and everyone in the town is
trying to figure out who it is.  They spoil each other with kindness,
kissing up to the supposed winner but they are all wrong.  The winner of
a 6.8 million pound lottery is Ned Devine.  He fails to show up one
night for a party and his friend Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen) goes to see
him.  He finds Ned deceased with a pleasant look on his face and a
lottery ticket in his hand.  It turns out to be the winner and Ned
apparently keeled over from a heart attack at the mind numbing thought
of taking in a fortune.
Jackie and his friend Michael O'Sullivan (David Kelly), plot to have one
of them impersonate Ned for a lottery official who will visit and
investigate the claim.  Using Ned's birth certificate, social insurance
number and other forms of identification claimed for himself, Michael
ends up impersonating Ned and all hopes are that he can get away with
it.  The town is eventually sucked into the fraudulent claim and they
will all share in the winnings equally.  A lone hold out is a cranky,
miserable old lady, faking disability who wants a giant share or she
will turn the folks in and collect ten percent of the lottery jackpot
which is the rule if you snitch on those defrauding the system.
'Waking Ned Devine' has a major flaw that I think discredits
wrtier/director Kirk Jones to a certain degree.  In today's age of
electronic media (and the old fashioned kind as well), you simply cannot
commit lottery fraud of a large nature because you will be caught.  A
huge jackpot, and the persons who claim it, like the ones in this film,
are almost certain to be investigated by the media, and they will even
find their way into a small Irish town like the one depicted in this
film.  If you are willing to overlook this rather large flaws, like I
am, the film is a joyride of old fashioned movie making resurrected for
today.
Made with a tempo that resembles good natured poetry, 'Waking Ned
Devine' is a grand scheme of investigating everyone's desire to be rich,
no matter who they are.  Certainly an original concept in many regards,
there is even a sub plot involving two men's love for the same woman and
one of them being the father of her little boy.  Despite the flaws
mentioned earlier, Kirk Jones has created a sweet story and executed it
in a directorial fashion that reaches into the heart of its very subject
and it runs just a little more that 90 minutes and doesn't weigh the
audience down and the best part is that from start to finish, it's
unpredictable and aims to please.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Brian De Palma will never be a truly great director. He's had over 20
years to prove himself and while some of his films are fluidly filmed
and make for very interesting entertainment, the majority of his films
are mediocre at best.  De Palma likes to pay tribute to Alfred Hitchcock
every time he sets out to make a film and likes to throw in as many
macabre scenes as the script will allow.  De Palma's use of repetition
to make a point is often tedious and his use of slow motion is very
tiresome at times.  I loved 1987's 'The Untouchables' more for Sean
Connery's Oscar winning performance and David Mamet's tense and
classical script and while the baby carriage scene on the train station
stairs worked to perfection, De Palma should have quit while he was
ahead because he almost ruined the film by stretching out the rooftop
climax scene beyond belief.  How many times can you play a swelling
music score and zoom in slowly on someone's eyes?  1976's 'Carrie' is a
good film and has Oscar nominated performances from Sissy Spacek and
Piper Laurie but De Palma stretches out the scene at the prom after
Carrie is crowned prom queen just a bit too long before the famous
soaking in pig's blood.  De Palma ruined 1983's 'Scarface' by allowing
every second word in the film to be f***.  De Palma's masterpiece (a
term used loosely in his case) is 1980's 'Dressed to Kill'.  That film
had a truly eerie tone and genuine chills and despite some large plot
holes, 1981's 'Blow Out' is a pretty good runner-up to 'Dressed to
Kill'.
In 'Snake Eyes' Nicolas Cage is Rick Santoro, a mildly corrupt Atlantic
City police officer attending a much hyped boxing match which is being
filmed for television's pay per view format.  The U.S. secretary of
defence is in attendance at the fight and is guarded by standard secret
service protection and is accompanied by Major Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinese)
who also acts as a bodyguard.  Distracted at the fight by a beautiful
tart in a red dress, Sinese leaves his post and the secretary is shot
and later dies in the hospital.  The shooting causes pandemonium and the
14,000 people at the event are sealed in as the building is ordered
shut.  Central to the plot and a key player in the whole scenario is a
nearsighted young woman named Julia Costello (Carla Gugino) who tries to
flee the building after the assassination for a different reason than
everyone else.
'Snake Eyes', if anything, makes one important point.  In the age of
electronic media, a political assassination cannot be concealed in a
public place.  Someone is bound to pick it up.  No more public
executions like the conspiracy (don't write me back saying there wasn't
a conspiracy because I'll laugh in your face and you'll get a nasty
response) that killed JFK.  The perpetrators of that crime would be
caught today if they tried that in public, either on film or videotape.
I admire the film for that but De Palma's latest attempt at suspense is
disappointing because the solution to the film is revealed too early and
De Palma fails to find any sub text to make the second half as good as
the first.  The film falls apart after about 45 minutes and never picks
itself back up.
Also, at a running time of only 98 minutes, the film resolves itself too
quickly without a sense of academic depth.  I often complain that films
are too long but this one is too short.  This is the kind of film that
needs to be over two hours in length but only if the set and plot points
can be expanded and they are not.  'Snake Eyes' was filmed largely in
Montreal, Quebec, Canada and is set inside the boxing arena for 99% of
its running time.  Some necessary scenes were actually filmed in
Atlantic City, New Jersey and oddly enough, another film, 1981's
'Atlantic City' with Burt Lancaster and Susan Sarandon combined Montreal
and Atlantic City to tell its story in the famous U.S. city of the
famous boardwalk.
Nicolas Cage is excellent in 'Snake Eyes' and Gary Sinese is a good
character but a predictable one and doesn't take full advantage of the
darker sides in his character's personality.  The female characters are
a throw away as they often are in De Palma's films and if Brian De Palma
could use actors and story lines the same way he uses his camera, he
might have an Oscar or two in his collection but for all the right
reasons, De Palma has never even once been nominated for the Academy
Award but he has been nominated 5 times for the Razzie award for the
worst that the film industry has to offer.  His peers are as unforgiving
as his critics.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When you ask someone why they liked 'Rush Hour', the standard answer
will probably be something like: "Lots of action!"  "Lots of comedy!"
"Great match-up of stars like Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker!"
Unfortunately, the film has everything we've seen before and the picture
looks for a new twist and while it comes up somewhat successful, it's
predictable formula doesn't quite pull it off.  'Rush Hour' is for the
movie goer who sees about five movies a year and a movie critic, whether
amateur or professional, always looks for that little extra edge and it
isn't found here.  The film is entertaining on the surface but
eventually you'll be looking at your watch after about the first 45
minutes.
Since Jackie Chan assaulted our senses with his North American
breakthrough film 'Rumble in the Bronx' in 1996, he has been on a roll,
even though film distributors have released some of his other films
since then that have actually been released in his native land years
before and the films, when released here in North America, were actually
six or seven years old.  Nobody does present day martial arts better
than Jackie Chan and I have a lot of respect for him and his ability.
Chris Tucker annoyed the heck out of me in 1997's 'The Fifth Element'
with that high pitched voice of his used in robotic fashion as a talk
show host 250 years in the future.  Tucker is very funny and has a lot
of potential and I see a great future in the movies for him but a new
angle must be found for his success to continue.  'Stakeout', '48 hrs.'
etc. etc.  Films where the cops get together with their colleagues or
other helpful people in order to catch the bad guys.  Let's do it again!
Tucker is an L.A. cop with his own brand of ease on the job who dances
after blowing up a getaway car and after his boss tells him he destroyed
an entire city block, Tucker says:  "That area was messed up anyway."
The Chinese consulate to Los Angeles has his little daughter kidnapped
and he calls upon a good friend of his, a Hong Kong police office played
in classic fashion by Jackie Chan.  The FBI want Chan kept out of the
picture and use Tucker to keep Chan occupied so he won't get in the way
of their domestic law enforcement.  That's it.  That's all.  That's the
whole story, folks!
The film moves well without becoming repetitive in its humour but it
can't escape its formula origins and because of that it fails.  Director
Brett Ratner makes the classic formula movie mistake by allowing his
actors to improvise too much instead of following a strict pattern style
of direction.  The screenplay by Jim Jim Kouf and Ross Lamanna has some
funny moments but it isn't a hard screenplay to write, let alone
execute.
Am I asking you to avoid 'Rush Hour'.  No.  Many of you will find it
entertaining but if your taste is a little high brow for 8 dollars then,
yes, avoid it at all costs.  It's not a bad secondary feature at the
drive-in and will become the perfect Saturday night video movie in a few
months.  It's just that kind of flick.
Visit the new home of FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
'Sweet and Lowdown' is one of those films from a cinematic genius where you
don't need the credits to tell you who's directing it.  You could blindfold
someone throughout the opening credits and take the blindfold off and while
watching it, know that it's being directed by Woody Allen.  There is a bit
of a cheat to this theory as Allen himself appears in a visual narration
along with others to discuss the film's main character but you would still
know it's a Woody Allen film without it and they say a great director can
see a finished film in his head and Allen is one of those great directors.
Sean Penn, a remarkably under rated actor and former best actor Oscar
nominee for 'Dead Man Walking' in 1995, gives a grand performance from a
rather cliched (but yet entertaining) script by Allen.  Penn plays Emmet
Ray, a little known jazz guitarist during the 1930's who was rumoured to be
second best in the world and some actually thought he WAS #1.
He drinks, he can't handle money, he pimps, he womanizes and has all of
those typical flaws that is usually associated with genius in a Hollywood
film.  I have my doubts about this theory on the part of many film makers.
They say Mozart died of a serious illness such as pneumonia, a high fever or
the flu, yet 1984's 'Amadeus' chose to show that he died in much the same
manner as Elvis Presley, presumably heart failure brought on by being full
of drugs and from severe exhaustion.
Emmet's idol is Django Reinhardt, considered the best jazz guitarist in the
world by most and Emmet actually has dizzy spells, is capable of fainting
and/or becoming ill when he's in the presence of this man.  This is made
very clear early in the film and 'Sweet and Lowdown has a wonderful rhythm
to it that captures the period it is displaying just perfectly.  As we
progress into the first half hour or so, Emmet is making the rounds, playing
from club to club, generating controversy and trying to spice up his stage
act anyway he can.  He creates a quarter shaped moon as a prop in which he
will attach a seat and be lowered down on during the beginning of his act.
It's a disaster on its first try and is never used again.
Emmet meets Hattie (Samantha Morton), a mute girl with a heart of gold.  She
does laundry for a living, wears baggy clothes and big shoes and is about as
"plain jane" as they come.  She is fond of Emmet and the two of them
consummate their relationship with each other early and this is in keeping
with Allen's liberal theme of relationships, something which is going to be
his legacy among film historians.  Emmet tires of Hattie and can't stay on
the wagon long enough to appreciate the genuine care she has for him and he
must explore the world he knows very little about.  He hooks up with Blanche
(Uma Thurman).  She likes fancy clothes, cigarette holders and the wild
side.  Right up Emmet's alley so to speak.  Too bad their relationship is
synthetic and unloving.  The really exciting part of the film comes when
Emmet suspects Blanche of infidelity and finds out that she is dating a hit
man (Anthony LaPaglia) and tags along one day to prove his theory by hiding
in the back seat of a car and becomes the unwitting individual involved in a
hold-up, police chase and auto accident.  This is a theory that is put
forward by one of the historians during the film and is humourous since
there are many stories told and shown as too EXACTLY what did happen.
Woody Allen has a knack for turning out about one film a year and can't be
accused of repetition as much as some would like to tease him about it.  As
far as period pieces go, Allen has another gem from the 1990's entitled
'Bullets Over Broadway' which is a cousin to 'Sweet and Lowdown' in its
depiction of a period piece.  It has a bit more of a neurotic flare that
Allen is also famous for putting in his films but 'Sweet and Lowdown' is
sort of a series of snapshots all put together in a very docile fashion and
entertains as smoothly as the music it is telling a story about.
As for the performances, I think Sean Penn could be Oscar bound for this
film from recognition he missed last year for 'Hurlyburly', a film I hated
but which was high on many critic's lists for Penn's performance.  I've
always like Penn, even back in the 1980's when he played such parts in
'Racing With the Moon', 'The Falcon and the Snowman' and 'Colors'.  Samantha
Morton is also great in a role of gestures and facial expressions, a much
more difficult part than one which is dialogue driven.  As a mute, she must
communicate differently and she does it in an almost psychic performance
where we can hear her thoughts and feel her emotions.  'Sweet and Lowdown'
is one of the high points of Woody Allen's career in the 90's, a decade in
which Allen refused to follow the Hollywood studio system and still clings
to his roots from two decades gone by.  What a guy!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
If you think you've seen it all in Hollywood, you haven't.  If you think
you've seen it all in every actor who ever played himself, you haven't.  If
you think you'll be in for quite a surprise with 'Being John Malkovich', you
will.  This is one of the most bizarre and weirdly obtuse films that
disappointed me at times while it delighted and intrigued me at other points
during its running time.  It almost looks like the paradox found in a Terry
Gilliam film with a profound sense of visual attraction while putting
forward the dark side of human personality.
Set in New York City in the present day, the story concerns itself with a
puppeteer named Craig Schwartz (John Cusack).  He is the type who works odd
jobs displaying his art and doesn't have a steady job.  He sleeps late and
lives with his wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz) who works at a pet store.  Their
apartment is flooded with animals.  The dogs, cats and chimps roam around
freely and they have many other animals around for companionship.  Craig
takes a job working in a most unique place.  An office building has a floor
that doesn't show up on the elevator's button because following the number
is 1/2.  How can you have 1/2 a floor?  The floor is only about 4 to 5 feet
high.  Everyone walks hunched over.  The doors are all miniature size and
the office furniture fits just fine as do the employees, as long as they're
sitting down.  Craig's job will be that of a file clerk.  Since he is a
puppeteer, he has fast fingers and it shows when he's given a test to
perform.  He's hired.  He meets the office tramp, Maxine (Catherine Keener),
who is a foul woman with a witch like personality.  There is a strange
sexual attraction between the two of them which dominates parts of the film.
THE PLOT THICKENS.  Craig is working one day when he drops a file folder
behind the filing cabinet.  Don't you hate that?!  He must move the entire
cabinet out to get the folder.  After sliding the cabinet away from the
wall, he notices a board covering something up.  Curiosity killed the cat as
they say.  After removing the board, there is an old door that seems to have
been abandoned.  Upon opening it and crawling inside, Craig is sucked into
its chamber and looks through the eyes of actor John Malkovich.  The door
turned out to be a portal into the back of his head.  Bizarre!  The only
catch is that just when this experience is getting really exciting (it only
lasts 15 minutes), your body is dispensed from its place and you fall out on
to the New Jersey turnpike.  BIZARRE!  Yes, this is all true.
If it sounds silly and unbelievable, that's the point.  The film drives a
wedge between the boundaries of convincing fantasy and magnifying stupidity.
This is all done with the feeling of inhaling laughing gas.  Needless to say
that actor John Malkovich finds out what is happening and tries to stop it.
You see, Craig and Maxine have started a business where people can enter the
portal for 15 minutes and pay $200 for the experience of being someone else.
Through it all is an explanation provided by the office boss (Orson Bean) of
how the portal works and how people can become transferred from its
perception or be imprisoned by its black hole like draw on human beings.
John Cusack is quite an actor.  He said for years he wanted to avoid the
trappings of a career enjoyed by people like Tom Cruise, Tom Hanks or
Harrison Ford.  It other words, super stardom.  He, like Nicolas Cage in the
early days of his career, has instead opted for the quirky roles in
Hollywood.  The off beat stuff and doing a convincing job in any role he
chooses to play.  He is one of the best actors in the business without many
people knowing it and I'm sure that drawing attention away from himself is
exactly the way Cusack likes it.
The two key female performances in the film are 180 degrees apart. Cameron
Diaz is sweet and innocent.  Sort of the naive victim of the whole thing
before her fate is revealed at the end.  Catherine Keener is just the
opposite.  As mentioned above, her portrayal of Maxine is that of a foul
woman with a witch like personality.  You know her character is just the
sort of enigma that will come away without so much as a scratch.  Oscar
nominations will be fourth coming but the film will suffer in the truly high
profile categories such as best picture.  While on many "ten best" lists for
1999, the film has a tailor made look of trying too hard to look original
like 1998's 'The Truman Show' did.  Both films share the concept of
character confinement before the truth is revealed but both show how the
human experience can be dream like in nature and while 'Being John
Malkovich' is a good film with things not seen before, it still seems a bit
aloof in the way its resolution comes down but it will be regarded as GREAT
film making only by the most hard core of fans who like fantasy films.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Warning:  this review contains indirect spoilers!
As far as I'm concerned, with the exception of 'The Hunt for Red October',
the 90's have been a bust for Sean Connery.  Consider, if you will, films
like 'Medicine Man', 'Highlander II: The Quickening', 'First Knight' and
last year's disastrous 'The Avengers'.  His obvious hand at calling a lot of
the shots on the sets of his movies are a mistake.  Connery is the kind of
movie star/actor who is better at leaving the creative end to directors and
writers because Connery's only real talent seems to be his on screen
presence.  This is confirmed by his obvious
capabilities that won him the Oscar in 1987 for 'The Untouchables'.  And,
Connery, as we all know, is the best James Bond there ever has been and/or
ever will be.
Connery, presumably in his last film of the 90's, has redeemed himself with
'Entrapment'.  This film is perhaps one of the cleverest and most shifty
eyed and perceptive films of the year and probably has one of the best
twists since 1995's 'The Usual Suspects'.  Not as multi-layered as that film
was, 'Entrapment' has an even tempo with little break away moments of wit
that make it seem more entertaining than it really is in many scenes.  Its
ability to compensate for some of its slow spots and weaknesses are the
film's greatest asset.
In 'Entrapment', Connery plays a seasoned veteran of crime.  A grand old
master of burglary who is still in the game not because he needs the money
but because he enjoys it.  He is not a small time crook.  He lives in a
castle in the British Isles that looks like it costs several million
dollars.  He has pampered his living quarters with many posh and upscale
artifacts and is a man of culture.  An insurance company in New York City is
investigating what they believe is his latest theft --- the disappearance of
a rare painting.  A former FBI man (Will Patton) is now the head
investigator for the insurance firm whose top go getter (Catharine Zeta
Jones), is excellent as one of his investigative hot shots and believes she
can get close to Connery, plan a job with him and turn him in as part of a
sting operation.  The audience is thrown into a frenzy of guessing games
when it appears that Jones is playing all sides to her advantage in order to
walk away with all of the loot herself.
Director Jon Amiel ('Sommersby', 'Copycat', 'The Man Who Knew Too Little')
structures the film like a game of chess.  He wraps the film in a riddle and
the film is not predictable which is its real pay off.  You'll wander
through 'Entrapment' finding huge plot holes that are large enough to drive
NATO's entire force through but the holes will all be closed as the film
hits its final mark.  Ron Bass and Michael Hertzberg, originators of the
film's story do a good job of creating a plot that doesn't drown in its own
premise.  This is not an action film.  Many of the scenes are very much just
a two character story with direct interaction between its two leads.  It
reminded me in many ways of 1972's 'Sleuth', where Laurence Olivier and
Michael Caine tried to outwit each other.  Will Patton's character as Jones'
boss is also a tepid one although he is on screen very little.  Shades of
Scott Glenn's character from 'The Silence of the Lambs' are the best way to
describes Patton's contribution to the film.
One problem I had with the film were the lazy performances encompassed
within its story.  Connery and Jones seem very relaxed at times and Jones
doesn't have even half of the zest that she possessed in 1998's 'The Mask of
Zorro'.  Ving Rhames, one of the best character actors of his generation and
who is often under used in his films, actually steals some of the scenes
he's in with Connery as a man whose loyalties are not quite understood until
the film's final moments.
'Entrapment' has a genuine look to it that shows the creative forces were
aiming to please all the way and while it's obvious that the film under went
several re-writes before getting it right, the performances could have used
a little spice and keep it from being a good film but one that is not that
memorable.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
'THE FIFTH ELEMENT' IS PRIMARILY A 'STARGATE' WANNABE
Next to comedy, science fiction is probably the most difficult and often
misfired form of filmmaking there is.  The key to it is to make it somewhat
believable even though you know all along it isn't and people have to relate
to their movie characters to truly enjoy two hours of leisurely time spent in
a movie theatre.  The 'Star Wars' series worked because the trilogy gave us
characters you could truly root for and characters you truly loved to hate.
 The 'Star Trek' series has worked so well because of it's mystical and
intellectual profile not enjoyed by everyone but certainly by its loyal
followers who have contributed more to that side of pop culture than
practically any other on film.  Television's 'The X-Files' works
magnificently because of its central theme of government deception and
conspiracy which is certainly a reality to anyone with common sense and its
FBI connection has characters both very human and very vulnerable.  
The Egyptian connection.  It was used as the central plot of 1994's
'Stargate' starring Kurt Russell and James Spader.  The Egyptian connection.
 It is duplicated in 'The Fifth Element' which is a wasted and tiresome
science fiction creation looking to establish new rules for that genre and it
fails miserably.  
In 'The Fifth Element', the story begins in 1914 Egypt where historians are
tracking ancient carvings in a desert structure believed to be the sign of
mankind's destruction on Earth as an evil alien entity will eventually
annihilate the planet.  The opening scene has alien creatures in large
mechanical outfits that look curiously like Alice the Goon from the old
Popeye the sailor comics.  The ancient wall carvings also indicate that a
FIFTH ELEMENT next to the other four which are earth, wind, fire and water
will act as a defender to prevent this destruction.  The story then jumps
three hundred years into the future to New York City and this prophecy begins
to take shape.  The police officers of the future look very much like the
creations in 'Judge Dredd' (1995) which was a laughably bad action film
starring Sylvester Stallone.  'The Fifth Element' has Bruce Willis playing a
loserly cab driver whose career was once in full swing as a high profile
military man and now the military wants him back to save the world (the plot
gets trivial and tedious here) and Willis looks more like a needle in a hay
stack than he does a leading man as he is surrounded by visually striking
sets and effects which despite their convincing nature, drown out the
characters from developing into anything more than cardboard cut outs.  A
priest (Ian Holm) is also central to the plot as he discovers that through
generations in his family of passing down a secret legend that a fugitive
from justice that Willis has rescued is none other than the fifth element
(Milla Jovovich) which is an alien life form created by man as an alien/human
hybrid.  Destiny, it seems has brought them together to save all of human
life on Earth.  Oh, brother, is this hokey or what?! 
The film takes on a moronic imitation of not only 'Stargate' but 'Blade
Runner', 'Close Encounters' and almost any science fiction theme you can
imagine.  Its climax is predictable, bogged down with unfunny humour and
protracted excitement.  Other members of the cast include Gary Oldman and
Chris Tucker.  'The Fifth Element' is directed with a wooden hand by Luc
Besson who should not attempt another run at science fiction but rather a run
out of the movie business altogether as it will be hard to redeem himself
after this movie masquerading as art but coming off as trashy cloning of
films gone by.  One of 1997's most disappointing films to date.     
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
A lot of people will criticize 'The Jackal' for the fact that Bruce
Willis is a high paid movie star and the cynics will take pot shots
at him by putting down this movie.  In reality, Willis is a very
talented actor who happens to be a movie star.  He should have been
Oscar nominated for 'Pulp Fiction', 'Nobody's Fool' and '12 Monkeys'
but as his career becomes more and more seasoned, Willis will get
recognized like Clint Eastwood and Sean Connery were and they were
not thought of as serious actors when they were in their thirties or
even when they were into their forties.   Although Willis may never
win an Academy Award just as the same might happen to Harrison Ford
and Tom Cruise, Willis will probably get noticed from the Academy
eventually in some form of a nomination.  For others, they will
examine 'The Jackal' closely and find that they have a terrific
thriller on their hands because although Willis is the bad guy this
time around, the movie belongs to Richard Gere just as much as it
does Willis.  Willis is  a chilling and icy assassin with no
conscience and this profile puts Willis in a whole new light.
'The Jackal' is a remake of the 1973 film 'The Day of the Jackal'
which was based on the best selling novel by Frederick Forsyth and
was directed by legendary movie maker Fred Zinnemann who made such
classics as 'High Noon', 'From Here to Eternity' and 'A Man for All
Seasons'.  That film was about the attempted assassination of French
leader Charles de Gaulle and this time the targeted quarry is in
America.  This remake by director Michael Canton-Jones isn't quite
as good but it is a standout on its own merit and has an extremely
convincing profile of an assassination set up.  I've read some
reviews that accuse this one of being overbearing and heavy handed
by saying that too much time, effort, planning and machinery is put
into pulling off the final result.  But let's be honest.  Movies have
to take some license from time to time with the obvious to make it
worthy of the admission price and when your target is a high profile
figure, it just may take a lot more planning than the average mind
thinks it will.
Willis is an American assassin for hire who takes an assignment for
the Russian Mafia to kill a major U.S. figure when the Russian crime
boss' brother is killed in an arrest attempt in which an FBI official
(Sidney Poitier) is involved.  What better way to get revenge on the
Americans by striking back and making a powerful statement by
assassinating someone important.  Sidney Poitier enlists the help of
an IRA terrorist (Richard Gere) who knows of Willis' past and with
the aid of Gere's former lover, a Basque terrorist (Mathilda May),
they help hunt down Willis.  Another Russian agent (Diane Venora)
plays a key role in helping the good guys.
'The Jackal' was filmed in several locations around the world and
has a pace which is mysteriously low key which will be mistaken as
being flat and the cool and lethal profile of Bruce Willis' character
makes it work.  Sidney Poitier hasn't appeared much in motion
pictures in recent years since 'Sneakers' in 1992 and he really is a
classic actor who should be seen more.  Richard Gere is on a roll. 
His recent turn in 'Red Corner' and now his convincing role as a
former IRA terrorist has provided him with his best work in years. 
I never looked at my wrist watch once during the film and 'The
Jackal' doesn't drag for a second and is a perfect thriller for
contemporary audiences who will embrace it while some won't
recognize its merit and will knock it not because it's a bad film
but because they will draw comparisons from the original and that's
a shame.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
      Jack Nicholson has worked with director, writer and producer James L.
Brooks on 1983's 'Terms of Endearment' and 1987's 'Broadcast News' and while
Nicholson's career has been sagging a little since perhaps his most famous
role as the Joker in 1989's 'Batman', Nicholson is back in full form in 'As
Good As It Gets'.  Nominated for only one Oscar in the 90's for Best
Supporting Actor in 1992's 'A Few Good Men', Nicholson is certain to receive
a nomination for Best Actor for this movie.
     Nicholson plays a modern day writer in New York who is also a bigot who
suffers from obsessive compulsive disorder which forces him into routines so
radical, its memorable at every turn.  He spars with a gay neighbour (Greg
Kinnear) at every chance he gets and causes trouble with his loud mouth at a
restaurant he frequents involving a kind but independently minded waitress
(Helen Hunt) with a little boy.
     Under Nicholson's racist, sexist and homophobic skin is a man with a
streak of decency like Archie Bunker as Nicholson does nice things
eventually for the other characters in the film.  Kinnear is beaten and
robbed in his apartment and Nicholson takes care of his little dog in a
reluctant manner after the film's opening scene depicted Nicholson putting
the little canine down the garbage chute of his apartment floor's hallway.
     Kinnear travels to Baltimore to ask his parents for the money to pay
off his medical bills and Nicholson and Hunt go along for the ride and the
characters all change and contract a better and stronger moral fibre by the
end of the film.  The relationship that builds between Nicholson and Hunt is
the real focus of the film and the spark of romance between them is unusual
and unique.
     As is typical with a James L. Brooks movie, the tone of the film is
slightly off beat and non-conformist which is perfect and this is a great
date movie.  Brooks' interpretation of romance in the 90's is both
simplistic and touching and his style of presentation with this movie is
done with little music score while it lets the actors create their own
symphony of words and that's important.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
Arnold Schwarzenegger.  An example of how big you can make it in the movies
and then have it fall apart so fast.  In the 90's, Ah-nuld has only had
three good films.  'Total Recall', 'Terminator 2: Judgment Day' and
'Eraser'.  'Last Action Hero' was Arnold's egotistical version of Bruce
Willis' 'Hudson Hawk' and 'True Lies' was both uneven, only mildly funny,
and lacked James Cameron's signature heap of kinetics.  I enjoyed Arnold's
work mildly in the comedies 'Twins' and 'Kindergarten Cop' but not 'Junior'.
Arnold served in the Bush administration in some sort of fitness advisor
capacity.  I forget the official title he carried but George Bush's claim
that he wanted to be a kinder, gentler president prompted Arnie to make his
second terminator portrayal a kinder gentler character.  A humourous
metaphor for his political connections, but let's be honest here, did we
really need a kinder and gentler terminator?  Give me a break!  He takes an
oath in the movie at the insistence of John Connor (Edward Furlong), that he
will not kill anybody.  So let's face it, Leonard Maltin was right when he
said that the first terminator movie was better simply because the film, and
Arnold's character, had much more edge.
Satan.  His image conjures up many things wrong in the world.  He's been
played by many actors.  Jack Nicholson, Al Pacino and even little old George
Burns have played the fallen angel most uniquely.  And now Gabriel Byrne
plays him with an ice cold sinister deviousness.  Byrne is a great actor
whose work in 'Miller's Crossing' and 'The Usual Suspects' remains his best.
He even had a hand in producing one of this decades most emotionally wrought
political dramas, 'In the Name of the Father'.
Both Schwarzenegger and Byrne provide a good and not so obvious game of cat
and mouse in 'End of Days'.  The first thing I should say about this film is
that it has so many plot holes and enough credibility gaps to allow a
transport truck to drive through that you must toss these factors aside if
you truly want to enjoy the picture.  Director Peter Hyams, whose work is
better when he has a hand in writing or co-writing his own scripts has a few
films I really enjoy.  'The Star Chamber' from 1983 where a group of
vigilante judges carry out their own brand of justice.  'Outland' from 1981
with Sean Connery in an outer space version of 'High Noon' and 1979's
'Hanover Street' with Harrison Ford as a World War II pilot having an affair
with a married English woman.
Hyams often acts as his own director of photography and clouds his films in
a murky and charcoal type of atmosphere which are fitting in adding to his
many scenes of compelling structure.  His vision is sometimes repetitive but
he makes fairly decent films.
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe, 'End of Days' is about an ex-cop and present
day high profile security officer (Schwarzenegger) who becomes involved in
confronting Satan when a young woman is chosen to be Satan's concubine who
will bear his child to walk upon the earth in the next millennium.  The film
begins in Vatican City in 1979 where the Pope and his council agree that the
time has come, based on a sign, where a female will be born in the world
that will be the chosen one for Satan's nasty scheme of planting his seed on
Earth.  Around the same time, a baby girl is born in New York City and a
ritual is carried out upon her at the hospital where she's born that will
put her under Satan's spell.  Skip forward 20 years.  1999.  Things begin
coming together on a collision course for the sake of mankind's existence.
A wall street banker (Byrne) goes to the men's room of an NYC restaurant and
is accosted in the men's room by the tangible spirit of Satan to walk the
streets in a man's body.  Satan has planted his disciples in positions of
advantage that will aid him in his plan to have Christine York (Robin
Tunney) bear his child and witness the end of man's days upon the planet.
Jericho Cane (Schwarzenegger) hooks up with the plot when he investigates
and assassin's plan to open fire on the streets of NYC.  He then finds the
writings of a street vagrant in an abandoned underground tunnel way and
connects the writings with quotes from the Bible and locks horns with the
devil in an attempt to protect the forces of good in the film.
Now, in 'The Exorcist' the devil was defeated with two priests being
sacrificed in the process.  Their religious bindings and the word of God
were powerful enough to expel the devil from a little girl's body.  'End of
Days' just doesn't come off as credible.  An observation is made in the film
that only the pure of heart can kill the devil and Cane isn't pure of heart.
He's angry at God for letting his family be taken from him and is a flawed
and truly mortal being whom Satan could squash like a bug if he really
wanted to.  In other films and t.v. shows where the bad guys always let the
good guys hang on just a little too long to defeat them which proves to be
their downfall, well, this is what happens in 'End of Days'.  There are also
scenes of action and excitement that just aren't credible and bring the film
down to an almost laughable capacity.  However, the portrayal of Satan by
Byrne, the special effects and some good camera work redeem the film
somewhat.
What's also funny is some of the humour displayed which are inside jokes
based on 'The Usual Suspects' from 1995.  Arnold's side kick in this film is
Kevin Pollak who appeared as one of the criminals in 'The Usual Suspects'
with Gabriel Byrne.  There is a scene where a trail of flammable fluid is
set a blaze to cause a big explosion, seen in 'The Usual Suspects' and a
line is delivered that says: "The greatest trick the devil ever pulled was
convincing the world he didn't exist".....a classic line uttered by Kevin
Spacey in 'The Usual Suspects'.  'End of Days' can stand fully on its own
and is worth a look by the curious but only die hard Arnold fans will
embrace it as great.  For the rest of us, it's an average ride all the way.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
How often have you felt your life to be insignificant, tedious and downright
meaningless?  Films like 'It's a Wonderful Life' show just how one single
person can have a large impact on the lives of those around them and
likewise.  'American Beauty' falls within the compound of urban melodrama,
sexual fantasy and inverted satire all mixed into one platform of story
telling.  The ads for the film are sort of misleading.  When I saw the
television spot for it, I thought it was a comedy.  How wrong I was!  The
film is a catapulting force of inventive character studies with the people
involved having mostly negative feelings about each other and is a truly
dead on accurate of how distant people have become with each passing year.
The people involved aren't widely known directors or writers and the cast is
a group of people who have won critical acclaim, Oscars, and praise for
their work.  They aren't movie stars, just great talents put together like a
jigsaw puzzle with all of the pieces falling into the right places.
Let's begin with the Burnham family.  There is Lester (Kevin Spacey).  He's
a 42 year old writer who has worked for a magazine the last 14 years of his
life.  He is a man who has never really gathered up his adult
responsibilities in life.  He isn't the kind of guy you want to hang around
with in real life.  His personality is actually that of  Kramer from
'Seinfeld' except for the humour.  Take away the laughs and you have a
character you actually feel sorry for.  His wife Carolyn (Annette Bening) is
a materialistic woman with ice in her veins.  The two of them haven't had
sex in a very long time.  Even though that is never mentioned, you can tell
and that observation is even made by another one of the film's characters.
Not only have they alienated each other but their teenage daughter Jane
(Thora Birch) is at odds with them and herself for that matter and has
nothing but contempt for her parents.  Her best friend Angela Hayes (Mena
Suvari) has caught the attention of Lester's eye who develops a crush on his
daughter's friend and sexually fantasizes about her quite often and we see
his fantasies visually with nicely textured scenes which are tasteful and
very deep rooted.
Next door to the Burnham family live the Fitts.  There is the teenage son
Ricky (Wes Bentley), a drug dealer with a deceiving and clean cut appearance
and shining personality.  His father is a right wing gung ho marine (Chris
Cooper) who is a bigot and his mother Barbara (Allison Janney) is a woman
who enjoys playing second fiddle to her military husband and has no life of
her own.  Minor characters that appear briefly but turn out to be important
to the film's resolution and should have been seen more to solidify the
film's emotional tone are two gay men played by Scott Bakula and Sam Robards
as fellow neighbors to the Burnhams and Fitts'.  Rounding out the cast of
significant players is a highly successful real estate honcho portrayed by
Peter Gallagher who has an adulterous affair with Carolyn.
'American Beauty' is filled with acute observations about suburban life and
makes some unattractive characters seem likeable and others which are
equally unattractive are displayed as highly unlikable.  It depicts
personality as its key element of appeal.  Kevin Spacey is brilliant in this
film.  He manages to be tragic, extremely funny and displays youthful
exuberance as a man just past the middle aged part of his life.  Annette
Bening is just as impressive in this film as a woman whose rigid
conservatism makes her sexually repressed, cold and failing as a wife and
mother.  Chris Cooper is the stand out in a supporting performance as one of
those characters you would just love to dunk at a carnival water tank
attached to a target.  His tough as nails portrait of a military man who
hates sensitivity and those different than him make his character perhaps
the most hated in the film as he tries to control his family's every move.
Director Sam Mendes illuminates his film with even strength.  The film never
takes a wrong path when faced with a fork in the road.  Everything is highly
believable and you will shutter with just how much you will identify with at
least one of the film's characters and although you think you can avoid the
comparisons, it will nag at you long after you view the final cut.  The
right words and situations are dished out courtesy of writer Alan Ball.  He
builds an arc of reality around the entire story to the point where its
conclusion should make you seriously evaluate your own life, no matter how
small you deem it to be in certain cases.  'American Beauty' is Oscar
material in all academic categories and despite its title, it really isn't
an American issue at all but one that is possible in any suburban
neighbourhood in the world where there are people.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
Set in the mid to late 80's, a film like 'One True Thing' attempts to
tell the story of Kate Gulden (Meryl Streep) who has dedicated her life
to being a homemaker and in the process of taking care of her family,
finds that she becomes an unintentional burden to them when for once,
she needs taking care of after she develops a slow and torturing form of
cancer.  Did I mention that this story line is only a sub plot?  What
the film is really about is a re-examination of priorities from the
stand point of the woman's daughter Ellen (Renee Zellweger) and how her
career driven life as a Harvard educated writer comes to a sudden halt
when she seems to be the only one in a position to give her mother the
care she needs while she dies slowly at home after being bed ridden and
confined to a wheel chair for too long.  
Meryl Streep receives first billing in this movie and received an Oscar
nomination for it as Best Actress but her role is clearly a supporting
one.  Zellweger is the film's protagonist --- a hard and judgmental
woman who can't cook, clean or do anything in that capacity as well as
her mother.  She carries a secret resentment from not having anything in
common with mom and somehow feels that she is totally blameless.  Her
father (William Hurt) is a fellow writer who runs a department at a post
secondary educational institute and while she has plenty in common with
him from a writer's stand point, she can't quite embrace her father's
generation and grows further and furthr away from him when she finds he
has been having affairs while his wife is dying.
What makes this film work is that although the story is told in
flashback from the the daughter's point of view, we don't really know
until the end of the film, who it is she's talking to about the film's
situations.  Combining that with top notch performances and an easy
flowing sense of style, 'One True Thing' does pay off and is especially
important to film audiences that can identify with its subject matter. 
It does have a distant and rather cold feeling about it that keeps it
from being a true motion picture classic but you have to admire it for
wanting to escape the trappings of a weepy and pretentious tear jerker,
and become just another inflatable film full of false emotion.
The film transcends any thought of making either the career woman or the
homemaker the heroine and treats them both as equals.  Quite a
remarkable thing in the age where most woman are in the work place and
rightfully so because in many cases it's out of necessity, and where the
homemaker is often viewed by many as wasting her life.  But 'One True
Thing' shows us that as long as one feels their existence is important
and they perform a valuable service that nothing ever goes to waste.
The balancing act this movie performs once again fails in the category
of under written characters.  William Hurt's portrayal of the father and
Tom Everett Scott, who plays the family son and Zellweger's brother, are
both not used to their full potential and are rather forgettable
characters.  The film is also too lengthy for many attention spans but
if you can stick it out for two plus hours, it is a film that not only
tells the story of a family but in many ways it looks around for exactly
what the definition of a family really is.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
The last time Clint Eastwood made a movie as a director that was under two
hours was 1990's 'White Hunter, Black Heart' in which he played a variation
on movie director John Huston who was on a quest to get 'The African Queen'
made.  Based on the novel by Andrew Klavan and written for the screen by
Larry Gross, Paul Brickman and Stephen Schiff, 'True Crime' has the usual
stamp of an Eastwood directed film.  It's long, and has a somewhat corroded
and protracted structure but Eastwood manages to land on his feet the way he
usually does --- by making it absorbing.  You would expect to find a quiet
and somewhat muted tone to a film that is a suspenseful take on the
execution of a possibly innocent man.
In 'True Crime', Eastwood plays Steve Everett, a seemingly washed up
investigative journalist who is one of those guys that cheats on his wife,
drinks and smokes too much, has little or no money, constantly fights with
his superiors, and through it all, is also great at his job.  As the film is
in its early stages, Everett is seen sleeping with the wife of one of his
editors (Denis Leary) who later finds out about the affair and upon
confronting Everett about it, both of them find that cooler heads prevail.
The same can't be said, however, for Everett's senior editor (James Woods),
who is hilarious and has some of the film's best scenes of dialogue in his
conflicts with Everett.
At San Quentin prison, a death row inmate named Frank Beachum (Isiah
Washington) is about to be executed on the day a young female journalist
from Everett's newspaper is supposed to do a human interest story about the
event.  She is killed on in a car wreck on the infamous Dead Man's curve and
the assignment goes to Everett.  He is told to do some straight reporting
and naturally he doesn't listen and the more he thinks about it and observes
the facts of the case, the more he finds out that the prisoner may be
innocent and he is on a last minute crusade to save his life.  Isiah
Washington is excellent in this film as Beachum and he accepts his fate in a
very calm manner.  The guards at the prison during his final hours are
polite and make things as easy for him as possible and Beachum refuses to
show any remorse for the crime to the prison chaplain since he insists he's
innocent.  His wife and little girl visit him (assuming its the last time)
and it's a very emotional scene.
Everett tries to balance his coverage of the story with his personal life
and had, on this day, promised to take his little girl to the zoo.  Never
one to balance his personal and professional life in proper perspective,
Beachum neglects his duty as both father and husband and pursues the story
which should be his first priority after all since a man is about to die.
In addition to being a taut and nail biting dram, 'True Crime' also succeeds
at being an very interesting rap of social commentary on both sides of the
death penalty.  It offers an explanation that at the time of lethal
injection, two guards push the button setting off the machine to inject
poison into the prisoner's system but a computer scrambles the motion of
events so each guard doesn't know who really administered the deadly
punishment.  Sort of like the theory of a firing squad where 6 men open fire
on their prey but only one has live ammunition.  The film also shows the
doubts and fears that prison officials have with carrying out their duty.
Unfortunately, the film takes wild an unexpectedly bizarre turn into
degrading its final twenty minutes into becoming an action picture.
Eastwood makes the film seem like it will throw you a curve ball at the last
minute and while waiting for the inevitable to happen, Eastwood is able to
keep the audience on the edge of their seats as things may turn out
differently than expected.  And Clint even uses slow motion at one point,
something he's long been against and I can't remember the last time he EVER
used it!  Through it all, the movie is well worth a look for the most part,
but waivers from being a potential classic and is instead another
installment in the Clint Eastwood director's library where his style is
becoming too typical.  How many times can you direct a film with pace and
feeling of jazz music, Eastwood's favourite form of musical rhythm which
doesn't always work in his movies!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
I suppose there are many ways of telling a story that deals with nuclear
terrorism and while 'The Peacemaker' decides it's going to be an action film
filled with gunfire, chases and explosions, it really isn't all that
exciting.  That isn't to say that it lacks merit in other areas such as
casting, location filming and brisk editing.  What it boils down to is an end
result that can't escape its own predictability.  If you're willing to
overlook these flaws, you will be generally entertained but never moved.
 'The Peacemaker' is the first film from Dreamworks Pictures which is the
creation of Steven Spielberg, Jeffrey Katzenberg and David Geffen and they
have aimed their first film directly at the average movie goer rather than at
a more broad range of movie tastes.
George Clooney plays a military officer who leads a team to find stolen
nuclear weapons involving participants from the new Russia and Bosnia.
 Nicole Kidman is a nuclear scientist working with him.  She's the voice and
Clooney is the muscle in carrying out the mission.  The film's first half
hour is rather difficult to follow as the characters introduced to the
audience are secondary and remain that way for the entire movie.  Oddly
enough, I had the precarious feeling I was watching the set up to a James
Bond movie and that I had seen it all before.  The American government, using
their satellite tracking devices from outer space, learn of the dilema and
proceed to stop it.  Their search takes them to many places and the film's
climax takes place back in America.
Director Mimi Leder and screenwriter Michael Schiffer work on a similar
parallel in using extreme violence in many circumstances to make their point
and what makes 'The Peacemaker' an acceptable thriller is that both leads
(Clooney and Kidman) maintain an impressive and equal amount of talent in
proceeding to save the world.  Neither one of their characters is above the
other and I thought that was appropriate.  Unfortunately, this first effort
from Dreamworks takes its audience for granted most of the time and that is a
disappointing start for the new studio.

Title
Review for Dresser, The (1983)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Three of director Peter Yates' most impressive films are 'Bullitt' (1968),
'Breaking Away' (1979) and 'The Dresser' (1983).  Scripted by Ronald Harwood
from his critically acclaimed play, 'The Dresser' tells the story of a group
of traveling actors in England during World War II who perform plays by
William Shakespeare.  The film focuses on two characters in particular.  One
is the head of the acting company who goes by the name of Sir (Albert
Finney), a man who is unable to grasp the very essence of friendship and a
man who is slowly being driven insane by an empty life of loneliness and
constantly repeating himself in the plays he performs.  The other is Norman
(Tom Courtenay).  He is Sir's personal valet and he performs his duty with
rigid loyalty and a deep caring for the man he serves knowing all along that
Sir's life is taking a toll on his own.
This is dramatic movie making at its finest and found a place with movie
industry peers with 5 Academy Award nominations, Best Picture, Actor (both
Courtenay and Finney), Director (Peter Yates) and Adapted Screenplay (Ronald
Harwood).  The film plays out with its roots remaining loyal to the play on
which it is based.  It takes place mostly in dressing room corridors, in
dressing rooms themselves, on the stage while the actors are performing and
has very little outdoor photography or varying scenes in general.  It is
almost exactly like watching a play with the audience confined to a stage
atmosphere.  It's ability to abandon the visuals of typical filmmaking make
it a film about the stage worth treasuring.  Truly an inspiration for anyone
considering a career in the theatre.  

Title
Review for Tender Mercies (1983)
There have been many redemption stories put through a camera lens in film
history.  The 1980's had some obvious and often talked about winners such as
'The Verdict' (1982) in which most film gossipers felt Paul Newman was robbed
by not winning the Best Actor Oscar as an alcoholic lawyer struggling with
the biggest case of his life.  The Oscar most deservingly went to Ben
Kingsley that year for 'Gandhi', respectively.  'Amadeus', which in part was
about a man (F. Murray Abraham in an Oscar winning role) observing the
realization of what his fate in eternity might be by absolving himself in
confession of his sins to a priest and then on a lighter note there was
'Tootsie' (1982) which most people don't think about as a story of redemption
but it is since its leading star (Dustin Hoffman) finds out through a gender
exchange done with make-up and women's clothes that he was a better person as
a woman in the short time he faked it than he ever was as a man.
1983 saw a small, little seen film entitled 'Tender Mercies' receive
exceptional notices from the critic's circle and from the Academy of Motion
Picture Arts and Sciences as it was nominated for 5 Academy Awards; Best
Picture, Best Actor (Robert Duvall), Best Director (Bruce Beresford), Best
Screenplay Written Directly For the Screen (Horton Foote who was a previous
winner for 1962's 'To Kill a Mockingbird') and Best Original Song ('Over You'
written by Austin Roberts and Bobby Hart).  Both Duvall and Foote came out
winners that year for their efforts.  As an actor it was Duvall's fourth
nomination after 'The Godfather' (1972 nominee for Best Supporting Actor),
'Apocalypse Now' (1979 nominee for Best Supporting Actor) and 'The Great
Santini' (1980 nominee as Best Actor).  If any American actor can hold his
own and can stir up conversation among film historians for all time it is
Robert Duvall.  
In 'Tender Mercies' Duvall emerged with a stunning characterization by
portraying a country and western singer well past the middle age of life
struggling with alcoholism and the demons of misery concerning an ex-wife who
won custody of their only child, a daughter, whom Duvall hasn't seen in many
years.  In the opening scene of the film we glance upon a country road motel
room window at night in which two figures in silhouette fashion can be seen
and rumblings are heard from the room with the repetitive chant of 'Give me
the bottle!' ringing out.  The motel's young and widowed owner, (Tess Harper)
and her young son step out on to the porch of the office and listen while
trying to watch the scene play out through the window  The scene abruptly
shifts to the room itself as Duvall is shoved to the floor by the other man
in a pathetic struggle over a bottle of alcohol.  The man with Duvall is
never seen on camera making this scene one of clever duplicity.  The next
morning Duvall awakes from his drunken cloudiness and the film's credits
begin to appear and the picture's tone and protagonist are established.
As the film progresses Duvall works off what he owes for the motel since he
is flat broke and asks to stay on and work as he is attracted to Harper and
sees a chance for redemption with his new surroundings.  He stops drinking
and is paid a visit by a persistent journalist (Paul Gleason) who asks Duvall
if he's a famous country and western singer from yesteryear that he's
planning to do a story on.  Duvall is naturally publicity shy and the
journalist informs him that his ex-wife (Betty Buckley) who is a world famous
c+w singing sensation is having a concert nearby.  Duvall then takes an
interest as it will give him an opportunity to see his only daughter.  Upon
seeing his ex-wife they immediately go for each other's throats verbally and
the spat is broken up by Buckley's manager (Wilford Brimley).  
A short time later Duvall is paid a visit by his now adult daughter (Ellen
Barkin) and the two of them are glad to see each other although sentimental
feelings never surface giving the film a dimension of stability by avoiding
any pretentious qualities.  Also in the course of the film, Harper and Duvall
get married and Duvall treats his new wife and stepson with dignity and
respect and they are paid constant visits by a group of young musicians who
idolize Duvall and they help him back on the road to success.  He makes a
recording that seems to do well but then an event occurs in his life which
reminds him of one of life's most staggering tragedies and he explains to his
wife in a heartfelt moment the he never did trust happiness.  It was that key
scene which won Duvall the Oscar more than any other point in the film.
 Duvall also wrote and sang his own songs in the film.  In fact, the entire
cast shines and Tess Harper's performance was overlooked that year by the
Academy and she would go on to be a nominee in 1986 as Best Supporting
Actress for 'Crimes of the Heart' which was good work but significantly less
than her work in 'Tender Mercies'.
'Tender Mercies' is a series of short scenes that make a short film with a
running length of only 89 minutes but the enormous power that shines
gracefully on the audience comes from the film's monumental simplicity
started by Horton Foote's script and carried out by director Bruce Beresford
and is a testament to Beresford's talent as a director.  In 1989, his film
'Driving Miss Daisy' would go on to win the Best Picture Academy Award but
Beresford would find himself not receiving a Best Director nomination that
year.  'Tender Mercies' is a solid film classic that is free from the
trappings of Hollywood's often too obvious visual style of fake emotion and
is proof that smaller films can sometimes be the backbone that keeps the
entire motion picture industry alive.

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
When director Oliver Stone made his 1994 statement 'Natural Born Killers', it
was to illustrate a point.  Violent criminals were made out to be celebrities
and heroes by not only the tabloid but mainstream media.  That film was
misunderstood by most who felt it nothing more than a free for all of
violence, coarse language and sexually demeaning innuendo when its real
intention was in fact to bring an anti-violence message.  Make no mistake,
there is no misunderstanding Stone's latest film 'U-Turn' as it is simply a
low key re-hash of 'Natural Born Killers' given a soap opera twist, wretched
characters whom we care nothing about and the film is blatantly pointless.
A hustling drifter (Sean Penn) on his way to California is caught up in the
Arizona desert after the radiator hose on his car bursts and he must take it
to the only garage in the area which is in the real life small town of
Superior, about 50 miles east of Phoenix.  He encounters a frightfully shifty
garage mechanic (Billy Bob Thornton) who is the only memorable character in
the film.  Upon leaving his car to be repaired he journeys into an odyssey of
hell where almost every character is evil.  He encounters a sultry young
woman on a street corner (Jennifer Lopez) and helps her with her parcels all
the way home and upon getting close to each other her husband (Nick Nolte)
walks in the assaults Penn who promptly leaves.  Later Nolte encounters him
again and apologizes and asks Penn if he might be interested in killing his
wife and he'll split the insurance money with him.  Penn at first says no but
finds himself in a position where he needs the money and upon seeing Lopez
again she asks him to kill Nolte !  And more money is involved ! !  If this
sounds like 'Double Indemnity' in the wild west, it just might be.
The town's sheriff (Powers Boothe) isn't what he appears to be and the film
reaches a certain point and just goes on and on way to long for the audience
to care anymore about anybody involved.  There are a couple of pointless
scenes which involve Penn encountering
a blind Vietnam veteran who begs for change on the street (Jon Voight) and
his character is insultingly stereotyped.  There is also a goofy spat between
Penn and a jealous redneck (Joaquin Phoenix) who thinks Penn is trying to
move in on his girl.
Oliver Stone has made some of the most shocking, important, socially aware
and truthful films in recent memory and has three Oscars for his filmmakng
efforts in directing and writing.  Since Stone has nothing left to prove and
can choose to make any film he wants to, is it necessary to be so pointless?
 At least Steven Spielberg can make a pointless film like 'Jurassic Park'
which at least contains state of the art special effects but entertains an
audience to the point where they want to come back.  Stone hasn't had a top
notch film since 1991's 'JFK' and six years is a long enough wait.     

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
WARNING:  Spoilers are contained to make a point in reviewing this film.
It's December 9, 1998.  A Canadian man named Stan Faulder is awaiting
execution by lethal injection tomorrow in the state of Texas, convicted
of a 1975 murder, and the circumstances leading up to the man's date
with death and the facts of his involvement in the crime remain somewhat
hazy.  Whether or not Faulder will die at the hands of capital
punishment remains uncertain.  As a Canadian citizen myself, I support
the use of capital punishment but only in absolutely certain cases where
the killers confess or where the criminal implicated is definitely
identified and his or her case is not circumstantial.  In any event,
their death means they will never kill again and the tax dollars needed
to support them in prison for thirty, forty or even fifty years could be
better spent on education, medicare, old age pensions and other worthy
social causes.
In 1995, Tim Robbins directed an absolutely brilliant film that was
fair, unbiased and left you wrestling with the moral dilemma of people
playing God (assuming you believe in God) in a world God gave us to run
as best we can.  Does that mean killing killers?  Perhaps.  Perhaps
not.  The film was 'Dead Man Walking' and it, along with 'The American
President' and 'Leaving Las Vegas' should have replaced the silly
choices of 'Babe', 'Il Postino (The Postman)' and 'Sense and
Sensibility' as some of the Best Picture Oscar nominees that year.
The film did win an Oscar for Susan Sarandon's heartfelt performance as
a nun who counsels a death row inmate (Sean Penn), sentenced to die in
Louisiana by lethal injection for the torture and murder of two
teenagers.  Fingers were pointed at Penn and another man but only Penn
got the death sentence while the other man got life.
Sean Penn is also extraordinary in this film.  He was Oscar nominated as
Best Actor and a strong case could have been made for him winning over
Nicolas Cage who scooped up the prize for 'Leaving Las Vegas'.  Based on
a novel by Sister Helen Prejean (whom Sarandon portrays in the film),
'Dead Man Walking' took the courageous step of examining the grief of
the victim's families.  Sarandon visits with the family of the murdered
girl and they believe that she is on their side in comforting them
through the pain of dealing with their child's death but when they find
out that she is counseling the death row inmate, they are enraged and
order her to leave their house.  The other murder victim's father is
more understanding but is still filled with hate and also objects to
Sarandon comforting the man about to die.  Sarandon also visits the
condemned man's family to get their response to the events about to take
place.
Tim Robbins made this film coming off an extraordinary performance in
the classic prison drama 'The Shawshank Redemption' in 1994 and turning
to another prison film within a year by examining a different subject
from a different point of view as a director rather than as an actor
shows Robbins' range on both fronts.
Elements of the convict's trial are exposed as unfair since he had a tax
lawyer defend him in court.  I have a lot of respect for Tim Robbins as
a director for showing both sides of the debate and letting the audience
make up their own minds.  He cross cuts footage of the execution at the
end of the film with footage of the crimes and uses the ghosts of the
murder victims to appear in the witness box at the time of execution.
Balanced with the expressions on the faces of the murder victims
families upon seeing a man executed and all done with a hauntingly
soulless musical interlude, 'Dead Man Walking' spells out one of
society's controversial topics that deserves as much consideration and
spotlight as any other important social issue.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Capricorn One (1978)
     The details are sketchy but I seem to recall watching an interview on
television news a couple of years back where a Hubble telescope analyst was
asked when we'll see pictures of what American astronauts left on the moon.
The astronauts left the American flag, a space cart and a plaque to
commemorate the historic event which is visible at the beginning of 1996's
'Independence Day' as the menacing mother ship from an alien world makes its
way towards Earth.  The analyst mentioned something to the effect that
because of the curvature of the moon and the angle of the telescope's
placement that seeing pictures of the American souvenirs left behind would
not be possible.  Many have speculated without evidence that the moon
landing in 1969 was a hoax, a mission carried out on a sound stage much like
the ones prepared for motion pictures using a pressure chamber to simulate
the lack of gravity that comes with a moon walk but the evidence in support
of the moon landing appears to be overwhelming but after seeing the effects
of the 'Apollo 13' mission in reality and in Ron Howard's 1995 film and the
constant
glitches experienced by NASA which remain to this day, it is a question that
lurks in the back of many minds.
     Major conspiracies in movies have been present long before Oliver Stone
made 1991's 'JFK' and frankly I'm sick of all the criticism Stone takes
every time he puts a movie out where conspiracy jokes ran wild in view of
his selected subject matter.  Director Peter Hyams ('The Star Chamber',
'2010', 'The Relic') displays a major conspiracy by the American space
program in which some will kill to protect their sinister secret of a faked
mission to Mars.  I'm talking about his 1978 film, 'Capricorn One'.  
     Three astronauts (James Brolin, Sam Waterston and O.J.Simpson) are hand
picked to lead America's next venture into outer space.  They are informed
by a bureaucrat and conspiracy participant (Hal Holbrook) before the mission
to Mars takes off that it won't work.  The trio are threatened if they don't
go along with the cover-up and their lives, their futures and the future of
their families is indirectly threatened.  They are expected to present a
false senses of hope that the space program can reach unlimited success even
if it means creating lies that will sell.
     The three astronauts decide at the last minute that they will pull the
plug and expose the entire thing and their efforts take a turn for the worst
when they end up in the desert chased by government assassins who intend to
kill them.  The entire story is picked up and followed by an investigative
reporter (Elliott Gould) who also becomes a target for elimination when he
gets too close to the truth.
     'Capricorn One' moves like an infectious and hypnotizing thriller as it
develops a somewhat familiar path into Hitchcock territory but although its
characteristics are heightened by movie making choosing to enhance the
theory of suspension of disbelief to a maximum effect, it still is an
entertaining ride with a great final sequence that you've never seen before. 
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
'The Mummy' strikes a familiar chord along the lines of irreverent film
making in so much as that it turns out to be nothing more than popcorn
entertainment.  As this was clearly the intention, the hustle and bustle of
its sheer aim to please can't quite escape the fact that the film is out of
control, over the top, over simplified and overly dependent on special
effects.  There are few laughs because the campy humour isn't understood by
all, few injections of character fuel, and the film is like a rollercoaster
gone out of control.  Instead of building a slow momentum leading up to the
action sequences, the film is determined to make the hair on the back of
your neck stand up indefinitely in its second half and it never gives you a
chance to breathe and it feels all wrong.
'The Mummy' does deserve credit in several areas.  The first of which is its
look.  Designed to look and feel entirely different than the 1932 feature
with Boris Karloff (technology sort of makes it impossible to look like the
original I suppose), this film has impressive production designs, sweeping
special effects which are good but over done.  It's attempt to poke fun at
films like 'Raiders of the Lost Ark' and other movies of a similar nature
isn't necessarily a good thing.  Doesn't Hollywood leave the lampooning of
classic films to Leslie Nielsen?
Brendan Fraser stars as an American in the French Foreign Legion named Rick
O'Connell, who, on an archaeological dig at the ancient city of Hamunaptra
accidentally awakens the Mummy who is the evil Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo) from
the days of the ancient Egypt around 1300 B.C. who was tortured, buried
alive and whose soul never laid down to rest upon his death and he seeks
revenge upon being awakened in what is now 1923.  O'Connell is joined in his
adventure by Evelyn Carnarvon (Rachel Weisz) and her brother Jonathan (John
Hannah).
The film might have come across better if it had a few big name and
experienced stars to carry it during its weak spots the way Jack Nicholson
carried 1989's 'Batman' through some of its weaker areas when the film
seemed like it was sagging and Nicholson's clear improvisation saved it from
collapsing.  The budget looked so big in 'The Mummy' that I suppose there
was little chance of latching onto a big name when most of them now command
20 million dollars a picture which is approximately 1/5 of a big studio
film's standard budget.
Director Stephen Sommers ('Deep Rising') makes the fatal mistake of allowing
the film to run over two hours (124 minutes to be exact).  'The Mummy' feels
like a marathon runner's feet at the end of a long run.  It's tiresome.
There's no doubt that the film is great to look at on the big screen in many
instances but the audience I saw it with had a lot of kids and after seeing
the look on the face of many parents in the crowd I think they realized the
film wasn't exactly a family adventure and the film definitely isn't for
young children under the age of 12.
On the veteran's end of the scale, 'The Mummy' has some redeeming
satisfactions.  Oscar winner and multiple nominee Jerry Goldsmith is
responsible for the film's sweeping original score and Oscar nominated
camera man Adrian Biddle ('Thelma and Louise') gives the movie a gleaming
and refined look of beauty.
Every entity has a weakness that leads to its destruction.  Superman had
Kryptonite, the Death Star had a hole two metres wide and the Blob had the
cold.  'The Mummy' has the distinction of being the type of film that over
uses special effects and doesn't have enough of anything else and it should
have realized that when special effects are involved, sometimes less is
indeed more.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
     Cynics were already taking shots at director/star Kevin Costner's film
'The Postman' as it was in production and dubbed it 'Dirtworld', mocking it
in reference to Costner's terrible and empty 1995 film 'Waterworld' about
the Earth consumed by melting glaciers eventually flooding most of the
planet.  That film was very unusual, especially showing the characters with
soiled clothes and faces in a world full of water?  In reality, 'The
Postman' is a rich and diversely entertaining film with a thunderous
frontier charge reminiscent of Costner's Oscar-winning 'Dances With Wolves'
from 1990.  Can comparisons be made to 'Dances With Wolves' and 'Waterworld'
when describing 'The Postman'?  Yes.  In fairness, 'The Postman' should be
judged on its own merit and it has plenty of it.
     Based on the award winning science fiction novel by David Brin, 'The
Postman' takes places in the year 2013 when the combination of a deadly
plague and war have ravaged and 
destroyed the fabric of the United States turning the clock back a couple of
centuries to the days of the pioneers.  
     Costner is a lone drifter traveling with his mule named Bill and the
two of them stop at small towns and perform humourous antics for the folks
of the community.  At one 
encounter, Costner meets General Bethlehem (Will Patton), a brutal and
Hitler-like leader who even likes to paint like Hitler did and has taken it
upon himself to be the new leader of the former United States and has an
army of goons who follow him dressed in militia-like outfits for the purpose
of inflicting brutality.
     General Bethlehem demands all men between the ages of 15 and 50 be
turned over to him for the purpose of indoctrination into his army and
Costner is a reluctant subject taken in a prisoner-like manner and
eventually escapes and makes his way to another community.  Before doing so
he finds an abandoned U.S. postal service truck lost in the forest where the
skeleton of a postman still in uniform remains and a bag of mail is in his
possession.  Costner takes the uniform and mail to the new community where
he begins to build hope for the future and re-establishes the mail service
and the days and historical references of the Pony Express are invoked.
     Costner meets a beautiful young woman (Olivia Williams) who along with
her husband asks him to father their child since her husband is infertile
after he contracts a virus.  Costner finally agrees after some very friendly
persuasion.  He also builds a loyal army of men and women who agree to be
postal carriers to face and abolish the naked aggression of General Bethlehem.
     I was overwhelmed by the beautiful scenery of 'The Postman' as it uses
the landscape of U.S. states such as Arizona and Oregon in its filming.  The
characters are well developed and the emotion is brought through in
Costner's ability to use an old fashioned subject and present it from a
different angle in a convincing and powerful manner.  
     The film's climax is tastefully presented as things are resolved with a
restrained amount of bloodshed for a film about war and a conclusion for
which many critics are 
accusing Costner of taking an ego trip.  Just because a director chooses to
tell a story with himself in the lead, doesn't mean he's on an ego trip.  No
one complained when 
Costner did it in 'Dances With Wolves' and people have rarely accused Clint
Eastwood of the same practice although he directs himself as the hero time
and time again.
     At a running time of 2 hours and 57 minutes, 'The Postman' is an epic
story of hope, renewal and is a pure visual presentation of conflict in
which a hero is built in 
a most unusual fashion both convincingly and in a way that makes you feel
good when you leave the theatre.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
One of the most flawless films of 1998 has arrived and it is called
'Shakespeare in Love'.  This is high spirited entertainment that is
rousing and the best thing about it is that it treats the time that it's
set in (the 16th century) with all the understanding of the 20th century
in terms of its use of dialogue.  It isn't a high brow period piece
where you need an interpreter of Shakespearean literature to translate
everything for you.  The majority of the words spoken are comprehensible
for the layman and enough to hopefully satisfy even the most radical fan
of the most influential writer of all time.  Having said that, it should
also be noted that there are no real stars in the picture, giving it a
great look of authenticity and believing that the people you are seeing
are indeed the characters they're playing and not themselves.  I man
wiser than I once said, "Give me no stars, just talent."  This is where
you'll find it.
The film is a fictional romp of how the influences in Shakespeare's own
life were the inspiration to finalize his play of 'Romeo and Juliet'.
Given another title originally in the film, it doesn't sound right to
most and the final title rolls off the tongue with anticipation for
those wishing to see it.
Gwyneth Paltrow is Viola, the daughter of a wealthy man and her marriage
is arranged and she is to marry Lord Wessex (Colin Firth), a man of
little warm emotion and who has plenty of cold domineering sides to his
personality and a man whom Viola can't stand.  Her heart belongs to Will
Shakespeare (Joseph Fiennes).  The two meet and fall in love and are
inseparable just as Romeo and Juliet were.  What's amusing in all of
this is the fact that at the time, Shakespeare was not regarded, as the
film states, as a great literary giant of his time but as a struggling
writer whose plays were always approached with crossing fingers for
success.  My, how things have changed based on the film's message here.
There is an assorted cast of characters in this film that give it the
free spirit it needs so as not to be bogged down with the assuming slow
pace of a romance.  This film has the cocky one (Ben Affleck).  He's an
actor who demands perfection and decides who is fit to work with him.
Ohhh, the stiff upper lip of him.  Really!  There is the clownish one
(Geoffery Rush).  As an Oscar winning actor who shined in 'Shine', this
is a role that Rush can have a ball with.  He plays the buffoonish owner
of the Rose theatre.  A man who weasels out of paying off the
extortionists and always snivels with good intentions.  There is the
deadly serious Queen Elizabeth (Judi Dench), whom we can't take our eyes
of of not because of the way she looks but by the way she speaks.  If
modern day school teachers were like her, the education system would get
a gold star.  Other actors who could have had larger and more memorable
roles are Tom Wilkinson ('The Full Monty'), Rupert Everett ('My Best
Friend's Wedding'), and Simon Callow ('Four Weddings and a Funeral'.  He
was the funeral.)
Their under written parts don't take away from the rest of the film
because they aren't major players but they are interesting nevertheless.
One of the producers of this film is Edward Zwick, director of 'The
Siege', 'Courage Under Fire', 'Legends of the Fall', and 'Glory'.  His
influence over this film's production brings a smooth mix to it which
gives it the fluid filming it needs to win over the majority of film
audiences which I believe it will.
The film is directed by John Madden and written by Marc Norman and Tom
Stoppard and for this movie to make its mark so well in putting aside
the rigid elements of a Shakespearean play for which mainstream lovers
of the arts have been known to mock and not understand it fully, this is
a film for which all can enjoy and re-inventing Shakespeare by taking
poetic license in a fictional account of his life is better and more
acceptable than re-writing any of his work.  That task would not be
acceptable anywhere.  One of 1998's best films and a worthy candidate
for a Best Picture Oscar nomination.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
     Steven Spielberg is without a doubt the most creatively diverse movie
maker of his generation.  He chooses material for children and adults alike
and often makes important social statements while doing so.  He released
'Jurassic Park' in 1993 and followed it up that same year with 'Schindler's
List'.  Can you think of two films more diverse?  He has released the sequel
to 'Jurassic Park' in 1997 entitled 'The Lost World: Jurassic Park' and has
followed that up with 'Amistad'.  
     Beginning in 1839, it tells the story of a slave ship whose prisoners,
led by new coming actor Djimon Hounsou, miraculously escape and kill the
Spanish crew of the ship.  Two men who bought the slaves remain and are
ordered by the prisoners to steer the ship back to Africa.  The ship floats
into U.S. waters and the slaves find themselves in the hands of U.S.
authorities and are tried for their actions in a New England Court.
     Their attorney (Matthew McConaughey), is joined by an abolitionist
(Morgan Freeman) and another man (Stellan Skarsgard) who fight for the
freedom of the slaves and they seek the counsel of former U.S. President
John Quincy Adams (Anthony Hopkins) who helps them argue for the release of
the prisoners in the United States Supreme Court.  
     The strongest thing 'Amistad' has going for it is that its message is
undoubtedly about morality.  The challenge in finding justice tries to
overcome many obstacles.  It places its profound message on the highest
pedestal and drives a stake into the heart of the American justice system as
it tests its fairness which sometimes seems partial when the President at
the time of the incident, Martin Van Buren (Nigel Hawthorne), who is a
supporter of slavery only in terms of keeping the South off his case,
replaces the judge at the trial with someone of his own choosing who may
rule against the slaves in their argument for release.
     'Amistad' begins slowly and gets better as it goes along and is well
crafted above anything else.  You can tell this is a film which was
discussed greatly by everyone involved in the making of it as it again looks
and feels like nothing Hollywood has ever made before which is a special
gift Spielberg has.
     The most important character in the film is the portrayal of John
Quincy Adams by Anthony Hopkins.  By the end of the film you wish you had
seen more of him but you realize that his role was adequate enough to affect
the outcome of the film and you feel satisfied after thinking about it.
Hopkins triumphs again in playing another U.S. President separated by 130
years.  Remember 1995's 'Nixon'?  It makes Hopkins a more appreciated and
cherished actor when you consider his range in playing those two characters
along with many others just as different.
     I was very impressed with the performance of Djimon Hounsou as Cinque,
the man who is the centre of the slaves' struggle for freedom.  It is
possible that along with Hopkins, he could receive an Oscar nomination for
this movie.  I hope 'Amistad' finds a place separate from Hollywood's
commercialism at Christmas time and while it does take liberties with
history's actual events, it should still be used in schools and universities
as an important learning tool in the progression of a more equal society.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association' at:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
What made 1993's 'The Fugitive' so compelling was that it managed to
avoid becoming just another routine action picture with a clever script
which a lot of writers worked on, among them David Giler, Walter Hill,
Robert Mark Kamen, David Newman, Jeb Stuart and David N. Twohy.  It had
an average director (Andrew Davis) who managed to pull a rabbit out of
his director's hat by doing extremely good work but he didn't get an
Oscar nomination while the film, for Best Picture, did.  The film did
earn Tommy Lee Jones an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor as a determined
U.S. marshall who absolutely will not quit until he gets his man and
Harrison Ford was unjustifiably misunderstood and snubbed for a Best
Actor nomination as Jones' intended quarry, and Ford turned in a
performance which had little dialogue but plenty of method, sublime and
reaction acting which I suppose explains why the Academy asked him to
present the Best Picture award at that given year's ceremonies.
Director Stuart Baird ('Executive Decision') is at the helm of 'U.S.
Marshals' which can't quite avoid being a diluted remake of 'The
Fugitive', as the plot is restricted once again to the pursuit of one
man and the exposure of a frame-up.  You don't get films more studio
oriented than this but this unnecessary movie is not a total wipeout,
despite being an effort to cash-in on the original, as it does have some
eye catching stunts, action and a pleasant pace at times but the movie
is extremely uneven.
Tommy Lee Jones is back as the U.S. marshall and this time his adventure
leads him to the pursuit of an escaped prisoner (Wesley Snipes) who is
framed for two murders involving international and domestic espionage
and Jones' entire team of assistants from the first film are back to
assist him.
We had a bus crash and train wreck account for the mayhem which led to
escaped prisoners in 'The Fugitive' and this time it's a plane crash and
its drowning wreckage that is the culprit.  Harrison Ford jumps off of
the edge of a water dam tunnel and now Snipes avoids being captured by
Jones by swinging on a wire from the top of a building in New York and
landing squarely on top of a high speed subway car and Snipes salutes
his predator as the train speeds away and Jones can only watch.
I had an accurate picture of the plot this time, regardless of its
shortcomings, but I was struck by the quantity of unnecessary characters
written in for no good measure.  There is Snipes' girlfriend (Irene
Jacob) who amounts to nothing more than a sympathetic beauty.  There's
Kate Nelligan, a U.S. marshal who barks orders and pushes a pencil
behind her bureaucratic desk who isn't really in the field of action and
just happens to be Jones' boss (it should be the other way around) and
then there's Robert Downey Jr., an agent assisting Jones' and his team
who is suspiciously low-key but never effective after being exposed for
what he is.  I ended up saying "Why are these people here for no other
reason except to be annoying?"
In wake of its recent trend of flops, Warner Bros. is celebrating its
75th anniversary this year which they are marketing heavily and while
studio execs who are green lighting projects and making movies that
matter but don't generate great box office such as 'L.A. Confidential',
it would be nice to see a film from them that didn't have to be a quick
cash grab and all studios should have the integrity to occasionally say
no to a sequel just for the sake of money.  Just ask the creators of
'E.T.'
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Midnight Express (1978)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
American films have dealt quite successfully with prison themes in such films
as 'Cool Hand Luke' (1967), 'The Longest Yard' (1974), 'Brubaker' (1980), and
'The Shawshank Redemption' (1994).  While these films are all excellent and
deal with diverse subjects inside their institutions, they all have one thing
in common; they are all domestic.  Alan Parker's 1978 film 'Midnight Express'
tells the true story of an American who was caught smuggling drugs out of
Turkey in 1970 and was sentenced to life imprisonment.  One of the opening
scene is breathtaking. There is a pulsating sound effect of a constant
heartbeat in the room where he is taping drugs to his body and upon
departure, he is caught just before entering the plane by Turkish authorities
and is put in jail.  
Brad Davis plays William Hayes, the American in question.  The story then
focuses on his family and American authorities trying to facilitate his
release.  He attempts an escape and only makes things worse for himself.  At
his trial he makes a rather poignant speech in conflict with the laws and
customs of Turkey and he is a criminal nevertheless and while the film does
extend a look at human rights violations, the audience should never lose
sight of the fact that the film's protagonist IS a criminal and that sympathy
for him may be generated on a certain level but he learns a lesson he will
never forget.
The brutal scenes of torture are hard to watch at times and Parker creates a
dark atmosphere of terror in keeping with the film's theme.  A little known
fact is that the incident documented was adapted into a screenplay by Oliver
Stone who won an Oscar for it and the film would earn a second trophy for the
toggling and pulsating score by Giorgio Moroder.
The cast also includes John Hurt, Randy Quaid and Bo Hopkins and 'Midnight
Express' is a harsh lesson in brutality that make some other prison films
look pale in comparison.

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
     'Rosewood' is based on a true story of a black town in Florida that was
burned to the ground after a white woman falsely accused a black man of rape.
 The tragedy happened in 1923 and was relatively unknown until the incident
was brought to life again seventy years later.
     Director John Singleton ('Boyz N the Hood', 'Poetic Justice', 'Higher
Learning') has made a searing, emotional and harrowing motion picture filled
with a nightmarish theme of mob justice that plays out as a slice of American
life that many will find hard to believe.
     A white shopkeeper (Jon Voight) is conscience stricken by what he sees
and helps the town's black citizens escape persecution and death.  A black
World War I veteran (Ving Rhames) passes through the area and becomes part of
the rescue effort, assisting Voight. Another intriguing member of the cast
(Don Cheadle) is compelling as a strong willed member of the town who refuses
to give in to prejudice.
     The flaws in 'Rosewood' are few and far between as Singleton directs
this movie as an absorbing and meticulously refined drama of detailed
proportions.  His recreation of a time and place in history is as vivid and
convincing as the most researched documentary there is.
     This motion picture is an early contender as one of 1997's best films
and could become Singleton's masterpiece although 'Boyz N the Hood' (1991)
will rank as quite an achievement for the young director who received two
Oscar nominations for that film as director and as the film's writer.  At the
time, he was the youngest director nominated in the history of the Academy,
making 'Boyz N the Hood' when he was 23.  He is a promising and creative mind
for the future of American cinema and his talent is derived largely from
choosing socially powerful subjects and bringing their aspects to the
public's attention and 'Rosewood' is perhaps the best film dealing with
racism since 'Do the Right Thing' (1989) and the best film about mob justice
since 'The Ox-Bow Incident' (1943).  
     The first half of 'Rosewood' is an introduction and visual structure of
a story whose message of violence leading to cause and effect explodes in the
second half with unforgettable results.

Title
Review for Natural, The (1984)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Robert Redford is an extraordinary guy.  Never a word of scandal is written
about him.  He lives quietly with his family on a ranch in western United
States.  He runs the annual Sundance Film Festival and he is politically
active as a loyal democrat.  He has had his share of bad films as all
Hollywood stars have but he has evened it all out with a Best Actor Oscar
nomination for 1973's 'The Sting' and a win in the Best Director category
for 1980's 'Ordinary People'.  His other impressive list of credits include
such diverse films as 'Quiz Show' (1994) for which he received another Oscar
nomination as Best Director and 1988's gem and little seen 'The Milagro
Beanfield War' which squeezed its way in to win an Oscar for Dave Grusin's
music score.  Redford's 1998 film 'The Horse Whisperer' should have had more
success but this film will become a buried treasure of the future and will
take its time to truly get noticed.
Redford's 1984 film 'The Natural' is a film that greatly divided the
critics.  Some accused it of being an obvious soap opera while others
praised it as being an old fashioned story which brought back memories of
Hollywood's golden era.  The plain truth is that 'The Natural' is a story of
lost youth with one man wondering how things would have turned out if his
life had gone in a different direction.  What makes it extremely worthwhile
and fascinating to watch is the fact that the circumstances in this man's
life that hand him a sour lemon are determined by fate and not by choice.
Set primarily from the early to mid 1920's to about 1940, Redford plays Roy
Hobbs, a man who can do anything that the game of baseball requires.....and
he excels at it.  As a friend of his says to a sports writer: "I thought you
might have heard of his 8 no-hitters."  The story of 'The Natural' is truly
filled with fairy tale like qualities and sentimental charm.  As a boy,
Roy's father helps him develop a talent for baseball and after his dad dies,
Roy makes a bat from a tree that was struck by lightning and appropriately
names the bat "Wonderboy" as he brands the name on his bat along with the
image of a lightning bolt.  Roy also has a special lady in his life named
Iris Gaines (Glenn Close).  Roy leaves her behind and intends to send for
her when he makes it in the big leagues.
At a carnival one fine day, after being provoked and taking on a bet, he
strikes out a heavy hitter in the major leagues whose nick name is "The
Whammer" (Joe Don Baker in a take on Babe Ruth).  Traveling with "The
Whammer" is sports writer Max Mercy (Robert Duvall).  The amazing feat
accomplished by Hobbs stuns everyone including the mysterious Harriet Bird
(Barbara Hershey) who is instrumental in Hobbs' future.  The rest of the
story can be explored from here at your own convenience for fear of
spoilers.
Other notable members of the cast are Kim Basinger as a floozy who tries to
seduce Roy in a set up by gamblers and swindlers.  Robert Prosky is the
film's villain as a judge determined to take over the team from Pop Fisher
(Wilford Brimley).  A sly performance which goes uncredited in the film is
by Darren McGavin as an unscrupulous bookie who makes 10 million dollars a
year (about 100 million by today's standards).
Directed by Barry Levinson with a screenplay by Roger Towne and Phil
Dusenberry based on Bernard Malamud's novel, 'The Natural' is a fulfilling
drama of hope and inspiration that captured four Oscar nominations for Caleb
Deschanel's sunlight enriched photography and scenes of silhouettes and many
dark passages which make the film stand out in a truly visual fashion.
Glenn Close was the only member of the cast to receive a nomination, this
time in the Best Supporting Actress category and the art direction/set
decoration made the era look totally authentic as it and the triumphantly
rousing music score by Randy Newman were also nominated.
For those who have flocked away from the game of baseball in recent years
since the devastating loss of the World Series in 1994 due to labour and
management difficulties, 'The Natural' and 1989's 'Field of Dreams' are two
great films that renew your faith in the game and may draw you to it even if
you were never a baseball fan to begin with.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Verdict, The (1982)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Director Sidney Lumet is notoriously respected for getting his films
made in record time, well under budget, and they are usually very good. 
Even his lesser films are still very admirable and he has been nominated
a few times for the Oscar but has never won.  His first big splash in
film was in 1957 when he was nominated for the film '12 Angry Men' which
is the best film ever made about men interacting with each other.  It
details a jury deliberating the fate of a man and tempers flare as the
case is dissected piece by piece.  His best decade was the 1970's when
he made such great films as 'Serpico', 'Dog Day Afternoon', 'Network',
'Murder on the Orient Express', and 'Equus'.  Lumet's films are never a
technical revelation but academics are the important parts of a film and
Lumet never compromises on that.  He also is very good at shocking
audiences with subject matter that he always manages to take to another
level.
His 1982 film 'The Verdict', is probably one of the most powerful films
to use silence as its strength and next to Stanley Kubrick's '2001: A
Space Odyssey', I can't think of a more powerful film to use silence. 
As a story of redemption, it is flawless.  It salvages one man's career
from alcoholic lawyer to legal hero who triumphs over some of the most
powerful forces in society.  
Paul Newman gives one of his top three performances (the others are 'The
Hustler' and 'Hud') in a role that many felt should have won him the
Oscar.  He lost to Ben Kingsley in 'Gandhi' but Newman did get his
Oscar, like a lot of people for the wrong role, for 1986's 'The Color of
Money'.  Oh, well.  At least it was a sequel to 'The Hustler'.  He plays
Frank Galvin, a divorced, alcoholic Boston lawyer about to take on the
case of his life.  A young woman was allegedly given the wrong
anesthetic by her physicians during child birth and was put into a coma
and declared brain dead.  Newman represents the woman's sister and
brother in law who sue the doctors and the Catholic archdiocese which
runs the hospital where everything went wrong.  Working against a
cunning, unethical, unorthodox and snake of a defence attorney named Ed
Concannon (James Mason), Newman only has one friend, Mickey Morrissey
(Jack Warden) who can help him with the case.  He refers to Mason as
"the prince of darkness" and tries to talk Newman out of going to
court.  It's a case that should never have come to trial as an offer was
made to settle out of court but Newman turns it down by thinking it's a
pay off to look the other way.
Newman not only has the difficulties of dealing with the defence but has
to overcome a biased judge, enraged clients who feel left out of the
decision making process, the betrayal of someone close to him and the
fact that his law practice hasn't been good lately.  Combine that with
the fact that his adversaries have more resources than he does truly
puts him in a position to overcome.
The film received five Oscar nominations --- Best Picture, Best Director
(Sidney Lumet), Best Actor (Paul Newman), Best Supporting Actor (James
Mason) and Best Screenplay Adaptation.  
Another great asset to this film is that it's written by David Mamet. 
Based on the novel by Barry Reed, Mamet spices the screenplay up with
great social observations but never detracts from the fact that it's a
story of redemption above anything else. The courtroom scenes are very
powerful and the film has a great use of music score in the fact that
hardly has one.  The nice thing about this film is the fact that there
is no media frenzy involved on screen and it is a very human story that
is made very credible by the fact that the characters are people that
many of us know in our real lives.  It's one of those heavy handed
dramas without an ounce of comic relief and is more than great film
making, it's a great lesson in overcoming life's truly difficult
obstacles. 
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
'Bicentennial Man' is a test for ourselves and our attitudes.  It is a test
aimed at our degree of cynicism.  How, in the age of ever increasing
resentment towards many things social, can we ever like a film that reaches
out and asks us to look at the world through the eyes of a machine?  Not to
draw a direct comparison, but 'Bicentennial Man' had that strange flavour a
la 'Forrest Gump' where the world is viewed sometimes in a misunderstood way
by those unfamiliar with its realities.  What 'Bicentennial Man' does is it
takes this premise one step forward and instead of using human eyes, the
eyes and functions of a robot get to see it for two hundred years.  Oh, how
many of us would like to see the world two centuries from now.  A cure for
cancer?  AIDS?  Gasoline in cars?  A cashless society?  People living on
other planets?  Day trips to the moon?  The next two top 100 lists from the
American Film Institute of the greatest films of their given century?
Seriously, 'Bicentennial Man' mixes elements of innocence and technology
nicely to give the film a smooth texture and never tries to answer questions
of society's progress a whole lot but concentrates on how one entity
progresses and watches those around him go from one generation to the next.
Chris Columbus is an interesting director.  If he had been around twenty
five or thirty years ago, I can see him having directed a lot of Disney 'B'
fare.  Perhaps those rascally 'Herbie the Love Bug' films or those cheesy
but entertaining films with a young Kurt Russell.  You know, 'The Strongest
Man in the World', 'The Computer Wore Tennis Shoes', and 'Now You See Him,
Now You Don't' to name a few.  In this generation, Columbus has made the
first two 'Home Alone' movies, a gem of a forgotten movie, 'Only the Lonely'
with the late great John Candy, 'Mrs. Doubtfire' and a real sappy letdown
entitled 'Stepmom' which was a film better suited for the likes of Garry
Marshall.
Beginning in the year 2005, Robin Williams is the voice of a robot named
Andrew brought home to a family by the patriarch whom Andrew refers to as
'Sir' (Sam Neill).  There is the lady of the house (Wendy Crewson) and, of
course, you have to have children in a Chris Columbus movie.  The youngest
daughter, Little Miss (Hallie Kate Eisenberg) is the focus of Andrew's
curiosity as he tries to learn about human behaviour.  One day after a
slight malfunction, Sir takes Andrew to be repaired.  His strange, human
like attributes are explained to the manufacturer (he would love to
manufacture many Andrews like this), but Sir makes Andrew tamper proof and
many years later, Andrew runs into Rupert Burns (Oliver Platt), the
manufacturer's successor, who is also a relative, and slowly, Andrew is
given body parts that make him more and more human.  All the while, Andrew
remains faithful to Little Miss, now a grown woman (Embeth Davidtz).
Williams makes his debut in the movie about forty five minutes into the film
as a human like character and his presence is a welcomed one as he continues
his journey and has many visions of life in the two hundred years that he
lives.
Chris Columbus keeps the film on target and maintains a low key approach to
the material.  It feels like a quiet evening spent at home with family
and/or friends doing something docile like playing cards, reading poetry or
playing a board game.  The film has no loud explosions, foul language, major
bursts of emotion and is good family material most of the time.
The film is based on the short story by Issac Asimov and the novel 'The
Positronic Man' by Issac Asimov and Robert Silverburg with a screenplay
written for the screen by Nicholas Kazan ('Reversal of Fortune').  Kazan
brings up memories of some very familiar films such as 'Forrest Gump', as I
mentioned earlier, Woody Allen's 'Sleeper' and a few other films that you
can see for yourself.  This hurts the film somewhat but the direction it dec
ides to take compensates for this somewhat.
When Robin Williams first landed in movies back in the late seventies and
early eighties, I never thought he would elevate himself to the position he
has today.  An Oscar winning actor with an impressive list of important
social films like 'The Fisher King', 'Dead Poets Society' and 'Good Will
Hunting'.  He makes films for the serious, the not so serious and the
downright whimsical.  Even a guest spot of television's 'Homicide' is
something over looked by a lot of people as the measure of just how good
Robin Williams can be.  With the success of 'Apollo 13', Tom Hanks went on
to involve himself with a study of the space program with the series
entitled 'From the Earth to the Moon'.  I would like to see Robin Williams
dive into something close to his heart.  Perhaps host a documentary of some
of pop culture's greatest comedians or star in a bio pick of a real life
comedian, something that would gain him even more respect than he's already
earned from playing real life characters in films like 'Patch Adams' and
'Awakenings'.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Skulls, The (2000)
Cast - Joshua Jackson, Paul Walker, Hill Harper, Leslie Bibb, Craig T.
Nelson, William Petersen, Christopher McDonald
Directed by - Rob Cohen
Written by - John Pogue
Produced by - Neal H. Moritz, John Pogue
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - PG-13 (Parental Guidance
13), Rated PG-13 for violence and brief sexuality.
Running Length - 106 minutes
Distributor - Universal Pictures
'The Skulls' was such a disappointment.  More than that it was appalling and
downright destined for the 'Dawson's Creek' generation and no one else.  In
fact, this could have been a 'Dawson's Creek' episode where people would
say: "Wow, how bizarre.  I never thought I would ever see an episode like
this".....much in the same way that fans of 'The X-Files' re-acted when they
saw their first humour episode of the show.....the only difference is that
'The X-Files' is usually brilliant and is certainly landmark television.  I
wanted to see this film eagerly because, allegedly, it is based on fact,
however loosely.  It's an intriguing premise.  A group of ivy league
freshmen at a prestigious American university take a vow and become members
of a secret society which amounts to little more than selling you soul to
the devil.  The cars, the cash, the women and the political connections make
you almost untouchable.  The seductive aspect of these creature comforts is
stamped with a hot branding mark on your body in the form of a skull that
makes you a distinct member of the society.  There is also the hidden crypt
where meetings take place, a wrist watch in the form of a skull and a code
of conduct guide in the form of a pocketbook that you are to keep in your
possession at all times.  The movie alleges that three former presidents of
the United States are members and the real life curiosity of the media
prompted them to ask a former president and his son if they're former
members.
Joshua Jackson of television's 'Dawson's Creek' is Luke McNamara, a young
man with a seemingly bright future who gets more than he bargains for when
he joins a secret society with all the trappings mentioned in the above
paragraph.  Luke's closest friends in life are his girlfriend Chloe (Leslie
Bibb) and his best buddy Will (Hill Harper).  Luke makes friends and a fresh
face in his life is Caleb Mandrake (Paul Walker).  Caleb's father Judge
Litten Mandrake (Craig T. Nelson) is a reigning power within the skulls and
welcomes new members with the aid of Senator Ames Levritt (William Petersen)
and the university provost, Lombard (Christopher McDonald).
As I was watching this film I was reminded of how some film makers bite off
more than they can chew.  This film is the perfect Saturday night popcorn
movie rental when it comes to home video where a group of teenage girls will
gather around their television and swoon over the two young male leads.
Fine, but what about something for the rest of us.  This film is also
unintentionally funny to the worst extent.  It constantly looks like the
actors are trying to pull off dramatic situations and they keep tripping
over themselves and can't find the whirlwind of success in pulling it off.
Director Rob Cohen who made a startlingly brilliant television movie for HBO
in 1998 entitled 'The Rat Pack' which captured perfectly the lives of
entertainers Frank Sinatra, Dean Martin, Sammy Davis Jr., and Peter Lawford,
is at the head of 'The Skulls'.  Cohen also made a fine bio pic of martial
arts legend Bruce Lee in 1993 entitled 'Dragon: The Bruce Lee Story' and
Cohen has a knack for capturing the nostalgia of a certain period with fluid
filming and a brisk pace to shower audiences with entertainment.  He should
have seen the light at the end of the tunnel here.  Writer John Pogue's
screenplay is like a blister driving you mad.  You keep hoping the pain will
go away but it only gets worse.
The climax tries to usher in an old fashioned way for gentlemen to settle
their differences but you can rent Stanley Kubrick's 'Barry Lyndon' to see
it done in a much better fashion.  It's also a climax (again,
unintentionally funny) where you don't care one bit about what happens to
the characters.  I was actually sitting there with my eyes closed and my
hand in front of my face and glancing up every few seconds because it was so
bad and now I guess I'll tell you how I REALLY felt about the movie!
: - )
Oh, well, with a film this bad, we at least know that given the treatment by
this motion picture that if this type of thing does exist in real life, we
know the perpetrators are definitely safe!  But there is no safe part of
this movie which will make you attack the movie theatre's cashier in an
attempt to get your money back.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
The amount of vice contained within 'Boogie Nights' serves as a profound 
statement on the culture of the 1970's, perhaps the most decadent in American 
society this century.  It's about the lowest common denominator in society's 
diversity but has a gradually progressive look as it spans six years from
1977 to 
1983.  It's an examination of the pornography business and its seedy side 
undoubtedly comes through not as gratuitous but as a well defined and artful 
statement about seduction through fast money, drugs and an illusion of the 
what the 'good life' really is. 
Beginning  in 1977 in California's San Fernando Valley, Mark Wahlberg plays 
Eddie Adams, a busboy in a disco dance club who meets the key player to his 
turbulent and sometimes successful future, a pornographic filmmaker named 
Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds).  Horner approaches him one night in the kitchen 
as he's performing his nightly duties and tells Eddie he sees him as a
future star 
in the business he excels in. 
Convinced of his future success, Eddie comes up with a show business name 
"Dirk Diggler" and his career begins.  Other key players in the film's
complexity 
are a female porno star, Amber Waves (Julianne Moore) in the film's best female 
supporting performance, Reed Rothchild (John C. Reilly), Little Bill
(William H. 
Macy), Rollergirl (Heather Graham) and the film's best male supporting 
performance in Buck Swope (Don Cheadle).  Each character has a goal and a 
dream to live up to.  Amber has a young son who she is trying to see in life
after 
divorce, Buck has dreams of owning his own stereo store and the others are 
less goal driven but are still fascinating characters.  It has a scene where
Horner 
is told as the 80's are about to begin that pornographic films will become the 
property of the videotape industry and Horner says he will not stoop to making 
videos because he is a "serious" filmmaker which brought out a few laughs 
from the audience with whom I saw this movie. 
The film's writer and director (Paul Thomas Anderson) has molded a film out of 
a relatively unknown cast who are known more to movie fans instead of casual 
movie goers.  It is a good comeback role for Burt Reynolds whose career has 
been sagging for years.  Anderson's direction is sure footed and built on a 
command of subject material which looks as if it was carefully written and 
researched in detail. 
This motion picture is unlike any I have ever seen before.  It starts slowly
and 
focuses more on solidifying its message in the second half and the film's last 
half hour is its most powerful.  But that isn't what makes it so strikingly
original.  
Its adult theme is countered by its convincing message that what you're 
watching isn't porno but a Hollywood production which stands up as academic 
gold.  There are scenes where the cast is involved in filming the porno scenes 
where their acting is extremely bad and for good actors to act bad when they're 
supposed to adds a dimension of talented creativity.  Their lives change 
drastically as the film winds down and the final scene is shocking if nothing 
else but you should see it coming.  One of the best films of 1997 and a likely 
candidate for a Best Picture Oscar nomination. 
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Shadow Conspiracy (1997)
What can you say about the director of 'Rambo: First Blood Part II'
(1985) and 'Cobra' (1986) making a movie about a major U.S. government
conspiracy?  Well, not much.  'Shadow Conspiracy' is a laughably bad
and totally far fetched piece of wretched garbage which is an insult to
those who believe in on going conspiracies in government world wide.
Charlie Sheen stars as a White House advisor to the President who
becomes gains knowledge of a massive government plot to commit
treason.  The movie has absolutely no depth of focus and instead of
building the story slowly in a fascinating manner piece by piece, it
instead dives right in and is nothing more than a tedious chase
picture.  Sheen is suspicious of the White House chief of staff (Donald
Sutherland) who may or may not be the bad guy.  Linda Hamilton rounds
out the major members of the cast as a reporter who aids Sheen in the
run for his life.  Even sillier than this, there is a nasty hitman for
hire who parades himself throughout the movie in a nameless and
speechless manner picking off people like insects and a scene near the
beginning of 'Shadow Conspiracy' is straight out of 'Three Days of the
Condor' (1975).  Director George P.  Cosmatos is not a filmmaker suited
for this type of material.  The unbelievable twists and turns in this
movie have no credibility and one scene involving a toy plane rigged
with a murdering machine gun mechanism had me almost walking out on the
film.  Sam Waterston ('The Killing Fields') gives a career worst
performance as the President and Ben Gazzara is equally stiff and dull
as the Vice President.  There isn't one single redeeming thing about
this movie and for all those people who complained that Oliver Stone's
'JFK' (1991) was an indictment of the system blown out of proportion,
'Shadow Conspiracy' will only serve to double that movie's stature as a
great film.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
'South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut' (1999)
Trey Parker and Matt Stone are two angry generation x members actually
making it in the big time world of animation.  Adult animation that is.  The
way they express themselves through the use of controversial subject matter
is designed to test your tolerance (or lack of it) and I admire them for it
because their work is so absurd and outrageous, it's genuinely funny.
Taking little kids and putting them in a world of being brought up poorly
and lacing their dialogue with four letter expletives is sort of like the
old pie in the face routine.  It looks funny unless it happens to you.  And
if you take it for what it is, realizing that it's tongue in cheek, you
can't lose.
'South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut' shows how Parker and Stone have built
up their academic style like a powder keg.  Not being able to do a lot of
the things contained in this film on television have actually made them turn
this film on the general public in the form of a wild animal as the NOT FOR
TELEVISION subject matter comes falling on you like a hail storm.
All your favourite characters are back for a run in the adventure of their
lives.  Kyle, Stan, Kenny and Eric do what all little kids have done in the
past.  They sneak in to see an R-rated film to see two Canadian actors named
Terrence and Phillip perform profanity in the form or dirty jokes and foul
mouthed songs and come out imitating everything they've seen.  Their parents
and community leaders are shocked and blame everything on the culture
contained within the film.  Before you know it, the president of the United
States has declared war on Canada and U.S. patriotism goes awry with
t-shirts and other merchandise knocking Canada and that is only the start.
This is all done, of course, in a humourous manner.  As a Canadian myself, I
was quite amused at the way our mannerisms are portrayed in the film.  The
Canadian animated characters heads are cut in half and the top part of their
head jumps every time they speak.  We did give the world insulin, the
telephone and basketball but this is truly the most amazing feat we have
ever pulled off!
"Oh my God, they killed Kenny!"  This is common in every episode of 'South
Park' on television where Kenny always dies and this phrase is blurted out.
Well, why leave it out in the movie?  Kenny dies and goes to hell where he
meets Satan and discovers that since Saddam Hussein, who dies in the film,
and Satan are lovers and that the war between Canada and the United States
will allow the devil to come back and rule the world with his lover by his
side.  Absurd!  And you may find yourself embarrassed at the fact that
you're laughing through all of this.
Like most animated features, this one runs out of steam near the end but is
so entertaining in its first hour that the momentum of that accomplishment
actually holds the rest of the film together like glue.  What Parker and
Stone are really doing in this film is testing not just tolerance levels but
their test is also to see if hypocrisy levels are also at a high level of
occupation.  They deliberately take a near utopia haven like Canada and make
it the focus of all that is wrong and evil in the world when just the
opposite is true.  They allow adult cynicism, seen in both the adults and
kids in the film to flow like blood from an accident victim.
There is a deep rooted dramatic message contained within 'South Park:
Bigger, Longer and Uncut' and I'm sure that when it takes its place in
history with other adult cartoons like 'Fritz the Cat', 'Watership Down' and
'Beavis  Butt-head Do America', it will stand the test of time when examined
in later years.  Now, how about a big screen 'Simpsons' movie!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
It doesn't really bother me when films take poetic license with true
stories and twist them somewhat to fit the needs of entertainment.
'Amadeus', 'Mississippi Burning', 'Nixon' and other films have tinkered
somewhat with history but still were great films made by talented
people.  'Seven Years in Tibet' probably would have made a better
foreign language film but it still receives a passing grade for its
story of bonding and bringing together two alien cultures that shows the
world can be made a better place through understanding at a time when
the world was on the brink of its darkest time in history.
Brad Pitt does well in an 'accent' role as Austrian mountain climber
Heinrich Harrer who meets the Dalai Lama, the spiritual leader of
Tibet.  Director Jean-Jacques Annaud ('Quest for Fire', 'The Name of the
Rose', 'The Lover', 'The Bear') is a director of extremely withdrawn
proportions.  His films are cold and devalue the underlying point of
emotion but he finds a niche for this film and makes it pay off well but
the film is no classic.  It's well made and is more of a "memorable
scene here and there" type of movie.  In Vienna, 1939, Heinrich Harrer
is about to embark on the Himalayan peak of Nanga Parbat.  He and his
team are taken prisoner by the British (World War II has just broken
out) and Pitt later escapes and comes in contact with the Dalai Lama.
Unfortunately, the way the movie introduces us to Harrer and his
capture, occupies the first half of the film when something like this
could have been told in about 40 minutes.
Harrer begins to tell the Dalai Lama (Jamyang Wangchuk) about his
world.  The young man is fascinated by it all and wants to understand as
much of it as he can.  The film is written by Becky Johnston based on
the book by Heinrich Harre and the film's most outstanding trait is the
cinematography by Robert Fraisse.
I don't know how Hollywood manages to do it and many times make it a
success, but they always put many films on a collision course with each
other.  In 1984 we had the three "save the farm movies" --- 'Country',
'The River' and 'Places in the Heart' right up to 1997 where we had two
erupting volcano movies like 'Dante's Peak' and 'Volcano' to 1998 with
two giant meteor movies like 'Deep Impact' and 'Armageddon'.  Martin
Scorsese's 'Kundun', also released in 1997 with 'Seven Years in Tibet'
is a much better film about the Dalai Lama in terms of technical
aspects.  In fairness, because the Dalai Lama was in many ways a
character in history that was hard in getting to know, both films about
him in 1997 tried but came up just short of capturing more than just the
superficial side of the man.  Perhaps that's a good thing as many films
are better left to the imagination when you leave the theatre or pop the
cassette out of your VCR.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
Police corruption has been a powerful subject for examination and perhaps the
most famous and well remembered story is 1973's 'Serpico' in which Al Pacino
played the title character and the film was based on a true story involving a
lone New York City police officer who blew the whistle on several of his
peers and then was forced to leave his career behind.  
'Copland' looks at the same subject of corrupt cops but puts a twist on an
old story you wouldn't expect to see.  It seems that for many years it was a
rule set in motion by the governing body in New York City that officers who
worked for the NYPD had to live in the city so their actions could be kept
under observation by Internal Affairs (these are the people who police the
police) but on a technicality many officers were later allowed to be declared
eligible to live in surrounding areas such as New Jersey and Connecticut and
it seems in this movie that across the Hudson River by way of the George
Washington Bridge is a little town named Garrison, New Jersey (pop. 1280) in
which a handful of cops have set up shop to perform many clandestine
activities of a corrupt nature and the town's honest but rather timid sheriff
(Sylvester Stallone) becomes embroiled in a conflict not usually seen in this
small town where he boasts that they have (quote) "one of the lowest crime
rates in Northern New Jersey" (unquote).
As the story picks up steam the corrupt cops in question (Harvey Keitel is
their leader) fake the death of one of their own so he can't be prosecuted
for a seemingly wrongful death of two motorists he had a run in with one
night while driving home from a night of drinking and the story then focuses
on an Internal Affairs agent (Robert De Niro) who begins investigating the
situation and finds something not quite right.  Because his jurisdiction ends
at the George Washington Bridge he tries to convince Stallone that something
has to be done by way of an investigation to resolve this unusual situation
 One of the crooked cops in question (Ray Liotta) has a redeemable side to
his sinful persona and has some of the best work of his career in this movie.
The film's writer and director (James Mangold) has approached the subject
matter in this movie with total credibility and has nailed down the attitudes
and personalities of police officers (both corrupt and honest) in a very
convincing fashion and while the film's climax is straight forward and
contains little surprises it is still powerful and intelligent filmmaking
done with characters both compelling and believable.  No actor has a leading
performance in this film and while each has a supporting role, Sylvester
Stallone shines bright with some of his best work in more than a decade and
proves he CAN act given the right set of circumstances and his portrayal of a
small town sheriff dealing with big city corruption is one of the most
sympathetic and interesting characters he's ever played.  Stallone dumps the
macho act entirely after gaining 40 pounds to play this role.  In fact there
are no slackers in this cast which also includes Robert Patrick, Michael
Rapaport and Annabella Sciorra   
'Copland' is a smashing success so far as movie making is concerned and is
one of the best films of 1997 and is certainly one of the most convincing
police stories of all time.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Association'
http://ofcs.org/ofcs/
Anyone who knows the 'Star Trek' movie series knows that they are all
characteristically different in style as well as substance.  The even
numbered ones, 2, 4, 6, and 8 are said to be better than the odd
numbered films 1, 3, 5, and 7, but each film in its own different way
has been mystical, action packed, compelling, funny, religious,
intriguing, harmonic, and terrifying.  Notice that there are 8
adjectives described here.  One for each film in order since 'Star Trek:
The Motion Picture' in 1979.  Wow!  Talk about a movie critic who
doesn't ramble on!  What better way to describe these films than in one
word.
The adjective that best describes 'Star Trek: Insurrection' is
"romantic".  The film is a nice 180 degree turn from 'Star Trek: First
Contact', the best of the three films so far that incorporates the cast
from television's 'Star Trek: The Next Generation' (1987-1994).
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) and his crew help a race of people who
are about to be sent into exile from their peaceful planet of prosperity
by others of the same race who want to take revenge for being sent into
exile years before.  The plot is quite monstrous.  Led by Ru'afo
(F.Murray Abraham), the exodus will come without the citizens knowing
it.  You see, in the 24th century it is possible to create a hologram
which is a fake image of something that seems real.  The entire planet
was to become a hologram and the unwitting citizens would be whisked off
the planet living in this hologram without even knowing it is false.
Riker (Jonathan Frakes), Data (Brent Spiner), LaForge (LeVar Burton),
Crusher (Gates McFadden) Troi (Marina Sirtis), and Worf (Michael Dorn)
tag along with Picard in heroic fashion to help save the people of the
planet and fight against the Federation at the same time who make a
disastrous decision early in the film.
The good thing about this movie is that all of the film's characters
seem to be displayed in an even flow of presentation and none of them
are given too much or too little screen time.  I thoroughly enjoyed this
film for taking the necessary steps and keeping in the tradition of
being very different from the other eight 'Star Trek' films.
Jonathan Frakes does a good job directing the picture while keeping the
pace free flowing and the running time relatively short.  Some of the
dialogue is wooden and a few of the performances a bit lazy but overall
I recommend this installment in the series simply for its ability to
entertain, tell a good but nevertheless predictable story and establish
its own identity.  When you consider that so many films that get
released are copies or variations of other films, it's really a surprise
to see a NINTH installment in a film series come off looking so much
different than its other chapters.
F. Murray Abraham (remember him).  He won a Best Actor Oscar in 1984 for
'Amadeus' for playing Mozart's rival Antonio Salieri.  His work as the
villain in this film isn't exactly the way I wanted to see him make a
comeback in film but he does his job well and creates probably the best
'Star Trek' villain since Christopher Plummer's portrayal of the evil
General Chang in 'Star TrekVI: The Undiscovered Country' in 1991.
Take advantage of this film on the big screen if you value the 'Star
Trek' series and while talk of this being the last 'Star Trek' film has
made its way through the movie grape vine in recent days, its box office
numbers suggest otherwise.  It remains a profitable and successful
franchise and the term 'Star Trek', when entered into any search engine
on the Internet, probably brings up more matches than any other genre of
its kind.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for City of Industry (1997)
There is no honour among thieves.  Point well taken but in 'City of
Industry' there is no honour among the people who have put together
this shallow, unrelenting and downright boring montage which has a
promising start but then crashes and burns like a bad plane wreck.
A group of low life thieves (Harvey Keitel, Stephen Dorff, Timothy
Hutton, Wade Dominguez) pull of what is a seemingly smooth heist by
robbing a jewelry store and as they count up the loot in seclusion, one
of them (Dorff) clumsily opens fire in a moment of greed and kills two
others (Hutton and Dominguez). Keitel manages to escape but just barely
and all this occurs in the first thirty five minutes of the film which
begins well but goes nowhere after that.  The last hour is a slow and
monotonous opera of planned revenge as Keitel goes after Dorff since
Hutton was Keitel's brother in the film and he is helped by Dominguez's
widow (Famke Janssen) in a seedy payback scheme.  It's also about
betrayal and all those things you've seen before but with no new twist
whatsoever.
The climax is predictable and the film is sort of like having a bad
night's sleep.  You know, one of those nights where you doze off and
wake up and then doze off again and wake up again etc., etc.  It's an
uncomfortable odyssey into crime courtesy of director John Irvin ('The
Dogs of War', 'Raw Deal', 'Hamburger Hill').  Were any of these any
good?
The type of visual style that 'City of Industry' strives for is that of
'film noir' and the picture would have been much better if it had been
in the hands of such stylish men as Martin Scorsese, Quentin Tarantino
or Abel Ferrara.  All of these intense filmmakers have directed Keitel
with better results.  'City of Industry' is a copycat wannabe of films
gone by and can easily be tossed into the junk pile in the opinion of
this reviewer.

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
It would be ludicrous to tell the world anything about the plot of
'Star Wars'.  The 1977 film which won six Academy Awards, the most of
any film that year (Sound, Film Editing, Art Direction/Set Decoration,
Costume Design, Original Score, and Special Visual Effects) has
returned and Special Edition refers not only to its restoration but
also its enhancement.  What beat it out for Best Picture, Best Director
and Best Original Screenplay?  'Annie Hall', Woody Allen for 'Annie
Hall', and Woody Allen and Marshall Brickman for 'Annie Hall'.  Alec
Guinness (who turned down the role of Obi-Won Kenobi several times
before Lucas convinced him to take it) was edged out for Best
Supporting Actor by Jason Robards for 'Julia'.  It actually is the
recipient of seven Oscars as a special achievement award for Sound
Effects was given to Benjamin Burtt, Jr. for the creation of the alien,
creature and robot voices but this was a non-competitive category.
George Lucas and 20th Century Fox have invested millions (most reports
indicate $10-15 million) to re-mix the original mono soundtrack which
originally appeared in the credits in 1977 as D OLBY SYSTEM - making
movies sound better for stereo and digital sound at that but the analog
mix can still be differentiated from today's technology.  Dolby Stereo
movies actually hit screens in 1978 with 'Superman' and 'The Deer
Hunter' being two classics with that new technology and 'The Deer
Hunter' won the Oscar for sound that year.  The 'Star Wars' negative
has also been cleaned up (although the print that I viewed had some
colour contrast problems).  It isn't quite twenty years since 'Star
Wars' hit the big screen.  It actually debuted in May of 1977 but they
are doing the right thing by re-releasing it now because from May of
1997 right through to the fall, we will be bombarded with
multi-blockbuster hits such as the fourth 'Batman' movie and Steven
Spielberg's sequel to 'Jurassic Park'.  'The Empire Strikes Back' is
due for re-release on February 21st and 'Return of the Jedi' finishes
off the space western trilogy with re-release on March 7th.  There is
approximately four and a half minutes of new footage included this time
in 'Star Wars' with a conversation between Han Solo (Harrison Ford) and
Jabba the Hut who looks smaller than he appeared in 'Return of the
Jedi' and since it is a computer enhanced Jabba this time, he moves
much more quickly than 'Jedi's' Jabba who was slower because he was a
puppet.  Actually, a super puppet :-)  The other additional scene has
Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) talking to one of his star fighter buddies
before the climax occurs which is the attack on the Death Star.  So
much for the additions.  As for the enhancements, there are scenes from
the first movie that have background additions such as flying objects,
live action creatures and new laser effects from the weapon known as
the 'blaster'.  Purists have complained that Lucas should never have
tampered with the original but as someone who has seen the film over 50
times, I had no problem with it and I think they've done a good job to
keep the film above date and it does stand up remarkably well twenty
years after the fact.  Endless imitations followed 'Star Wars' and most
of them flopped ('Battlestar Galactica', 'Buck Rogers in the 25th
Century' and 'Flash Gordon') but 'Star Wars' was a revolutionary
contribution to society's pop culture and influenced other outer space
creations such as the return of the 'Star Trek' series which went from
the small screen to the big one, the invention of the 'Alien' series,
'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial', and no doubt today's 'The X-Files' which
is arguably the best program on television for its combination of
Earthly crime, outer space connection and paranormal activity.  'Star
Wars: Special Edition' is a grand opportunity for everyone to enjoy it
all over again and for a new generation to experience a wonder which
will remain just as strong in 2077 as it does today.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
Like most movie fans, every once in a while I enjoy something light to take
the sting out of all the bad movies that crop up every so often, and so far,
1999 has had its share of real clunkers.  So now that the summer season has
arrived, can things get better or worse?  That depends on who you ask.  Last
summer brought 'Saving Private Ryan' but it also brought 'Godzilla' which
was disliked by most.  Romantic comedies have the dubious distinction of all
looking alike so what's so interesting about 'Notting Hill'?  Aside from the
fact that it's a quiet, well written and cleverly conceived comedy, it also
has many scenes of brisk drama about how bad people think their lives are
and finding out that the rich and famous sometimes don't have it much
easier.
In 'Notting Hill' Julia Roberts plays Anna Scott, the most famous female
movie star in the world (that must have been a stretch for her to play).
While visiting London to promote her new film, she browses the little
neighbourhood shops in the Notting Hill district and enters a little travel
book store owned and operated by William Thacker (Hugh Grant).  After making
a purchase she leaves the store and has an accident later with Grant and
gets covered in orange juice.  He offers to let her come to his flat and get
cleaned up and the two of them later strike up a romantic relationship.
Thacker has a problem with women that makes him say some things in a rather
tongue tied fashion, a perfect contrast to Roberts' character who says
little, listens while looking directly her subject and knows exactly how to
respond.  William takes Anna to meet his best friends and his sister.  There
is Max and Bella (Tim McInnerny and Gina McKee).  She is in a wheel chair
from a tragic domestic accident and Max takes care of her.  William's sister
Honey (Emma Chambers), works in a record store and is rather goofy around
her own kind, let alone meeting a rich and famous movie star.  The most
hilarious but yet somewhat out of place character is Spike (Rhys Ifans).
He's the scruffy, slow witted room mate to William and provides some of the
film's funniest site gags.
The film reminds us in wake of the Princess Diana tragedy of 1997 that the
media is ruthlessly obsessed with celebrity fed only by the will of the
public.  There is one startling scene where the media find out that Anna is
staying at William's flat and they take pictures of all parties concern in
rapid fashion that will haunt Anna's career once the gossip starts.
I suppose what struck me as most whimsical about 'Notting Hill' is the fact
that those involved make the film work with straight, no-nonsense dialogue.
The film has very little music score and relies on romance to make it all
sing.  There is one intimate little night time date that William and Anna
embark on where they trespass on to private property and enjoy the pleasures
of a garden ladled setting to further their romance.
Another plus the film offers are the scenes where we see ordinary people
going about their lives and the audience can relate to this and the audience
isn't consumed by the trappings of a rich movie star's life but rather she
is brought down to the ordinary lifestyle and this is a fresh and proper
perspective the film takes in making it more appealing than any other
direction it could have taken.
Director Roger Michell makes it all unfold attractively like a play and
screenwriter Richard Curtis ('Bean', 'Four Weddings and a Funeral') writes
some inventive lines and injects just enough humour and drama to find a
perfect balance and 'Notting Hill' has an ending that is not really expected
but fate plays a hand in the plot all along and some will envy the outcome
of this film while other's will like their present lives just fine the way
they are.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for 8 Heads in a Duffel Bag (1997)
Comments on this review may also be sent via email to wfrith@icom.ca
Joe Pesci won the Academy Award as Best Supporting Actor in 1990 for his no
holds barred portrayal of a mobster with a sense of humour in 'Goodfellas'.
 Pesci's other film credits such as 'Home Alone' (1990), 'Home Alone 2: Lost
in New York' (1992), 'JFK' (1991), 'Lethal Weapon 2' (1989), 'Lethal Weapon
3' (1992) and as far back as 'Raging Bull' (1980) distinguish him as a unique
and inventive actor.  '8 Heads in a Duffel Bag' is a deliciously wacked-out
and ingenious dark comedy complete with all of Pesci's trademark wiseguy
antics.  
Pesci plays a New Jersey mobster whose job requires him to deliver the heads
of eight men murdered by the organization he works for to a crime boss in San
Diego.  Pesci transports them in a duffel bag aboard a commercial airline and
encounters a medical student (Andy Comeau in a very impressive film debut) on
his spring break who has an identical bag.  Naturally, the bags get switched
at luggage pick up in San Diego and the rest you can figure out for yourself.
 Comeau meets his girlfriend (Kristy Swanson) at the airport and she
introduces him to her parents (George Hamilton and Dyan Cannon) and the four
of them leave for a vacation in Mexico.
Your enjoyment of '8 Heads in a Duffel Bag' will depend on how strong your
tolerance to black comedy is as the film leaves no stone unturned in its
pursuit of laughs and delivers on many levels.  There are plot holes in the
script by writer/director Tom Schulman (Oscar winner for Best Original
Screenplay in 1989 for 'Dead Poet's Society') but they are covered up by good
pacing and a frenzied climax.  The film borders on extreme silliness from
time to time but contains all the right tempo and build up to a satisfying
and hilarious conclusion.
Surprisingly, Pesci, as good as he is, takes a back seat in this film as
Comeau is the film's protagonist and David Spade from SNL and the two
disasters 'Tommy Boy' and 'Black Sheep' and who stars as Comeau's college
room mate who gets caught up in the insane antics of this story, provides
some great one liners.  Spade steals the show from Pesci in many scenes.  One
classic scene is worth the price of admission alone as Pesci has a nightmare
about the heads doing a little musical number.  Is '8 Heads in a Duffel Bag'
bizarre?  Of course.  Original?  Definitely.  Worth seeing?  Yes but don't
blink or this film may cause you laughing pains you won't be able to get rid
of anytime soon.  

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
I often say that the reason why the movies continue to dominate year
after year and set new box office records is because they know how to
play on our sub conscious minds better than any other medium.  Music
used to be that way but has lost sight of its traditional and deepening
roots.  The movies often take us to places far away and beyond our
imaginations and often make us feel that we'd love to be up there with
our heroes on screen.  In each given year, the films generally nominated
for the Best Picture Oscar and the ones that usually win, are films set
in the past and teach us something about history --- not just to prepare
us for where we're going but to bring us closer together with other
generations who lived back then.
'October Sky', a true story, has all the elements a young person can
identify with.  Whether your a part of today's youth or a participant in
it from years gone by, this film has everything.  A jealous but decent
man for a father, not wanting to see his son turn out better than
himself in life.  A wise and inspiring teacher who is a constant
reminder that life is all about choice.  Best friends who stand by your
side and work through the tough times --- having just as much to gain or
lose as you do, and through it all, the determination to do something
with your life despite who you are and where you come from.
Jake Gyllenhaal stars as Homer Hickam, a young man from Coalwood, West
Virginia who doesn't want the life of a coal miner and would eventually
go on to be a premium rocket scientist at NASA.  After hearing about
numerous accidents and a few deaths as a result of work in the mines,
Homer wants a better life for himself and is fascinated by rocket
science.  His hero is Werner von Braun, the man who helped the United
States develop advanced space techniques and eventually gain world
superiority by putting a man on the moon.
The story of 'October Sky' begins in 1957 and the Russians have become
the first country to put a man in space and determined to develop their
own space program during the cold war, the U.S. must stay competitive
with their enemy.  Inspired by this, Homer and his friends (William Lee
Scott and Chad Lindberg) begin in their own front yard building
rockets.  They eventually enlist the help of one of their class mates
who is the school nerd (Chris Owen).  He has no friends, wears glasses
and always has his nose stuck in a book.  He knows quite a bit about
physics and general rocket propulsion and helps out a great deal.  Their
first few experiments are disastrous.  They destroy a fence, almost kill
someone when the rocket gets sent out flying hazardously among the
town's general population and are arrested when one of their rockets is
suspected of starting a serious fire.  They find a deserted open rock
patch about 8 miles from town, and erect a flag and small shack to
continue their experiments.
Jake is inspired by a teacher (Laura Dern), whom he deeply respects, and
conflicts heavily with the ideas of his father (Chris Cooper), a foreman
in the coal mines, about how the course of his life should be taken.
Eventually winning many science contests puts the boys in competition
for the national finals in Indianapolis, Indiana where Homer gets to
shake hands with Werner von Braun and doesn't even realize it.
At a time when so many people are generally unhappy with their lives,
this film takes you to new dimensions and says that anyone can do
anything they want with their life and while that sounds like a tired
statement, this movie demonstrates that we need a constant boost to make
us feel better about ourselves.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Life can be manipulating.  Really?  Thanks for telling us that.  The
question is whether it's for bad or good.  How many times have you been
coaxed by a friend who's twisted your arm to do something you didn't
really want to do at first but later on you were glad that you did?
What's so bad about that? Politicians manipulate us and later on we're
often sorry that we voted for them.  Product placement ads on television
and the movies manipulate us by planting subliminal thoughts in our
heads, enticing us to buy their brand and there are many entertaining
advertisements and a lot of stupid ones as well.  'Patch Adams' is
easily recognizable as a manipulative film but it feels good and
therefore it is good.
Many question the sincerity of the medical community.  The true nature
of tackling major diseases and curing them raises economical questions
rather than ethical ones.  A cure for cancer, AIDS and many other
diseases means billions of dollars lost for the pharmaceutical companies
in existing medications and treatment.  1/7 of the American economy is
driven by medicine run as a business rather than as a humanitarian
effort and many cannot afford to pay and they die.  It's refreshing to
see a film that treats medicine with humanity and with delicate grace
and humour that can make human suffering a little easier and since its
based on a true story, it has even more credibility.
Robin Williams redeems himself in this film after the disappointing
'What Dreams May Come', released earlier this year.  Beginning in 1969,
Williams plays Hunter Adams, nicknamed 'Patch', a man who brings
humanity to his patients by using humour as a treatment for those with
fatal diseases and other serious ailments.  As the film begins, Adams is
a voluntarily patient in a mental institution and finds that he has a
positive influence on some seriously catatonic patients and finds he
wants more and decides to check himself out of the institution and into
medical school.  The medical students are driven in the wrong direction
by the chief of the medical program (Bob Gunton) who actually tells a
group of them in class that he will take the humanity out of them and
make doctors out of them!  Shame on him!
He meets other medical students who become his close friends and he has
a relationship with a female student (Monica Potter) that he's sweet
on.  The elder instructors feel that Adams' methods are unorthodox as he
dresses up in funny clothing, makes jokes and improvises his way through
the hospital wards and tries to make the sick and the dying feel
better.  Adams and his friends open free clinics, take supplies from the
wealthy hospital in secret and aren't supposed to see patients at all
until the third year and Williams has a clash of ideals that leads to a
bumpy road that may prevent him from graduating.
Director Tom Shadyac ('Ace Ventura: Pet Detective', 'Liar Liar') proves
he can handle a touching and human story as well as he can a shallow
comedic film and while Williams is allowed to invent a lot of his own
routines, I think a lot of movie fans will appreciate it as vintage
Robin Williams and few have a better balanced career that the one
Williams has carved out for himself.
The film is based on the book 'Gesundheit: Good Health Is a Laughing
Matter' by Hunter Doherty Adams and Maureen Mylander and is adapted for
the screen by Steve Oedekerk who keeps his writing fresh and alive and
has some good observations and gives the film social commentary and
something that audiences can take home with them and think about.  My
father doesn't smile much but did so sincerely after seeing this film.
'Patch Adams' is no classic but given the fact that the film will be
attacked by many as manipulative, those same people enjoyed and
recommended Williams' 1989 film 'Dead Poets Society' which was far more
manipulative than this film and 'Dead Poets Society' won an Oscar for
its writing!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
The MTV generation have movies of their own while others have theirs. 
It's nice, however, when we can trade off and occasionally enjoy each
other's product.  'Varsity Blues' is the type of movie that teenagers
can enjoy for showing themselves what they're capable of, both
positively and negatively.  Certainly, it is frivolous in many scenes --
a rather mindless barrage of high school pranks with shock waves felt
today by the cultural impact of 'National Lampoon's Animal House' and
'Fast Times at Ridgemont High'. Entertaining to be sure but rather
forgettable otherwise.
Jon Voight has become the quintessential movie bad guy in recent years. 
'Mission Impossible', 'Anaconda', 'The Rainmaker', 'Enemy of the State'
and now 'Varsity Blues', put Voight in the spotlight of railroading the
good side of human behaviour in favour of the self serving movie
villain.  He pulls it off sharply with squinting looks of evil that
prove that in many ways the villain is the true test of an actor. 
Perhaps that's why Voight has an Oscar in his collection for Best Actor
for 1978's 'Coming Home'.  Although his performance was that of a
Vietnam veteran made a paraplegic by the most unjust war of the 20th
century, his performance was one of strength and you really felt pride
for one of the movie's true good guys.  Although Voight is only a
supporting player in 'Varsity Blues', he gets first mention because it's
really him that propels me to give this film a marginal recommendation.
James Van Der Beek of television's 'Dawson Creek' plays John Moxen, the
back up quarterback of a varsity high school football team who gets a
chance to prove himself when the more than capable starter gets hurt. 
His aloof friend Billy Bob (Ron Lester) is responsible in a way for the
starting quarterback's injuries and vows not to let anything happen to
the new replacement.  They play football in a small town in West Canaan,
Texas...where football isn't just a game or a way of life, but is a form
of religion.
There are the usual plot sidelines such as the girls in their lives. 
The other players, some of whom exhibit criminal behaviour, and the win
at all costs attitude of Coach Kilmer (Jon Voight).  This includes
injecting players with painkillers when he knows they could be severely
injured later on.  His racist tendencies in failing to give the ball
when necessary to the film's talented star running back who is black is
a further measure in lowering the team's morale and his blackmail of one
of the players that will prevent him from obtaining a full academic
scholarship are just some of the coach's other personality traits.
What's refreshing about this movie is the way it highlights the film's
important moments and never treats them as trifle, overplayed or silly
-- like the team sticking together in rejecting the coach's tactics, the
scene where Moxen is put to the test to see if he will cheat on his
girlfriend and how the players showcase their submission to a team
leader capable of bringing them back from the brink of losing with
disgraced feelings.
The film is directed by Brian Robbins ('Good Burger').  His aptitude in
filming and editing the impact of the gridiron is impressive and ranks
up there with 1993's 'The Program' as some of the best football scenes
put on film since 1974's 'The Longest Yard'.  I would rather have seen
'Varsity Blues' as a television network movie of the week because it's
overall feeling is more like a field goal than a touchdown but the drive
is still successful nevertheless.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
'Rounders' has several things going for it.  It's star, Matt Damon is an
Oscar winning screenwriter for his efforts last year on 'Good Will
Hunting' with Ben Affleck.  Reports have it that the two of them are out
to prove that they aren't just one hit wonders as they have just put the
finishing touches on a new draft of another screenplay.  Damon's co-star
in 'Rounders' is Edward Norton, the incredibly diverse new comer who
thrilled audiences is 1996's 'Primal Fear' as the two-faced killer who
wasn't truly revealed until the end of the film and for which Norton
received an Oscar nomination as Best Supporting Actor for which he
should have won.  Norton also appeared as the attorney for Larry Flynt
is 'The People vs. Larry Flynt' and was seen in Woody Allen's 'Everyone
Says I Love You'.  Martin Landau (Best Supporting Actor in 1994's 'Ed
Wood') also appears in 'Rounders' as a fairly pivotal supporting player.
Movies about gambling have always made for good character studies.  Up
there with alcoholism and drug abuse, most films of this nature usually
manage to tell a good human story.  My favourite film about gambling is
still James Caan's 1974 performance in 'The Gambler' (no, not the one
with Kenny Rogers) and a close second is Robert Altman's 'California
Split', ironically made the same year.
'In 'Rounders', Matt Damon plays a law student who is working his
internship and goes to greet an old friend and a never do well played by
Edward Norton who has just been released from prison.  Both men are
compulsive card players at various styles of poker.  Damon teeters on
returning to the seductive world of easy money but resists at the
request of his live in girlfriend (Gretchen Mol).  Damon once gambled
and lost to the leader of a Russian underworld organization in New York
City played by John Malkovich who probably has a Russian accent down
better than any other American actor I've seen.  Damon lost $30,000 of
his money, which was his working money and was also going to pay for his
tuition.
Damon eventually returns to the gambling circuit and he and Norton get
into debt above their heads and their lives are placed in jeopardy.
Before Norton went up the river, he had a number of outstanding debts
and after his release from prison, hustles his way as a wannabe street
smart player who is a born loser.
There are a number of interesting other characters in the film who don't
get a lot of exposure but there is a peculiar strength and well
developed aspect in each of their personalities that director John Dahl
has touched on well.  Famke Janssen ('GoldenEye'), plays an illegal
gambling club attendant and John Turturro plays a trusted friend of
Damon's who has to turn his back on Damon in the final run to teach
Damon a lesson.  This is probably the best thing he could do for him as
their friendship is put to the test.  Damon and Norton are very good in
their roles and they each hold their own against one another.
Martin Landau plays a judge and a sort of fatherly figure to Damon who
helps Damon when he is cornered in debt.
Director John Dahl ('Red Rock West' and 'The Last Seduction') is one of
those directors who like John Sayles and Peter Hyams, has made some good
films but who is unlikely to rise to the occasion of a high calibre
director's status.  Screenwriters David Levien and Brian Koppelman avoid
clichs and drum up a solid and hard boiled screenplay that doesn't try
and be too smart for its own good.  It just stays effective enough and
lets the actors breath life into the words on the pages in a smooth and
highly dramatic style.  One of the saving graces of the film is its
success in being almost humourless.  It knows that no comic relief is
needed in a film like this.
'Rounders' offers no powerful insight into the world of gambling.  It
primarily wants to be a low key but effective and moody look at low
lifes and people just above the gutter who have the capability of
falling in at a moment's notice.  The camera work is well laid out in a
lot of smoke filled and dimly lit rooms that capture the underworld
perfectly.  The film is an adult lesson in morals that unfortunately has
a predictable ending that makes one breath a sigh of relief but its even
pace and shortage of slow spots combined with its message of hypocrisy
about society's tolerance of the intolerable make it real and
effectively memorable.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
(this address will change in October 1998...details to follow)

Title
Review for Godfather: Part III, The (1990)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
Francis Ford Coppola knew that if a third installment in his 'Godfather'
series was going to be made,
he would have to offer audiences and critics alike a new perspective.
His story of power within an organized crime family had propelled 'The
Godfather' (1972) and 'The Godfather Part II' (1974) to the top of many
"all time greatest films" lists.  Those who expected 'The Godfather Part
III' to be as good as those films were, frankly, fools.  Coppola's
intention in the third film was clearly aimed at offering a story of
redemption.  Sixteen years had passed and 1990 brought a whole new
decade of film making that so far by 1998, would look a great deal
better than the 80's.
Returning for the third time would be Al Pacino, referred to by Coppola
as America's greatest actor.  Pacino would reprise his role of Michael
Corleone, a man who destroyed his life by bowing to the trappings of
wealth through ill gotten means which he inherited from his father.
Michael, as a more ruthless ruler and killer than his father had been,
is now looking to redeem his immortal soul by going straight.  All
illegitimate investments made by the Corleone family have now been sold
off and their money has been invested into real estate.
As part two left off, it was 1959.  As "The Godfather Part III' opens,
we see the decaying former Corleone estate in Lake Tahoe, Nevada.  It is
now deserted.  Michael begins narrating a letter he is writing to his
children, asking them to come to a religious ceremony where he will
receive a special award by his church for his charitable contributions.
As the letter is being narrated, the film shifts to a shot of New York
City.  It is 1979.  In the church, as Michael is receiving his honour,
he has a flashback to the murder of his brother, Fredo.  A murder which
Michael engineered and gave the go ahead to.  As fans of the series
know, Fredo betrayed Michael, which led to this ghastly fate.  As
Michael grew older, he regretted this action and had been haunted by it
ever since.  Fredo's murder and Michael as the perpetrator of it, would
be the central theme of the film and the most admirable thing about 'The
Godfather III' is the under lying Shakespearean overtones express.  Not
just in the last scenario I described, but throughout the film as many
tragedies are showcased.
Also returning for a third time would be Diane Keaton as Michael's
former wife Kay and Talia Shire as Michael's loyal sister Connie.  Some
other minor characters reprise their roles and it's fun to watch for
them and say "I remember that guy.  Is he still around?"
A vibrant new character named Vincent Mancini (Andy Garcia) would be
introduced to audiences as Michael's illegitimate nephew.  Vincent is
the son of Michael's brother Sonny, portrayed by James Caan in the first
film and seen in a cameo in the second.  Garcia would be the only cast
member nominated for an Oscar.  He was nominated for Best Supporting
Actor and the Academy's failure to nominate Pacino as Best Actor was a
travesty as Pacino brought a fresh angle to his character with total
believability.  Pacino got nominated for as Oscar the same year he made
'The Godfather Part III'.  He was nominated as Best Supporting Actor
(against Garcia) for 'Dick Tracy' as he played an over the top villain
under heavy make-up.
Michael takes Vincent under his wing and shares his experiences in what
is now the legitimate family business.  Vincent's desire for a life of
crime is driven by his greater desire to destroy a vile and under handed
thug named Joey Zaza, played very well by Joe Mantegna.  Zaza controls
all the things the Corleone family used to be involved in.  Drugs,
gambling, prostitution and other vices are Zaza's specialty and he aims
to kill Michael later in the film with help from some powerful forces
who are also out to swindle and destroy Michael.  Michael is drawn back
in to a life of crime by sheer destiny.  A destiny set in motion when
Michael was a young man, not thinking that once you're in, it's for
life.
Pivotal to the film's outcome is the character of Mary Corleone,
Michael's daughter.  As portrayed by Sofia Coppola (Francis' daughter),
the character is nearly ruined.  Her acting is just downright bad and if
her part had been any bigger, the film would have failed miserably.
Coppola had to replace Winona Ryder who had started in the role of Mary
but had to withdraw after suffering from exhaustion by coming directly
off a couple of other films she worked on.  Julia Roberts and Madonna
had also been considered at one point for the role of Mary.  Michael's
other grown-up offspring, Anthony (Franc D'Ambrosio) is a complete throw
away as his character is never examined or given any real focus.
Other notable actors in the film are George Hamilton as Michael's
attorney and Eli Wallach as an old friend of the Corleone's who double
crosses Michael for his own selfish gains.  Robert Duvall, who played
Tom Hagen, Michael's step brother and family attorney in the first two
films, didn't appear in part three, reportedly because they wouldn't pay
him enough.
Technically, the film moves well.  Gordon Willis' 'prince of darkness'
photography has an uncanny depth of focus and sizzles with many darkened
indoor scenes and one scene involving a helicopter attack upon a group
of crime bosses through the skylight of a hotel banquet room, is
brilliantly photographed.
'The Godfather Part III' is an overall excellent film that offers a new
story while it combines memories of the past through its reoccurring
characters and Andy Garcia's performance of what Michael was in the
second film.  Part three was nominated for seven Oscars including Best
Picture and Best Director for Francis Ford Coppola.  Coppola wrote the
script with Mario Puzo and they failed to receive an Oscar nomination
for their writing this time around.  The two of them won Oscars for
their screenplays of the first two films.  There is no need or desire on
my part for a fourth film.  Coppola didn't get lucky by having his third
film accepted by critics, audiences and his peers.  He constructed the
film sharply and didn't repeat himself.  He re-invented himself.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Soldier's Daughter Never Cries, A (1998)
'A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries' (1998)
Merchant-Ivory has a long standing tradition of producing some of the
most respected and high quality films dealing with aristocratic
lifestyles.  Films such as 'The Bostonians', 'A Room With a View',
'Howard's End', The Remains of the Day', and 'Jefferson in Paris' have
showcased their talents.  Ismail Merchant is the producer and James
Ivory is the director.  Their latest film is a triumph of family, pride,
cultural comparisons and light drama with an emphasis on telling a
somewhat true story.  Based on the novel by Kaylie Jones, the daughter
of author James Jones, the film is a semi autobiographical account of
life from the middle of the 1960's and into the early 70's.
Bill Willis (Kris Kristofferson) and his wife Marcella (Barbara Hershey)
have a little girl named Channe.  This American family lives in France
and Kristofferson is a successful writer and the family attends parties
and other social events.  They have a French maid to look after their
children as they adopt a little boy named Benoit.
Benoit's mother was 15 years old when she had him and she couldn't
possibly hope to care for the boy and his adoption into the Willis
family (he is later named Bill by his American family) is not an easy
one at first.  The maid and his step sister don't like him and his
somewhat shy personality puts him at odds since he came from a life of
little love and expects nothing special from his new family.  The family
indeed embraces him and later on he and his step sister grow fond of
each other and discover their mutual need and respect for one another.
Their schooling is upper crust.  A full European education in manners,
complete with school uniforms and the strict discipline of the
educators.  Friends are made, identities are established and the kids
eventually grow into their teens and into adulthood (Leelee Sobieski and
Jesse Bradford).  There are romantic relationships for the women.  The
maid has been sexually repressed for most of her life and the daughter
would find her true love back in America.  North Carolina to be exact,
as the head of the household (Kristofferson) decides to move his kin
back there.  At first, the kids have trouble adjusting to the American
way of life.  European born but with American parents is somewhat
confusing to them and they need to adjust promptly.
'A Soldier's Daughter Never Cries' has a natural rhythm to it that
blends in with its benign but effective story telling.  It never takes
itself too seriously but there is an incredible amount of depth in the
character's lives that puts it head and shoulders above most films of
its kind.  The entire cast shines.  When Kris Kristofferson made 'Lone
Star' in 1996, I thought he would receive an Oscar nomination for it. 
His craft makes him a viable force in this film and Hershey, as his
wife, is on target as a strong willed woman who is neither subservient
or intimidated.
The real protagonist of the story is Sobieski.  As the daughter, the
story centres around her.  Her maturity into adulthood is impressively
told through the lens of a very skillfully used camera.  James Ivory
captures every aspect of the family's life perfectly.  There are no
black sheep.  This is usually a pretension reserved for less experienced
film makers.  You want to be a part of this family when it's all said
and done!  The screenplay by Ivory and two time Oscar winner Ruth Prawer
Jhabvala ('A Room With a View' and 'Howard's End') is perfectly churned
out with dialogue that says the right thing at exactly the right time. 
A film that knows the value of the spoken word is usually better than
anything else that tries to imitate it.  This stuff is authentic!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
I haven't seen such a lavish and exquisitely told Victorian era story
like 'An Ideal Husband' since Martin Scorsese's 'The Age of Innocence'
in 1993.  'An Ideal Husband' has all the admirable qualities of a story
and look similar to an installment of television's 'Masterpiece
Theatre'.  
The rules of society were strict and somewhat highly hypocritical in
many instances back in the days of long gowns and tuxedos for casual
wear.  Everyone in high society seemed upper crust and more trustworthy
than they are perceived today but there was still plenty of blackmail,
adultery, wheeling and dealing and manipulation to be found.
'An Ideal Husband' casts a negative light on the feisty brawl of
politics involving dishonour, blackmail, the manipulation of a fortune
and the will of one man to keep his dignity.  The film also runs a
perfect length of just over 90 minutes and this makes it appeal to those
who find this type of entertainment too highly enlightened for their own
tastes.
Set in England, Jeremy Northam portrays Sir Robert Chiltern.  A short
time before he is to give an denouncing address to the British
Parliament regarding British support to form a canal through Argentina,
he is approached by the underhanded Laura Cheveley (Julianne Moore) who
supports the canal plan and wants Sir Robert to change his mind and
support it also or she will blackmail him with an incriminating letter
that will ruin his reputation and cause his life to come crashing down
like a house of cards.  Among the casualties in this house of cards is
Sir Robert's marriage to his wife Gertrude (Cate Blanchett).
The screenplay is by Oliver Parker based on a play by Oscar Wilde and
the dialogue is impeccably written to showcase the tongues of dignity
found in the era shown.  The film is relatively simple to follow, unlike
many films of its kind which take often needless sub plots and inject
them into a story where it isn't needed.  'An Ideal Husband' also has
the look of a Merchant-Ivory production and the sets, costumes,
cinematography and music score are all to be given an "A" for effort and
successful execution.
Other noteworthy members of the cast are Rupert Everett, Minnie Driver
and John Wood. No one seems out of place and everyone is casted
perfectly and the direction and screenplay adaptation by Oliver Parker
is truly an exercise in subtlety.
The mechanics of the film's overall climax are somewhat docile in nature
but are in keeping with many aspects of its own tone.  This film is the
type of achievement that I always argue keeps the movie industry alive
because the movies always keep tradition in focus.  Film is arguably the
most educational medium if the right movies are selected to show us a
little of the past that for the most part can pave our future.  This
film also draws heavily from the origins of theatre since it is based on
a play and the theatre for many is the true art of dramatic
presentation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Hooper (1978)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     I know what you're thinking.  What could possible justify writing a
full review of a movie like 'Hooper'?  My reasons may surprise and please
you at the same time.  It just so happens that Burt Reynolds really is a
talented and clever actor.  Not necessarily in 'Hooper' but in other films.
Reynolds displayed a knack for the craft of acting in films like
'Deliverance', 'The Longest Yard', 'The End', 'Starting Over' and more
recently in 'Boogie Nights' which is a film he is certain to receive an
Oscar nomination for Best Supporting Actor and he has a very good chance of
winning.  The problem is that Reynolds like Tom Cruise, Harrison Ford and
Mel Gibson has somewhat buried the recognition of his talent in the minds of
the public because they often choose the commercial route in making movies.
I recently saw Reynolds on television talking about his work on 'Smokey and
the Bandit' and he said that he never saw a bunch of people working on a
movie in his life where they were having more fun and after all, a person's
occupation should be pleasant and I admire Reynolds for most but not all of
the choices he has made in his career.
     Another reason a film like 'Hooper' deserves some recognition is that
it symbolizes in an entertaining way the plight of the movie stunt man.  How
many categories do they have at the Academy Awards?  Both technical and
academic?  A lot, but they should have a category for stunt men because how
many people on a movie set put their lives on the line in the name of film?
It is an under rated and exploiting art form which gets over looked too often.
     Directed by Hal Needham, a former stunt man himself, 'Hooper' is about
the personal and professional life of a movie stunt man complete with the
trade mark 'good ol' boy' style that makes a Burt Reynolds movie such great
escapism.
     'Hooper' centers on the final career days of legendary stunt man Sonny
Hooper (Reynolds) as he is working on what will eventually turn out to be
his last film because of his ailing back and other physical discomforts and
Sonny relies on a great quantity of pain killers for his condition.
     'Hooper' showcases three generations of stunt men, Sonny (Burt
Reynolds), the middle, Jocko (Brian Keith), the oldest and Ski (Jan-Michael
Vincent), the youngest.  Although none of them are related in the movie,
Reynolds is having an intimate relationship with Jocko's daughter (Sally
Field).  There are other interesting characters involved including the
movie's producer (John Marley) and the film's unethical and spotlight
grabbing director (Robert Klein).  Even football legend Terry Bradshaw has a
scene as a tough guy who starts a bar room brawl with Reynolds
and his gang.  
     The climax in 'Hooper' boils down to a rocket car stunt which will make
a jump across a wide gorge.  A stunt that will be executed by Sonny and Ski
and a stunt for which Sonny will command an unprecedented $100,000 dollars.
     'Hooper' is a movie which plays like action on laughing gas and will
induce pleasant side effects for a movie audience that harmlessly embraces
that sort of thing. 
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Taxi Driver (1976)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
1976.  One year after the United States had pulled out of Vietnam and the
country had began of new era of recovery.  At the tail end of this era, set
in a time of one of the worst crime periods in the history of New York City
and America in general was Martin Scorsese's 'Taxi Driver'.  A landmark film
that transformed stomach turning violence into art, confronted social issues
many wanted to turn away from and made stars out of many of its cast
members.  Robert De Niro had already won an Oscar for 1974's 'The Godfather
Part II' in the best supporting actor category and 'Taxi Driver' was his
first Oscar nomination as best actor.  His performance is one of hypnotic
gore as he plays Travis Bickle, a taxi driver, and a lonely drifter without
family or friends and a man who isn't evil, he just suffers from urban
paranoia.  He wants to save a 12 year old prostitute (Jodie Foster) from a
sleazy life and return her to her parents in Pittsburgh, is tired of all
street scum in general (not realizing later on the potential hypocrisy of
his actions), and he executes an armed robber while defending a
neighbourhood merchant who thanks him and through all of this, believes he
is doing the right thing by planning to assassinate a leading candidate
running for president.  Travis plans the assassination for two reasons: he
was scorned by a woman named Betsy (Cybil Sheppard), volunteering her
services for the candidate, and to vent his disgust for a man working with
her in the same cause (Albert Brooks).  Travis draws a great deal of
influence from a middle aged cabbie named Wizard (Peter Boyle) but uses that
wisdom in a misguided fashion.
If 'Taxi Driver' had been made just ten years earlier, it would have
received an X rating by the American style of rating movies through the
Motion Picture Association of America or it may have been banned altogether.
It is still considered to have hard core violence in this the year 2000 and
is not the least bit dated.  This is Martin Scorsese's first truly great
film.  It is a landmark achievement.  Many would say that Scorsese's first
great film is 1973's Mean Streets' but as great a film as it is, it is
considered more of a cult film among film historians than a mainstream
Hollywood film.  'Taxi Driver' is hardly conventional film making but has
garnered probably more controversy than most other films in the last thirty
years.  Film historian Leonard Maltin only rates it two stars out of four
which was truly a surprise when I first read his review and the American
Film Institute in 1998 rated it #47 on their top 100 list of greatest films
ever made.
Scorsese directs many scenes slowly and in a stiff manner, which works
perfectly as the terror of its psychological qualities make it a full
blooded horror film at times without monsters or elements of the paranormal.
Also getting his first big break in this film is Harvey Keitel, who plays a
street pimp and is one of the most slimy characters you will ever see in a
film.  My two favourite scenes in the film are, one, where Travis buys arms
from a dealer who also trades in drugs and stolen automobiles.  He shows
Travis a suitcase full of firearms and Travis' seduction for these deadly
weapons transforms him into a full workout mode to get his body into shape
and fulfill the fantasies created by the dark side of his mind.  The other
killer scene actually unfolds several times as Travis performs his
assassination rehearsal in front of a mirror where he repeats
confrontational lines several times and it is a trademark scene of style
that De Niro would uses several times in his career and it works every time.
One thing that should be remembered from this film is how devastating the
influence of film can be.  John Hinckley Jr. said this film made him attempt
to kill president Ronald Reagan in order to prove his love to Jodie Foster,
who, as mentioned earlier, played a child prostitute in the film.  Hinckley
attempted to kill Reagan outside a Washington D.C. hotel on March 30, 1981.
Reagan at first wasn't believed to have been shot because he didn't feel a
thing.  After a chest wound was discovered in the presidential limousine,
Reagan was then rushed to the hospital and thankfully, made a full recovery.
The 53rd annual Oscar telecast was delayed one day, to March 31, out of
respect for the president.
I've always found it strange that the 1970's, in my view, the most decadent
and dreary decade of 20th century America, has produced the greatest films
of the the 20th century.  'Taxi Driver' is certainly one of the greatest
films ever made, not only because of its sheer attempt to go for the
jugular, but because is celebrates a whole host of subjects which were
brought to the attention of many who refused to believe or even know they
were present in such a vile way within society.  And many of Scorsese's
small interjections of freakish characters, such as the one he plays as a
well dressed man in the back of De Niro's cab who watches his wife in a
strange apartment committing adultery and telling Travis how he plans to
kill her, give the film the detail it needs and prevents his film from being
a low level exploitation film and instead Scorsese elevates it into
influential artistry.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
     'City of Angels' is from director Brad Silberling (1995's 'Casper')
and is based on the 1988 Wim Wenders film 'Wings of Desire'.  The
setting for this film is Los Angeles and the poetic tone the film
projects for its entire running time is both mystical, hypnotic and
truly gives the viewer an emotional experience that doesn't just come
from the performances of its two leads but from the overall beauty of
its story and how things develop based upon some early scenes of
tenderness and gentle kindness.  The opening scene is a little girl's
bedroom and the child is running a fever of 105 and her mother takes her
to the hospital, all the while under the observation of an angel named
Seth (Nicolas Cage).  Upon receiving treatment at the hospital, a second
image of the child is seen standing next to Seth, obviously her spirit
ready for the journey towards Heaven and Seth explains that she will see
her mother again one day.
     Seth is captivated by a beautiful doctor named Maggie Rice (Meg
Ryan) and falls in love with her.  He tries to comfort her after the
unavoidable death of a patient in her care who died on the operating
table of a serious heart condition.  Maggie blames herself but her
superiors at the hospital and her eventual encounter with Seth convince
her otherwise. It seems that Seth and other angels like him can't be
seen unless they want to be.
     Cage and Ryan are very well matched as lovers in the film and their
chemistry gives the film the leverage it needs to maintain its tone from
start to finish.  Also thrown into this already impressive cast is a
cardiac patient (Dennis Franz) at Maggie's hospital who knows of Seth's
identity and because I want to avoid this becoming a spoiler review, I
will stop here.
     There are some rather interesting scenes of beauty such as the
early morning California sunrises which a group of angels gather for
regularly to observe for its beauty and appreciated simplicity.  Seth
seems to hear music in the sunrise and takes pleasure in the fascinating
quality of the human experience and this draws him closer to Maggie as
the film moves along.  Maggie eventually falls in love with Seth and the
two of them try and embrace in the total human experience and Seth must
face a choice of continuing as one of God's messengers or joining the
human race on Earth.
     What I wanted to avoid thinking about throughout the course of this
film, were inevitable comparisons to films such as 'Ghost' and 'Heaven
Can Wait' and while 'City of Angels' is not a completely original film,
it does have the magic to make it a good film, lacking greatness because
of its somewhat muddled ending.  Cynics will trash the film for being
too nice for its own good while others will appreciate it for its
old-fashioned and mostly successful take on the oldest story in the
world, love.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
     Peter Fonda turned 58 years old in February and he is beginning to look
and sound more and more like his famous father Henry who died in 1982.  Fonda
has pretty much always taken a back seat in popularity to his sister Jane who
retired from movies in 1990 and today is married to billionaire media mogul
Ted Turner.  Peter Fonda is probably most famous for his 1969 classic film
'Easy Rider' written by Fonda himself along with Dennis Hopper and Terry
Southern.  Fonda starred in that film but his career has been a mediocre one
at best and his daughter Bridget is now carrying the torch for the Fonda
family into the next generation.
     'Ulee's Gold' is a remarkable comeback opportunity for Peter Fonda and
the low-key presentation of the hard driving subject matter is also quite
impressive.  Fonda plays a bee keeper and honey manufacturer living in
central Florida with his two grand daughters and is involved in a friendship
with his neighbour (Patricia Richardson) who happens to be a physician.
 Fonda's son is in a correctional facility after being involved in a robbery
with two other men who maintain contact with Fonda's daughter-in-law and she
is a recovering drug addict as we discover later in the film.  It seems that
while high one night she tells the two men about money her husband stashed
from the robbery and upon his entrance to jail, kept this a secret.  The two
criminals want Fonda to locate the money and hand it over to them.  Fonda is
caught in a moral dilema concerning this crime while caring for the recovery
of his daughter-in-law, raising his two daughters and keeping his business
running.
     This film works because its deliberate slow pace gives the film's entire
tone a hint of reality and Fonda plays the aging bee keeper in a seasoned and
somewhat sympathetic manner.  This is a movie that will find a better
audience on video in a few months and 'Ulee's Gold' is intended for mature
audiences as it is free from the standard Hollywood trappings with a very
ordinary presentation yet powerful message about family and the heartaches
sometimes involved.

Title
Review for Boys from Brazil, The (1978)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     The most intriguing thing about 'The Boys From Brazil' is that it keeps
you guessing how the plot will unfold.  It begins in South America and a
secret meeting is taking place.  A meeting held by Dr. Josef Mengele,
otherwise known as the "Angel of Death" and a former Nazi enforcer under the
command of Hitler himself during World War II.  
     The movie implies that he is still alive and he is played chillingly by
Gregory Peck.  Peck's interpretation of the role is a monologue of hatred for
those who oppose his ideas and arrogant superiority over those he wishes to
control.  It is a blinding and insane personality trait which Peck plays very
convincingly.  
     The meeting he is holding is with different men, some former officers of
the SS, young generation assassins and other evil conspirators.  A large
number of men are to be assassinated across the globe over a period of time
in order for Mengele's plan to work.  What the men at the meeting don't
realize is that their meeting is under surveillance by a young man (Steve
Guttenberg in one of his first roles) who intends to convey the recordings of
the meeting to a Nazi hunter (Laurence Olivier in an Oscar nominated role) in
the hopes of stopping Mengele and bringing him to justice. 
     After receiving a strange phone call from Guttenberg, Olivier finds in
the next little while that evidence begins to mount to support the claims
that the plot the SS intends to carry out is in fact becoming a reality.
 This leads Olivier on a world wide trip to find the truth.  He finds a
number of boys living in various parts of the world that all look exactly
alike and he discovers the Mengele has created clones of someone.
     In wake of the cloning of Dolly the sheep in Scotland in the past year,
you might want to take a look at 'The Boys From Brazil' to see how this
movie, which was dismissed as science fiction when it first came out in 1978,
has proven to be somewhat of a prophesy and although bans on human cloning
have been called for around the world, who knows?  It may have already
happened.
     Laurence Olivier is superb in his role and the film is directed by
Franklin J. Schaffner (Oscar winner for 'Patton' - 1970) and is based on the
novel by Ira Levin.  It doesn't try to be anything more than a low key
detective story with moments of heightened tension that show evil at its most
vindictive.  You will definitely be against cloning once you've seen 'The
Boys From Brazil'.

Title
Review for Dirty Harry (1971)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
'Dirty Harry' is the film that made Clint Eastwood a bona fide North
American movie star.  His earlier work in the westerns he made in Italy
with Sergio Leone in the 1960's are excellent but they didn't really go
over with the North American audiences until years later when they found
their way on to late night television and eventually on home video.
1971 was a good year for Eastwood.  Not just because of his breakthrough
in 'Dirty Harry' but also because it marked the year that Eastwood made
his directing debut with another classic of his, 'Play Misty for Me'.
Eastwood's directing and producing would eventually pay off for him with
the ultimate recognition he received from his peers when Eastwood won
two Oscars for producing and directing his anti-Western masterpiece
'Unforgiven' in 1992.  Eastwood's venture into directing hasn't always
worked because he stretches out his story lines too long in many cases
and his films are at times just downright boring.  1997's 'Midnight in
the Garden of Good and Evil', directed by Eastwood was a somewhat
admirable film but is the first film in years that had me bored more
than any other time in recent movie history.
In 'Dirty Harry', Eastwood stars as San Francisco police inspector Harry
Callahan, a cop who bends the rules (sometimes breaking them), in his
pursuit of the criminal element.  America exploded with crime in the mid
to late 1960's and 'Dirty Harry' was a timely release that showed
Harry's quest to rid the streets of scum his way wasn't necessarily a
bad thing and despite some elements of police brutality, criminals will
win when they have no rules to play by while the cops do.  In fact, to
respond to charges leveled by critics that inspector Callahan was a
right wing cop with no regard for the constitutional rights of suspects,
Eastwood made the first of four sequels to 'Dirty Harry' in 1973
entitled 'Magnum Force' where a group of vigilante police officers
executed criminals with a greater disregard for the law and Callahan
would not go along with it because he knew where to draw the line in
dealing with scum and never crossed it to the point of becoming a
criminal himself.
The first time we see dirty Harry is on a roof top where the police are
investigating a shooting where a female swimmer was gunned down.
Harry's jacket and tie persona, complete with his legendary sunglasses
are an instant identification of his character and would strongly
establish him throughout the other four 'Dirty Harry' films.  The first
time we get a clear read on Eastwood's character is in the mayor's
office where Harry sarcastically insults the city's highest ranking
official and begins investigating the character known as Scorpio who
promises to unleash a wave of homicides on the city unless he's paid one
hundred thousand dollars.
Andy Robinson would prove to be one of the sickest psychotic villains in
movie history and in many ways, his character is still the most
frightening to date and his portrait of evil as a man suffering from
urban paranoia was arguably the best performance in the film.
The cat and mouse play between Eastwood and Robinson is taut,
suspenseful and horrifying at times to watch but as any fan of the
series will tell you, you can't stop watching it.
One of the film's scenes that makes for the most interesting debate
among movie fans and social observers is the scene in the D.A.'s office
after Harry initially captures Scorpio and is told that the suspect will
be set free because Eastwood violated his constitutional rights.  The
D.A. is joined by a judge in explaining Harry's violation of the
suspect's rights and the balancing of suspect's rights and the right of
the public to be protected by criminals is called into question, giving
'Dirty Harry' it's admirable quality of socially redeeming subject
matter and the film avoids becoming just another police exploitation
picture directed with talented scarring impact and colourful insight by
Don Siegel.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
Director Neil Jordan has never been known to make very good movies
unless they're are products of his own scripts.  His Oscar winning
screenplay of 1992's 'The Crying Game' is an example of his skill as an
excellent writer, as that film had one of the most shocking plot twists
seen in films this decade.  Jordan applied a hypnotic like style of
direction to 'The Crying Game' and does the same on a much lesser scale
with 'In Dreams'.
The film isn't a failure, it just looks weak in many areas but has good
performances from its cast which usually redeems films weak in other
areas.  It has a set up with a social injustice from the past that comes
back to haunt others in the film years later.  
A small town in Massachusetts is flooded in an excavation project in
1965 and one of the town's children falls through the cracks.  Combined
with years of physical abuse at the hands of his mother and his horrific
stay in a mental institution where he received electric shock
treatments, he becomes a serial killer (Robert Downey Jr.) and is able
to form a nexus with a woman who has psychic abilities.  In other words,
he can get inside her dreams and torture her.
The subject of his torture is Annette Bening.  She plays a woman with
psychic abilities who has had the gift (curse) since childhood. 
Sometimes her visions are real and sometimes they are not.  This leads
to many psychotic episodes for her after the vision of her daughter's
murder comes true.  Her life is further complicated by her husband's
(Aidan Quinn) suspected infidelity and she is put into a mental
institution when her dreams are interpreted by a psychiatrist (Stephen
Rea) as those of a disturbed mind.
Rather than elevate the film to a level of dramatic interpretation and
put it across as a complex thriller, Neil Jordan instead relies too much
on the "schlock value" found in numerous slasher films of the past.  His
eerie camera work and deserted forest locations are commendable but this
can't compensate for a rather thin story.  Accompanying Neil Jordan on
his screenplay is Bruce Robinson ('The Killing Fields') who all but
disappeared from the major Hollywood screen writing scene with only five
writing credits to his distinction in the last 15 years and is not
impressive in this effort at all.  
Annette Bening is quite good in the film and Robert Downey Jr., a very
convincing psycho here, has a scene near the end of the film that looks
like 'The Shining', 'Psycho', and 'The Silence of the Lambs' all mixed
together and as it looks all too obvious, it falls short of getting even
a marginal recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
'Mimic' is a grade 'a' idea given the 'b' movie treatment.  It has all the
trappings of that genre.  People not knowing what to make of a strange
phenomenon at first.  People trapped in a desperate situation confronting the
deadly menace and finally how to kill the intruder and is that intruder
killed off convincingly?  
A bug scientist (Mira Sorvino) has invented a species of insect that will
help prevent the spread of a deadly disease affecting children when they are
bitten by a cockroach.  The pests are primarily found in the New York City
subway tunnels and make their way forward and the new insects created are
supposed to counter their efforts.  They are turned loose in the location
mentioned but three years after the incident there is a new problem.  The
experimental bugs follow the theory of evolution and spawn a new form of
species, one that is part insect and part human!  Ooh, how hidious!!  Yes, it
is.  Unfortunately what the film does is take an inventive situation and it's
given the old clandestine treatment with only a few people knowing about it
and finding out what to do about it.
One of the best clandestine stories of terror in recent years was 1995's '12
Monkeys' in which one man traveled back in time to find a way to stop a
deadly virus from spreading across the globe and killing 99% of the world's
population.  That film focused on a re-occurring nightmare by its leading
character and had a sense of unpredictability.  'Mimic' can't escape that.
 It is predictable.
However, for all the flaws it contains, it is still a biting (no pun
intended) and potentially scary movie which flows like gasoline about to hit
the fire.  The cast is admirable and Charles S. Dutton has some good moments
as one of the trapped people fighting off the monsters.  Large insects
creations have been pain stakingly created to look exactly what they're
intended to be and every attention to detail has been attended to. 
'Mimic' suffers from the same problem as Peter Hyams' 'The Relic' did earlier
this year and that is reflecting a story by constantly filming in dreary,
dark and unsavory places where the audience is forced to return every once in
awhile and the need for a breath of fresh air is denied.  This is what killed
'Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom' (1984) where the primary setting was
in the cave of a deadly cult and the film eventually became trivial.  'Mimic'
is done with a slight dose of originality but it is forgettable.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
One thing you have to give the entire 'Alien' series credit for is the
fact that they are all vastly different.  Four different directors
have injected their vision of horror in space battling ugly creatures
of unspeakable strength.  Ridley Scott got the ball rolling in 1979
with 'Alien' and chose a very relaxed and later tension filled pace in
which the main characters get eliminated one by one.  As a visionary
piece of film making it was genuinely original but as a character
study and a film of plotting, it was shallow.  James Cameron picked
things up in 1986 with 'Aliens' and Cameron had two things to his
advantage.  First, he also wrote the script to it which gave him
latitude to invent things at anytime on the set and secondly, he
challenged the intellectual aspects of the first film by moving 180
degrees the other way and giving the audience a spectacular roller
coaster ride of soldiers creating their own demise by underestimating
their enemy.  Again, the main characters get eliminated one by one and
the few survivors that remain give the film a better ending than the
first film.  Unfortunately the third film, 'Alien 3' from 1992 had a
former music video director (David Fincher) at the helm and the film
suffered from dizzying camera work too incoherent for its own good and
a feeling of dreadful torment which instead of entertaining the
audience, it merely gave them an opportunity to see how the story of
Ellen Ripley would come to an end.  It had some good moments but for
an intended end to a classic film trilogy it was no classic itself.
Proof of its failure as an appropriate way to end things is found in a
fourth film which tries to redeem the series and end things once and
for all.
'Alien Resurrection' is directed by by Jean-Pierre Jeunet and is
written by Joss Whedon and I'm sorry to say that it is a major
disappointment.  It chooses a straight forward formula path in which
to tell its story.  A covert government operation in space is breeding
a new batch of the horrible creatures and little is known about them
by this crew who believe they can contain them in chambers for
experimental study.  The corrupt general in charge (Dan Hedaya) of the
space station operation sells out to a band of space travelers who are
criminals of a terrorist proportion.  Ron Perlman (t.v.'s 'Beauty and
the Beast') is the most slimy and potentially dangerous of the band
and Winona Ryder is portrayed as one of the gang as well and she is
badly casted in a role not suited for her talents.  Naturally, the
creatures get loose and all hell breaks loose again and a group of
people battles to survive in an unoriginal manner which we've seen
three times before.
Sigourney Weaver who played Ripley in the first three films and who
died in the third one is cloned here with some DNA from the creatures
she battles and her character of the new Ripley this time is
unattractive and robotic at best.  Her leadership is badly needed in
this film and I found her character could have been better written.
On the plus side, this film looks great and has the usual computerized
special effects which are now standard procedure for movies and the
technical aspects all around are impressive but its attempt to redeem
itself from the failure of the third film is only mildly successful
and its shallow attempt at continuing the story that should have been
laid to rest long ago is painfully obvious.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi IV: Jian dan ren wu (1996)
Martial arts expert turned movie star Jackie Chan has had a number of
international hits before testing the production markets over here in North
America.  'Rumble in the Bronx' and 'Supercop' came out in 1996 and while the
former was an over rated and over hyped disappointment, the latter was decent
entertainment.  Now in 1997 we are subjected to a movie which has to have
Jackie Chan's name in the title.  This movie has considerably less action
than the previous two films mentioned and the humour is both childish and
silly.  Chan is working for the CIA in this movie and a trail of suspicious
circumstances take him around the world and the movie's main setting is
Australia.  He is trying to crack a case involving the Russian mafia which
could lead to stolen nuclear devices being used as a first strike on the
west.  It's difficult to criticze these types of movies because you have to
accept them in many ways for what they are.  There is a terrific scene
involving a chase downhill on skis but many of the action scenes are toned
down and this leaves the audience begging for more.  It has an abrupt ending
where you say "Huh, that's it?"  This is not like reviewing a movie based on
a classic novel or upstanding play or a movie with serious actors.  This
movie is clearly for die hard Jackie Chan fans only and the rest of us will
say, "Well, I can take it or leave it."  That's all I can say about this
movie which doesn't dignify having much more said about it.

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
'TRIAL AND ERROR' OBJECTS TO BEING ORIGINAL
It's a struggle for a lot of television stars to make a transition to
the big screen.  Two of the most successful have to be Robin Williams
and Tom Hanks.  Other stars such as Tom Selleck, Shelley Long, David
Caruso and Roseanne have had luke warm, little or no success at it.
Michael Richards is certainly the funniest second banana on television
today with his wacky portrayal as Kramer on the top rated television
comedy 'Seinfeld'.  He attempts to strut his stuff in the latest comedy
from Jonathan Lynn ('Clue', 'My Cousin Vinny', 'Greedy') entitled
'Trial and Error'.
Jeff Daniels ('Dumb and Dumber', 'Gettysburg', 'Terms of Endearment')
also stars as a high profile, conservative attorney who is sent by his
firm's boss from Beverly Hills to Nevada to represent a member of the
family (Rip Torn in a genuinely entertaining role) on trial for fraud.
Daniels gets drunk at his bachelor party the night before and by nature
of a hangover the next morning his out of work actor friend (Richards)
substitutes for him in court and pretends to be the attorney of record
for the trial.  The problem now is that he has to keep on being the
attorney of record and things get sticky here to say the least.
I don't understand why Hollywood feels it's necessary to keep telling
the same story over and over again.  While 'Trial and Error' isn't a
complete disappointment because it does have some hilarious moments,
it's a movie of switching identities and getting through the system
very nervously which is something we've seen time and time again.
There is also a needless romantic sub plot where Daniels has an affair
with a beautiful waitress (Charlize Theron) and at the same time is
engaged to be married back home in California.
Jeff Daniels plays the straight man quite well in this one and Richards
does the best he can and you can tell at certain points where his
comedy is improvisational and while 'Trial and Error' hasn't cleared
the way for him to have a big career in the movies, Richards probably
has a better shot than most from today's television at breaking out.
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca

Title
Review for Evening Star, The (1996)
'The Evening Star' is the long awaited sequel to 1983's 'Terms of
Endearment.'  Shirley MacLaine returns as Aurora Greenway, the firey,
outspoken and no nonsense character we came to admire in the first film.  As
'The Evening Star' begins it is 1988, approximately 15 years since the
untimely death of Aurora's daughter Emma portrayed in 'Terms of Endearment'
by Debra Winger.  Aurora's three grandchildren are now fully grown and they
all have misguided and disfunctional lives.  Throughout the course of the
movie there are many sentimental moments on film which echo the tone and feel
of the first film as we are re-united with old characters and come to know
some new ones.  The problem 'The Evening Star' has is the inevitable scrutiny
it will come under in being compared to 'Terms of Endearment.'  If that
picture had never been made then there might be something here but while it
is entertaining and contains the realistic look of everyday life, it is a
disappointing follow up movie with absolutely nothing new to offer.  The most
memorable character from 'Terms of Endearment' was Garrett Breedlove played
brilliantly by Jack Nicholson and his character is desperately needed and
guess what?  He has a cameo but it comes at a bad time at about an hour and
forty five minutes into this movie which runs two hours and eight minutes.
 We are fed up with the film by the time he shows up and it's a case of too
little too late.  There is a ridiculous and silly storyline early in the film
which has Aurora carrying on an affair with here therapist which lasts about
half of the movie and it bored me silly.  It is hard to make a good sequel to
a movie that won five Academy Awards including Best Picture of the year.  For
those who don't want the memory of the first film tarnished stay away from
this one but if you long for more of the same you'll get it but only on a
superficial and less than ambitious level.  

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
It's difficult to write a review of 'In and Out' without giving too much
away.  When I first heard about this film that bills itself as a comedy I was
afraid that it might be offensive to members of the gay community.  I don't
know how some will react but as a straight person, I found it had many
problems which I will describe later on.  It's about a small town English
teacher (Kevin Kline) whose former student goes on to win an Academy Award
and during his acceptance speech thanks everyone who helped him make it
possible and in his thanks he singles out Kline as his former teacher and
declares at the end of his speech that Kline is gay.  Needless to say this
causes the usual uproar of intolerance within the community from the close
minded while it shocks and surprises many others.  Kline insists he is NOT
gay but it's hard to convince everyone and his wedding is in three days!
Two of the best films I've seen in recent years dealing with homosexuality
were 'Kiss of the Spider Woman' (1985) and 'Longtime Companion' (1990).  What
these films had in common is that they both took a forward look at their
subject matter without making more about their themes than was necessary.
 They were extremely well acted (William Hurt won the Oscar for 'Kiss of the
Spider Woman') and they were memorable.  What 'In and Out' does is take this
very sensitive subject matter and treats its second half by being flagrantly
condescending.
To tell you anything more than that would spoil the film but its climax is
disappointing and the entire film has frumpy humor to boot and doesn't quite
know in many scenes when to make its point and leave.  When the credits roll
up the screen there are many unanswered questions and 'In and Out' is a true
disappointment and believe me if you've laughed at the coming soon attraction
of this film or the television commercial advertising it, then you've already
seen most of the funny moments.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Meet Joe Black, and then say good-bye to him.  Like an oddity you would
meet at a friend's party, Joe Black is the sort of guy that reminds you
of the person who sits in the corner for the duration of the party and
says nothing not because he's shy but because he just isn't
interesting.  Ditto for this character study?  Notice the question
mark.  180 minutes of mumbling, meandering and dull facial expressions
are inexcusable from a director, Maritn Brest, who has been responsible
for film gems such as 'Going in Style', 'Beverly Hills Cop' and 'Scent
of a Woman'.  Talented in every sense of the word, Brest makes his films
technically flat and academically exciting as his characters always
stand out and Brest's sub text isn't always challenging but his films
are usually captivating and always entertaining.  What's more shocking
is how a pair of actors like Anthony Hopkins and Brad Pitt can read a
script and not use the chef's line...."It needs more flavouring!"  In
the dictionary under "bland", you will see a description of this movie.
The most disappointing thing about this movie is that its last half hour
is great and I don't understand why the same technique wasn't applied to
the rest of the film.
Anthony Hopkins is a media mogul whose decency as a person shines
through at every turn.  He loves his family, misses his late wife, has
not re-married for the sake of his enormous wealth and resists the idea
of making a deal with a rival to merge with his company and under mind
his life's work.  Hopkins wakes up one morning and hears a strange voice
that keeps saying "Yes."  The key to the film's story is his daughter
(Claire Forlani), a medical intern who meets an un-named man (Brad Pitt)
in a coffee shop one day.  She's pretty much an item with her father's
right hand man in business but finds that it's more of a business
arrangement and her father can sense this.  After striking up a
conversation with Pitt at the coffee shop, the two of them obviously
feel struck by the love thunderbolt.  They part strangely outside and as
she goes one way and turns the corner, he goes the other and watches her
fade from sight while standing in the middle of the street and is hit by
a car.
Hopkins experiences chest pains at the office and convulses and hears
the strange voice again and later that night before dinner, he hears it
again and is visited by what we learn is death (yes, the grim reaper)
who has assumed Pitt's body and wants a lesson in life before taking
Hopkins to the next world and the two of them know that their time left
on Earth is short.  Hopkins is able to reflect on his life and Forlani
thinks that the body she sees is the man from the coffee shop and the
film explains things clearly later, although there is no reason for this
film to be three hours in length.
When I think of films such as 'The Godfather', 'Citizen Kane' and other
movie classics that can tell a story in less time than this film, I'm
appalled.  'Meet Joe Black' has brief musical interludes here and there,
too many close-ups and much of the dialogue is barely audible giving the
impression that it could pass as a silent film if subtitles were added
which would probably get the words across more clearly than the
underachieving vocal chords of the cast.
Based loosely on the 1934 classic 'Death Takes a Holiday', 'Meet Joe
Black' is written by Ron Osborn, Jeff Reno, Kevin Wade and the brilliant
Bo Goldman who is way off the mark by allowing his name, along with
director Martin Brest to be attached to this film.
'Meet Joe Black' is not a bad movie.  It is, however, a very under
achieving and disappointing one.  It has no punch to move an emotional
nerve in the body of a movie fan and while a film like '2001: A Space
Odyssey' can be hypnotic and mistaken as boring, 'Meet Joe Black'
doesn't even have the technical supplements to warrant being what it is,
flat and unappealing.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for High Art (1998)
'High Art' is the kind of hard-core art film that cries out for
understanding.  It's repetitive imagery is a reflection of its surreal,
moody and often abbreviated characterizations.  It has all the qualities
of sleaze, drama, reality and blemishes of the soul that a sophisticated
movie buff can and should appreciated.  What it lacks in the area of
common story telling is compensated by its uncompromising look at the
alternative side of some people's lives.
Ally Sheedy stars as Lucy, a semi-retired photographer who never really
understood the beauty of her work.  She watches over her materialistic
mother who spends six thousand dollars in the blink of an eye on her
American Express card and can't remember what she spent it on.  She and
her friends are primarily drug addicts and drifters in life.  One in
particular (Patricia Clarkson), is a German movie actress of limited
stature who doesn't seem to care about the effects of snorting dope and
she lives her life in a constant state of flagrancy.
The protagonist in the film is Syd (Radha Mitchell).  She is an
assistant editor of a fashionable New York City magazine who discovers
Lucy's work and asks her superiors if they're interested in looking at
her work.  Her superiors are aware of who Lucy is.  Sort of an
underground hero of the photographic art world, Lucy agrees after a
meeting with Syd and her superiors, to do a piece for the magazine, and
throughout the course of their working relationship, Lucy and Syd become
lovers.  Greta and Lucy also have a past and they never quite end their
relationship until later in the film as the film's sub plot is sort of
an exploration of their feelings for each other.
Paced in a very sedate manner, writer/director Lisa Cholodenko finds the
emotional core of each character in the film as being very
straightforward and brings absolutely no glamour whatsoever to any of
their lives or appearances and this is the film's strength.  Appearances
count for a lot in this film.  Sheedy and Mitchell look very comfortable
and convincing in their roles and their performances are extraordinarily
sharp.
There isn't a false note in this film which runs a perfect 101 minutes.
Not too long or too short.  It has Oscar worthy performances from Sheedy
and Clarkson and after watching Ally Sheedy in films from the 80's such
as 'WarGames', 'The Breakfast Club', 'St Elmo's Fire', 'Short Circuit',
her career in the 90's has become a true showcase of her real depth and
talent as an actress.
As a modern day tale of tragedy, 'High Art' has few flaws and fewer
shortcomings and is filled with interpretive dialogue showing the
nervous calculation of each life it chooses to document.  Some to the
extreme and some to a lesser extent. But in the end, one will most
likely walk away from it remembering not how it looked but rather how it
felt.

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
The core audience for movies is people between 18 and 24 years of age.
I remember when I was that age, I still hated movies like 'Dirty Work'.
Even when I was 12 to 18, I still hated movies that insulted my
intelligence while offending my sense of decency and good taste.
Decency and good taste are, of course, a matter of individual opinion on
everyone's part, but let's be honest; movies like 'Dirty Work' are
indefensible trash intended to end another wannabe's career.  Cue cards
may work on the Weekend Update portion of 'Saturday Night Live' but Norm
Macdonald's jump to the big screen has him in character doing what looks
like a reading of cue cards to execute his lines and every gag in the
film falls flat on its face with Macdonald being the biggest of turkeys.
Upon research, I discovered that there have been four other movies in
Hollywood history that have the same title as this film and I thought I
might be in trouble from the opening credits when I saw that it took
three people to write a film like this.
Macdonald stars as a man well into his thirties who hasn't found his way
in life and the void we all go through in life seems to be stretching
its boundaries in his case.  He has trouble holding every job he has, he
can't keep a steady girlfriend and is an easy target for insults.  His
best buddy Sam (Artie Lange), turns out later in the film to be closer
to Macdonald than he realizes and Sam's dad (Jack Warden) holds the
secret to Macdonald's past that is completely wasted as the humourous
way they try and present the scenario will make your jaw drop with its
offensive and no talent execution style courtesy of director Bob Saget
(television's 'America's Funniest Home Videos' and 'Full House').  How
did Saget get to direct a motion picture?  He must have more friends
than talent.  He looks good on t.v. but he also looks like one of the
ultimate "bad corn" contributors to modern day pop culture through his
efforts here as a director.  Next, we'll probably have one of the Olsen
twins directing movies.
Failing at every turn, Macdonald and his buddy Sam decide to open a
business doing the one thing they're really good at: REVENGE!  They find
that even though they're relatively successful at it, there are still
problems with their new found endeavours as Macdonald is asked to do a
job that will strike a blow against the friendly grandmother of a girl
(Traylor Howard), that he's sweet on.
Unoriginal, unfunny, rude, offensive (especially to fat people and the
homeless), 'Dirty Work' doesn't even look like it has someone else
watching besides director Saget, interested enough to try and make the
film work.  While directors are ultimately responsible for the way a
film turns out, sometimes there are other people such as the first
assistant director, the writer or even the actors who can create input
in making a series of scenes work to become at least a mild success.  No
one here has any idea of how to do that.  It's one of the biggest no
talent hack jobs I've ever seen and ranks in my all time worst films
list along with other films from the last couple of years such as Tom
Arnold's 'The Stupids' and John Leguizamo's 'The Pest'.  After feeling
ripped off for your money, just remember an old joke that applies to
this film, not to be taken seriously but I hope it makes you feel
better.  If you can't beat them, arrange to have them beaten!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
What's extraordinary about 'Gods and Monsters' is not just the fact that
it's about a director responsible in many ways for setting the stage in
the way horror films would be made for decades to come but the dark side
of them that filtered into his personal life.  One man's loneliness, a
sense of dreams never quite fulfilled and wrestling with his own
sexuality make for a truly interesting film with no pretensions and
plenty of rich characterizations.
Director James Whale (1889-1957) was a grand director of horror, having
made 'Frankenstein' (1931), which is #87 on the AFI's list of all time
greatest films.  He made 21 films as a director, and some of his other
achievements include 'The Invisible Man' (1933), 'Bride of Frankenstein'
(1935), and his last film in 1949 was entitled 'Hello Out There'.  Whale
went into seclusion somewhat until his death eight years later.  The
film tells us many things about Whale, where he came from, his family
history and the fact that he was gay.
James Whale is portrayed in 'Gods and Monsters' by Ian McKellen, and he
had better polish up his Oscar speech because he may need it.  His work
in this film is brilliant because of the way he UNDER plays the role.
He brings dimensions of the character to the screen but others remain an
enigma.  By the end of the picture, you feel sympathy for Whale but you
want to know more about him.  The film is simply shot, almost like a
play by director Bill Condon and the screenplay, based on the novel
'Father of Frankenstein' by Christopher Bram is adapted for the screen
by Bill Condon as well.
The film opens in the final days of Whale's life as he lives in his
modest upper-class home in Southern California.  He is cared for by his
housekeeper who has worked for him for 15 years (Lynn Redgrave who is
also Oscar worthy).  There is a quote in the film that strikes a
memorable chord that says something about the fact that servants who
have worked for you long enough begin to feel as if they're related to
you.  Whale spends his time drawing as an artist, sketching on pads
mounted on giant easels and granting the occasional interview to an
eager journalist or fan, relishing in the thought of meeting such a
talented but under rated man.
The story starts to unfold interestingly enough when Whale begins to
fancy a gardener for hire, Brendan Fraser (who holds his own in many
scenes with McKellen).  He fancies him for not only for what he feels
are his incredibly good looks but for companionship, someone to talk to
and sketch.  He makes a notation that Fraser has the most extraordinary
head and features and that he wants him to sit and have his image
sketched.  Fraser, a heterosexual, later learns that Whale is gay and
things take a somewhat unpleasant turn in their relationship towards the
end of the film.
There is one scene in 'Gods and Monsters' that is priceless.  A garden
party hosted by the great movie director George Cukor portrayed in the
film by Martin Ferrero.  There are actors playing Boris Karloff, Elsa
Lanchester, Elizabeth Taylor and Princess Margaret.  Seeing all of these
actors portrayed by others is convincing and it is one of the best
scenes where McKellen portrays Whale's emotions as a man longing for the
past at times and wanting to put it behind him at other times.
One thing that haunted Whale ferociously throughout the course of his
life was his experience in World War I.  He has constant memories of it
and memories of it along with other scenes from his life seem real to
him in his everyday existence as he sees images from those experiences
right before his own eyes in the present day that aren't real, just
ghostly as an ingredient in Whale's mind as we learn he suffered a
stroke and takes medication and the stroke continues to make certain
functions of his brain deteriorate.
Hopefully, 'Gods and Monsters' will encourage people to take a look at
the work of James Whale with enthusiasm not just for the films he
directed but for the skill he had that has influenced the film industry
to capture his story on film 41 years after his death.  Bringing the
story of the final days of this man's life to the screen to audiences
who were perhaps not familiar with him serves as a way for people to be
educated not only about what they're watching but with what they learn
about the past which affects the present.  A tired clich, but it works.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Kiss the Girls (1997)
To get a stamp of approval in making a motion picture thriller you have to
address three basic points of interest.  Is it original?  Is it predictable?
 Do you care about the characters involved?  This is pretty much the rule for
all movies but with thrillers there is a tendancy for the tension factor to
run higher than other films.  'Kiss the Girls' pretty much succeeds as a
clever film but it borders on repetition in many circumstances.
The story begins in Washington D.C., and Morgan Freeman plays a D.C. police
oficer but his official title is forensic psychologist and his niece is
missing and the worst fear of the family is that she's dead.  His search
takes him to North Carolina where the audience witnesses the abduction of a
young doctor (Ashley Judd) and she is taken to a forest hideaway where the
abductor has imprisoned young women separately like in a jail and taunts them
with promises of his sexual prowess.
As a movie critic I refuse to write spoiler reviews so you'll have to see the
rest of this movie to follow its sprawling second half.  Morgan Freeman plays
the role of the cop in much the same fashion he did in 1995's 'Seven' and
since I despised that film, I tried to look deeper into the merits of this
film.  It does have good psychological tension and Freeman does carry the
story well for most of the film and much credit should be given to Ashley
Judd whose portrayal of the victim is very convincing.  
I don't know about you but the one thing I hate the most in story telling
whether it's a book, play, television piece or big screen movie is the red
herring factor.  If you don't know what that means it refers to throwing
something at the audience without them seeing it coming.  One of the most
intense recent examples of this was in 1996's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' which
started out as a great crime story but took a bizarre and ridiculous turn at
becoming a vampire flick with junky results.  'Kiss the Girls' has a unique
visual style and impressive direction by Gary Fleder who hints at what may
occur next without it being a dead giveaway.
'Kiss the Girls' re-unites Morgan Freeman with Cary Elwes who both appeared
in the American Civil War classic 'Glory' from 1989.  Other members of the
cast include Tony Goldwyn and Jay O. Sanders.  This movie is not recommended
for anyone that has ever had a criminal encounter involving abduction.  It is
vividly shocking and contains chilling scenes of terror which is not for all
tastes.  For others, you'll find it hard at times to leave your seat.

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
Demi Moore's struggle to give a star making performance has finally paid off
with 'G.I. Jane'. Moore gives an incredibly strong performance filled with
dedication to her craft thanks largely in part to the guidance of experienced
veteran director Ridley Scott.  Scott, whose films include 'Alien', 'Blade
Runner' and 'Thelma and Louise' has crafted a film with some of the most
intense basic training ever seen in a motion picture.  Stanley Kubrick's
'Full Metal Jacket' from 1987 featured an incredibly harsh treatment of raw
recruits being inducted into the U.S. Marines but that film is tame in
comparison to this.
Moore plays the first woman in the U.S. military to be trained as a Navy
Seal.  This reportedly is supposed to be the toughest training of any
fighting force anywhere.  Apparently, they have a drop out rate of 60 per
cent.  The master chief of the unit (Viggo Mortensen) vows that the first day
will not end until someone drops out.  The first day of training lasts 19
hours and the trainees look very physical in their roles.  Attempts are made
to give Moore preferential treatment since she is a woman.  She resists any
attempts at special treatment and tells her commanding officer that she wants
to be treated EXACTLY the same way as every other man in her unit.  Her three
months of training hit some rocky spots from officials within the military
who conspire against her in their attempt to keep the Navy Seal unit entirely
dominated by men.
Ridley Scott's control of the camera in working with director of photography
Hugh Johnson plunges the audience directly into the action with authentic
scenes of military training both compelling and convincing.  Demi Moore is
thoroughly convincing in a very demanding physical role she plays with total
credibility.  She even sports a buzz cut to her hair to give the role more
punch.
'G.I. Jane' is primarily a basic training film which is not a film classic
but rather a slick opportunity to present a visual style of the military not
done before in motion pictures.  Anne Bancroft has some of the best work of
her career in years as a U.S. Senator who recommends Moore as the first
female candidate.  She plays her role perfectly and convincingly by providing
the basis of high rolling bureaucracy in doing what's convenient at the time
of her profile among her peers and in front of the media complete with
hypocrisy and different loyalties to suit the moment.  'G.I. Jane' is a film
that rightfully knows the limits of its subject matter.

Title
Review for In Love and War (1997)
Director Richard Attenborough is a master of detailed story telling.
The Academy Award winning producer and director of 'Gandhi' (1982)
tells the story of famed American writer Ernest Hemingway (Chris
O'Donnell) and his romantic encounters during World War I with a Red
Cross nurse (Sandra Bullock).  Based on the book 'Hemingway In Love and
War' by Henry S. Villard, James Nagel and Mackenzie Astin, this movie
develops its characters very well as we come to know their
personalities and overall human qualities.  O'Donnell is bravely
spirited as Hemingway and Bullock has a keen sense of duty and maturity
in her role as the caring nurse as she is several years older than
Hemingway and this movie is based on a true story.  Unfortunately, this
picture has some very big flaws such as neglecting the presence of its
supporting players which has plagued Attenborough throughout his
directorial career.  His 1992 film 'Chaplin' was a very entertaining
and deep biography about the life of Charles (Charlie) Chaplin played
by Robert Downey Jr. but Attenborough failed to develop the supporting
players such as Douglas Fairbanks (Kevin Kline) and Mary Pickford
(Maria Pitillo) both of whom helped Chaplin establish United Artists
along with the pioneering film director D.W.  Griffith in 1919.  Even
the character of legendary FBI director J. Edgar Hoover (Kevin Dunn)
could have been played better with coaching and script changes
influenced by Attenborough.  'In Love and War' is basically a two
character story when it should really have involved its supporting
players better.  It also suffers from a tedious pace and a lackluster
use of music score which enhances most romantic sagas.  It is an
exceptional visual experience as the landscapes of Italy and Canada
serve as the film's location points and are very well photographed.
This film is suited to audiences of extreme literary taste and
dedicated lovers of film romance.  Others beware!

Title
Review for Red Corner (1997)
     Although it is a formula picture, 'Red Corner' crackles with energy and
is at times a taut and suspenseful thriller which has good supporting
characters and a leading man (Richard Gere) who has never really impressed me
much as an actor but he does a good job here.  It was amusing watching Gere
get upstaged last year in 'Primal Fear' when a young, bright,
twenty-something actor (Edward Norton) stole every scene they were in
together.  While Gere shines as the protagonist of 'Red Corner', it is a very
realistic situation that he encounters.  
     How many times have we picked up the newspaper and read about our fellow
citizens being held captive in a foreign country, subject to the laws of that
land they have allegedly broken.  It happens often and it happens here.  Gere
plays a lawyer again (as he did in 'Primal Fear') only this time the stakes
are higher.  In 'Primal Fear' he played a criminal defense attorney and here
he plays a media attorney working to secure a large corporate contract for
entertainment programming in The People's Republic of China.  He is a smooth
talker and one night he takes a woman to a hotel room and the next morning he
is arrested as she turns up dead in the room and Gere insists that he is
innocent but he can't remember what happened the night before.    
     That is the basis for the prosecution's case.  How can this man say he
is innocent if he can't remember what happened?  Gere's defense attorney (Bai
Ling) at first remains loyal to her country's system of justice and pretty
much tells Gere that in her country people are not presumed innocent like
they are in America and if he pleads innocent he will be shot within a week
and the cost of the bullet will be mailed to his family.  She also tells Gere
that China has six times the population of the United States but only one
tenth the crime rate.  The human rights issue is never a factor with her at
first.  Slowly she starts to adopt western ideology and things start looking
up for Gere.  Or do they?  
     Director Jon Avnet ('Fried Green Tomatoes', 'The War', 'Up Close and
Personal') works well with the subject matter here and the movie's strongest
quality is detail.  It digs to the heart of a system in need of reform and
shows everyday life in a culture very different from the west in every way.
 The movie is easy on politics and long on emotion.  Writer Robert King's
screenplay is skillfully laid out with a convincing set-up, mid-section but
has a conclusion seen before in many whodunits but finds a way to be
entertaining using a different atmosphere.

Title
Review for Field of Dreams (1989)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association' at:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
When it was released in the spring of 1989, 'Field of Dreams' was a
film that people talked about until the very next year when the film
received three Oscar nominations for Best Picture, Best Screenplay
Adaptation and Best Original Score.  A movie theatre manager at the
time, I can recall people's acute observations on the film.  One
gentleman commented that after seeing the film, "You wanted everybody
in the world to be your friend".  The film managed to find a theatre
in my city that would show it for practically the entire year leading
up to its Oscar race, and it eventually came away empty handed from
the Academy.  Perhaps the most preposterous shut out was in the Best
Original Score category when Disney's easily forgettable score to 'The
Little Mermaid' beat James Horner's lovely and emotionally feel good
notes.  It looks like Horner is poised to receive a long overdue Oscar
for the 'Titanic' score, but that remains to be seen.
Acutely obvious but not easily done by other films, 'Field of Dreams'
rides a wave of continued success for its overbearing simplicity.  As
the 1998 baseball season is about to get underway in less than a
month, 'Field of Dreams' is a classic motion picture that commands
every baseball fan to see it.
Written for the screen by its director Phil Alden Robinson, based on
the book Shoeless Joe by W.P. Kinsella, the phenomenal success the
film enjoyed was derived from the fact that you didn't have to be a
baseball fan to enjoy it and it appealed to people from all walks of
life.  Baseball was used only as a metaphor to enhance the story of
one man's search for redemption and finding it in a baseball field he
builds by sacrificing some of his rich farmland in the heart of Iowa
after a strange voice tells him "if you build it, he will come".
Ray Kinsella (Kevin Costner) was a man always fascinated by the
greatest game in the world, baseball.  It was one of the things that
kept him going but also reminded him of the painful relationship he
shared with his father, deceased in the film, and how an ugly exchange
of words forced Ray and his father to become alienated from each other
over a disagreement about the status of 'Shoeless' Joe Jackson,
portrayed in 'Field of Dreams' by Ray Liotta.
Jackson had been a player banned from baseball for life for throwing a
World Series in the era of Babe Ruth (Ruth saved baseball after the
scandal by being a top drawing card of the sport and symbolizing all
that good about baseball) and the detailed examination of the infamous
Black Sox scandal can be seen in the brilliant film 'Eight Men Out'
(1988) from director John Sayles.  Ray took exception to the fact that
'Shoeless' Joe had been his father's hero and said he "couldn't
respect a man whose hero was a criminal".
Ray is excited that spirits from the past other than 'Shoeless' Joe
have also come to his Iowa baseball field to play ball.  One early
evening, Ray hears the mysterious voice again, the same one that
inspired him to build the baseball surface, and this time it tells Ray
to "ease his pain".  This leads Ray to Boston where he makes contact
with Terence Mann, played splendidly by James Earl Jones.  The two of
them form an awkward relationship and travel to Minnesota to find a
former baseball player turned physician (Burt Lancaster in his last
big screen appearance).
The clever thing about 'Field of Dreams' is that it seems to have no
point until the film's final scene when it all becomes clear.  The
film's dreamlike atmosphere and fantasy enhanced theme, displayed in a
perfect flow of emotion from start to finish are symbolic to the very
essence of its genre.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith at:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Boxer, The (1997)
Oscar-winning actor Daniel Day-Lewis and director Jim Sheridan have
combined their talents on two previous films, 'My Left Foot' (1989 for
which Daniel Day-Lewis won the Best Actor Oscar) and 'In the Name of the
Father' (1993) and these two films have made a powerful impact on the
film industry and Day-Lewis and Sheridan continue their good working
relationship with 'The Boxer'.  The creative mind of director Sheridan
is a dramatic one at best with hardly any comic relief and that's great
to see.  His writing partner Terry George worked with him on 'In the
Name of the Father' and teams up with Sheridan this time to write a film
that once again has it's story line roots in the Irish Republican Army.
'In the Name of the Father' showcased Lewis in a true story as a
wrongfully convicted man sent to prison for fifteen years along with
three others for a bombing they had nothing to do with.  He was accused
of being a member of the IRA in that film and plays a former one in 'The
Boxer.'
Released from prison after 14 years for his actions within the IRA,
Daniel Day-Lewis stars as a boxer who returns to his former
neighbourhood in Belfast and opens a boxing gym and tries to bring peace
to the region by promoting boxing events that will unite Catholics and
Protestants in the entertaining spectacle of it all.  Some of his former
associates within the IRA object to his peace making efforts and
sabotage his actions by connecting them to further the cause of IRA
violence.  In one case a policeman's death is caused by a car bomb
outside the arena on the night of one Day-Lewis' boxing matches,
sparking riots and his boxing gym is burnt to the ground in the mayhem.
All the while this is happening, Day-Lewis is re-uniting with an old
flame (Emily Watson) whom he courted before he was sent away to prison.
She is the wife of an imprisoned IRA man and is raising a young son and
is caught between her feelings for Day-Lewis and he loyalty to marital
fidelity.
'The Boxer' works on many levels.  The film has an incredibly simple
tone and feel to it but is a powerful drama of spinning proportions.  It
has a slow beginning but is one of those films that's to be appreciated
once the entire thing is absorbed.  For a man released from
incarceration, Day-Lewis plays his role in a very low-key manner as a
man who knows he's wasted half his life and is determined to make the
most of things from now on.  There is a constant reference to many of
the character actors in the film who discuss IRA activities on a regular
basis and the secret meetings show dissent within the organization and
the eventual downfall of one of its members in a very violent fashion.
When Neil Jordan made 'The Crying Game' in 1992 to the release of Jim
Sheridan's 'In the Name of the Father' in 1993, there was a cease fire
declared within the IRA after that and although violence has flared up
once again in a few incidents, at least the release of those two films
and their messages of anti-violence caused some movement towards ending
the bloodshed.  Films CAN change things socially and politically.
An art film in every sense of the word, 'The Boxer' is a well-crafted
piece of film making, derived from social statements of the past,
relying on the future in which films like this will continue to thrive
within the community of film lovers who appreciate this sort of thing.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for On Golden Pond (1981)
Screen legend Henry Fonda passed away fifteen years ago in 1982 and in all
the time that has passed since his death, he will be remembered by many in
this generation for his last film which brought him his long awaited Academy
Award for Best Actor the year he died and that film is director Mark Rydell's
'On Golden Pond'.  At the 1982 Academy Awards celebrating the films of 1981
his daughter Jane (who herself retired from film acting in 1990 with 'Stanley
and Iris') accepted on his behalf and truly delivered moments of gracious
respect for her father and shared her father's feelings about the award and
his appreciation in winning it.  It is one of Oscar's finest moments in the
last two decades.  Nominated rarely at other previous times in his career,
most notably for Best Actor in 1940 for 'The Grapes of Wrath' and in 1957 as
co-producer of the year's Best Picture nominee '12 Angry Men', Fonda would
take his place in history as one of Hollywood's most easy going yet powerful
leading men. 
Set at a summer lakefront home in Maine, 'On Golden Pond' tells the story of
an elderly couple (Henry Fonda and Katharine Hepburn) who share time together
at their summer retreat and await a visit from their daughter (Jane Fonda)
who will join them in celebrating Henry Fonda's 80th birthday in the film.
 The relationship between the two Fondas in the film is a rocky one as she
refers to her father on a first name basis and brings along the man she will
marry (Dabney Coleman) and his young son (Doug McKeon).  The film is centred
primarily on the relationship between Henry Fonda and Doug McKeon as their 67
year age difference makes for an interesting and strangely compatible
character study.  
Based on the stage play by Ernest Thompson (for which he also won an Oscar
for Adapted Screenplay), 'On Golden Pond' features a strong and emotionally
balanced theme of a family struggling to restructure itself and finding a mix
of happiness and sentiment in the final analysis.  Katharine Hepburn won her
FOURTH Best Actress Oscar for 'On Golden Pond' and no other screen performer
has won as many and certainly not all of them in a leading category.  Ingrid
Bergman and Walter Brennan have three each (Bergman two for Best Actress and
one for Best Supporting Actress and Brennan all for Best Supporting Actor).
 Hepburn is as important to 'On Golden Pond' as anyone in the film and was
gladly not overlooked for this film as the heavy favourite to win the Oscar
that year was Meryl Streep for 'The French Lieutenant's Woman'.
Not much is written or has been remembered regarding this classic motion
picture but it is perfect family viewing not just for its entertainment value
but for its wholesome yet modern day take on values and feelings which at
first seem selfish but eventually become human.
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
Columbia Pictures was quite upset with Brad Pitt recently when Pitt made
statements to the media that 'The Devil's Own' was one of the worst
filmmaking experiences he had ever had.  Pitt later recanted those statements
but the cat was already out of the bag and while this motion picture isn't
really all that bad, it does have large plot holes and one dimensional
characterizations.
A terrorist in the IRA (Pitt) escapes justice in Northern Ireland in 1992
where he is hunted for the deaths of twenty four people.  The people he's
been involved in murdering are a combination of police officers and British
soldiers and Pitt flees to America where he makes connections to take up
residence with a family headed by Harrison Ford who is a New York City police
officer.  Pitt passes himself off as a landed immigrant with a construction
job to go to so the family never learns at first what the true objective of
his visit is.  His true objective while in New York is to purchase military
hardware, mostly missles from and arms dealer (Treat Williams).  Ford's
family is dragged into the chaos which erupts as Pitt becomes the target of
many of his enemies.
The movie's psychological profile of Pitt's involvement in terrorism stems
from the fact that as a boy of eight, he witnessed the murder of his father
by an intruding gun man one evening as his family was sitting down to dinner.
 Ford's character has an attack of conscience on two fronts.  One by helping
bring Pitt in to the authorities alive once Pitt's cover is blown and the
other involves Ford lying to protect his partner (Ruben Blades) who is being
investigated for shooting a robbery suspect in the back.  
Director Alan J. Pakula ('All the President's Men', 'Sophie's Choice',
'Consenting Adults') uses silence in many scenes to make the picture's
atmosphere more powerful without disruptive music or loud action sound.  Brad
Pitt and Harrison Ford have some good moments on film together but 'The
Devil's Own' lacks plot and character development wide enough for the movie
to justify its running time of almost two hours courtesy of screenwriters
David Aaron Cohen, Vincent Patrick and Kevin Jarre based on Jarre's story.
 It does have a convincing story about clandestine terrorism gone awry but
looks too much like the studio was trying to use big name stars to rake in
the dollars when stars of much less notoriety could have pulled it off.

Title
Review for China Syndrome, The (1979)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Propelled with no music score, the heart pounding drama of 'The China
Syndrome' carries the entire film.  For younger readers, in the spring
of 1979, on March 28 to be exact, at 4 a.m., a serious accident occurred
at the Three Mile Island nuclear facility in Pennsylvania, outside of
Harrisburg.  In today's day and age of electronic media where breaking
news is almost instant after a major event happens, the fury over this
fiasco would have been ferocious.  The public didn't need the electronic
media in 1979 in the well known forms of the Internet, modems, cell
phones or faxes because there was something else interesting to talk
about.  'The China Syndrome', starring Jack Lemmon, Jane Fonda and a
very fresh Michael Douglas, was released on March 16, just twelve days
before the actual nightmare in Pennsylvania.  Experts scoffed, critics
charged that the film was an unrealistic portrayal of a potentially
serious matter, comparing it to what they thought was the impossible
scenario painted in 'Dr Strangelove' where a U.S. general goes insane,
and on his own, launches a nuclear attack on the Soviet Union using an
alternative war plan.  It was, perhaps, one of the most under rated
controversies of all time in terms of timing a motion picture with an
actual occurrence.
I saw the film on my own and again one week later with relatives and
ended up seeing it a total of four times in the theatre and I own a
videotape of it which is well worn.  It's plot would make a great
episode of television's 'The X-Files' by working in some paranormal
phenomenon to subdue fans of the show, such as myself.  'The X-Files'
did a two-part episode in Season 4 based on the TWA Flight 800 tragedy
which took place in the summer of 1996.  I think the Three Mile Island
story was over shadowed somewhat by Russia's Chernobyl disaster in 1986
where a nuclear facility actually exploded and that incident was far
worse and had far reaching consequences for parts of the entire planet.
One of the reasons I'm writing this review is so that the memory of
Three Mile Island and Chernobyl will be activated in the minds of people
everywhere from time to time, whenever they log on to this review no
matter where they live in the world.
A veteran of two Academy awards and multiple nominations, Jack Lemmon
starred as a conscience stricken nuclear plant worker who, along with
others by his side, discovers that a serious accident may trigger an
even worse one later on.  When Lemmon is on the screen you don't care
about anything else that's happening, he's that good and he's the best
one in the film.
The setting is Southern California, in the Los Angeles area, where a
television news reporter (Jane Fonda) and a camera man (Michael Douglas)
are filming a documentary on the day to day activities of a nuclear
facility.  They are escorted by a public relations man who keeps them
informed and watches their every move, every step of the way.  The
television crew arrives at the room where Lemmon and his co-workers are
employed.  The t.v. people are on the above floor and witness the
accident mentioned in the above paragraph while looking through a glass
window, commonly found in factories, separating the clerical offices
from the other work stations.  Douglas secretly films the entire
accident through the glass and as he and Fonda arrive back at the
station, the unauthorized photography is a matter for serious debate
with their employer.  Douglas is furious that the station won't air the
footage, alleging a cover-up between the station and the executives at
the nuclear plant.
The investigation into the disaster is swift, relatively thorough but
misses something.  This troubles Lemmon, as he cannot accept the plant
being back in operation so soon.  At a loss of $500,000 a day to the
company that operates the facility, money seems to have a language all
its own.  That's not news.  What is fascinating about 'The China
Syndrome' is that it moves not only as a stirring drama, but as a well
placed thriller that is thought provoking and is undeniably
entertaining.  It looks so realistic as it moves from scene to scene and
its harrowing climax involving Lemmon's suspicions of danger actually
happening is comparable in feeling to the atmosphere experienced by a
multiple alarm fire or a military ambush.
The lacerating tragedy of the film is developed well from the start by
director James Bridges and by the script written by him and two others,
T.S. Cook and Mike Gray.  They all received an Oscar nomination for
their screenplay.  Lemmon and Fonda were nominated for Best Actor and
Actress, respectively, and I still say that Lemmon gave the best
performance of the five but lost to a deserving Dustin Hoffman in
'Kramer vs. Kramer'.  Lemmon was still more deserving.  If he had more
screen time in the film then I believe he would have won.  Compounded
with the fact that Lemmon had won before for Best Supporting Actor in
1955 for 'Mister Roberts' and in 1973 as Best Actor in 'Save the Tiger',
his defeat was more understandable but not necessarily excusable.
Lemmon's penchant for playing good guys made his portrayal of a decent
man getting stiffed all the more powerful.  Jane Fonda and Michael
Douglas shine strongly in their roles and if Michael Douglas were more
well known to movie audiences in 1979, he might have received a Best
Supporting Actor nomination but Douglas did win in 1987 as Best ACTOR in
'Wall Street'.  Jane Fonda had also won twice before being nominated in
this film.  She won in 1971 for 'Klute' as Best Actress and in 1978 in
the same category for 'Coming Home'.  In my opinion, 'The China
Syndrome' should have received a whole fistful of Oscar nominations in
such categories as Best Picture, Director for James Bridges and several
technical categories but it never happened.  I suppose the film will
have to live on without peer recognition but audience recognition can be
just as significant.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for BASEketball (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
The only thing that's worse than viewing a really bad movie is seeing a
really bad movie that actually HAD potential.  I love movies that take
cynical and sarcastic jabs at all the things that make most of us
angry.  Recent high school graduates signing NBA contracts in the 100
million dollar range which they don't deserve because they haven't
proven themselves in the big leagues.  Teams switching cities,
disregarding fan loyalty even though their profits are substantial.
Sports stadiums and arenas given corporate names and plastering their
marketing strategy in people's faces until their exhausted and the way
some sports, like hockey, disregard rules in favour of dirty play.
'Baseketball' makes fun of all these things but loses sight of the fact
that gross-out gags can only carry a movie so far.
Trey Parker and Matt Stone, the creators of television's 'South Park',
star as two social misfits who, while at a party one night in the
suburbs, invent a game in the driveway of their hostess and later call
in baseketball.  A cross of course between baseball and basketball that
in reality looks pretty boring.  Like strikeout in baseball, the idea to
retire you opponent in baseketball is the 'psyche' out where you
mentally tease members of the other team to distract them from doing
their job.  I was sick of the game of baseketball after the second or
third scene involving it.  The game grows in popularity slowly until a
billionaire (Ernest Borgnine) wants to take the game professional.  Five
years pass and the game is so popular that it ranks up there with the
other major sports and arenas are packed with fans and Bob Costas and Al
Michaels, two of America's best sports broadcasters, are the chief
announcers for the Milwaukee Beers, the name of the team that Parker and
Stone play for.
One tasteless scene makes fun of the fact that Borgnine, the owner of
the Beers, chokes on a hot dog at the championship game and dies and the
Beers lose.  At the reading of the will, Parker is given majority
control of the team but if the team loses the championship next year,
controlling interest reverts to Borgnine's widow (Jenny McCarthy).  Gee,
like that doesn't give away the ending.  Don't blame me.  I'm saving you
money by telling you that the movie makes this obvious, predictable, and
you've seen it all before.  McCarthy is pursued by the villainous owner
(Robert Vaughn) of the Dallas Felons (can you guess what team they're
making fun of here?) who tries to get close to her and take over the
team himself.  Parker and Stone both fall for a beautiful humanitarian
(Yasmine Bleeth) who runs one of those programs for underprivileged
children.
The creators of 'The Naked Gun' and 'Airplane!' series are responsible
for this mess of a movie that doesn't have the first clue where to draw
the line, keep its ideas fresh or be entertaining and convincing without
using crude humour. I found Parker and Stone completely untalented in
this film.  How can two guys who make such a sharp and funny show like
'South Park' miss the mark by so much here?  Director David Zucker lets
every joke fall flat and 'Baseketball' will only appeal to the dirty
minded adult and the care free mind of pre teens.  How about something
for the rest of us?
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
A children's tour group is shuffled through an air traffic control center
and while the tour guide is trying to make his usual informative speech, one
nerdy little kid observes that air traffic controllers have one of the
highest stress jobs imaginable.  Describing the job that leads many of them
to become alcoholics, insomniacs, nervous wrecks, air traffic controller
Nick Falzone (John Cusack) says: "You forgot suicide, kid".  Suicide in this
line of work doesn't just mean the loss of life.  There are many ways to die
in this job.  Three mistakes in two and a half years by allowing planes to
come too close to each other on your radar screen means your job is killed.
Having an affair with a colleague's wife can mean the death of your
marriage.  And remaining in the building when a bomb threat becomes a
serious threat can indeed kill you.
What makes 'Pushing Tin' work so well the way it does is that the film is
layered with many whimsical anecdotes and makes a tediously old story of
marital infidelity seem fresh and alive with short controlled burst of
laughter rather than genuine belly laughs.
Nick's fellow colleagues in the air traffic control business are the kind of
people you want to socialize with.  They keep a sense of humour about
themselves during the most stressful points on the job.  They often place
bets on a colleagues performance and frantically exchange the money between
themselves when the payoff comes.  They often get together for barbecues,
play pool and drink while toasting to their job which, believe it or not, is
a real marvel.  An observation made in the film is that an air traffic
controller is responsible for more lives in one day on the job than a
surgeon is for his entire career.  The story is set around the New York City
area where three airports, JFK, LaGuardia and Newark International are all
within twenty miles of one another.  Incidents involving planes flying too
close to one another appear to be a regular thing if you believe the display
of events in this film.  I'm sure this will cause a lot of talk among
aviation analysts, the general public and air traffic controllers themselves
as well as the Federal Aviation Administration as to just how accurate this
information is.
Nick seems to be a happily married man.  His wife Connie (Cate Blanchett -
Oscar nominee from 'Elizabeth') is a loving wife and they have two kids.
Their lives are turned upside down by the arrival of Russell Bell (Billy Bob
Thornton) and his sex pot wife Mary (Angelina Jolie).  Russell is a
colleague of Nick's who has worked as an air traffic controller in many
locations around the U.S. and Nick has a one night stand with Mary while
Connie says she slept with Russell although we don't know if this ever
happened since we don't see it.
What makes the film work is that many of the scenes involving infidelity and
the talk surrounding it have many injections of off beat humour that are
appealing and director Mike Newell ('Donnie Brasco'), directs 'Pushing Tin'
in the same manner he did with 'Four Weddings and a Funeral'.  There is a
zany but realistic flare emphasized in the film's comic moments and pushing
tin is a slang expression which refers to the job an air traffic controller
has of directing huge aircraft safely through the skies of the world's most
hectic city.
The strikingly original screenplay is by Glen Charles and Les Charles based
on an article by Darcy Frey entitled 'Something's Got to Give').  The film's
score is also very entertaining and is by Oscar winner Anne Dudley ('The
Full Monty').
What's most interesting about this film is the excellent performance of John
Cusack.  Cusack has denied himself the opportunity to become a huge star
like Tom Cruise, Mel Gibson and Harrison Ford.  A group he can easily fit
into but he has instead purposely opted for the quirky and off beat roles
he's enjoyed and is one of the best actors out there.  But more than that is
the bizarre, and at times hilarious performance of Billy Bob Thornton.  He
has made a habit of playing bizarre and unorthodox characters in 'Sling
Blade' and 'A Simple Plan'.  And if you liked him in those films, don't miss
'Pushing Tin'.  His character in this film enjoys mind games, sleeping
through possible traffic accidents where he may be a victim, shooting hoops
without missing very often, and standing under 747's as they fly over his
head upon landing on runways and the concussion of the plane's sweeping
force lifts him off his feet and hurls him many feet into nearby fields
where he laughs his head off upon hitting the ground.  He reminds you off a
circus performer and free spirit at the same time.  All in keeping with the
film's general theme which is a balanced and totally redeemable comedy for
adults.  You may not want to fly for a while after seeing the movie as it
plays on the paranoia of air travel the way 'Jaws' played on the paranoia of
going swimming in the ocean.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
I hate America Online.  But that won't influence my decision to give
this movie the review it deserves, a good one.  Having had an account
with America Online for almost two years, it would have been nice to get
mail from MY one true love, found in one of their usually FULL chat
rooms.  That's assuming, of course, that she's out there.  Instead, what
I got most of all from AOL in my mail was spam.  For those of you that
don't know what that is, it refers to junk mail online.  Jean Stapleton
appears in this film and has a great line that deserves immortality.
Someone asks her if she's ever had cyber sex and she replies: "I tried
to once but all I got was a busy signal."  I love that line.  I am a
user of high bandwidth.  I just discarded the soon to become obsolete
telephone modem for a cable modem so I chuckled a bit when I saw the
dial-up system in this movie.  AOL is the match maker for the two lead
stars in this wonderfully refreshing comedy that plays out somewhat like
a Woody Allen movie in parts with its background score and observations
on diverse personalities who would only fit in in NYC because for some
people in this film, no one else in the world would tolerate them.
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan fall in love over the Internet in 'You've Got
Mail', the film that re-teams them with Nora Ephron who wrote and
directed 'Sleepless in Seattle' in 1993 which also featured Hanks and
Ryan.  This is an innocuous romantic comedy of the best kind.  It
doesn't feature any four letter words or people jumping into the sack at
a moment's notice, not that there's anything wrong with doing that in
movies if the situations and/or character development calls for it, but
it's nice to see a refreshing change here.  It's a movie you can not
only take your sweetheart to see but your mother and grandmother as
well.
Meg Ryan plays a book shop owner who inherited her store from her mother
after she died and runs it with close sentimentality and has a small
number of employees working for her and chief among them are Jean
Stapleton and Steve Zahn.  The bookstore is her life and not a bad one
at that as we discover in the film that she brings in about $350,000 a
year doing it.  Unfortunately, a super store is opening just up the
street, offering discounts, unlimited reading time for customers to
browse and other incentives that will put her small business out in the
cold.  It's chiefly run by Tom Hanks who shares the business with his
filthy rich father (Dabney Coleman) and Hanks is also in a relationship
with a woman whom he really can't stand.  Ryan's love interest (Greg
Kinnear), is a self made phony.  The philosopher type who thinks he
knows what makes people happy.
It just so happens that Hanks and Ryan, from the beginning of the film,
before we find out anything about them, exchange e-mail and slowly fall
in love with each other with predictable but pleasant and entertaining
results.  Not knowing that they are business rivals through their e-mail
and chats online makes you look forward to how their conflicts will be
resolved when or if they find out about each other.
What I liked most of all in this film is the way Meg Ryan's character
comes into fruition.  She's the best thing in the movie and while she
deserved Oscar nominations for her work in 'When Harry Met Sally',
'Sleepless in Seattle' and 'Courage Under Fire', she never got one.  I
hope she gets nominated for this movie.  Tom Hanks plays his part very
well and doesn't lose to Ryan by much and while his character can be
perceived as a villain to some extent, his character grows on you and
you find out that he's really a decent guy.  Not original but extremely
pleasant, 'You've Got Mail' reaches out and does exactly what the
Internet does: it touches people on a global level and with that much
variety, there's no excuse for not finding YOUR true love.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
It's a tired statement but it sticks.  1997 has been such a bad year
involving big budget films that have fallen flat on their faces that an
entertaining film made for scale such as 'The Full Monty' is a certified
comedy gem with some important dramatic overtones.  What is so striking about
this film is that it's nothing like you would excpect.  It's about male
strippers but contains absolutely nothing of a sexually provocative nature.
Set in England, it's basically about six men who find work as exotic dancers
and the story builds to the climactic scene which asks 'Will they or won't
they'?  Take it all off, that is.  It centres primarily on three leads,
Robert Carlyle (Begbie from 'Trainspotting') Tom Wilkinson ('Priest') and
Mark Addy.  The three of them used to work together in the steel industry but
are now unemployed looking to improve their lives.  What's interesting is
that Carlyle and Addy are best friends and Wilkinson used to be their boss so
they now must come to terms that they're all in the same boat sometimes
rocking it a little too hard.
The comedy is leisurely presented and the movie contains the type of shrewd
wit often desired but hardly ever seen.  The rehearsal scenes in preparation
for the big show are hilarious as the men don't have an ounce of go-go
ability and the physical comedy is presented perfectly as a well timed string
of gags.  But along the way 'The Full Monty' does more than that.  It also
combines the main story with some touching moments of reality involving
Carlyle's struggle in presenting himself as a role model to his young son who
finds the growing pains in a life of borderline poverty more than a struggle.
Director Peter Cattaneo illustrates his movie by slowly drawing the audience
in to a film which has excellent character development, medium pacing and a
genuinely good nature to it.  See it with friends.  It is an audience picture
that like a good television sitcom, sells better with a natural laugh track.

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
The team who brought us 'A Fish Called Wanda' in 1988 re-team for 'Fierce
Creatures.'  There is an old saying in life which is "You can't go home
again."  That was never more true than with the production of 'Fierce
Creatures.' John Cleese, Jamie Lee Curtis, Kevin Kline and Michael Palin
return in a film that has nothing to do with 'A Fish Called Wanda' but
perhaps it should have.  A sequel would have been a far more interesting
concept than this plotline.  A multi-billionaire (Kevin Kline) who is truly
a hard edged businessman/rascal employs his son (also played by Kevin
Kline)to travel from Atlanta to merry old England to investigate the
corporate restructuring of a zoo run by a bumbling but well meaning chap
(John Cleese).  Along for the ride is Jamie Lee Curtis to assist in the
investigation and rounding out the cast is Michael Palin as a zoo employee
who is key to the film's bizarre climax.  Putting it plainly, 'Fierce
Creatures' is a disaster not so much because of what it's about but because
it tries to capture the same level of humour as 'A Fish Called Wanda' did.
The personalities of the characters in this movie are similar in nature to
'Wanda' and some of the scenes are downright copycats of that film.  The
jokes and the physical gags are surprisingly flat and the movie is abruptly
immature at the wrong moments and the word that comes to mind to sum it all
up is 'phony'.  Even more preposterous is the fact that it took two men to
direct this farcical mess (Robert Young and Fred Schepisi)and John Cleese is
aided in the screenplay by Iain Johnstone.  Producer Michael Shamberg should
have recognized that this film wouldn't work and even if you've never seen
'A Fish Called Wanda' you still will recognize the flaws that make this
production superficial and self-serving.

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
I'm puzzled by the fact that in 1998 the American Film Institute rated the
original 'Jaws' from 1975 #48 on its all time list.  Don't misunderstand.
The ratings were not based just on being the BEST in the minds of those who
rated the list of films involved but included the movies with the biggest
historical impact and cultural significance.  Having gotten that out of the
way, why was 1952's 'Singing in the Rain' #10 all time when the musical in
this day and age has practically dried up and vanished yet we still have
predatory films laced with thrills and humour the way 'Jaws' portrayed its
subject matter.  Heck, in 'Lake Placid' a human head even pops out at you
the way one did from the bottom of the boat in 'Jaws'.
In today's surroundings, you can certainly make a film with gritty special
effects that look realistic enough.  This seems understood already but look
at 1997's 'Anaconda', a film with horribly digitized special effects where
the crop marks on the giant snake stood out so much that you could
practically feel them if you touched the movie screen.  Things have been
cleaned up a lot here.
'Lake Placid' is directed by Steve Miner ('Friday the 13th 2+3').  Miner
tastefully edits his picture here so that the gore is generally quick like a
lightening bolt (perhaps a wee bit longer than that) but he stretches out
the laughs to overlap any squeamish feeling audiences may have about all the
blood and guts.
'Lake Placid' is an end of the century 'Jaws' rip-off in an endearing sort
of way, and the material is dumbfounded and irreverent entertainment that
somehow works.  I suppose you could argue that 83 minutes isn't enough to
justify a ticket price of nearly ten dollars but you will get several laughs
to soften the blow and many of you will like the film's strange brew of
different ingredients.
The film begins in Maine as a small town sheriff named Hank Keough (Brendan
Gleeson) and a diver are out on a black coloured lake and the diver gets
bitten in half below the waist and the investigation begins!  This film has
nothing to do with Lake Placid, New York.  The title is irreverent as they
joke that they wanted to give the lake in question that name but it was
already taken.  A game warden, Jack Wells (Bill Pullman) is called in from
the local area as is paleontologist Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda) from New
York City.  They are later joined by Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt) who is a
mythology professor who likes and worships the presence of crocodiles.  His
character is thrown into the mix for comic relief and is similar to the Matt
Hooper character portrayed in 'Jaws' by Richard Dreyfuss as the shark
expert.
In typical 'Jaws' like fashion, the crocodile isn't seen right away but much
later on in the film and there isn't much of an explanation as to how one
identified to have Asian origins could end up in a lake in New England.
Despite the gaps in logic, there is plenty of off beat and original humour
penned by David E. Kelley of television's 'The Practice' and Ally McBeal.
One of his characters includes a potty-mouthed Betty White.  Yes, that's
right.  Betty White of 'The Mary Tyler Moore Show' and 'The Golden Girls'.
She plays a widow living on the lake who sort of treats the croc to free
meals made of full living cows and her now deceased husband?
A 30-foot crocodile may seem like a stretch (no pun intended) to believe
they could exist in the type of places they do in this picture but if you
want a good scary picture a bit more effective, look for 1980's 'Alligator'
as it is better and uses Chicago as its setting where a bigger population is
threatened that seems more exciting but 'Lake Placid' is still that form of
entertainment where the 'boing' sound would have matched its goofy but
effective scenes.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
One thing I found disappointing in 1973's 'The Exorcist', is that
despite its tremendous entertainment value, it exploited the premise of
demonic possession without telling you much about it.  It made up for
this flaw by showcasing an absolutely blistering climax as two priests
try and rid Satan from the body of a little girl.  William Peter Blatty
did win an Oscar for his adapted screenplay, based on the book, so he
must have done something right.
'Fallen' has a similar problem but can't touch the classic stature of a
film like 'The Exorcist' by any stretch of the imagination.  It's
premise of soul transformation is an intriguing one but it has no line
of explaining the history or theological origins traced to the heart of
its story.
Denzel Washington is always impressive (has he ever made a truly awful
movie?)  All right, I'll give you 'Heart Condition' (1990) and maybe
'Ricochet' (1991) but the Oscar winning actor always finds the right
style even in films that are mediocre.
Washington stars as a California detective who pays a final visit to a
convicted felon he help capture (Elias Koteas) who is about to be
executed and deep down, Washington relishes the fact that the low life
is about to succumb to the lethal forces of the gas chamber and Koteas
tries to make final contact with Washington by attempting to shake hands
with him.
Upon execution, Koteas sings a familiar song just before which comes
back to haunt Washington later in the film along with other
characteristics of the criminal's behaviour.
Unusual occurrences begin to surface as a series of murders occur in the
city and Washington finds a familiar pattern to it all.  People begin
confronting him and sing the song that Koteas sang at his execution and
this drums up suspicions that the killer's soul is being transferred
into the bodies of innocent people.  It seems that the soul can change
bodies at will upon the act of a simple touch by one person to another
and the movie can't escape the fact that anything that routine is simply
not a believable premise for a movie.  The movie spends virtually its
entire first hour doing this and becomes tedious after the first 45
minutes.
Washington seeks advice from a theologian (Embeth Davidtz) and is
dealing with his partner (John Goodman) through all of this and the
skeptical tone of his boss (Donald Sutherland).  Goodman and Sutherland
are instrumental in the film's final resolution which the audience can
see coming a mile away.
Director Gregory Hoblit ('Primal Fear') uses repetitive pseudo slow
motion shots that stretch and skew across the movie screen in a deeply
coloured and grainy manner as a way of showing the perception of evil
and I found it to be a tiresome and gruesome trick that was over used
and reminiscent of a Brian DePalma film.
Writer Nicholas Kazan ('Reversal of Fortune'), has penned a shallow and
unimaginative film of wannabe gothic proportions and instead of coming
up with a story that should have characters we care about, it fails
because it doesn't showcase an acceptable form of depth and therefore
contains a story we ultimately care nothing about.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
The only thing worse than a bad sequel is a bad remake.  Bad remakes are
worse because they lower the integrity of the original film somewhat and
if anyone ever tries to remake 'Citizen Kane', 'The Godfather' or 'Star
Wars' they will certainly fail.  A remake of the 1968 film 'The Thomas
Crown Affair' directed by Norman Jewison probably sounded like a good
idea at the time but who knew things could go so wrong.
The original starred Steve McQueen and Faye Dunaway and this remake is
with Pierce Brosnan and Rene Russo.  Brosnan is a corporate big shot
named Thomas Crown in New York City who has a passion for antique
paintings.  He also likes to steal them.  Not for the cash but for the
sheer pleasure of having them hang in his home.  His latest fancy is a
painting worth one hundred million dollars.  After scooping it up, he
becomes the prime suspect of an investigation headed by an insurance
investigator named Catherine Banning (Rene Russo) and she works with the
NYC police department who, at first, refuse to believe he is a suspect
in the crime.
'The Thomas Crown Affair' takes a familiar path into the silly and
downright unbelievable as it makes Crown the only intelligent man in the
film and Russo is the only other person in the film with similar
intelligence.  All the other characters in the film, the police, the
museum security and anyone else involved in the case are made to look
like bumbling idiots who can't do anything right.  To further bother the
frequent movie goer, the film has Banning falling for the man she's
supposed to be investigating.  Whether or not a remake should
incorporate things found in the original is beside the point.  
I have always found John McTiernan to be a director better suited to
action films than anything else.  Having done the first and third
installments in the 'Die Hard' trilogy along with 'Predator' made
McTiernan a formidable director of action.  He is not suited for
dialogue layered pictures where interaction and sub text are needed. 
His films become shallow in this regard.  McTiernan tries to inject a
little antic he used in 'Die Hard'.  There's a scene in 'The Thomas
Crown Affair' where he has Brosnan use those little explosive hockey
puck devices that explode and create lots of smoke that develop a
diversion to the scene.  
One thing that really bothered me about 'The Thomas Crown Affair' was
the downright staging of the whole thing.  Getting actors to say their
lines in a convincing way is not easy and it's made even more
complicated by the fact that it doesn't help to mumble.  Have you ever
seen those programs about "The Making Of" a certain film where you see
the actors on the set talking between takes --- either to each other or
to the audience and there is a lot of noise around that drowns out what
they're saying so it isn't totally clear?  That's a large part of this
film and many of the scenes look as if they've been done with only a
couple of takes.  
Pierce Brosnan is one of those actors who's only tailor made for a
certain role and his latest attempts at portraying 007 James Bond have
been good ones but his attempts at anything else have been mediocre at
best.  Rene Russo has also been bitten somewhat by the stereotype bug. 
After turns in two 'Lethal Weapon' films and a stint as a secret service
agent in 'In the Line of Fire' in 1993, not to mention starring opposite
a primate in 'Buddy' have given her few qualifications to star in a
remake of a classic motion picture.  Maybe she and Brosnan should do a
sequel to 'The Blue Lagoon'.  It couldn't be much worse than this film.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Prizzi's Honor (1985)
Director John Huston who died in shortly after making this film was a master
of story telling.  There was always a hint of conservative ambience detailing
his films and for a man who started in the 1940's and made movies for over
four decades, he certainly was the right man for the very dark and off beat
mob comedy, 'Prizzi's Honor' (1985).  It ranks as a superlative look at a
fictional New York City crime family and is based on Richard Condon's best
selling novel.  
The film opens in charismatic style at a wedding and each of the main
characters is visually profiled.  There is the ever unpredictable Jack
Nicholson as a hit man for the Prizzi family and the other main characters in
the film include Kathleen Turner as the woman he would fall in love with and
who turns out to be more than he bargained for.  Others are William Hickey as
the family boss who personifies the devil in his gripping visual style of
acting. Lee Richardson and Robert Loggia as his sons, John Randolph as
Nicholson's father and best friend to Hickey and Anjelica Huston (daughter of
director Huston and winner of the Best Supporting Actress Oscar for this
film) as the Prizzi family's mafia princess and a former lover of Nicholson's
in the film.
Nicholson is love struck at the wedding as he glimpses Turner for the first
time and tries to track her down and they eventually consumate their
relationship by marrying and it turns out that while Nicholson is a slow
witted hit man, she's a quick witted hit woman!  This of course causes
problems in their relationship as she becomes embroiled in deceiving the
Prizzi family and is offered a contract to rub out Nicholson.  The outrageous
twists that this film offers are too numerous to mention and 'Prizzi's Honor'
also serves as a cleverly inter woven and well plotted film which never loses
its focus in the important moments and has one more goody up its sleeve just
when you think things are ready to settle down.
If you haven't seen 'Prizzi's Honor' it's real treat and is perfect for home
video viewing and is recommended for adult viewing for its mature theme.
It's one of Nicholson's most pleasantly menacing performances.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Rather than making sharp independent productions with a low budget and high
degree of skill like his 1994 comeback 'Pulp Fiction', John Travolta has
chosen to embrace the big studio system of commercial enterprise and has
only made two great movies since 'Pulp Fiction' and they are 1995's 'Get
Shorty' and 'Primary Colors' in 1998 for which he should have received an
Oscar nomination.
Travolta's latest disappointment is directed by Simon West ('Con Air) 'who
has a dim eye for supporting characters in this film and structures his
movie like a darkly trimmed and photographed structure of shadows that you
would expect to find in a Tony Scott movie.  In fact, you could throw out
many of the supporting players in this flick with big names like James
Woods, James Cromwell and Timothy Hutton and replace them with minimum wage
actors and you couldn't tell the difference.  The only thing that is worse
than this muddled scenario is that the film's two leads (John Travolta and
Madeline Stowe) don't have distinct sides to their personality and rather
than look like investigators getting deep inside a murder case, they look
more like chess players simply going through the moves.
Getting involved in the plot of 'The General's Daughter' is like meeting an
old acquaintance somewhere in public that you weren't very fond of.  You
want to keep the encounter brief, you want to go on your way as soon as
possible and you want to forget about it as soon as possible.  Getting
involved with this film's characters is like attending an open seminar at a
large banquet centre where a business meeting is going on.  You smile
politely at others, you never get to know them and you'll be glad when it's
all over.
With a screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and the masterful William Goldman
(a major bust here), based on the novel by Nelson DeMille, 'The General's
Daughter' attempts to cover familiar ground with a conclusion you won't care
about and you won't want to tell others about it after you've seen the film
with any great anticipation.
Travolta and Stowe play Paul Brenner and Sarah Sunhill.  One is a warrant
officer and the other a rape investigator who look into the matter of a
young female army captain named Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie Stefanson) who
has been murdered.  Throughout the course of the investigation, they uncover
many potential suspects, including the one they think is the most likely to
have committed the crime, Colonel Moore (James Woods).  There is even the
suspicion that the general may have been the one responsible for his
daughter's death with a high agenda for national political office and a
cover-up that will save his chances at getting elected.  It wouldn't make a
difference if I did give away the ending because chances are you won't care
about it.  Remember 1992's 'The Bodyguard' where the assassin was actually a
minor character that was given little or no focus in the film.......ditto
here and that still gives nothing away because there are so many of them in
'The General's Daughter'.
Strangely, I felt that 'The General's Daughter' had a look and feel to it
similar to 1990's 'Presumed Innocent'.  The characters in that film, such as
the prosecutors, the defence attorney and the wife of the accused were
important but underwritten characters.  Here, the same thing happens with
the film's key players and the film has some rather goofy and amateur
dialogue and situations where the characters think they're impressing those
around them with their intelligence when in fact it's really synthetic and
too obvious.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Home Alone 3 (1997)
     The amusing thing about a sequel to a sequel is that the formula
usually wears off by the time you get to it.  As I was watching 'Home Alone
3' I was surprised at how much charm it had and the harmless fun of a family
film had struck the kid in me.  Macaulay Culkin, Joe Pesci and Daniel Stern
are nowhere to be found in this movie and this one has no connection in
relation to the previous two films.  Although set in a wealthy neighbourhood
in a Chicago suburb like the first two chapters, this third chapter to the
series offers a plot with international intrigue.
     A computer chip vital to the development of U.S. Air Force technology
has the potential of falling into the wrong hands and miraculously, the chip
falls into the innocent hands of a little boy (Alex D. Linz) who doesn't
know what he has until late in the movie.  Four  criminals working to
smuggle the chip to the eventual buyer trace its whereabouts to Linz's
neighbourhood and come in direct contact with his house and the attempted
recovery of the chip is under way.  Naturally, you can guess the rest.
Booby traps abound as Linz sets the usual pratfalls in motion complete with
dispensing as much pain as the villains deserve.
     Some scenes are obviously a flagrant misconception of how things work.
There's a scene where an FBI field office in another city finds out that the
chip may be in Chicago and they leave on the first plane out.  Uh, why not
make a simple phone call to the Chicago office and let them take over.
Since no one believes Linz in his claim of burglars searching the homes in
the neighbourhood, he straps a video camera to his remote controlled truck
toy and catches the burglars red handed and the truck does things in motion
that are totally unbelievable.  It pushes open a steel gate, runs over a
person and jumps across an alley in daredevil style.  Kids will love it but
adults less cynical of breaking suspension of disbelief rules in the name of
making children laugh will enjoy genuine laughs and overlook the flaws.
     Scripted by John Hughes who wrote and directed the first two and
directed by Raja Gosnell who served as editor on the first two films, the
two of them collaborate here for an installment in the series that hopefully
will be the last one and they should quit while they're ahead and not push
their luck too far.  They got away with this copy cat of the first two films
but manage to make it work based on the charm of a new child hero so
likable, you'll want to take him home with you after the movie.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
'Hard Eight' and 'Boogie Nights'.  1996 and 1997 were good years for
director Paul Thomas Anderson.  Two films that established him as a hard
boiled and progressive film maker.  His influential style, that of a young
Robert Altman, was breath taking to behold.  Particularly 'Boogie Nights'.
A film which spanned six years and gave us an evenly balanced look at
several characterizations and the film knew where its high points and low
points were.  The decibel level was right on the money.  My, how things
change.  'Magnolia' is an over stuffed stinker that reeks with pretentious
situations and over written scenes of ulcerating ugliness.  It does this
from its opening scene and tries to explain that co-incidence and
unlikeliness are the most bizarre facts of life
The most depressing film I've ever seen is 1998's 'Affliction'.  Superb
acting from all (including James Coburn's Oscar win for Best Supporting
Actor) but the film had a strange and curious path of familiarity for many
families and the picture concentrated itself on the actions of only a few
major characters.  I said in my review that while being truthful, that
didn't seem to matter much because the overall purpose of film is to
entertain and I questioned the entertainment value of such a film and a
similarly depressing film from 1998 entitled 'A Simple Plan' which suffered
from the same fate and while  recommending that film, I like it less and
less the more I think about it.  I had to debate for almost a week and
finally gave 'Affliction' a marginal recommendation for its stain of genuine
emotional truth.
'Magnolia' also makes the mistake of trying to bombard the screen with too
much over the top material that it loses track of its entertainment value.
The film is like being grabbed by an octopus and pulled in so many
directions that you're exhausted after finally escaping, the equivalent of
leaving the theatre for movie goers.  Leaving 'Magnolia' is indeed an escape
rather than a departure.  The film's glib symmetry will be mistaken by some
as high powered drama but it suffers from an ending which goes against the
first rule of screen writing.  I call it the 'red herring' factor.  A final
scene that is out of left field with no warning given to the audience and is
a ridiculous and cheap way to end all it thinks its accomplished.
The story is an ensemble piece that shows the lives of about a dozen
characters, some of whom aren't worth mentioning because their scenes are so
one dimensional.  Senior to the film is Jason Robards, a dying man named
Earl Partridge who is trying to contact his long lost son Frank (Tom Cruise)
who has changed his last name to Mackey and wants nothing to do with the
dying spirit of his father after being contacted by Earl's home care worker
(Philip Seymour Hoffman).  Frank Mackey is a kind of manipulative
motivational speaker.  He tries to expand other men's horizons in the sexual
universe by telling them what sex really is and how to use it to get members
of the opposite gender to fall immediately for them.  His seminars come
complete with a spotlight, head set microphone and flashy wardrobe.  Some
good work here by Cruise, but I hope the members of the Academy don't give
him an Oscar for it.  If they do, it will be in part, a sympathy vote to
compensate Cruise for the ridiculous amount of time he spent making 'Eyes
Wide Shut'.  Sure, a great film in the end and one of the best of 1999 but a
film that could have been made in only a few months.  Earl Partridge is also
filled with regret for marrying an uncaring and unloving woman named Linda
(Julianne Moore).  A neurotic, maniacal female who hates her step son Frank.
Meet Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall).  He is the host of a game show where a
group of kids on one side, take on a group of adults on the other and all
the trappings of the game show world are explored in such a manner as to
leave the most foul taste in your mouth after it's all over.  Jimmy is dying
and only has a couple of months left to live and tries to make amends with
his wife (Melinda Dillon) and his drug addicted daughter (Melora Walters),
who is about to warm up to a police officer (John C. Reilly).  Then there is
the most boring of the stories involving a former child genius (William H.
Macy) as a loser who works at a job he is too overqualified for.  Was
William H. Macy trying to top himself by playing a loser similar to the one
he played in his Oscar nominated role in 'Fargo'.  You won't top that one,
Billy!
What is most shocking about 'Magnolia' is how it uses its music score.  The
music literally goes on for so long that it obliterates the senses and
doesn't know when to quit.  The audience I saw it with was stone faced
throughout its ridiculous running time of three hours and gasps of shock and
disbelief hit the auditorium during the unlikely climax.  What little there
is to rave about in some of the performances, notably Cruise and Reilly, is
drowned out by a protracted chemistry among its cast and is comparable to
having one of your teeth pulled without anesthetic and then needing all of
your teeth removed because your dentist fouled up.  In other words, the film
sets off a chain reaction of dreariness you won't recover from anytime soon
and you won't even care about its characters when it's all said and done.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
Based on the Vanity Fair article 'The Man Who Knew Too Much' by Marie
Brenner, director Michael Mann's 'The Insider' is not so much a film which
is anti-tobacco as it is pro-truth.  Mann's ability to diversify himself as
a film maker continues to impress me.  From his little known 'Thief' in
1981, to his Oscar winning period piece effort 'The Last of the Mohicans' in
1992 to his soulful examination of crime with 1995's 'Heat', Mann always
finds a laid back style mixed with a textured style of great visuals and an
under lying theme of violence, or at least a reference to it (always
tastefully portrayed) is found in his work.  Mann teams up with the Oscar
winning writer of 'Forrest Gump', Eric Roth to bring a broadened approach to
a very serious issue which may be the most serious legal entanglement ever
to engulf the United States.  I'm talking, of course, about the law suits
that many states have filed against the tobacco industry, citing them for
selling a knowingly dangerous and addictive product which has cost many
health care programs billions of dollars.  What 'The Insider' does is it
makes you think about the ethics involved in pursuing the truth, no matter
what the cost.
Based on a true story, 'The Insider' is about a former tobacco company
executive and a producer from t.v.'s '60 Minutes' who collaborate to tell
millions the truth about the way cigarettes are allegedly tampered with to
increase a person's desire for them.  Dr. Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe) is
the conscience-stricken former tobacco executive who wants to blow the
whistle on his former employer and teams up with Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino),
a top producer for '60 Minutes' who works closely with legendary anchor Mike
Wallace (Christopher Plummer).
As the story unfolds, we see that Wigand signed a document of
confidentiality, stating that he would never reveal to outside sources the
details of his job.  He eventually balks at this and feels that he has a
greater responsibility to the public.  His life then begins to fall apart.
As he makes progress in bringing what he knows to the public, he finds a
bullet in his mailbox, an e-mail is sent to his house threatening to kill
him and every member of his family and his wife leaves him.  At least he is
able to find work as a high school teacher after being fired from his old
job with big tobacco.
What really makes 'The Insider' work is the way it tries to tackle the
subject of media ethics.  As it is based on a true story, there is a
detailed breakdown of the struggles, arguments and wrangling over what
content is suitable to air and what footage may land CBS' '60 Minutes' in
some serious hot water.  Bergman produces the segment with Wallace as the
host, interviewing Wigand and making allegations against big tobacco as the
film becomes more and more absorbing.
The film also does something very clever.  It never tries to match its two
leading stars against each other in an effort or given opportunity to
upstage one another.  The first half of the film is primarily about Wigand's
dilemma and the second half tells the story of Bergman and Wallace and how
they are at odds during the whole story.
Russell Crowe, who was born in New Zealand, gave a brilliant and hard boiled
performance as the tough cop in 'L.A. Confidential' and mastered an American
accent extremely well.  He makes good on that again with his portrayal of
Wigand using a New York accent which he nails down to perfection.  Pacino,
my all time favourite actor, gives a straight forward performance as the
veteran producer who oozes decency.  He cares about his sources and goes
to bat for them each and every time.
At a running time of over two and a half hours, Michael Mann uses every
minute to properly tell his story of one of this generations greatest
injustices.  There is a time during the film where a lot is said about
Jeffrey Wigand's flaws that perhaps question, if not, damage, his
credibility as a witness to his former employer's dealings.  Balance is the
key with this film that strives not only to inform but enlighten an audience
in a conventional yet powerful manner.  An extraordinary combination
and Oscar nominations for some may be involved.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
Actor, writer and director Billy Bob Thornton has created a sharply
perceptive film entitled 'Sling Blade'.  A mentally retarted, middle
aged man named Carl (Billy Bob Thornton) is released from a mental
institution where he was sent as a young boy for murdering his mother
and her lover after catching them red handed at commiting adultery.
The film begins with the surroundings of the institution where Carl
mingles with other patients of the asylum and grants an interview with
the assistance of his doctor to a young girl writing for her school
newspaper.  There is a monlogue of eerie dialogue in which the camera
doesn't cut away for quite sometime as Carl is speaking which instantly
develops his character quickly, drawing the audience in and making Carl
a strong protagonist.
Carl is due for release a short time later, and tells his doctor that
the hospital is all he's ever known and that he wants to stay.  The
kindness shown by his doctor helps Carl greatly as he lands a job
fixing small engines for farm and gardening equipment at a local shop
and Carl befriends a young boy during the process of his release and
comes to find that the boy's mother is involved in a relationship with
an abusive man (Dwight Yokum).  His mother's best friend is the manager
of a supermarket (John Ritter --- yes, that's right, Jack Tripper from
'Three's Company' and barely recognizable with Buddy Holly glasses and
a weird hairdo) who is a homosexual and this is where 'Sling Blade'
becomes important and symbolic.
The underlying message of this movie is tolerance and acceptance of
those in our society and Thornton has directed the film with a quiet
sense of maturity and surprising sensitivity. There are moments in the
film of conflict and tension in which Carl is present but doesn't
participate yet Thornton acts it out as if Carl understands all the
while exactly what is going on but is powerless to do anything.  There
is wonderful use of the music score in 'Sling Blade' as a lot of the
quiet and tender moments are blended together with soft tones of
musical riffs which are barely audible at time but enhance the scenes
they're in greatly and it's still hard to believe that in an age where
the average film can cost thirty to forty million dollars to produce
that Thornton had this one made for only one million dollars.
'Sling Blade' has earned Thornton 1997 Oscar nominations for Best Actor
and Best Screenplay Adaptaion and they are nominations that are more
than deserving and Thornton has established himself as a talented force
to be associated with and the studios ought to take note of this man
whose 'Sling Blade' will be a gem talked about for years to come.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Folks who lived through the 1950's certainly remember much of the purity
that decade had.  Mom vacuumed in pearls and baked cookies with her good
dress and kitchen apron attached.  Dad wore the same suit to work
everyday and left the house each morning and returned each evening with
the same greeting to his family.  The kids were raised wholesome with
good breakfasts made by mom.  Girls wore skirts and dresses down to
their ankles and boys were clean cut as everything was squeaky clean.
Utopia to some but secret repression to others.  The open minded and
diverse approach to life is the difference between colour and black and
white in 'Pleasantville'.
Tobey Maguire and Reese Witherspoon are two teenagers made in the 90's.
Halter tops for the girls, baggy pants for the boys, body piercing,
sexual appetites fulfilled and a teenager's life is complete?  Notice
the question mark.  Maguire's character is a big fan of a black and
white television sitcom from the 50's called 'Pleasantville'.  In the
tradition of 'Father Knows Best' and 'The Andy Griffith Show',
'Pleasantville' is the all American image of a decade gone forever.
While 60's, 70's and even some 80's type culture has come back to
society in the 90's, culture of the 50's has not and probably never
will.
Children of divorced parents, Maguire and Witherspoon argue one evening
after mom leaves to spend the weekend with her boyfriend.  Maguire wants
to watch a 'Pleasantville' marathon on television while Witherspoon
desires a rock concert on television with her boyfriend who is coming
over shortly.  During the argument, they break the television remote
control.  A few moments later, a mysterious t.v. repair man (Don Knotts)
pays a visit to the house and gives the kids what looks like an antique
remote control.  Knotts is fascinated by the fact that Maguire is a big
fan of 'Pleasantville' and after he leaves, the kids struggle with the
new remote and get sucked into a black and white fantasy world inside
their television.  They are now a part of the town of Pleasantville.
Their new family is a complete shock to them.  Mom (Joan Allen) and dad
(William H. Macy) are stereotypes of the 50's described earlier in the
review.
The other folks in the town who are major players in the film are a cafe
employee played by Jeff Daniels who is an aspiring painter and the
town's mayor, J.T. Walsh and this is Walsh's last film since he passed
away earlier in 1998 from a heart attack.
As the film progresses, the kids from the 90's bring their personal
lifestyles to their new fantasy life and slowly things around them turn
to colour.  Some of the town's folks like it and others don't.  A town
council meeting is called to look into whether or not the new colourful
life brought to Pleasantville can be considered criminal activity.  A
metaphor for the McCarthy hearings, no doubt.
'Pleasantville' is written and directed by Gary Ross who was involved in
creating film pleasures such as 1988's 'Big' and 1993's 'Dave'.  Ross
has found a new direction in film that works on many levels but he does
fails to create any real edge.  The film is emotionally satisfying but
lacks excitement, however it compensates for it with excellent
performances from the actors, some of whom have their characters
experience an emotional metamorphosis.
Just to be clear, movies have to get at least three and a half stars out
of five for me to recommend them and 'Pleasantville' is an original
piece of movie entertainment that is far from being a masterpiece but it
may go down as a mild film classic but that will depend on society's
intention to grasp and accept a cultural giant from the past.  The
question is "Will they or won't they?"
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
It helps a great deal to have a movie come out at the end of the year that
is a reminder of the year's biggest box office hit which came out in the
summer.  'Independence Day' has skyrocketed to #6 on the all time box
office list and that film about an alien invasion of Earth was a tense
filled and dramatic telescope of filmmaking.  A complete one hundred and
eighty degree turn is completed with 'Mars Attacks.'  An idiotic President
of the United States (Jack Nicholson) and his hopelessly materialistic
wife and U.S. First Lady (Glenn Close) are caught in a dilemma when
Martians attack our planet and a wacky handful of characters are caught up
in the frenzy.  Visionary director Tim Burton ('Pee Wee's Big Adventure,'
Beetlejuice,' Batman,' 'Edward Scissorhands,' 'Ed Wood') has cooked up a
delicious mix of camp humour and visuals and has crossed the finish line
with a movie which is not for all tastes but Burton's films usually aren't
and 'Mars Attacks' has the director in the uncompromising position of
telling his story with a mixed bag of lunacy.  The funniest thing about
this movie is that Nicholson not only plays the leader of the free world
but also a sleazy and hard boiled Nevada real estate developer named Art
Land.  Yes, I'm certain the selection of this characters name was no
co-incidence.  His wardrobe alone is worth the price of admission for the
amount of pure belly laughs that it delivers.  Combine that with some
ingenious computerized special effects and the cultural lessons of all
those tacky flying saucer movies of the 1950's and 'Mars Attacks' delivers
some surprisingly inventive gags and justice is done to the characters in
the picture that you'll love to hate.  I must admit that this picture
caught me off guard as I was prepared for an 'Independence Day' rip off
but it isn't that way at all.  At the conclusion of this movie you'll find
the end result comes from the most unlikely character and this one is
destined to become a cult classic.  Other cast members include Pierce
Brosnan, Martin Short, Rod Steiger, Annette Bening, Jim Brown, Sarah
Jessica Parker, Lukas Haas, Michael J. Fox, Danny De Vito, Natalie
Portman, Sylvia Sidney, Lisa Marie and Tom Jones.
Coming Soon:  Reviews of 'Beavis and Butthead Do America' and 'My Fellow
Americans.'  SEE YOU AT THE MOVIES !

Title
Review for Few Good Men, A (1992)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
As of 1997, Jack Nicholson has won three Academy Awards.  In 1975 as
Best Actor in 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest' even though Nicholson
should have won for 'Chinatown' in 1974 and Al Pacino should have won
for 'Dog Day Afternoon' the year that Nicholson won for 'One Flew Over
the Cuckoo's Nest', but that's the way things go.  Nicholson has also
won in 1983 for Best Supporting Actor in 'Terms of Endearment' and in
1997, again for Best Actor in 'As Good As it Gets'.  Nicholson's only
other Oscar nomination in the 90's so far has been for Best Supporting
Actor in 1992's 'A Few Good Men'.  Nicholson's portrayal of a deranged
and fanatical Marine named Col. Nathan Jessep is largely the strength
that holds 'A Few Good Men' together for its entire run of 138 minutes.
As a courtroom drama for much of its running time, it has the potential
to fizz out quickly but Nicholson's appearance in the movie's climax is
the film's defining moment.  Whenever a movie runs over two hours in
length, I always get nervous, fearing over length but that doesn't occur
in this film in which Nicholson appears only in four key scenes but they
are the most powerful in the film.
The film opens on a U.S. military base in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba where two
Marines are seen bursting into the room of another where they gag him
with electrical tape, tie his hands and feet with it and stuff a rag
into his mouth.  As we cut to the opening credits list, we are treated
to a sequence of drills performed by a squadron of Marines in full
formal dress who perform some fancy movements with their rifles.  As the
film begins its basic run, we discover that the opening sequence has led
to the death of the Marine ambushed and legal counsel is assigned to
represent the two other Marines charged with the crime of murdering
him.  Lt. Commander JoAnne Galloway (Demi Moore) asks for the job but
the assignment goes to Lt. Daniel Kaffee (Tom Cruise) who has only been
out of law school and in the Navy a short while.  Kaffee's specialty is
plea bargains.  He is reluctant to go to court.  His investigation of
the case leads him to go to court eventually to defend the Marines
charged with murder.
Kaffee's colleague and the lead prosecutor is Capt. Jack Ross (Kevin
Bacon) who is extremely convincing in this film and the matching of
court skills between Bacon and Cruise is one of the film's greatest
strengths.  There are no dirty tricks involved between the two in order
for one to win his case.  They are friends through and through the
trial, and this, while not that noticeable at first, is one of the
film's greatest assets.  One scene in a bar during the trial even has
Ross admitting to being Kaffee's friend and he advises Kaffee that his
conduct in court could land him a court-martial.
After reading a plot outline from any description of the film, it would
lead you to believe that 'A Few Good Men' has its share of good guys and
bad guys.  Partly true, and partly false because the characters
perceived to be the villains believe in what they're doing from an
extreme position taken in their military duties and also believe they
aren't guilty of any crime because of their "code" in protecting their
country.
Jack Nicholson's counter parts on the base in Cuba are Lt. Col. Matthew
Markinson (the late J.T. Walsh) and Lt. Jonathan Kendrick (Kiefer
Sutherland), a nasty redneck of a Marine who would probably shoot you if
their was an improper mark on your uniform.  J.T. Walsh is probably the
film's weakest character, not because of his skill as an actor, but
because he is over shadowed by many other popular superstars.
Tom Cruise and Demi Moore are joined by co-counsel Sam Weinberg (Kevin
Pollak) who is the pillar of strength for both of them and a voice of
intelligent reason at the times that are the most tense.  Director Rob
Reiner keeps the film moving at a brisk pace and the film doesn't have a
single boring spot and the screenplay by Aaron Sorkin, based on his
play, isn't full of surprises but is full of snappy dialogue and in the
film's final resolution, Sorkin sets out to resolve what was originally
discussed by the characters earlier in the film.  It's not a
conventional court room drama but one with an off beat texture.  The
most interesting thing about Sorkin's script is that even though the
plot lacks depth, it still requires your full attention as it looks and
feels like putting pieces of a jigsaw puzzle together.
Nominated for four Academy Awards, including Best Picture, 'A Few Good
Men' is a film with universal appeal as its main focus isn't only about
finding the truth, it's about the main character, Tom Cruise's lethal
performance as a Navy officer and lawyer, and his willingness to earn
the respect of his peers.  Something we all want.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
1982 was an interesting year that in one way or another, affects the events
surrounding 'Bowfinger'.  One quirky story involved the estate of the late
great Peter Sellers suing those involved with the making of 'Trail of the
Pink Panther'.  The movie was a series of out takes based on old footage
featuring Sellers as Inspector Clouseau from other 'Pink Panther' movies all
strung together with new footage containing other actors to look like a new
adventure based on the Inspector Clouseau legacy.  Since Sellers died in
1980, it looked as if they were trying to make a movie without having to
give any compensation to Sellers himself.  It was also a year where Steve
Martin made 'Dead Men Don't Wear Plaid'.  That film showed Martin
interacting with footage from other movies, for example, those with Humphrey
Bogart to make it look like the old footage and new footage combined made
for a coherent film.  It was also the year that Eddie Murphy made his motion
picture debut in '48 hrs.' which launched a successful movie career for him
It was also the year that Frank Oz made his directing debut with the film
'The Dark Crystal'.
Steve Martin likes to lampoon the film industry and make light of its image
and the culture surrounding it.  His 1991 triumph 'L.A. Story' put the L.A.
lifestyle in the proper perspective and he played a slasher film director in
Lawrence Kasdan's 1991 mediocrity 'Grand Canyon'.  For me, Martin's best
role was opposite Michael Caine in 1988's 'Dirty Rotten Scoundrels' where
Martin played a bumbling con man who gets more than he bargained for when he
learns to master his art form at the hands of a more experienced thief
played by Caine.
Together for the first time are Steve Martin and Eddie Murphy in
'Bowfinger'.  Surprisingly, Martin plays his part in the film completely
straight.  Murphy is the talent that makes the film work because he plays
two characters that have more in common with each other than it first
appears.
Martin is Bowfinger, a no talent film maker, sort of an Ed Wood of the 90's
who wants to make that one great motion picture.  A member of his staff
writes a completely campy film about aliens called 'Chubby Rain' that
Bowfinger believes will be brilliant.  He cons his way into the company of a
hot shot studio executive (Robert Downey Jr.,) who, after a brief encounter
with 'Bowfinger', tells him he has his deal for a picture if he can land the
biggest action star in Hollywood named Kit Ramsey (Eddie Murphy).  After
Trying to lure Kit into the project personally, Bowfinger fails to get his
star but has a back up plan.  He tells his staff who have struggled with him
for years (played by actors Christine Baranski, Adam Alexi-Malle and Jaime
Kennedy) that he did land the deal but confides in only one of them that he
failed and decides to photograph the real Kit Ramsey in secret from far away
distances without the star's knowledge and uses many excuses to make his
staff believe that Ramsey is working on the project voluntarily.  Also in
the mix is a young actress (Heather Graham), just off the bus from Ohio with
dreams of making it big as an actress in Hollywood.
Murphy's character of Kit Ramsey is hilarious.  He's the sort of star who is
jealous of other action heroes and complains that he doesn't get the same
treatment as the biggest stars who are his peers.  He treats outsiders like
dirt, is close to his entourage and suffers from paranoia and sees a pseudo
therapist (Terence Stamp) for his problems.  Ramsey's paranoia is all based
on misunderstanding.  Thrown into the story for all of this is a Kit Ramsey
look alike (also played by Murphy), whose character has a great twist that
may make Martin's plan work after all.
'Bowfinger' is directed by Frank Oz ('In and Out', 'What About Bob?', 'Dirty
Rotten Scoundrels', 'Little Shop of Horrors') and Oz structures his film
like a cleverly played game of desperation.  He makes light of it all and
the film never uses a heavy hand in any of its scenes to make the chemistry
between its stars work.  Oz also likes to make his movies work like puppet
shows.  He manages to get the most deadpan looks from his actors and often
confines many of his scenes to the same locations.  There is also a deft
amount of silliness (at times too much) that accompanies his stories in
their sub text.  Oz's work with Jim Henson's Muppet franchise gave him these
light hearted qualities that work well with live action characters and the
human actors who play them.
'Bowfinger' has a perfect running length of 97 minutes and is a true triumph
for Martin as the film's author.  He manages to come up with an entertaining
story filled with witty gags and a fair amount of originality and Eddie
Murphy shows that at the age of 38, he can still act in a very immature
manner and still look like a seasoned veteran of all sorts of comedy as he
displays many layers of his past work this time around.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
'Star Wars - Episode I - The Phantom Menace' (1999)
When 'The Godfather Part III' was released in 1990, people knocked it as
disappointing and not living up to the standards of the first two films.
There was a 16 year gap between II and III and Francis Ford Coppola was able
to find a fresh story and I thought the film was well executed.  When such
great films play on our sub conscious minds for years and we replay every
exciting moment in our heads over and over again, it is human nature to
expect the roll to continue.  How many of us want our favorite sports team
to win the championship every year?  It simply won't happen.
George Lucas once commented that he wanted to wait many years after 1983's
'Return of the Jedi' to tell the story contained within the first three
chapters of his 'Star Wars' saga because he wanted film technology to excel
and become what it has today.  There is a 16 year gap between 'Return of the
Jedi' and 'The Phantom Menace' and the original three 'Star Wars' films
generate as much debate as they do entertainment.  Many are split on what
film is better, 'Star Wars' or 'The Empire Strikes Back'.  Certainly 'The
Empire Strikes Back' was a better character enhancement of its leading cast
and isn't it odd that Lucas had no hand in the film's finished screenplay or
the direction of the film.  Lucas was responsible for the film's story line,
however.  Those credits for the movie's finished script belong to Lawrence
Kasdan and Leigh Brackett and the man who directed it was Irvin Kershner.
Most agree that 'Return of the Jedi' was the weakest chapter and Lucas not
directing it makes you wonder if he's a better businessman that filmmaker
with the success of all the merchandising tie-ins and his creation of many
post production facilities for motion pictures
'The Phantom Menace' begins about thirty years before the original three
films started.  The peaceful planet of Naboo is involved in a dispute with
the sinister trade federation.  Two ambassadors who are also Jedi knights,
Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and young Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) are sent
to peacefully negotiate the trade dispute but the trade federation, who
would eventually become the evil empire seen later in episodes IV, V and VI
try to wipe them out and pursue the good Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman)
into signing a treaty that will do more harm that good for her people.
Senator Palpatine/Darth Sidious (Ian McDiarmid) is the most evil of the
federation members.  A trait that would serve him well in eventually
becoming the Emperor, Darth Vader's lord and master.
Throughout the course of the Jedi's adventures, they come upon a young slave
boy named Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd) whom they will train to become a
Jedi knight since the force is with him so strongly.  This idea is brought
fourth by Qui-Gon Jinn but Jedi master Yoda is unable to see his future
through the force and fears the boy may be an element drawn to the dark side
of the force and is against his training as a Jedi.
The story is sort of self defeating in many ways because we know how the
events will play out later so this is a major setback for the film.  It also
has a silly and unnecessary computer generated character named Jar Jar Binks
thrown in for no other reason than to mildly entertain children and even
then, some little ones may find his antics too silly.  On the redeeming side
of things are a space pod race halfway through the film that is absolutely
mesmerizing and a climax that manages to include four major conflicts that
keep our eyes glued to the screen.  Combined with the introduction of a new
master villain named Darth Maul (Ray Park, Peter Serafinowicz), and a look
at the origins of R2-D2 and C-3PO and Jabba the Hut also making an
appearance, the film is marginally well done from an academic stand point
and superb from a technical outlook.
Does 'The Phantom Menace' live up to its hype?  No.  It has major character
weaknesses that make many of the film's actors look like life size action
figures with little personality or complexity.  The story is well told in
part but is a bit tiresome and bears the markings of trying to go home again
which is usually not possible.  For technical zest and the memory of old
friends seen in the film, I recommend 'The Phantom Menace' to be savoured as
an experience  that will only be a one time deal for many but I am also
recommending it as giving George Lucas the benefit of the doubt that he will
improve in the weak areas when episodes II and III are released in the
coming years.  Maybe his plan is to build a slow burn uphill and not
downhill.  Time will tell.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Clockwork Orange, A (1971)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Stanley Kubrick certainly has established himself as the master of
'dehumanization' in the medium of film.  His mechanics as a filmmaker
have made for better social commentary than almost any other attempt by
any director in the history of movies.  Kubrick's films are scarce.
Since 1975, he has only made three of them.  'Barry Lyndon' in 1975,
'The Shining' in 1980 and his last film, 'Full Metal Jacket', was made
over a decade ago, in 1987.  Scheduled for release sometime in 1998 is
his latest film, 'Eyes Wide Shut' with Tom Cruise.  Cruise has worked
well with other legendary directors such as Martin Scorsese and Oliver
Stone, so it will be interesting seeing Cruise work with a director not
known for choosing big stars in his productions.  I suppose Jack
Nicholson in 'The Shining' and Kirk Douglas in Kubrick's 1960 epic
'Spartacus' qualify as big stars but this is the exception rather than
the rule with Kubrick.
Kubrick had long been a director well ahead of his time.  His theme of
technology running amok has been evident throughout his career.  Look at
'Dr. Strangelove'.  The nuclear arsenal of the United States is
compromised when an insane general uses a loophole in the launch
procedure to carry out his own attack.  Thankfully, something like that
has never happened, but look at other examples.  The malfunction of the
HAL 9000 computer in '2001: A Space Odyssey', a computer trusted
to run the entire mission if the astronauts could not, and presently, in
real life, the millennium bug is plaguing all institutions that the
population relies on for routine service.  If it isn't fixed in less
than 2 years, the world could be in chaos.  The author of 2001, Arthur
C. Clarke, deserves much credit for this idea as well as Kubrick but
somehow Kubrick's visual style of film presentation gives it greater
impact.  What about the Challenger explosion in 1986?  Another prophecy
from Kubrick or simple neglect on the part of the mission controllers?
Any way you look at it, Kubrick is probably more misunderstood in his
storytelling than any other director and you certainly can't accuse him
of copying any other director.  In fact, I can't even think of one
director that Kubrick looks influenced by.  If anything, Kubrick seems
to have a style all his own.
Kubrick adapted Anthony Burgess' novel 'A Clockwork Orange', and
released the film in 1971 to a stunned audience.  Even more shocking to
many at the time was the film's claim to 4 Academy Award nominations
(Best Picture, Director, Adapted Screenplay, Film Editing but
surprisingly no
acting nominations).  This angered many members of the motion picture
academy, particularly the older and more conservative ones who felt the
film was a deplorable exercise in showcasing violence and other ghastly
images of a graphic nature.  As usual, many missed the point with the
release of a Kubrick film.
The message in this film was actually anti-violence.  The story is set
in the future, after 1971.  Perhaps in the late 70's the 80's, the 90's,
or the 21st century.  We are not told. The opening shot focuses on Alex
(Malcolm McDowell).  A slow pullback of the camera commences and we see
another three young men with him.  This opening scene is accompanied by
eerie synthesized music and narration on the part of Alex.  Next, the
four young men, we discover, are a violent gang who, in some of the
film's early scenes, assault an old man, mix it up with a rival gang and
rape a woman in her own home and cripple her husband.  Alex is the
gang's self-proclaimed leader, a smart individual answering to the devil
on his shoulder rather than the angel.  He lives with his parents but
lies to them about his activities and later has a run in with his
juvenile parole officer that the next time he gets caught by the law, it
will be the real prison and not juvenile detention, as was the case in
the past.  His parole officer is a smarmy fellow.  He knows Alex is up
to no good but he can't prove it.  He teases Alex with the possible
consequences of Alex's actions but Alex pays him no mind.
Early in the film, Kubrick uses his camera as a metaphor to the human
experience.  Alex meets two girls in a record shop and takes them home
for some carefree sex.  As the scene begins, we hear the 'William Tell
Overture' and the camera speeds up to its maximum in rather comic
fashion to illustrate the quickness experienced in the joy of sex at the
peak of its most exciting moment.  Later, after a run in with members of
his own gang, Alex shows them who is boss as they are walking on the
waterfront and this time the camera is using slow motion as Alex takes
his walking stick, which he uses as a weapon from time to time, and
smacks one of his own fellow thugs in the crotch.  He then proceeds to
kick him, causing him to fall into the water and as Alex helps him out
of the drink, he cuts the back of his hand with a knife.  The camera's
slow motion effect illustrates the long suffering effects of pain.
Francis Ford Coppola used the effect of slow and fast editing a year
later in 1972's 'The Godfather'.  We see the picture slowly fade from
the movie producer's discovery of a horse's head in his bed to a rather
somber head shot of Don Vito Corleone sitting in his chair at home.
Later, Michael Corleone, acting as the godfather for his sister's son at
a baptism, is seen taking hypocritical vows in church as the editing is
faster, showcasing the murders of rival crime family members.
Alex is fond of classical music, particularly Beethoven.  He is captured
and sent to prison for 14 years after causing the death of a woman in a
robbery.  While he is in prison, he hears of a secret medical procedure
that can turn a person anti-violent.  He volunteers for the experiment,
with catastrophic results.  He is injected with a drug that will make
him immune to violent acts of any kind, and his persona changes as he is
forced to watch, with his eyelids propped up and in a straight jacket,
films of violent acts, both physically and sexually.  This is the key
turning point in the film.  Alex begs the doctors to stop but they say
it's for his own good and that he will be released shortly from prison.
One doctor notes to his colleagues that Alex's discomfort in watching
the films is the "punishment element" of the experiment.  Punishment for
his crimes, no doubt.
When Alex is released from prison, he finds everything in his life has
changed and he runs into some old adversaries, bent on getting revenge
for Alex's past deeds.  He finds that society is even more violent than
he could have imagined, and violence did increase dramatically in real
life society from 1971 on, and continued for many years.  Another
Kubrick prophecy come true?
Kubrick keeps the film light at times with injections of dark humour,
particularly those involving a prison official (Michael Bates), a man
who is captain of the guards and enforces his discipline with military
style tactics.  The scenes with him are among some of the film's most
hilarious moments.
As 'A Clockwork Orange' winds down, the political machinery involved in
Alex's attempted rehabilitation begins to unravel, forcing a deal
between Alex and the government to rectify any wrong doing.  The final
scene is truthful, honest and a real satisfactory way to end a film that
at times is a lacerating satire on society, complete with all the red
hot ingredients to anger and at the same time amuse movie audiences.
Success doing that is rare.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
The cinematic talents of Al Pacino have reached new heights with 'Donnie
Brasco'.  Pacino has played a criminal many times in his career and from the
high profile and diverse characterizations of Michael Corleone in both
'Godfather' movies to the lacerating and despicable thug he played in
'Scarface' (1983) to the hilarious over the top gangster under heavy make-up
in 'Dick Tracy' (1990), this legendary actor has managed to find new
dimensions every time he sets out to play the bad guy.  In many ways,
re-inventing yourself in a lot of films can be more difficult than anything
else you attempt in screen acting and I suspect Pacino enjoys living up to
the challenge.
In 'Donnie Brasco', which is based on a true story, Al Pacino plays a life
long member of the Mafia whose career in crime is marked with what he claims
are twenty six assassinations as a hit man and he praises himself on a level
of greatness that others in the organization aren't willing to recognize
since he has not managed to move up much all the years he's been involved in
his seedy and unrewarding lifestyle.  His character is really a pathetic
example of a life wasted.  His still lives in a second class ordinary
apartment with his junkie son and a female companion.
Enter an undercover FBI agent played sternly and completely in control at all
times by Johnny Depp.  His assignment is to get inside the life of Pacino and
the organization he associates with and break it up.  It's a job he performed
for almost three years from 1978 to 1981 and his work along with other agents
led to over two hundred indictments and one hundred convictions.
Having gotten close to Pacino's character leads to problems for him as he
develops conflicting loyalties since Pacino treats him like a son and
promises to make him a 'made' guy.  Depp's character encounters family
problems with his wife and children who feel shunned by his devotion to work
and commitment elsewhere.
Director Mike Newell has created a convincing and meaningful crime saga with
unpretentious characters and scenes of sorted detail combined with a
screenplay by Paul Attanasio ('Quiz Show') based on the novel 'Donnie Brasco'
by Joseph D. Pistone and Richard Woodley.  Pistone is the FBI agent Depp
plays in the film and while Pacino makes the film, Depp still proves he's one
of this generation's finest young actors.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
AS A REVIEW OF THIS FILM, I FEEL IT IS IMPORTANT TO GIVE YOU AN
EXPLANATION OF THE SHOW'S PROGRESS IN BETTER UNDERSTANDING THE FILM.
HERE IS A RUN DOWN OF THE SERIES.  ALL FIVE SEASONS ARE ANALYZED.  IF
YOU WATCH THE SHOW RELIGIOUSLY LIKE I DO, SKIP AHEAD TO ANOTHER OPENING
PARAGRAPH LIKE THIS ONE, ALL IN CAPITAL LETTERS, THAT WILL ONLY DISCUSS
THE MOVIE.
Once in a generation, you get a truly great visionary who has a knack
for capturing the desires of the human imagination better than you could
ever believe.  Rod Serling had 'The Twilight Zone', Gene Roddenberry had
'Star Trek', and Chris Carter now has 'The X-Files'.  Inspired by the
early 70's t.v. series 'Kolchak: The Night Stalker' starring Darren
McGavin, Carter has crafted a television series that doesn't only
investigate the paranormal but it provides an examination of the human
condition that borders on being a soap opera but doesn't quite cross the
line because all the shows are not tied directly to each other like a
soap opera usually is.
'The X-Files' chooses to make episodes that are isolated in their own
stories as well as other episodes that are part of the show's overall
mythology that pick up from where they last left off every several
episodes or so that examines the strengths, weaknesses, morals and
intelligent qualities that each character possesses is his or her own
way.  'The X-Files' did not start out as a borderline soap opera.  It
began as a cult show that looked more experimental than progressive in
its first season (1993/94).  In fact, the first episode aired on the FOX
network on September 10, 1993.  The total scope of characters had not
yet come into play as being very interesting except for the two leads,
David Duchovny as FBI Special Agent Fox Mulder and Gillian Anderson as
Special Agent Dana Scully.  Season 2 was more progressive and ended with
its most intense cliffhanger in the show's five years.  It was the first
of a three part series that picked up with the first and second episode
of season 3 that had Mulder and Scully involved in their most explosive
adventure ever to date in the series.  Season 3 is the show's BEST work
to date.  There is more diversity among the show's tone, both humourous
and dramatic as well as its usual mystique.  Season 4 is the show's most
ambitious time as more story developments occur with splendidly
addictive results.  Season 5 is sort of an enigma.  It's right in the
middle.  Better than season 1 and 2 but inferior to season 3 and 4.
Mulder is a true believer in the paranormal and its relative ties.
UFO's, extra-terrestrials, mutants and un-Earthly beings in general are
Mulder's cause in life as a branch of the FBI has a category known as
the x-files, cases where the only explanation (or lack of one) seems to
be tied to the supernatural.  Enter Scully.  She is a skeptic, a medical
doctor with a background in science who believes that the answers for
every unexplained occurrence are there and that one just has to know
where to look.  Cancer, AIDS and many other diseases haven't been cured
as we haven't learned where to look and that is the parallel to Scully's
belief that science can explain everything or so she believes.  Scully
has been assigned to become Mulder's partner and he believes she is to
spy on him for her superiors but as the show would progress, Scully, to
this day, has her same beliefs but is the only person that Mulder ends
up trusting.
The show is basically tied to five important story lines.  The first is
Mulder's quest to find his sister, Samantha, who was abducted from her
home at the age of 8 as Mulder, at age 12, watched as a supposed alien
force took his sister in the same way the little boy was taken from his
mother in 'Close Encounters'.  Secondly is Mulder's quest to clarify his
father's name.  His father was murdered by forces inside a dark network
tied to the government because he could expose too much about a secret
government and military project that the men involved have supposedly
been negotiating with extra-terrestrials for the revolution of a new way
of life on Earth.  His father has been shown in flashbacks from time to
time as being involved in government experiments and the collection of
data during the Cold War.  These factors have included a mysterious
alien entity in the form of a mysterious black oil that can infiltrate
the human body and jump from person to person and is the main focus of a
race between the United States and Russia to find a vaccine for it in
fighting its effects that has been seen in the last three seasons of the
five years the show has been on the air.  Thirdly is the infiltration on
society of a strange specimen of bees that appear to carry small pox, a
disease thought to be almost eradicated by modern medicine but perhaps
it will make a comeback for some sinister purpose.  Fourth, Fox Mulder
and his sister Samantha seem to be the focus of a reoccurring question.
Who is their father?
Fifth is the progression of Scully's health.  She was abducted by a
strange force, some believe by aliens and some believe by the government
and some believe both that later caused her to develop cancer and her
fight against its progression that seems to be arrested for the moment
that occurred at the beginning of season five.  Season five, which just
ended on May 17, 1998 was the most "teasing" season of the series as
many of the regular characters weren't seen as often as they were in the
other four seasons and for good reason.  EVERYONE appears to be in the
movie which is supposed to appeal to die hard fans of the show, such as
myself and people who have never seen it.  The movie is supposed to
answer serious questions raised by the show over the past five seasons
and the movie will be a stop sign at its conclusion that will phase in
season 6 in the fall of 1998.
Mulder has had three secret sources of information that he turns to when
he's stuck on a case.  These people are like the deep throat character
played by Hal Holbrook in 'All the President's Men'.  In fact, Mulder's
first informant, was named Deep Throat (Jerry Hardin), and he was
murdered by conspiring forces at the end of season 1 and at the
beginning of season 4, Mulder's other informant, Mr. X (Steven Williams)
was likewise murdered by what we assume are the same people.  Mulder's
current source of information is from a UN employee named Marita
Covarrubias (Laurie Holden).  She is a woman who is the least
trustworthy of all of Mulder's informants.
Other reoccurring characters on the show are the Lone Gunmen.  They are
Byers (Bruce Harwood), Langly (Dean Haglund) and Frohike (Tom
Braidwood).  These men are often the show's comic relief but are serious
and important enough to help Mulder with his quest for unexplained
scientific and technical explanations he needs in solving a case.  The
Lone Gunmen work out of a lab that also serves as their apartment where
they have computers and other high tech gadgets for analyzing and
explaining certain types of data fed to them.
There is Alex Krycek (Nicholas Lea).  Krycek started off as what looked
like an ally to Mulder but later we learned that Krycek was a double
agent, working for the Cigarette Smoking Man and his consortium as well
as for the Russians although Krycek's birthplace has never been
established.  He is one of the show's most interesting characters who
hasn't been used as much as I would like to have seen.
There was the introduction in season 5 of Special Agent Spender (Chris
Owens).  His character has not yet been utilized enough to really
comment on but more should be explained about him in season 6 and should
involve a relationship between him and the Cigarette Smoking Man.  Or
maybe not.
Last but certainly not least is Mulder and Scully's boss, Assistant
Director of the FBI, Walter Skinner (Mitch Pileggi) who is the most
underplayed character in the series.  Very little has been explained
about Skinner in the four years the show has been on.  Skinner is a
former Marine and Vietnam veteran who seems to hiding a secret pain in
life.  Skinner never smiles and when he tries to, it doesn't last long
and is usually a smile reminding him of a happier time in his life or is
a smile that reminds him of something strange and not something funny.
He is a somewhat sympathetic character that you like, hoping he will
always remain as a good guy but Chris Carter has portrayed him as
uncertain more than any other character.
Mulder and Scully are monitored by the government within the government,
a consortium of men of considerable experience in their work who all
look to be in their 50's and 60's.  There is the 1st Elder (Don S.
Williams), who seems to be the leader, the Well Manicured Man (John
Neville), who appears to be an under boss of authority and the infamous
Cigarette Smoking Man (William B. Davis) who is the most focused upon
character of the three men and the show's chief bad guy and one of the
most intelligently portrayed villains in the history of television or
the movies.  If you are having trouble picturing these men, think of a
dark room or dark outside scenario, where men, dressed in suits, plan
their next move that will affect the lives of millions.  They're the
sort of men believed by many to have killed JFK, RFK and Martin Luther
King, Jr.  In fact, in season 4, an episode called 'Musings of a
Cigarette Smoking Man' is one of the series best episodes as its
alternative presentation of ideas does in fact imply and it shows that
the Cigarette Smoking Man killed JFK and Martin Luther King, Jr.
Throughout the show, Mulder and Scully have each lost a parent and a
sibling.  Scully's father died of a heart attack in season 1 and her
sister was accidentally murdered by assassins who meant to kill Scully,
at the beginning of season 3.  Mulder's father, as mentioned already,
was murdered by conspiring government forces involving the Cigarette
Smoking Man at the end of season 2 and Mulder's sister Samantha has been
missing since before the series began.  These losses have driven them
further in living up to the old adage that for every action there can be
an equally strong reaction and their experiences and bonding with one
another have taken the show to progressive heights virtually unmatched
by any other show.  What keeps 'The X-Files' so interesting is that the
relationship between Mulder and Scully hs always been kept professional
an never personal.  They have never been lovers and despite the desire
of immature teenage female fans who watch the show but aren't really
fans and can't tell you what's going on (I can't tell you how much
people like this bother me), Chris Carter says that he will never do
anything to rock the boat in making their relationship anything but
professional.  I and several of my 'X-Files' friends have vowed to stop
watching the show if it ever becomes personally romantic between Mulder
and Scully.
The last episode of the show before the movie is the end of season 5.
Fox Mulder's work, all of the x-files, were burned in his private office
at the FBI Headquarters by the Cigarette Smoking Man who first removed
Samantha Mulder's file.  The x-files were apparently destroyed because a
link in solving them all had allegedly been found through the mind
reading abilities of a 12 year old boy.  Solving all of the x-files
would be a threat to the consortium's planned project involving
extra-terrestrials and  involving the Cigarette Smoking Man..........
..........HERE IS WHERE THE MOVIE REVIEW BEGINS
WARNING:  This review contains some spoilers which I never do but it is
necessary in this case to appreciate the film.  Fear not.  Not all is
revealed!
'The X-Files' movie begins in what we know in the present day as being
North Texas.  It is 35,000 B.C., and a pair of what can be described
most understandably as cave men, are running along a thick winter like
tundra that resembles the North or South pole, probably the climate of
North Texas in 35,000 B.C. before the evolution of climate change to its
present day climate.  They fall through a weak spot in the snow and
encounter alien entities in an underground cave where the black oil is
exposed to them. Skip forward to the present day.  Again, it is North
Texas.  A group of boys are playing and one of them falls through the
ground.  We are to assume that its the same spot the cave men
encountered as the boy who fell through finds a skull and the boy is
contaminated by the black oil.  There is a quick rush to quarantine the
boy after a call is made by a mysterious man on the scene to the
Cigarette Smoking Man.
The movie is clever in its opening scenes, as Mulder and Scully are not
present right away and work their way into the story later in what would
become another tie to the film's many plot points, all on a collision
course with each other.  When we do see Mulder and Scully, after about
the first twenty minutes into the film, they are at the scene of a
federal building in Dallas, Texas, where a bomb threat has been called
in.  Among their discussion is a phrase that tells the audience that the
x-files have been shut down.  After the bomb situation has resolved
itself, Mulder encounters a doctor (Martin Landau), who was an old
friend of Mulder's father and who knows the real purpose of the bomb
scare scenario in Dallas.  
The consortium introduces us to new character, a man we assume is a
scientist (Armin Mueller-Stahl), who has information about a new virus
related to the uncovering of the black oil in North Texas.  The regular
consortium members are there.  The 1st Elder (Don S. Williams), The Well
Manicured Man (John Neville), and, of course, the Cigarette Smoking Man
(William B. Davis).  We discover that not only has the government been
working in control with some extra-terrestrial forces for the past fifty
years, but we also learn that the consortium is working to prevent in
part, a colonization of the Earth for which they have no control.  This
element is derived from season 5's two part story 'Patient X' and 'The
Red and the Black'.  We learn that the United States and Russia are
working to find a vaccine that will prevent the colonization by extra
terrestrials by spreading the black oil.  The vaccine plays a major part
in the film and progresses up to the film's conclusion where we learn
the fate of the x-files in what will be the start of season 6 in the
fall of 1998.
Mulder and Scully face elements that they've never been up against
before as their exploits take them to the South pole for their most
difficult adventure ever and although the film is an expansion of the
television series, Skinner (Mitch Pileggi) and The Lone Gunmen (Bruce
Harwood, Dean Haglund and Tom Braidwood) are only used briefly.  
I was hoping the movie would create more depth than it ultimately did
and although the creators of the movie say that you don't have to know
anything about the television series to enjoy the movie, this is not
entirely true.  You can enjoy the movie if you've never seen the t.v.
show but only about 75% of the movie will make sense.  Without knowing
anything about the black oil, the bees, and the consortium, audiences
will have to watch repeats of the show to truly appreciate it.  All in
all, a good effort and certainly better than the first 'Star Trek' movie
in 1979 and 'Twilight Zone---The Movie' in 1982 which failed to live up
to the standards of their television pasts.  'The X-Files' movie does
live up to the standards of its television past with a vision of the
future which will keep true fans clued in for more. 
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
'Fight Club' tells the story of urban paranoia in perhaps the best way I've
seen since Martin Scorsese's 'Taxi Driver' in 1976.  The film tries every
possible way to shock the audience with dread, visual excrement, free
flowing ideas and morbid theories and a protagonist whose very existence is
so far beyond pathetic, that it seems not of this world.  The movie is a
product of director David Fincher, a man whose films are so ugly, they often
miss the real point they're trying to make.  Fincher has been a music video
director and cuts his motion pictures rapidly with visual tricks and plays
with his film a bit too much in the cutting room.  'Alien 3' was Fincher's
first real notice and it received mostly negative reviews.  His hugely
commercial 'Seven' in 1995 had its high points and low points and came
across as a cult like version of 'The Silence of the Lambs' with Kevin
Spacey being the only stand out member of the cast.  'The Game' with Michael
Douglas and Sean Penn in 1997 was like touring a broken down fun house and
now Fincher has released his most controversial film to date with 'Fight
Club'.
You simply can't say enough good things about Edward Norton.  His enormous
talent as an actor is matched only by the fact that he chooses his films
carefully and makes the most of his characterizations.  His next move should
be to act alongside a Newman, a Duvall or a Hoffman the way Tom Cruise has
because since Tom Cruise has held his own with those actors, imagine what
Norton could do!  In 'Fight Club' he is Jack, our narrator and friend who
works for a major car manufacturer and hates his job, his boss and his
surroundings.  On a business flight one night he meets Tyler Durden (Brad
Pitt), a soap manufacturer and salesman who befriends Norton and we later
see a strange twist in their relationship that plays with Norton's mind
better than most psychological thrillers of its type.
After Jack's condo is terrorized by a bombing, Tyler puts him up at his
place and the two of them form a strange group of other angry, young to
middle aged men who have similar lives and call it "fight club".  It's an
organization of counter culture where unorthodox, bare fisted fights occur
and anything goes in the manly art of self defense.  Others gather around as
two selected members of the group fight and they have very strict rules
about the sacred order of the club.  Jack also has many problems.  His lack
of friends forces him sub consciously to attend support groups where people
suffer from many diseases and disorders.  One is for a group of men with
testicular cancer and Jack becomes involved with Robert Paulson (Meat Loaf),
a man who later becomes a member of the club.  Jack also meets Marla Singer,
a woman with no life who lives in poverty, smokes herself in a way that may
lead to an early grave and she has no direction in her life.
"Fight club" eventually makes its way into many major cities around the
United States and borders on becoming a terrorist organization striking at
the very heart of commerce and financial viability.  Fincher makes the most
of his wide screen presentation and uses the ratio very well in structuring
his film technically that bends and stretches the limits of the human mind
and shows just how much of an emery it can become in each of us.  'Fight
Club' may seem a bit lengthy but it does sit well as it never seems
repetitive and always has a few goodies up its sleeve.
The controversy surrounding 'Fight Club' will become gigantic.  It's not a
film for the casual movie goer.  Its hard core presentation is unsparing.
It goes for the jugular the way 'A Clockwork Orange', 'Do the Right Thing'
and 'JFK' did.  It's also a film that will sit well with cult film
historians who have appreciated such films as 'Eraserhead', 'The Rocky
Horror Picture Show' and 'Blue Velvet'.
The film's screenplay is by Jim Uhls, based on the novel by Chuck Palahniuk.
There are many layers of human nature mixed with a perspective view of life
at the bottom of the world and reflects just how many people are
increasingly desperate in their lives, striving for something better and
realizing that opportunities for success are in many cases, closed doors in
their lives and an alternative for their ambitions must be found.  Although
Brad Pitt receives first billing, his character resembles much of the
psychotic tumbling found in his performance in '12 Monkeys' but Pitt does a
good job with what he's given here.  Again, this film belongs to Edward
Norton.  I hope he receives his third Oscar nomination with this film as he
is destined to certainly win one some day if there is any justice.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
The most brilliantly written film of the 1990's so far and likely will
be all around is director and co-writer Quentin Tarantino's 1994 shock
filled masterpiece 'Pulp Fiction'.  Hilarious, violent, sexy, vibrant,
hip and many other adjectives can be used to describe this complex
character study set in Los Angeles but reflective of society everywhere.
What probably turned off a lot of people from the film was its attitude
that it was acceptable to celebrate the behaviour of lowlifes by making
the two main characters, a couple of hit men (John Travolta and Samuel
L. Jackson), a pair of unconscionable verbal trash cans who hold
philosophical debates throughout the course of killing people.  In
reality, the film is more about what backfires from that lifestyle when
one of the hit men goes down for the dirt nap at an untimely point in
the film with little sympathy.
The film tells basically two stories with sub-text thrown in for good
measure among some of the supporting players, although some have argued
that everyone in the film is a supporting player.
The first tale, about the hit men (Travolta and Jackson) details their
quest on a bright and pleasant morning to confront, recover stolen
property from and kill four small time thieves in a run down apartment
complex where hamburgers are the main breakfast.  There is a command of
character on the part of Jackson, who solidifies his authority with
quotes from the Bible and some sarcastic poking at his targets of prey,
complete with an automatic pistol.  Both Jackson and Travolta have a
hilarious exchange of words regarding the subject of foot massages and
it's only one of many scenes the film has where comic mockery of mayhem
is the norm.  The first twenty minutes of the film focuses on this
occasion and the consequences of it when they settle business and
director Tarantino returns to this messy farce for the film's final
scenes.
The second tale is that of a third rate boxer, Bruce Willis, and his
wishy-washy girlfriend and how the two of them try and take it on the
lam after Willis successfully double crosses his boss in a fight he is
supposed to throw.  Willis provides some the best work of his career as
a character with integrity shining through at the wrong time.  His past
is mirrored through an affection for his father from whom he inherited a
very special wrist watch.  Upon trying to recover the watch, he
encounters a frightening amount of nightmarish characters who want to do
him in.  The basement of a used appliance shop is the setting for the
film's most unpleasant scenes of bad taste and this is the film's only
weak spot.  The scenes involving Willis' conflict and confrontation of
the film's most unpleasant characters drags somewhat but not too much
and was the main reason, I believe, for Tarantino's return to the the
film's opening story towards the end of the film.  In case you haven't
seen 'Pulp Fiction', it's told in a very appealing and non-sequential
fashion, adding to its impact as a pulsating and stunning piece of very
American cinema.
Another piece of dialogue filled scenery is a business date between
(Travolta) and his boss' wife, (Uma Thurman).  Not romantically linked
but strangely attracted to each other in a competitive way, the two of
them burn up the screen with their personalities, indicative of the
film's most basic scenes of good taste.  The scene is filmed at a 1950's
nostalgia bar where the art direction, waiters and waitresses are decked
out in everything reminiscent of the film's opposite tone.  Travolta and
Thurman enter a dance contest at the restaurant and take home first
prize for their efforts, marred by an overdose of powerful drugs that
almost kills one of them and results in getting and antidote from the
drug's main supplier.  This is the film's most heart pounding scene that
makes light of it all and that in and of itself is repellent or
hilarious, depending on your point of view.
A very important scene in 'Pulp Fiction' is the opening montage, in
which two losers (Tim Roth and Amanda Plummer), plot their next heist
and decide to rob the diner they're currently having breakfast in, not
worrying about the unexpected danger they're about to encounter which
they think is unlikely, after describing the relatively low amount of
security associated with a diner in contrast to a bank.
'Pulp Fiction' harbours many thrashing scenes of vibrant energy that it
not only found a place as the critic's darling of the year in which it
was released, but it earned Tarantino and his writing partner Roger
Avery an Oscar and made a healthy return at the box office for its
studio.  With public acceptance as strong as that of the critic's, 'Pulp
Fiction' is perhaps smarter than any film of its generation.  It's a
motion picture which is timeless not because of its controversy but
because of the enduring nature of criminals bent on self destruction
which everyone loves to see.

Title
Review for Firestorm (1998)
The mechanics of a film like 'Firestorm' are pretty basic.  It isn't
like you would expect a brainstorm of ideas to revolve around such a
simple and mundane premise.  Therefore, you have to count on the film
having a well executed blend of stunt work, editing, photographic
expertise, and it should, at the very least, have a brisk pace.
'Firestorm' doesn't have any of these elements in the proper place.  In
a somewhat shameless and pitiful way, it passes itself off with the
trademark elements of a television movie.  The shaky camera angles, an
obviously low number of takes, murky photography and cheesy special
effects are all presented in a protracted and scattershot manner and
many of the movie's bland action sequences are clumsily executed and
in a movie involving fire, you almost need a magnifying glass to see any
of the important moments.
Former NFL celebrity and present day football analyst Howie Long stars
(barely) as a wilderness firefighter who confronts a renegade group of
escaped prisoners, disguised as firefighters, who are using a forest
fire as the perfect cover for a getaway scheme involving the recovery of
millions of dollars hidden away just before their leader was caught and
sent away to prison.
William Forsythe plays the villain leader (barely) who enlists the aid
of other prisoners to help him recover the money but kills each one of
his helpers along the way so he doesn't have to share the loot with
them.  Tagging along for the ride is a nature photographer (Suzi Amis)
who becomes embroiled in Long's fight against the bad guys after Long
rescues her from Forsythe's gang after she's kidnapped and tells Long
during their hike through the forest that she's the daughter of a
tough marine and learned a lot from her old man.  Where's the
incredible hulk when you need him?  Rounding out the cast is the veteran
actor Scott Glenn who is completely wasted as a colleague of Long's in
the fire fighting game who suffers a career ending injury and has to
make an embarrassing sacrifice during the film's climax.
'Firestorm' is unbelievably anaemic and has some of the worst computer
enhanced gimmicks so far in the technology of motion pictures.  It's
credibility is strained by so many phony fire related elements that
you'll wish you had a little device with you that's marked "break glass
in the event of boredom".  There are countless scenes where some of the
cast members would have become overcome by smoke inhalation and died
long before they get out of their entanglements and other scenes that
depict debris landing on them, in front of them and around them would
have been equally fatal in a real scenario.
The only thing worse than this movie would be to see it turned into a
movie theme park ride which actually may be more entertaining than
sitting through this.  Thankfully, it's less than 90 minutes.  Wow!  It
really does resemble a t.v. movie!
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
'Affliction' is not as obvious a film as it may seem.  Besides showing
the inherited traits that are often passed down from father to son, this
film also strives to show one man weak enough to actually swallow that
theory whole.  His feeling of worthlessness, his dysfunctional life, his
incompetence on the job, and his ability to eventually alienate everyone
in his life he cares about but he manages to hang on to the one person
most detrimental to himself before things turn tragic and the course of
his life will be changed forever by the film's conclusion.
Nick Nolte as Wade Whitehouse, gives his finest performance to date as a
small town police officer in upstate New Hampshire who looks the other
way for his so-called friends, has an ex-wife who hates him, a young
daughter who finds him weird, and a girlfriend (Sissy Spacek) who tries,
unsuccessfully, to change him.  He drinks and while indications of the
film's description you may have read elsewhere may lead you to believe
that alcoholism is the inspiration for the film's title, the real
affliction is the monstrous behaviour burdened upon Nolte by his
brooding, violent, irresponsible and alcoholic father Glen (James
Coburn).  Coburn's portrayal is, in many ways, more scary than most
manufactured monsters shown in some of the most sinister horror and
science fiction films.  Uncaring, unloving and a human being with
absolutely no redeemable qualities, Coburn is one of the sharpest
supporting players seen in film in years and his character is so
realistic that it will haunt many long after they leave the theatre.
The film has narration by Wade's brother Rolfe (Willem Dafoe).  Dafoe
also has a small part as Wade's younger brother who leads a normal life
and despises the abyss his father and brother have fallen into.  He is a
successful school teacher and the remarks aimed at his family are less
than endearing.
'Affliction' is based on the novel by Russell Banks, the author of 'The
Sweet Hereafter' and the film is written for the screen and directed by
Paul Schrader who has worked on such screenplays for the movies as 'Taxi
Driver' and 'Raging Bull'.  Schrader's screenplays and in this case his
direction, looks abstract to the genuine concept of entertainment.  I
also had a similar criticism of 1998's 'A Simple Plan', which generated
a similar feeling as this film does.  Just because these films purport
to tell a story about the true condition of the human soul and how it
can be destroyed can make for fine film focus but they often have
limited entertainment value attached to them, especially with such a
downer ending, which they often contain.
To expand on the comments made about Nick Nolte and James Coburn, I must
say that I never expected them to be as perfect on screen as father and
son as they are in the finished product.  Coburn has always been an
under rated actor and has always managed to please in his employment as
a performer.  And what can you say about Nick Nolte?  A man with only
one Oscar nomination to his credit for 1991's 'The Prince of Tides',
this film could easily win Nolte an Oscar but it wouldn't be genuine
unless Coburn also wins.  Although there is only twelve years between
them in real life, they truly look like father and son on screen.  Nolte
should have received additional Oscar nominations in his career for work
in 'North Dallas Forty', 'Under Fire' and 'Weeds'.
The last thing that I can say about this film is that Nolte's
performance, while totally convincing and heartbreaking is also the
stuff that fits the first line of this review in so much that his
performance is not obvious.  For the first hour or so, his character is
rather sedated.  But we come to later realize that Wade Whitehouse is a
man who has in fact, bottled up his feelings for so long that when the
film concludes, we find that sometimes it's better to let your feelings
out rather than control them to the point where they build to the point
of eruption which is inevitable among human beings.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
Andrew Lloyd Weber and Tim Rice's internationally acclaimed musical 'Evita'
is now a big screen motion picture featuring a sweeping pace despite its
running time of approximately two hours and fifteen minutes.  Some may come
out feeling as if they've watched an extended music video and that feeling is
justified but the integrity and originality of the play is kept intact by
director Alan Parker.  Parker is certainly no stranger to orchestrating and
piecing together films with a musical background.  'Fame' (1980) and 'The
Committments' (1991) are examples of Parker's talent and his eye for
dramatization is nothing to shy away from, either, as his craft in that
department was established with 'Midnight Express' (1978) and 'Mississippi
Burning' (1988).  Madonna who at first was a controversial choice to play the
title role stars as Eva Duarte, a poor Spanish woman who rose to national and
international attention when she married Argentinian dictator Juan Peron and
campaigned to help the poor while politicizing her own gains and that of her
husbands.  Despite being a target for many years by critics, Madonna is
electrifying in the picture and will probably receive an Oscar nomination for
her work.  Juan Peron is played in a straight forward manner by Jonathan
Pryce and Antonio Banderas is Che, a man who follows the everyday antics of
Eva.  Fans of the musical will be pleased to see it revived as this is an
almost zero speaking picture and 99.9999% song.  It's vivid re-creation of
that period is matched extensively by panoramic camera work.  'Evita' will
probably be enjoyed better by people who have seen the play but for those new
to the material, I don't think you'll be disappointed.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
The creators of my all time favourite television series 'The X-Files' would
have killed for the opportunity to make an episode with the material as
eerie as the stuff contained within 'The Sixth Sense'.  This is right up
their alley and if you love stories about the paranormal, the occult or good
old fashioned ghosts, 'The Sixth Sense' is a film you definitely don't want
to miss.  It strings the audience along and keeps them in the palm of its
hand and deserves to be one of 1999's best films on many critic's lists at
the end of the year.
'The Sixth Sense' is a quiet, sometimes muted, and always surreal thriller
that has psychological overtones that drum up memories of films past.  It
will scare the tar out of you at times and in a very tasteful manner I might
add.  But what makes it truly memorable is that it is not done in a
conventional style with any recognizable formula but offers a plot twist
that will be hard to spot since your mind will be on how the main character
will resolve the fear regarding his sixth sense.
The real test of how good a film can be dramatically is to withdraw any
extreme attempt to overwhelm the audience with a music score.  Few films
succeed at this but 'The Sixth Sense' carries itself extremely well and uses
the afterlife as a metaphor and draws variations (not copies) from films
such as 'Jacob's Ladder' and 'Ghost'.
Bruce Willis is Dr. Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who has a very
respectable practice.  So much so in fact that he wins awards from local
dignitaries and has a wife (Olivia Williams) who loves him very much.  One
night at his Philadelphia home, a young adult breaks in and Malcolm
discovers that it's a former patient from a decade or so ago who wasn't
cured of his problems and he shoots Dr. Crowe in the stomach and then
commits suicide.  The film then skips forward to the following autumn and
Malcolm counsels a young boy named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) with a very
serious problem.  Cole confesses: "I see dead people".
This confession doesn't come easily.  It happens about halfway through the
film after some terrifying psychological teasing at the hands of his peers.
He is ridiculed by other children his age and his mother has a difficult
time dealing with her son's problems.
After Cole confesses that he sees the dead, Dr. Crowe diagnosis his case as
paranoia and no one believes he is actually telling the truth.  There are
signs throughout the film that not only can the boy see the dead but he can
actually hear them and communicate with them as well.  'The Sixth Sense'
then takes a strange and sudden twist that will leave you breathless during
the film's final few minutes.
Bruce Willis is good in his role but he falls into the classic trap of
acting with either animals or children who upstage him.  In this case it is
11-year old Haley Joel Osment who gives a heart breaking, strong and eerie
performance as the child with the gift that is more like a curse.  Osment's
performance should bring him an Oscar nomination as Best Supporting Actor.
You may remember him as Tom Hanks' little boy in 'Forrest Gump'.  Strangely,
in a supporting role he manages to be the main character as the film's
entire arc is built around him.
29-year old writer/director M. Night Shyamalan deserves a lot of praise for
crafting a film with intelligence, emotion and one that will give you a lot
of after thought.  The reason it does is that all of the people that the boy
sees have died of violent or unnatural deaths.  There is no mercy in its
look at what the afterlife may be like when the soul leaves the body
unexpectedly and one man's idea of what it may be like is as valid as anyone
else who has tried it in a similarly sophisticated fashion in the past.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
     In a summer being bombarded with 100 million dollar spectacles and
action pictures with little or no room to leave an audience breathing, it is
truly refreshing to have a big budget Hollywood film arrive in theatres that
is skillfully presented, monumental in its vision (and visuals) and most
importantly one that will stir emotion in audiences familiar with the
Hollywood style of artful filmmaking.
     That film is 'Contact'.  Based on the novel by Carl Sagan, it's from
Oscar winning director Robert Zemeckis ('Forrest Gump'), who is a master at
combining technology and academics in film so brilliantly and tells the story
of an astronomer (Jodie Foster) driven by passion and intelligent belief that
Earthlings are probably not the only ones in the known universe with
intelligent life.  Her mission in life started when she was very young.
 Before she was ten years old she displayed stunning characteristics in
achieving greatness through the field of science and mathematics and saw her
way through to become a very important research technician, teacher and
pioneer in her chosen field.  Her greatness is not realized at first as her
low profile is eventually brought to the surface one evening as she receives
radio transmissions from outer space thought to be the first contact with
alien life.
     The world soon learns of this historic communication and there is a
frenzy of panic and protest which develops between the government, religious
groups, various world organizations and people in general as philosophy tries
to make sense of this seemingly impossible event.
     Transmissions begin filtering through the universe and eventually arrive
on Earth that categorize a blueprint of some sort which will enable the
people of our planet to build a machine of transportation to touch the
unthinkable if someone is willing to make the journey.  Politics and
competitive acts make their way through the system and a man (Tom Skerritt)
is finally chosen as the one who will make the journey.  He is someone with
whom Foster has had great conflicts with many times in her career and his
choice is a frustrating one for her to swallow.  That is as far as I will go
in telling you anything more about this modern masterpiece as many more
events unfold which lead to an eventual conclusion that will leave audiences
debating long after they leave the theatre.
     Jodie Foster is moving and head strong as the protagonist in this film
in a performance that is the best so far in 1997 and she could find herself
nominated for an Oscar next spring.  1997 has been lacking in great roles for
women so far and Foster's is the best one given since Frances McDormand's
Oscar winning, breakthrough and noticable performance in 1996's 'Fargo'.
 Other members of the cast include James Woods as a doubting and borderline
villain in the role of a national security agent, Angela Bassett as a White
House aide, John Hurt in a dark and fascinating performance as a man of
undisclosed wealth aiding Foster in her journey and Matthew McConaugheyas a
writer in a role that is somewhat under written and that is the film's only
weakness.
     I am tempted to make comparisons to other classic science fiction films
but somehow 'Contact' manages to escape comparisons because while it is
certanly influenced by achievements of the past, it's presentation is totally
original, intelligent and without pretention.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
What do you get when you cross two terrific Oscar winning actors with a
totally unoriginal story?  Two Oscar winning actors appearing in an
unoriginal story, of course.  Sound silly?  Try and equate the question and
answer you just read with the feeling you'll experience after seeing
'Instinct'.  Sleeping pills may be needed to stay awake during this film
that is like an airliner that never gets off the ground.  You just sit there
and wait for something to happen.
The posturing of 'Instinct' is outrageously insulting to a movie buff.
There is a combination of 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest', 'The Silence of
the Lambs' and 'Gorillas in the Mist' at almost every turn.  There is even a
copycat camera shot of a scene right out of 'The Shawshank Redemption'.
Throw into the mix a confined setting where too much time is spent on one
issue and you have the atmosphere of spending an afternoon with a really
annoying relative you can't get away from.  It's a shame because the
performances in this film are very good and don't dignify the pace and
texture that this film has to offer.
Anthony Hopkins is Dr. Ethan Powell, an renowned anthropologist who goes
missing in 1994 in the jungles of Africa while on an excursion to observe
the behavioural traits of gorillas.  He is arrested for murder by the
authorities and spends a significant amount of time in custody before a U.S.
state department official brings him home and he is confined to the
psychiatric section of a maximum security prison in Florida.  A former
colleague of Powell's (Donald Sutherland) assigns a bright young
psychologist named Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding Jr.) to help Powell out of his
shell.  Powell's time in the wilderness has given him psychotic episodes
around humans where he is prone to attack them at anytime.  In fact, Powell
feels more secure and has a better peace of mind when he's in the company of
the wilderness than with humans at all, including his daughter (Maura
Tierney).  Caulder tries to establish a trusting doctor/patient relationship
with Powell but fails when Powell resists his attempts at rehabilitation
after we learn that it's not his mind that's been affected but rather his
environment.
The conditions at the so called care facility are atrocious.  The
psychiatric wing of the prison is overcrowded.  Medication levels are too
high for the men.  They aren't given the proper recreation time and the
guards are especially brutal and harsh with them.  Among the prison
employees are a pathetic doctor who's just passing time (George Dzundza) and
a tough prison guard (John Ashton) whose character is nothing more than a
stereotype.
There are two relatively interesting scenes of excitement, one near the
beginning and one near the end that give 'Instinct' moments of exclusive and
badly needed tension but the rest of the time the film is bogged down with a
lot of sappy dialogue and watered down characterizations.  Director Jon
Turteltaub who has made 'Cool Runnings', 'While You Were Sleeping' and
'Phenomenon' is not a suitable choice for this material which needs a steady
and heavy hand and not one experienced at lightweight drama, free floating
comedy or romantic overtures.
On the plus side, the performances are very stirring by the two leads.  I
was overwhelmed to see a young actor like Cuba Gooding Jr. hold his own with
a seasoned veteran like Anthony Hopkins.  The two of them are solid and are
casted well in their roles.  Too bad the screenplay by Gerald Di Pego based
on the novel entitled 'Ishmael' by Daniel Quinn is such an experience in
boredom.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Thief (1981)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Director Michael Mann's moody crime film 'Thief' from 1981 is a film of such 
slick, original and invigorating visuals that it's hard to imagine the film
made any 
other way once you've seen the entire thing.  Also scripted by Mann from the 
book 'The Home Invaders' by Frank Hohimer, it has a flow of such natural 
dialogue to match the best crime scenes ever filmed and the characters are 
totally unsympathetic for an extra focus on reality.  It bothers me sometimes 
that motion pictures take a protagonist who chooses the wrong path in life and 
they are made out to be sympathetic. 
Mann, who has made other films such as 'The Last of the Mohicans' (1992) and 
a great companion piece to 'Thief' entitled 'Heat' from 1995 with Al Pacino and 
Robert De Niro and the force behind the 80's television series 'Miami Vice', 
chooses his camera angles carefully and uses tight editing and feisty
lighting in 
'Thief' that enhances the film's final outcome.
James Caan is a lifelong thief who has spent over a decade in prison and can't 
reform his ways after release.  His mentor (Willie Nelson in a two scene cameo) 
has taught him everything he knows about crime and Caan tries to obtain his 
release from prison when learning that Nelson is suffering from an eventually 
fatal respiratory condition.  Caan plans the greatest heist of his career
while in 
the employment of a slimy crime boss (Robert Prosky).  Caan works with a loyal 
partner (James Belushi) and marries a woman (Tuesday Weld) who doesn't 
seem too upset that her new husband is a criminal who may leave her anytime 
by being arrested, pursued or killed in the life he has chosen.  The
personality 
profile between Caan and Weld is nicely set up in a cafe sequence where they 
explain their lives to one another and decide to stay together. 
The film's basic message is survival and uses the old morality statement that 
there is no loyalty among thieves and the picture's original music score by 
Tangerine Dream and the arresting cinematography by Donald Thorin impact 
the story just as well as any academic thought the director ever had.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
When was the last time you were stuck in a traffic jam?  Waiting and
waiting and waiting to get somewhere you REALLY want to be, only to be
held up and when you finally reach your destination, you discover that
it definitely wasn't worth the wait.  That's exactly the feeling
generated by 'Out of Sight' from director Steven Soderbergh whose most
well known film credits include 1989's 'Sex, Lies, and Videotape' and
1991's 'Kafka'.  'Out of Sight' is also based on the novel by Elmore
Leonard whose other works have been turned into movies recently with
last year's 'Jackie Brown', based on Leonard's novel entitled 'Rum
Punch' and 1995's 'Get Shorty', based on Leonard's novel of the same
name.  I must confess that I haven't read the novel 'Out of Sight' but
based on other reviews I've read, some critics are referring to the
original story as a cult novel which explains to a certain extent why it
doesn't make for a very good film.  Cult areas of arts and literature
either find an audience or they don't.  You either love it or you hate
it.  There is no in between.  I was completely turned off by this film
which is unconvincing, meandering and has too many unnecessary
characters that are disposable.
George Clooney stars as a bank robber who has hit somewhere in the
neighbourhood of 200 financial institutions in his career and the film
opens with him committing one of these acts after he storms out of a
building across the street, upset about something, and we find out later
in the film why he did what he did.  He is apprehended in the parking
lot by the authorities after his car won't start in a getaway attempt
and we see his life in "the joint" with others who become key players in
the way the story unfolds.  Also introduced to the audience in the
film's first few minutes is a federal marshal played rather laughably by
Jennifer Lopez.  Her full fledged authority as a federal marshal isn't
even half as convincing as say Jodie Foster's performance in 'The
Silence of the Lambs' and she only played a trainee in the FBI and I
would rather have her on my side in a crisis situation rather than Lopez
who looks better playing sultry and glamourous characters instead of
someone who's gutsy, tough and professional as she tries to be in this
film.
Clooney eventually makes his escape from prison with a certain sense of
ease and is confronted by Lopez on the other side of the fence as she
packs a shotgun but she's overpowered by Clooney and his friend who has
come to pick him up (Ving Rhames).  Lopez eventually makes her escape
with  one of Clooney and Rhames's accomplices, a confused and neurotic
loser played by Steve Zahn who likes wearing sunglasses all the time,
even at night.  Clooney and Rhames hook up with two other thugs they met
in prison.  The other hard nosed criminals are played by the very
talented Don Cheadle (who, incidentally was better in 'Boogie Nights'
than Burt Reynolds was) and Isiah Washington, and their plan for a heist
of monumental proportions is the film's climax.
As 'Out of Sight' progresses, the film shifts back and fourth at times,
like other films in wake of the success of 'Pulp Fiction' and like many
other films in history, 'Pulp Fiction' will be imitated for years to
come through all mediocre attempts and this film is just the latest.
Writer Scott Frank who wrote some of the best dialogue heard in the
movies in the 1990's with 'Get Shorty', disappoints greatly here as he
builds a foundation to his story which is shaky and under developed as
many scenes go around and around in circles and don't really lead
anywhere.  Some of them fall flat on their face as some of the humour is
limp and fine actors such as Albert Brooks and Dennis Farina are
completely wasted.  Soderbergh's direction of this film is bland and
misses the mark as Soderbergh looks like an employee of the film's
script and brings what looks like no sense of his own vision to the
film's sub plots and character configurations.  At least director Barry
Sonnenfeld made the characters in 'Get Shorty' somewhat cartoonish and
still managed to make them convincing as that film had characters you
could latch onto and root for and had others you were glad to see get
the metaphoric pie in the face in their just desserts.  'Out of Sight'
has none of these qualities and is another wasted opportunity for George
Clooney to showcase his true talent.
Clooney has yet to strike gold and has only had one truly great
performance which was in 1996's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' which
co-incidentally is another cult film which was doomed in its second half
but Clooney remained the film's only memorable character.  Giving a
great performance in a great film is something he's still striving for
and he hasn't found it here.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
Arthur Miller's play from the 1950's entitled 'The Crucible' was a very
timely play indeed in wake of the McCarthy hearings in the United States
designed to root out communists and which many of its critics termed a "witch
hunt."  The setting for this movie is Salem, Massachusetts in 1692 and the
root of this play is literally a witch hunt involving adultery, conscience,
betrayal and relentless evil.  Daniel Day-Lewis stars as John Proctor, a man
trying to save the honor and life of his patronizing wife (Joan Allen) who is
a woman of moral conduct and devotion to her husband.  An inquest conducted
by a British magestrate (Paul Scofield) in a chilling and commanding
performance which should snag him an Oscar nomination seeks to root out the
presence of Satan not only in Proctor's wife but presumably in the character
of a young woman (Winona Ryder) and other members of her group who meet in
secret ritual fashion.  The penalty for being convicted of any association
with Satan is death by hanging.  Ryder's character had an adulterous affair
with John Proctor and now seeks to destroy his marriage by aiding in the
conviction of his wife all the while trying to prove her own innocence.
 Director Nicholas Hytner ('The Madness of King George') fashions an
electrifying yet plain look to this film which is in keeping with Miller's
story and the entire cast shines with emotion and passion.  I was impressed
with the way this movie was able to avoid any pretentious conclusion as it
makes its point clearly and then exits appropriately.  One of 1996's most
well acted pieces. 

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Cast - Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi, David
Keith.
Directed by - Jonathan Mostow.
Written by - Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery, David Ayer.
Produced by - Dino De Laurentis.
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - Rated PG-13 (Parental
Guidance 13) - Rated PG-13 for war violence.
Running Length - 115 minutes.
Distributor - Universal Pictures.
The submarine movie.  It seems like everybody thinks they can make a
successful one.  In the 90's, 'The Hunt for Red October' and 'Crimson Tide'
were among the most popular.  But the grand daddy of all submarine movies is
Wolfgang Petersen's 1982 masterpiece which re-defined the term
white-knuckler when describing motion pictures.  Academically efficient and
technically brilliant, director of photography Jost Vacano actually
developed (in an authentic submarine with cramped corners) a method that
allowed the camera to run from one submarine bay to another as smoothly as
if the camera were on a flat conveyor belt.  This is a feat that should have
won him an Oscar but instead the award was given to Billy Williams and
Ronnie Taylor for their easy and mostly outdoor filming of 'Gandhi'.  'The
Hunt for Red October' was a sly and extremely well written espionage film
that tied itself up a little too perfectly at the end but kept in the
tradition of Hollywood standards without ticking off the audience.  'Crimson
Tide' had the distinction of being a superbly acted film (it doesn't get
much better than Gene Hackman and Denzel Washington) with great sub woofer
capabilities on the home entertainment system.  The new millennium brings in
yet another movie about a war time machine they now name a sandwich and this
one has some pretty bland ingredients and some very large plot holes.
I also got the feeling that while watching this movie that someone behind
the camera actually lost a lot of games of Battleship. You remember that
Hasbro board game where people would exclaim "You sank my battleship!"  I
say this because the film is like a game of Battleship that someone wanted
to win very badly and the characters are largely portrayed as parts of a
pinball target, video game target or just about any other target you can
imagine in the name of combat.  'U-571' actually feels at times like
standing next to someone who has only emptied half of his roll of quarters
during the routine of playing a video game and you say, "Come on.  Hurry up.
Let's go!"....because you're so bored after a while.
The setting for 'U-571' is World War II.  Lt. Andrew Tyler (Matthew
McConaughey) and Lt. Commander Mike Dahlgren (Bill Paxton) are the lead
officers on a mission for the United States that will allow, in theory, for
a group of navy recruits and their officers to board a Nazi submarine, in
the disguise of fellow Nazis, and steal an encoding device which the Nazis
will protect at all costs.  This all goes smoothly for a while until a
clever Nazi crewman with binoculars spots the sabotage and all hell breaks
loose.  The Americans have to then fight their way aboard the submarine and
steal the device while fearing an attack from their own allies, managing the
vessel's incurred damage and looking after captured prisoners.
After the initial mayhem, the film becomes bogged down with repetitive
vacuums of action which are handled very well with a booming sound track of
refined detail but it all becomes tiresome before too long.  This truly
surprised me because director Jonathan Mostow mad a crackling and totally
authentic Hitchcock style thriller in 1997 entitled 'Breakdown' which showed
the intimacies and nightmares of violent crime and had believable
performances from its cast and filled the bill nicely for two hours.
Producer Dino De Laurentis, aside from standing behind Mostow on 'U-571'
also stood with him as producer of 'Breakdown' and it looks like a
compromise was reached where they agreed that one would have his way on one
picture and the other would have his way on the other because these two
films look completely different although they have the same director and
producer working on them.  Even if subject matter is completely different
from one project to the next, a film buff can spot the trademarks of an
established produced and director that makes all of their work seem similar.
The mix of collaborative efforts looks lost on 'U-571' but directors always
have a better eye for films than businessmen do any day of the week.  When
you go back to look at the career of De Laurentis, he has been involved with
some pretty dreadful movies including 'Conan the Barbarian', Conan the
Destroyer', 'Dune', 'Silver Bullet', 'Year of the Dragon' and 'Body of
Evidence'.  The last two being razzie award nominees for worst picture of
their respective years.
One thing that is mentioned at the end of the film are some of the other
missions that men in real time war have given sacrifice to.  This was a
pleasant thing to see.  Much in the same way that 'Star Trek IV: The Voyage
Home' paid tribute to the men and women of the Challenger disaster of the
way Oliver Stone paid tribute to the men who fought and died in the Vietnam
war with 'Platoon' and 'The Towering Inferno' dedicated its title to fire
fighters who gave their lives and the opening scene of 'Dirty Harry' shows a
wall of names depicting deceased police officers. 'U-571' would make a great
video game and it wouldn't surprise me in this age of marketing if one
actually comes out.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
'Ed TV' had me mildly interested for about the first half its running
length.  But after that, it made its point and then just kept going on
and on before finding a trivial way to conclude itself.  How appropriate
that a film about television should have so many people from
television's history in it.  Woody Harrelson ('Cheers'), Ellen DeGeneres
('Ellen'), Rob Reiner ('All in the Family'), Jenna Elfman ('Dharma and
Greg'), and Martin Landau ('Mission Impossible', 'Space: 1999').
Screenwriters Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel even got their start on the
small screen, and directing it all, little Opie and Richie Cunningham
(Ron Howard).  The star of 'Ed TV' (Matthew McConaughey) saves the film
from being a total failure just as he did with 1996's 'A Time to Kill'
which also hung on by a thread every time he wasn't on screen.
McConaughey is starting to fall into the same trap as George Clooney in
so much as he is extremely talented but can't quite find the right film
role after a few years on the big screen to really push him over the
line into true stardom.
In 'Ed TV' McConaughey stars as Ed Pekurny, a 31 year-old video store
clerk who gets selected by a failing network to be the star of its new
show.  A show without scripts, directors or focus.  It's the brainchild
of a programming executive (Ellen DeGeneres).  And taking credit for it
all is a shady and shark like fellow executive (Rob Reiner).  It's
entitled Ed TV and the concept is simple: an ordinary man's life will be
put on television 24 hours a day as he goes about his usual business and
every detail of his life will be for the general entertainment of the
viewing public.  Actually, Ed isn't on television when he sleeps but the
cameras are there to greet him when he opens his eyes in the morning.
Sound familiar?  'Ed TV' is, in many ways, the reverse of 'The Truman
Show' where a man's life was on t.v. from the cradle into his 30's but
the only difference is that he didn't know about it and Ed does.
Ed's family is quite a handful.  His older brother Ray (Harrelson)
believes he should have been chosen for the show and although the rest
of the family is against the idea at first, Ray says:  "He's 31 years
old and works as a video store clerk.  What's he going to do?  Spend the
rest of his life re-arranging "Ernest" movies?"  Ed and Ray's mother and
step dad (Sally Kirkland and Martin Landau) have a solid marriage at
first but the new show brings out secrets that may threaten their
relationship when Ed's long lost dad (Dennis Hopper) comes to visit.
Ray's fianc Shari (Jenna Elfman) eventually falls for Ed, complicating
things even further and Ed wants to quit the show but the network won't
let him out of his contract.  He breaks up with Shari and the audience
is dying to see him get it on with a hot model (Elizabeth Hurley).  We
constantly see people from all over America watching the show, injecting
their own opinions about what should happen in Ed's life and the show's
direction in many ways is determined by polls taken and the published
results show up constantly in the newspaper USA Today.  Ed rides the
zamboni at hockey games and is cheered on by folks, has his image
plastered on the side of city buses with a caption beside it promoting
the show, has people following him on the streets wanting his autograph
and there are plenty of in-jokes about television.  Put that together
with plenty of annoying product placements and advertisements and you
REALLY have a movie about t.v.!
Gee, did I describe the film enough for you?  My point in this case was
to tell you more than I had to really, to illustrate that most of this
happens in about the first hour to 75 minutes and then the film gets
bogged down with reflection on the part of Ed as he looks back on the
whole experience with regret and the film shifts gears from comedy to
drama and can't decide what its real purpose is.  The best performance
in the film comes from Harrelson and Ganz and Mandel's script has its
usual flubbering of jokes that are in bad taste, inventing new terms and
combining some old ones for a few belly laughs but the film feels like a
failed sales pitch where you think you may have the potential to buy a
product you'll like, but you just can't quite see yourself paying for
it.
The film does make some good points about the state of television in the
90's where trashy television pays off with enough people supporting it.
A major news story came out at the end of 1998 citing that network
television viewer ship was down a whopping 12% for the year, making it
the biggest loser in media competition.  When a professional wrestling
program is currently the biggest show on cable, what does THAT say about
the state of quality?  Not a lot in my opinion and that's sort of what
'Ed TV' is like.  It's staged, it's false, and it doesn't mean a whole
lot except for what you already know about television.  How many people
want to lay down money for a big screen movie with a small screen
message?  I don't.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Becket (1964)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
How many times in film histroy have actors and actresses split the vote when
it's time to vote for the Academy Award?  Several.  1950.  The Best Actress
category.  Anne Baxter and Bette Davis nominated for 'All About Eve'.  Both
lost to Judy Holliday for 'Born Yesterday'.  1953.  The Best Actor category.
 Montgomery Clift and Burt Lancaster nominated for 'From Here to Eternity'.
 Both lost to William Holden for 'Stalag 17'.  Want a more recent example?
 1986.  The Best Supporting Actor category.  Tom Berenger and Willem Dafoe
nominated for 'Platoon'.  Both lost to Michael Caine for 'Hannah and Her
Sisters'.  Last but not least, 1991.  The Best Actress category.  Geena Davis
and Susan Sarandon nominated for 'Thelma and Louise'.  Both lost to Jodie
Foster for 'The Silence of the Lambs.'  The point here is that sometimes when
casting a ballot in deciding who the best really is, someone is bound to get
left out. 
Two of the finest actors to ever hit the motion picture screen never won an
Academy Award.  They are Richard Burton and Peter O'Toole.  Burton died in
1984 and while Peter O'Toole is still around, he is hardly active in motion
pictures anymore.  His last nomination came in 1982 for 'My Favorite Year'.
 That film was an entertaining little farce but a cake walk for O'Toole.  Of
all his nominations he should have won for his motion picture debut in 1962
for 'Lawrence of Arabia' but lost to Gregory Peck for 'To Kill a
Mockingbird'.  Burton should have walked away with one for 'The Spy Who Came
In from the Cold' in 1965 but lost to Lee Marvin for 'Cat Ballou'.
The two of them star in 1964's 'Becket' for which they were both nominated
for Best Actor but lost to Rex Harrison for 'My Fair Lady'.  'Becket' is a
towering example of movie making at its most subtle yet it still manages to
overcome any hint of tedium as Burton and O'Toole endure loyalty to their
characterizations practically unmatched by any other duo who have played
screen adversaries.  Set in th 11th century, the real story begins with King
Henry II (O'Toole) visiting the tomb of his once best friend, the Archbishop
of Canterbury, Thomas Becket (Burton).  The film then shifts back in time to
tell their story beginning early in their lives.  As young men they are
always together as best friends.  O'Toole a future king of England and Burton
a deeply religious man who will devote his life to God.  As the film
progresses there is the talk of war with France, the under handed dealings of
the powerful and an eventual breakdown in their relationship when Burton is
hand picked by O'Toole once he is king to make Burton the new Archbishop.
 O'Toole has it in his mind that Burton will do anything for him since they
are friends but after Burton demonstrates that his loyalty is to the church
over his king, things go terribly wrong.
Directed by Peter Glenville from a screenplay by Edward Anhalt (who won the
Oscar) based on the play from Jean Anouilh, 'Becket' is not only a triumphant
display of academics but has striking cinematography by Geoffrey Unsworth who
filmed the entire piece in a manner similar to recalling old paintings which
are displayed so prominently in some of the finest museums in the world.  He
captures details of expression and frankness splendidly.  'Becket' is a
perfect film for that rainy weekend afternoon and is for those with a
constructive mind in dealing with film while others will mistake it as being
stiff and unappealing.     

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
Edward Norton is quickly establishing himself as a solid player among
his Hollywood peers.  In three short years in Hollywood, he has played
many different characters: a vicious killer, a pornographer's attorney
and a gambling loser.  Not to mention an appearance in a musical.  How's
that for diversity?  One guy, yes only one, wrote me a short time ago
and said that my movie reviews are too short.  In the age of the
Internet where we are literally drowning in information, I told him that
my reviews aren't too short, they're just right, considering the fact
that I want to give people a chance to read other critic's reviews so
why should I ramble on and on and on.  Those roles I mentioned in which
Edward Norton appeared ----- research them for yourself to give yourself
some extra time if you feel my reviews are too short.  That'll keep you
busy for a while but if you have to look up the roles, you aren't much
of a movie fan.
The hypocrisy of hate, based on race and executing that hate through
criminal actions is examined expertly in 'American History X'.  Edward
Norton plays a neo-Nazi skinhead who reforms his ways somewhat, after
being released from prison, and butts heads with his former white power
superior (Stacy Keach).  But Norton's biggest problem is that his
younger brother (Edward Furlong), is on the same path and will probably
end up like his brother if he continues on his current course of action.
This film has more grit and raw violence to make its point in a totally
necessary fashion than almost any other film in 1998.  The most engaging
thing about some of the scenes is the fact that director Tony Kaye uses
black and white and slow motion during some of the film's most shocking
moments.  More importantly, the film doesn't take one course of action,
possibly taking a turn to drag and lose some of its power.  The film
jumps back and fourth from the present to the past constantly throughout
its entire running time..
One night Norton executes two black men for attempting to steal his
truck from his driveway and goes to prison for it.  In prison and given
laundry detail, he is forced to work with a black prisoner and becomes
drawn to him to the point of near friendship and realizes that there is
good and bad in everyone.  A lesson he learned the hard way since his
father was killed by black drug dealers as a fireman and Norton had it
in for all black people based on that one incident.  A black man and
Norton's former and his brother's present history teacher (Avery Brooks)
is the foundation building the right path in this movie and re-names
Furlong's class american history x.  It's a re-working of his current
class which will be a one on one session each day at school as a
reprimand after Furlong hands in a project arguing hate is the right way
and white way for his race to behave in protecting their civil rights
and Furlong even argues in favour of Hitler.
Edward Norton deserves an Oscar nomination for this film and the social
commentary put forward by writer David McKenna is a constant reminder of
how history is carried on in the present day in American society where
words and beliefs are sometimes more harsh than violence.
Whatever your beliefs are, 'American History X' strives to be a visually
stunning and hard core examination of race relations in America where
just looking the wrong way in other people's eyes can get you killed and
where your right to believe in your own convictions can be as
destructive or rewarding as you allow it to be.  One of 1998's ten best
films
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Platoon (1986)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Oliver Stone's semi-autobiographical account of his own experiences in the
Vietnam War is presented in 1986's 'Platoon'.  When I first saw this film
with a packed audience I was not only entertained, not only informed but I
was astonished at how many people disliked this film all for the wrong
reasons.  Certainly people are entitled to their opinion but more important
than that, 'Platoon' forced movie audiences, politicians, military brass and
society in general to look at an ugly aspect of world history.  A lot of
people don't want to face the many aspects of combat tradgedies associated
with war but Oliver Stone did his part by making a film to which a testament
of thoughtful insight was made to try and prevent history from repeating
itself.  
To depict 'Platoon' as simple war film would be superficial.  It's probably
the best film in at least the last 30 years or more that correctly formulated
the three aspects of quality story telling: man vs. man, man vs. nature, man
vs. himself.  Filmed on an initial 6 million dollar budget and with the
Philippines substituting for Vietnam in location shooting, Stone had a tight
schedule to work with and the results were nothing short of brilliant.  
Charlie Sheen is the film's protagonist, a young man who narrates his
experiences in Vietnam in letters he sends home to his grandmother and we
gain an insight into the men within his platoon.  Tom Berenger plays a no
nonsense, unorthodox and somewhat evil sergeant undoubtedly made a victim of
it all by the insanity of war who tries to shape and mold the men in his
company into fighting without rules, without morals and without comapssion
for anyone, even women and children in a suspicious village they stumble upon
where weapons for the enemy are being stored.  Willem Dafoe plays another
sergeant within the same platoon whose personality is just the opposite of
Berenger's and he butts heads with Berenger's war crime activities and the
two men become at odds with each other with tragic results.
'Platoon' is a smart film that is told with little or no plot but rather a
style uniquely inventive of caring about the characters involved and paying
tribute to the men who fought and died in the Vietnam War and Stone dedicates
the film to them in the movie's closing credits.  Filled with explosive
scenes of combat including a vicious climax which may force some to cover
their eyes and with a cast of ordinary characters of all different
personalities and habits, Oliver Stone's 'Platoon' is a lacerating indictment
of a confict fought and which makes people debate the real purpose of the
Vietnam War.  One of the greatest films in the history of cinema and a war
film like no other.       

Title
Review for Preacher's Wife, The (1996)
'The Preacher's Wife' is a good natured remake of 'The Bishop's Wife' from
1947.  That film featured Cary Grant, David Niven and Loretta Young and their
respective positions are filled in this movie by Denzel Washington, Courtney
B. Vance and Whitney Houston.   An angel (Washington) in a surprisingly
ordinary performance gets his wish and returns to Earth to help a
neighbourhood preacher (Vance) who is the best character in the movie and who
has lost much of the spirit he has in his faith.  Throughout the course of
the picture Washington passes himself off as the preacher's assistant and no
one believes he's an angel except Vance and Houston's little boy by whom the
film is narrated.  I enjoyed 'The Preacher's Wife' on a sub standard level of
holiday entertainment and it is wonderful for the entire family but has a
deliberately slow pace courtesy of Penny Marshall ('Big,' 'Awakenings,' ' A
League of Their Own.')  She has made a nice film but a very ordinary one and
to be too critical of this movie is like being too critical to your mother
because you thought her Christmas cake was missing something.  It simply
isn't a nice thing to do.  This is especially true and 'The Preacher's Wife'
deserves high praise for being deliberately family oriented and a movie
charming for even the smallest children.  They certainly did do their best to
please making this one.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Director Renny Harlin had two films out in 1990.  One of them was a
disastrous film entitled 'The Adventures of Ford Fairlane' and the other
was 'Die Hard 2', a worthy sequel to 1988's 'Die Hard'.  Harlin can look
so good at times and so lousy at others.  He's one of the directors that
frequents the big screen in schizophrenic style.  His latest film, 'Deep
Blue Sea', is somewhere in the middle between good and bad.  It's sort
of the purgatory of film making if you will.  
On the plus side, there are no slow spots but on the negative side,
there are too many references to other films such as 'Jaws', 'The Abyss'
and 'The Poseidon Adventure'.  There are also some pretty lousy special
effects that look similar to the snake in 1997's 'Anaconda' which was
cheesy and the computer crop marks around the enhanced snake looked very
visible.  In the case of 'Deep Blue Sea', they don't look quite as bad
but they don't look all that convincing either.
Dr. Susan McAlester (Saffron Burrows) and Dr. Jim Whitlock (Stellan
Skarsgrd) believe they may have found a protein like substance in a
shark's brain that could lead to a major breakthrough in the cure for
Alzheimer's disease.  Funding the project is Russ Franklin (Samuel L.
Jackson).  As he and all the other major members of the cast are
assembled, things go awry.  There is the engineer Tom Scoggins (Michael
Rapaport), another scientist Janet Winters (Jacqueline McKenzie), the
shark handler Carter Blake (Thomas Jane) and a chef (LL Cool J).  The
entire project is on a station in the Pacific Ocean and battling the
elements of a fierce storm and the rebelling sharks who don't like being
experimented on are just some of the problems that arise causing
everyone's life to be put in jeopardy.  The sharks also have an
extremely fast thinking process, an intelligence similar to a human
being's that gives them the edge over us when you compare their strength
and size to it all.
'Deep Blue Sea' is one of those pictures where the action concocted is
at times mediocre at best.  Mediocre because it lacks the injection of
the little things that make an action picture work --- the detailed
elements of things like humour from time to time, the ability to stop
and take a breath and the intelligent stroke of trying to avoid a
formula presentation which is a trap that many films seem to fall into,
thinking that the audience hasn't seen it all before.  
The screenplay of 'Deep Blue Sea' is by Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers and
Donna Powers and has the elements of obligation rather than
imagination.  By that, I mean that it looks like they had a deadline to
meet rather than by treating writing as the personal obligation that it
is where no deadlines mean that the best work will be accomplished.
To make a movie about sharks is almost a waste since inevitable
comparisons to 'Jaws' are sure to follow.  After 'Jaws' we had
'Piranha', 'Orca', 'Alligator' and, yes, even 'Tentacles' about a giant
octopus.  It seems that almost twenty five years later, we still have
the large predatory creature films that look less and less like
entertainment and more and more like someone is obsessed with advancing
computer technology at the expense of a paying audience.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Virus (1999)
The true invigorating art of science fiction and horror is quickly
fizzling out in Hollywood.  Like comedy (especially in television),
these genres are extremely hard to succeed at.  Never easy but often
attempted, the absurdity of many of them rarely pan out into becoming
unintentional comedies but that's what happens in 'Virus'.
The opening scene unravels like a cheesy bad dream in the South Pacific
where a Russian ship carrying satellite and computer technology and in
contact with the MIR space station, suddenly becomes paralyzed when a
strange force field in outer space sends a shock wave through MIR and
directly connects it to the ship.  Many pieces of equipment are
destroyed, the crew is seemingly incapacitated and things fade to
black.  
FADE IN: An expedition team is traveling through the South Pacific.  Led
by the captain (Donald Sutherland), he is hauling cargo using a platform
connected to a towing line that's connected to his barge.  Other members
of his team are William Baldwin and Jamie Lee Curtis, both of whom give
extremely bland performances as the banality of their characters suffers
from an over extended screenplay of intimate shock value throughout its
running time and a lot of action scenes that don't flow smoothly but
rather come off as short controlled bursts of energy and not as genuine
moments of excitement.  A raging typhoon forces the captain's cargo to
be cut for fear of bringing down the entire vessel.  The crew finds the
Russian ship and figure out that maritime law allows them to salvage its
remains and walk away with approximately 30 million dollars.  They soon
learn that like the rules of old fashioned material greed dictate, there
is no such thing as easy money.
The film takes a sharp turn here after a somewhat promising start.  The
basic premise is simply that the force field that struck the ship from
MIR is breathing life into a new form of alien technology that allows
mechanical parts to assemble themselves and gives them the will to kill
humans and use them as spare parts in mechanical assembly.  Sort of like
the Borg from 'Star Trek: The Next Generation'.  Oh, where is there a
nuclear device when you need one?
Gale Anne Hurd who has worked in a producing capacity for such films as
'The Terminator', 'Aliens', 'Tremors', and 'Dante's Peak', takes another
stab at her craft with 'Virus' and the film's title, I'm sure, is no pun
intended at making fans sick of it after about the first half hour.  Who
is John Bruno and where did he come from?  Another failed attempt at a
new director trying to teach an old genre new tricks and it doesn't
work.  After serving as a miscellaneous crew member for such films as
'Terminator 2: Judgment Day', 'Die Hard 2', 'The Abyss', and 'Heavy
Metal', Bruno is not suited to the top chair on the set of a motion
picture.  His direction of the film is bogged down under a lot of dark
and hollow scenes of repetitive energy.  The film fails for primarily
one reason: lack of scene diversity. If you're going to make a film
that's set primarily in one location for the entire running time, you
had better have a dynamite screenplay but this one is more like a weak
sparkler.  'Virus' put me in mind mostly of 1998's 'Sphere' where a
strange alien force was at work by the sea.  Maybe that's why both films
look watered down!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
The comparisons to 1994's 'Pulp Fiction are becoming absurd.  That film was
in a class by itself and will be recognizable in nostalgic flashbacks years
from now.  'Two Days in the Valley' (1996) and a few other 'Pulp Fiction'
wannabes are a waste of time and conversation.  
'Grosse Pointe Blank' is being compared to 'Pulp Fiction' and that is the
most ludicrous insult of them all.  Martin Blank (John Cusack) is a freelance
hitman and former government assassin who returns to his Michigan hometown
for his ten year high school reunion.  Along the way he finds some time to
spend with his psychiatrist (Alan Arkin) and rubs elbows with a fellow hitman
(Dan Aykroyd) whose trying to recruit Cusack into joining him in business as
a partner.  Upon returning to the place where he grew up, he visits his
mother living in a mental institution, visits his father's grave and stops by
to view the place his old house used to be and he is stunned to see it is now
the site of a convenience store. 
Throughout the course of the picture he is tailed by two government watchdogs
and another assassin working in tow with Aykroyd to eventually kill him and
he finally meets his high school sweetheart, the girl he stood up on prom
night (Minnie Driver).  She is stunned to see him again and plays hard to get
in a lovable fashion which brings back the good old days for the two of them.
'Grosse Pointe Blank' starts off in a most quirky and unusual fashion with a
likable tone and feel to it but as soon as Cusack and Driver meet, this
motion picture takes a sharp turn in the direction of being unbearably
abysmal; full of dialogue that has no coherent structure and has situations
and characters straight from the mannequins reject pile.  
It's such a disappointment to see John Cusack in a role that undercuts his
value as an actor and Cusack is an extremely respectable star who has made a
name for himself by wanting a low but noticeable profile in Hollywood since
most of his films are critical rather than financial successes.  'Grosse
Pointe Blank' leaves a bad taste in your mouth after you view it and revels
in its own imagined glory as it builds itself up to be more than it really is
and in the final payoff it falls flat on its face being full of meandering
dark humour and heartless characters, some of whom redeem themselves too late
and others who are unnecessary in the film's attempt to entertain.

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
As the medium of film grows larger with each passing year, movie audiences
are left with fewer original movies but as long as a film can still
entertain, it can still be called good.  In the case of 'Event Horizon', this
is a movie that isn't necessarily a copycat of past science fiction/horror
films but rather it has been influenced by them.  There are shades of
'Alien', 'The Exorcist', 'The Shining', '2001' and '2010' all mixed together
in one very collective blend to shock and electrify you and is not for the
faint of heart.  There are extreme moments of graphic violence mixed in with
a very loud and thunderous soundtrack and the special effects and art
direction/set decoration are eye catching to say the least.
Set 50 years in the future in the year 2047, 'Event Horizon' deals with a
group of space explorers led by Laurence Fishburne who travel to the far
reaches of Neptune to investigate a space ship launched from Earth 7 years
earlier which disappeared without a trace.  It is found and a doctor along
for the ride (Sam Neill) is the one who helped build and design the ship and
scientific technology has allowed him to create the outer space atmosphere
around it.  The exploration team discovers that the ship itself is now
possessed by a lifeforce of its own and it feeds on the fears and secrets of
humans who encounter it.  Sound like a 'B' movie plot?  Perhaps, but read on.
To understand and appreciate this movie you have to stretch the boundaries of
your imagination to a limit that perhaps may be a little too illogical and
there is no doubt that director Paul Anderson has gone over the top at times
but I still found the movie frightening, compelling and it has been a very
long time since I jumped up in my seat while watching a film.  Its religious
overtones may offend some and its tone is sharp but the film is evenly paced,
solidly edited (perhaps a bit too much at times) and technically efficient.
 If you enjoyed the movies I mentioned in the first paragraph of this review,
then 'Event Horizon' will satisfy your craving for this kind of
entertainment.  Don't see this one if you feel faint at the sight of blood
and it is not recommended for anyone that's ever covered their eyes during a
movie.

Title
Review for Meet Wally Sparks (1997)
     The outrageous antics of comedian Rodney Dangerfield are seen in such
hilarious films as 'Caddyshack' (1980), 'Easy Money' (1983) and 'Back to
School' (1986).  'Back to School' is probably the funniest and most likable
of these films but Dangerfield (who is 75) has lost his way pretty much with
'Meet Wally Sparks'.  
     Rodney portrays an unorthodox tabloid talk show host who becomes mixed
up in one wild situation with a southern governor and his family who are
extremely conservative.  Dangerfield's son becomes romantically involved with
the governor's daughter and a television executive's assistant who's trying
to have Rodney fired is in tow and gets exactly what he deserves.  Throw in a
political sex scandal and a head butting feud with Dangerfield's television
boss (Burt Reynolds) and you have the makings for a trivial and desperate
comedy of enormously bad proportions.
     Someone should have told Dangerfield (who co-wrote the picture) that
less is sometimes more and that good comedy doesn't necessarily include
throwing in everything but the kitchen sink in order to make people laugh and
the film degrades not only itself but the audience.  Furthermore the film is
bogged down with Dangerfield's one liners that are growing tiresome.  It's
slapstick humour is both juvenile and self defeating.  Given the limited
release this film had, I suspect that it may have been considered at some
point as a direct to video release.
     Dangerfield's fans will be pleased but others may feel that even though
we somehow know what to expect going in, we don't expect the humour to hammer
us over the head like a baseball bat.

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
"They don't make 'em like that anymore!"  That's what the true movie fan
will say and only a true cynic who is angry at the world, blaming it for
all of their personal failures will hate this film as it is nearly
impossible to truly dislike a film like 'Simon Birch'.  This film is
brimming with childhood innocence and coming of age and has enough light
hearted humour to fill the context of a two hour motion picture.  The
film plays like poetry.  It has its highs and it has its lows and I
don't mean that in terms of quality but in terms of emotion.
Based on 'A Prayer for Owen Meany' by John Irving, 'Simon Birch' has
within it a true story of optimism when life hands you a setback.  The
point of this film can be easily missed as it strives for its entire
running time to tell a story of how friendship can have no boundaries,
only commitments.
Ian Michael Smith is Simon Birch.  He's a twelve year old boy who has a
birth defect of inadequate growth.  He's an absolutely spirited human
being and for a boy of twelve, he has the wisdom and attitude of someone
three times his age.  He and his best friend, another 12 year-old played
by Joseph Mazzello ('Jurassic Park'), go about their everyday lives in
Gravestown, Maine in 1964.  Simon is a boy who isn't truly happy.  Wise
in the many ways of the world for a boy his age, Simon's parents neglect
him.  Never truly loving him for who he is but disappointed by the way
he was born.  It is a stigma many children suffer from.
Joseph Mazzello plays Joe Wenteworth, and his mother, portrayed by
Ashley Judd, is the town's live wire.  A beautiful and down to earth
woman who gave birth to Joe out of wedlock and refuses to name who his
father his.  In many ways, she acts as a substitute mother for Simon.
Making sweaters for him when it's cold, showering him with a kind word
and making him feel he's as good as anyone in the town are her assets
and she is the best character in the film.  I would like to see Judd
receive an Oscar nomination for this role as her character is the
emotional anchor of the film, even though she isn't in it as much as we,
who like this film, would enjoy seeing her.
One thing I would like to point out about 'Simon Birch' is that it is
flawed but very mildly.  There are traces of 'Stand by Me', 'Forrest
Gump', 'The Sweet Hereafter' and 'Made in Heaven' to be found but the
film's mild lack of originality is compensated by terrific performances
and a story that will be mistaken by many as manipulative when it's
really about one thing, humanity.  We are treated at the beginning of
the film to the somewhat surprising appearance of Jim Carrey who plays
Joe Wenteworth as a man in the present day, visiting friends of the past
and is the film's narrator.
Other major characters in the film are Oliver Platt as a suitor of Joe's
mother who Joe eventually grows fond of and David Strathairn who in many
ways plays the film's most enigmatic character.
I was stunned to see that many of the things that Simon and Joe go
through actually happened to me as a youngster and as many who see the
film will testify to, it is a film that brings back happier times in
one's life and is a film many can relate to.  People in many regards
don't go to the movies to be lectured to but 'Simon Birch' is the
perfect film to take children to as both an entertainment value and as a
lesson of life.
The film is written for the screen and directed by Mark Steven Johnson
who wrote both 'Grumpy Old Men' movies and 'Simon Birch' is a film that
will not be entirely appreciated for the moment but will be better
cherished a decade or more down the road.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
(this address will change in October 1998...details to follow)

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
'Mystery Men' has all of the ingredients of a typical 1990's film that looks
like an adult comic book layered with special effects.  Naturally it's all
computerized and has paid advertising seen throughout the film by the
corporate states of America.  The hero, Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear) wears
his outfit plastered with ads from sponsors and the film's bizarre visuals
look in many cases like 'Batman' and 'Blade Runner' on LSD.
Now that you have an idea of how it looks, it's important to tell you how it
feels.  There are moments of sporadic laughter but the film has clumsy
execution and an even clumsier tone.  The way the heroes carry out their
mission is unconvincing in the face of unspeakable evil and no one would
believe for a second that they could overcome their adversaries and save the
day for the forces of good.
Mr. Furious (Ben Stiller), the Blue Raja (Hank Azaria), the Bowler (Janeane
Garofalo), the Shoveler (William H. Macy), Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell), the
Spleen (Paul Reubens) are a team of wannabe heroes.  Some of them have fake
accents, some use the tools of mere mortals and in general look like a gang
of club members who got together in one afternoon and decided to be crime
fighters and went to the nearest garage sale to get their arsenal of
weapons.  Forks, shovels and other oddities are used and in the opening
scene we find they need a lot of work when they try and save a seniors home
from a group of invading meanies.  The original members of the group are Mr
Furious, the Blue Raja and the Shoveler.  They are joined later by the
Bowler, Invisible Boy and the Spleen.  The most intriguing member of the
group is the Bowler (Garofolo) who has the skull of her dead father inside
her ball and brags effortlessly that "The guy at the pro shop did it for
me."
When Captain Amazing is held captive in the evil clutches of Casanova
Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush), the heroes try and save him but have to deal
with the goons aiding the chief bad guy.  Casanova Frankenstein's plot is to
destroy the city that kept him in an insane asylum for many torturous years.
With his ego the size a dozen pro athletes, some would argue that Captain
Amazing's eventual fate is justice in the making while the amateurs get all
the deserving glory.
Director Kinka Usher catapults the film like a guided missile gone awry.  I
enjoyed some of the antics and the way it made me laugh from time to time
but overall I just couldn't find enough to sustain a film with a running
length of 121 minutes.  Neil Cuthbert is the author of the film's screenplay
based on the comic book series Dark Horse created by Bob Burden.
In my review of 1998's 'There's Something About Mary', I criticized the film
for going too far in its display of overly crude material and I said that
Ben Stiller was rather flat and unfunny.  In 'Mystery Men' I found that his
performance as the most screwed up hero probably looked good on paper but
his execution of it is comparable to the least funny member of the original
Three Stooges.  The rest of the cast members are very flat and the fact that
there are definitely too many of them makes it hard to root for any single
one of them.
Throughout the history of film, many have argued that some material just
isn't capable of being filmed.  Some literature worked better in plain text
on paper.  Some of it looks better as images in squares known as comic books
and while special effects have worked marvelously for many films in the
nineties, just as many of them have suffered from overkill and have passed
themselves off as flash over substance.  'Mystery Men' may be 1999's
ultimate definition of that.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
How typical!  Joel Schumacher, who is currently destabilizing,
dismantling, and destroying the Batman franchise, has taken a different
turn, definitely not for the better with his latest effort (ha!)
entitled '8MM'.  Once again Schumacher (who should be relegated to
directing t.v. commercials and music videos) pushes us away instead, and
instead of drawing us in, he makes the fatal mistake of handing the
audience a movie that has too much literal meaning and not enough space
to let the audience digest one course before he crams another down our
throats.  It would have been a pleasant experience to see this film use
violence, pornography and psychotic lunatics as a metaphor for a missing
persons case that had great potential contained within its story line.
But instead, Schumacher and writer Andrew Kevin Walker ('Seven'), have
given us a movie that is as pleasant as going through a fun house with
actual booby traps rigged to literally kill you.
Nicolas Cage stars as a Pittsburgh private investigator who takes a case
offered to him by a wealthy widow and her business manager/attorney
(Anthony Heald).  The woman's husband was an industrial czar. Upon
settling his estate a strange 8MM film exists that was in his possession
that basically turns out to be a sadistic porno film where a young woman
is sexually tortured.  It's not certain that she was murdered which is
the thrust of the case: to find out if she was.  Cage finds the girl's
mother (Amy Morton) who wants answers in the disappearance of her
daughter.  His investigation of the case takes him to Los Angeles where
he meets a porno shop employee (Joaquin Phoenix) who helps Cage find
disruptive and illegal material in porno's sickest places where the
young woman in question may have been photographed.  Cage's search also
takes him to New York where he encounters some seedy and unspeakably
evil porno peddlers (James Gandolfini and Peter Stormare) who turn out
to be killers in disguise.
1989's 'Field of Dreams' is not a baseball film.  It used baseball as a
poetic metaphor to help a man "ease his pain" and redeem himself.  It's
probably the best film in the last decade to find a subject like
baseball, and use it as a metaphor to project the image of good story
telling.  '8MM' goes right for the jugular in all the wrong ways and
looks a lot like a big budget porno film and can be described as a movie
becoming a victim of its own subject matter that wallows in the excess
of its own seediness and has little room for the audience to react in
anything more than standard fashion.  The film at times just seems to be
going through the motions with wooden direction, a bland performance by
Cage and a clandestine feeling of being trapped --- already experienced
by 1995's 'Seven'.
Another problem with this film is its editing.  It's too static at times
and too quick at other times and comes across as very sloppy and
uneven.  Some of the situations and dialogue are also absurd.  We see
that Cage has a wife (Catherine Keener) and baby daughter and his wife
is constantly showing her faithful traits towards her husband and
supports him in his career and later in the film, she threatens to leave
him if his work continues to dominate his life.  A bit much after
showing her support earlier in the film.  It seems totally out of
character for her and a contradiction on the writer's part.
Big, brooding, and unpleasant without making you feel entertained are
just some ways to describe '8MM' which is artificial entertainment
disguised as a wannabe thriller that had audiences I saw with it, bolt
for the door upon the first closing credit on the screen.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
White knuckler!  That's the term that first came to mind when figuring out how
to describe 'Breakdown'.  Kurt Russell and Kathleen Quinlan play a young
couple traveling across the United States as Russell is in the process of
changing jobs and their journey from Massachusetts to California takes an
unexpected and nightmarish jolt in the Arizona desert when they are set up by
a team of criminals (led by J.T. Walsh) who trap and extort money from upper
income and wealthy people using kidnapping and murder to get what they want.
The casting of Kurt Russell in this motion picture is most effective as
Russell is a perfect portrait of the everyday man and doesn't ruin the film
by becoming a macho and unbelievable wrecking machine which is the trademark
set by stars such as Arnold Schwarzenegger, Sylvester Stallone and Bruce
Willis.  
The set up, midsection, and conclusion of 'Breakdown' are all extremely vivid
and credible and the movie is also vividly surreal in telling a story that
can happen to anyone.  Director Jonathan Mostow has selected a captivating
and borderline macabre tone to the entire film paying tribute to the master
of macabre himself, Alfred Hitchcock.  While the film never crosses the line
into macabre storytelling, it certainly plants its toes on the finish line.
 'Breakdown' is also spellbinding in keeping the audience guessing as to what
exactly is going on until you figure things out at about the halfway point.  
The talents of under rated character actor J.T. Walsh are executed
brilliantly in this movie as Walsh's portrayal of evil is as mind numbing and
bone chilling as any villain in recent memory.  I would have liked to have
seen his character utilized a bit more on an expanded level in 'Breakdown'
 but he is terrific nonetheless.  
While 'Breakdown' borrows from a number of motion pictures such as
'Deliverance' (1972), and most recently 'The Vanishing' (1993), it manages to
establish its own identity by creating an acceptable amount of violent
tension relevant to the story and an adult theme that will keep you on the
edge of your seat for its entire running time courtesy of the screenplay by
director Mostow and his writing partner Sam Montgomery and keeping an
audience on the edge of their seats is what movies are all about.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
Cast - Paul Newman, Linda Fiorentino, Dermot Mulroney
Directed by - Marek Kanievska
Written by - E. Max Frye, Topper Lilien and Carroll Cartwright
Produced by - Ridley Scott, Charles Weinstock, and Chris Zarpas
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - PG-13 (Parental
Guidance-13), Rated PG-13 for some sexual content
Running Length - 89 minutes
Distributor - USA Films
Paul Newman has announced that he will soon retire from the medium of film.
He says he wants to make a couple of more films and will retire sometime in
2001.  He also mentioned that he would like to do another film with his wife
Joanne Woodward and that would be a great swan song in the career of the
second greatest actor in the history of American cinema, behind Al Pacino.
Newman has been nominated for the Oscar eight times as an actor and has also
received a nomination for producing 1968's 'Rachel, Rachel', which he also
directed.  Newman owns three awards from the Academy, for best actor in
1986's 'The Color of Money', an honorary Oscar for his entire body of work
and the Jean Hersholt humanitarian award for his charitable efforts.  Newman
is a stand up guy, a great role model for upcoming actors and lives the kind
of clean Hollywood lifestyle others could take a lesson from.  Newman is 75
and can still act with the best of them. His part in 'Where the Money Is'
makes Newman look semi-retired and his work in the film, with all due
respect, is something he could have made more of it but he is still fine
nevertheless.
There's are two movies I kept thinking of while watching 'Where the Money
Is'.  The first one is entitled 'The Brink's Job' from 1978 and 'The
In-Laws' in 1979, both starring actor Peter Falk.  'The Brink's Job' is sort
of self explanatory by the nature of its title and is a better look at an
armoured car robbery story and is based on a true story about a famous 1950
Brink's caper that rocked the city of Boston.
'Where the Money Is' is a docile attempt to weave a somewhat interesting
plot about an armoured car robbery with the lives of those wishing for
something better by collecting the loot from it.  The film is also a cake
walk for Newman, and the rest of the cast for that matter.  This film
probably would have gone straight to video if it wasn't for the charismatic
performance by Newman who acts as the anchor for this movie and saves all of
those in front of and behind the camera from being totally forgotten.
It tells the story of a convicted bank robber named Henry Manning (Paul
Newman) who is living in a nursing home and he reportedly has suffered a
stroke and is unresponsive to anything around him.  Nurse Carol Ann McKay
(Linda Fiorentino) believes that given the past of this colourful criminal
that he's faking his ailment and she tries to prove it.  She tries to turn
on the charm by doing things like sitting on Henry's lap etc, etc.  After
getting desperate, Carol indeed proves that Henry is faking his condition by
throwing him and his wheelchair for a special kind of ride.  Carol wants to
liven up her marriage by going along on a robbery caper with Henry and her
husband Wayne (Dermot Mulroney) agrees, reluctantly, to go along with the
robbery caper and together, this threesome embark on a night of posing as
armoured car guards and heist a truck and carry out robberies by making
merchants think they're the real thing, just filling in for the evening and
their uniforms and acts of persuasion are very convincing.
The problem with 'Where the Money Is' is that it has no edge.  It moves
along well but has the look of a television movie and really has no
excitement.  It's not that it was intended that way but director Marek
Kanievska and writers E. Max Frye, Topper Lilien and Carroll Cartwright (why
did it take three people to write this?) have made a genteel type of movie
that you can take your grandparents to see in proud fashion on a Sunday
afternoon with little or few people in the theatre to bother you.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Absence of Malice (1981)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     The first amendment of the U.S. constitution guarantees freedom of the
press.  Many feel that with freedom comes responsibility and the media is
often irresponsible in many of the stories it covers.  A half a million
people died through butchering in only six months in the tiny African nation
of Rwanda.  Yet the silly O.J. Simpson story which was in the public eye at
the same time got more coverage overall in the press than the Rwanda
situation did.  People will say that the media was just giving people what
they wanted but is this entirely true?  '60 Minutes' continues to be a top
ten show and managed to remain in the top 10 when a large number of the 1997
World Series games bumped many popular shows out of the top 10 that week.
The success of '60 Minutes' is due largely in part to its responsible and
original programming of issues that don't necessarily make the front page in
other mainstream media.  '60 Minutes' refused to cover any of the O.J. saga.
It continues to be a respected and entertaining show.
     I had a friend (more of an acquaintance, actually) who believed that
'Raiders of the Lost Ark' was such a great movie that it deserved an Oscar
nomination for its writing.  I'm not taking anything away from 'Raiders' but
as great a film as it was, it was hardly a stupendously written film.  It
was an update of those Saturday afternoon serials people used to go to the
movies and see in the 1930's.  A grade 'A' film with a 'B' movie script.
So, because of that, the Academy decided to go with five other original
screenplays, 'Arthur', 'Atlantic City', 'Chariots of Fire'(the winner),
'Reds' and 'Absence of Malice'.
     Set in Miami, the film told the story of a businessman (Paul Newman)
who was implicated by a local newspaper in some illegal dealings.  The
reporter in charge of the story (Sally Field) is being tricked by a
government bureaucrat into printing the false story about Newman.  She hides
behind her paper's legal department and the first amendment.  Newman comes
looking for her and his confrontation is also with the paper's editors and
attorneys.  Secretly, he plots to get even with those who have slandered him.  
     The story also focuses on Newman's relationship with his sister
(Melinda Dillon) who lives in a convent and she is extremely repressed.
Through constant meetings with Field, Newman states the moral position the
media should take in reporting the truth and not speculation.  One scene has
the two of them on Newman's boat just a few miles off shore and Newman tells
her the reason he wanted to meet like this is because he didn't want to meet
in a place like a restaurant where she could easily get up and walk out.  He
also says at one point in the film he will tell her the truth about his
business dealings if she wants to know as a "person" and not as a "reporter".
     The film is directed splendidly by Sydney Pollack who captures a sense
of simplicity in dealing with a complex issue and the Oscar nominated
screenplay by Kurt Luedtke is filled with moral examinations and a climax
set where an investigation of the paper's practices come under scrutiny.
'Absence of Malice' isn't just about media ethics, it's about observing how
one man's life can be turned upside down by the press and remembering that
none of us are immune from it.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith at:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm 

Title
Review for Five Easy Pieces (1970)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
I guess Jack Nicholson must be good friends with director Bob Rafelson.
As a director, Rafelson has made only 12 movies in 31 years and six of
them have been with Jack and with the exception of 1997's 'Blood and
Wine', I never really liked anything made by Rafelson and his films with
Jack, aside from 'Blood and Wine' are 'Head' (1968), 'The King of Marvin
Gardens' (1972), the remake of 'The Postman Always Rings Twice' (1981),
'Man Trouble' (1992) and, alas, 'Five Easy Pieces'.
I know this film has been hailed by people everywhere since it came out
but the film just flat out did not draw me in.  I didn't care about the
people involved.  It's clearly the type of film that needs a good music
score and hardly has any score at all and no one in the cast seems to
stand out besides Nicholson.  What is remarkably disappointing about
'Five Easy Pieces' is the fact that the film is alarmingly flat.  It has
no zest and its only good point, as mentioned, is the commendable
performance by Nicholson.  As a confused young man with the gift of
musical genius bottled up inside him, Nicholson gives a commanding
performance that brought him his first Best Actor Oscar nomination.  He
lost the award to George C. Scott in 'Patton' but it remains the film
that launched Nicholson's career and he would receive two other Oscar
nominations ('The Last Detail', and 'Chinatown') before winning the
prize in 1975 for 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest'.
'Five Easy Pieces' is an enigma in the way it displays Nicholson's
character and I did enjoy, somewhat, the way the film built itself up by
revealing many traits of Nicholson's genius before we discover the
family from hell that he left behind a long time ago.  A recent survey
of people across America in 1998 revealed that 71 per cent of them had
started a new job within the last three years.  The average person will
change careers 10 times in their life and that number will probably grow
as the faster the world will continue to turn faster and faster.
Nicholson's character is one with no focus.  He resides with his live-in
girlfriend (Karen Black), and their relationship is rather rocky and
Nicholson wants to abandon the responsibility of marrying her like many
of the other responsibilities he ran away from in his life.  We discover
that Nicholson had a gift for being a great pianist but gave it all up
to work on an oil rig where he hates his boss and spars with his friend
who is later dragged off by the authorities on suspicion of robbery.
One scene has Nicholson hopping out of his friend's car and jumping on
to the back of a moving truck where a piano is tied down and as the
traffic begins to move, Nicholson stays on it, playing the instrument as
it pulls onto a collector lane, leaving his friend behind.  The most
powerful scene in the film is the one where Nicholson explains to his
father, who is confined to a wheelchair and can't speak, that he
regretted abandoning the family after seeing how his father ended up.
In many ways 'Five Easy Pieces' reminded me more of a television movie
than a big screen motion picture.  This is the film that made Jack
famous with his infamous "chicken salad sandwich speech" where he puts a
waitress in her place when she refuses to bring him what he wants as she
quips that it isn't on the menu.  I think this is another example of a
potentially great film made only average by an average director and
while I feel it is only average, I can understand why others hail it as
great---especially those fond of character studies.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
It would be easy to miss the point of a film like 'Hurlyburly'.  That is
if it had one. I've been a movie critic for 15 years and I don't think
I've ever seen a more pointless film that rambles on and on and on like
a broken record and when it's over, it's no closer to having said
anything in its final 10 minutes than in its opening running time of the
same length.
Set in Hollywood Hills, Eddie and Mickey (Sean Penn and Kevin Spacey)
play room mates who are successful talent agency executives and are well
on their way to becoming major Hollywood players.  They wallow in all
the excesses of classic tinsel town life.  Snorting cocaine, picking up
drifting hookers and bringing them home for wild sex, indulging
themselves in the extremes of alcohol.  And when it's all said and done,
it's real but you won't care one bit.
Also along for the socially unredeeming ride is Phil (Chazz
Palminteri).  Phil is an ex-con who always wears a leather jacket and
tries to pass himself off as the GQ end of the movie business.  Nothing
more than a Hollywood wannabe, Phil wants to be a stuntman and goes on
endless cattle calls only to be passed over each time he auditions. 
Quick tempered and having had many different children with many
different women, Phil is perhaps the most amoral of the bunch and his
fate is of little consequence or surprise.
Others characters in the film are Artie (Gary Shandling).  Artie is a
close friend of Eddie and Mickey's who pops by for the occasional boys
night out and his character is perhaps the most pointless male in the
film.  The female characters are even more disappointing.  Meg Ryan is
Bonnie, a stripper with a child who comes to party at the whim of a
phone call.  Robin Wright Penn is Darlene, an actress struggling to make
it with more than just her talent and Anna Paquin is Donna, a drifter
and air head who looks for her next meal ticket and place to call home
around every corner.
'Hurlyburly' has a companion film in 1998 known as 'High Art'.  This
film knew when to listen and when to keep quiet.  It displayed the seedy
side of big city life, the consequences of drug use, and low morals with
polish and a sedated side to its personality.  'Hurlyburly' is like a
car wreck with no chance to breathe, an extremely high decibel level,
and a screenplay by David Rabe, based on his play, that tries too hard
to look like a well written piece of art when it is nothing more than a
two hour play on semantics with a calculating sense of the preposterous.
Director Anthony Drazan is a slave to the film's screenplay, adding no
injection of his own vision and there is a scene in the final third of
the film where Eddie and Darlene have sex and upon leaving the bed, the
long arm of a boom mic is visible in a mirror for about thirty seconds! 
This really is professional film making?!
How a cast like this could be coaxed into such a mess is a mystery. 
Despite their energy and convincing styles, I suspect that they wanted
to make a film with long takes, limited editing and a chance to put any
actor's true test of talent (the stage) on celluloid in a filmed stage
play that is as desirable to watch as falling into a bottomless
pit.             
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Atlantic City (1980)
Some actors find success in their careers sooner rather than later and vice
versa but in the case of Burt Lancaster it was pretty much a smooth ride all
the way.  Lancaster died in 1994 his career began in 1946 with a picture
entitled 'The Killing' and his career really took off in the 1950's with 'Jim
Thorpe: All American' (1951), 'Come Back Little Sheba' (1952) and the movie
that would bring him his first Oscar nomination, 'From Here to Eternity'
(1953).  'From Here to Eternity' would win eight Oscars and really launch
Lancaster's career and he would win the Best Actor Oscar in 1960 for 'Elmer
Gantry'.  In that film he played a second rate preacher whose moral
followings were called into question.  Lancaster's career cooled off somewhat
in the late 1960's and for most of the 70's but he would make a comeback with
one on his finest performances in 'Atlantic City U.S.A.' (1980).  This
Canadian and French production first released abroad with the above mentioned
title would come to the U.S. in 1981 with the title 'Atlantic City' and play
across the country including a run in a Los Angeles theatre to qualify it for
Oscar consideration which it got being nominated for five Oscars: Best
Picture, Actor (Lancaster), Actress (Susan Sarandon), Director (Louis Malle)
and Original Screenplay (John Guare).  It would not win any of them.
Lancaster plays Lou, a man who brags about a flamboyant and high profile
career in crime but in reality is a small time loser with dreams that never
succeeded into making him anything more than a two bit hood.  He and Sarandon
live in the same apartment building and he watches her constantly through his
window and secretly falls in love.  Director Louis Malle brilliantly directed
this film with a distinctly European flavour and managed to tell a story
without pretention and one full of strong characters.  Sarandon plays a
casino employee training to become a hot shot card dealer and that isn't the
only deal that goes down.  Her sister and lover come to visit and the lover
(Canadian actor Robert Joy) becomes involved in a drug deal which embroils
Sarandon and Lancaster heavily in the plot.
Lancaster's character would prove to have some noble qualities as he tries to
protect Sarandon's honor and life from the scum of society.  His romantic
consumation of their relationship is based purely on lust while Sarandon uses
him in a somewhat justifiable manner out of a sense of survival and need.
 It's one of the most unusual love stories you will ever see.  'Atlantic
City' manages to convince its audience that while it stands up as a
respectable character study, it's also a story of human nature at its most
immoral and has the stamina to invoke itself as a classic motion picture
without popularity but takes its place as a buried treasure.  
Other members of the cast are largely made up of talented actors and notable
personalities such as English born but Canadian raised Kate Reid and
Canadians Hollis McLaren, Harvey Atkin and Al Waxman.
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review 

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
At a perfect running length of 80 minutes, 'The Blair Witch Project' is a
completely fictional film that looks ferociously like a documentary.  It
uses mostly the thought of horror instead of visual horror itself to make
its effective showcase a truly memorable horror film that will have you
looking over your shoulder in the theatre. That's something few big budget
Hollywood films these days are able to do.  The film was made for around
thirty thousand dollars, the cost of a new car with several luxuries and is
destined to do well with young audiences.
Based on the fictional premise that a group of young student film makers
went into the woods in October 1994 to film a story about the legendary
Blair witch, gives 'The Blair Witch Project' its name. Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard play the threesome who are ambitious yet
naive, disorganized, irresponsible much of the time, and most of all
tenacious. The film reports that during the week or so they went hiking in
the reclusive woods of Maryland, they were never heard from again and that
their footage was found a year after their disappearance and that footage is
their story.
It begins with the group using various methods of recording such as both
black and white and colour to tell the story of how they are preparing to
leave for their excursion. We see them at home, in the driveway and in their
hotel on 16 mm film. Then the film picks up considerably from this point.
They talk to various people who have heard stories of the legendary Blair
witch, some believing in the story and some not. Their journey into the
forest gives them the lesson of their lives which may be their last. This
film may do for camping what 'Jaws' did for going swimming in the ocean. One
of the people in the town with whom they spoke before leaving for the woods,
tells of a story about a strange collection of rocks in a certain
arrangement. They find it and it becomes part of their story as a chill is
sent down their spines about this prophecy coming true and the consequences
that may come with it. They also find a ritual style of trees arranged in a
frightening manner which further threatens their sanity which they later try
desparately to maintain.
As the film moves on, their first night in the woods goes without much of a
hitch. As things go on they get worse and worse. One of them throws the map
away that was their salvation out of the forest, they run low on food and
water and hike around in a circle only to find themselves back where they
started. They make a humourous reference to the film 'Deliverance' which is
intended to get a few laughs. They hear strange noises in dark and far away
places in the woods at night and feel that their lives are in danger.
Tempers flare and we see this all done in a true professional style with a
script that looks like it was ALL improvised. In fact, much of the film was
reportedly improvised but not knowing which scenes were and which weren't
make it seem all the more impressive in its final blend. In a big Hollywood
production you can usually tell which parts are improvised. The acting is
top notch as we see the shift in friendships turn to hate and frustration.
Film makers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez have written, directed and
edited a documentary style motion picture (and you still won't believe that
it ISN'T a documentary) that shows they have a promising career if they stay
focused with their own visions and don't sell out to the Hollywood style
claptrap. The Cohen brothers ('Fargo') have been the main artists that have
avoided doing this and are the true material that film students should take
their cues from.  Perhaps Myrick and Sanchez have.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for One Fine Day (1996)
Scheduled to open on December 20th is the comedy/drama 'One Fine Day'
starring Michelle Pfeiffer and George Clooney.  I had the opportunity to
view this movie in advance on the evening of December 5th here in my
hometown through various established contacts and I can tell you right now
that there's no need to hold your breath.  The movie is set in New York
City and Pfeiffer and Clooney star as the parents of kindergarten aged
children who arrive one morning escorting their offspring to school and
they are late and the class has already left for their scheduled field
trip.  She is an architect on the verge of a major promotion within her
company and he is a high profile journalist working on the most important
story of his life.  They are forced to juggle the needs of their children
and their careers and are inadvertently thrown together for ONE FINE DAY
of course meaning it will be one of the most chaotic and alarming days in
memory as they must bring small children to work with them!  Unfortunately
you can't build a film with a running time of 108 minutes simply around a
premise.  The premise must expand into plot and develop gears to get off
the ground.  This film never does that and I looked at my watch at
precisely the 24 minute mark which is a bad sign.  Clooney, who has struck
gold on television's 'ER' and who is presently shoooting next summer's
'Batman and Robin' in which he will star as the caped crusader is the only
character with some interesting aspects.  He makes the most of a
repetitive script by adding an easy going charm and likeability while
Pfeiffer suffers badly in a role that gives working women a bad name and
really makes them the target of male chauvanism.  The film plays more like
a network television movie rather than a big screen Hollywood presentation
and I was actually offended at the amount of unintended child neglect that
is associated with this film.  Michelle Pfeiffer is a remarkably talented
actress and gained breakthrough recognition and critical acclaim in 1983's
'Scarface' as Al Pacino's trashy and drug addicted wife.  Clooney has had
small success on the big screen but gained some surprisingly good notices
earlier this year for Robert Rodriguez's 'From Dusk Till Dawn' as a
murdering escaped prisoner on the lam in Texas trying to make it to the
Mexican border with his sexually psychotic brother and a family he's taken
hostage.  Clooney was one of the most chilling and unrepenting bad guys in
recent memory in that movie which was indefensible garbage.  I would like
to see Clooney perform well in a good film instead of being the standout
character in really bad movie which has been happening a lot lately.  'One
Fine Day' even has the nerve to insult us by having its two leading
characters who hate each other at the beginning of the movie slowly fall
in love and bring us to a disappointing conclusion.  I've given away
nothing but what a cliche!

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
Albert Brooks is a successful and respected entertainer for two reasons.
One, he is a great example of the ordinary guy in just about every movie he
does which most of us can relate to and two, his writing has a biting
sensation of reality and often a radical perception of reality many refuse to
face.  'Lost in America' (1985), 'Broadcast News' (1987) and 'Defending Your
Life' (1991) are all examples of Brooks' talent both diverse and highly
entertaining.  'Defending Your Life' was a fantasy but I can picture many
people believing what the afterlife might be the same way Brooks portrayed it
in that movie.  Debbie Reynolds is 'Mother.'  Her two sons played by Albert
Brooks and Rob Morrow are respectable, hard working men but mother has
favoured her sports agent son, Morrow over Brooks who is a writer of glib
science fiction.  A wonderful wife and two kids is a great bonus for Morrow
while Brooks being twice divorced doesn't sit well with his family.  Brooks
drives from Los Angeles to San Francisco and moves back in with mother and
his reason is that it's an 'experiment' to see if he can somehow figure out
his relationship with his mother then maybe he can finally adjust to finding
the right mate and finally adjust to women in all aspects of his life.  This
movie is filled with situations that will almost certainly make a lot of men
say "Hey, I've had that experience with my mother!" or "Wow, I can't believe
how this movie details the little things that cause friction in a
relationship!"  It's a dark and humourous and pain stakingly detailed
screenplay co-written by Brooks and directed by the man himself.  Mother is
one of the most realistic slices of life I've ever seen and I related to it
better than most movies I saw in 1996 and Debbie Reynolds is terrific as the
mother who offers love, advice and compassion in an unorthodox and least
obvious way towards her sons.  Albert Brooks is a treat as always and this
gem of a movie is certain to become another buried treasure which will
probably find a huge following on home video as its theatre release has been
limited.  For everyone that's ever had a mother, don't miss this one!

Title
Review for Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977)
By 1977 director Steven Spielberg had already established himself as a world
class filmmaker with 'Jaws' in 1975 and his big screen debut in 1974 entitled
'The Sugarland Express'.  While the former was obviously the more popular,
many of Spielberg's fans also recall an ingenious television movie he did in
1971 entitled 'Duel' which is a cult favourite among many film fanatics,
myself included.  Born in Cincinnatit, Ohio in 1947, Spielberg achieved
greatness in the art of filmmaking before he was thirty years old.
Undoubtedly the greatest creative mind working in film in the last twenty
five years, Spielberg's films invoke debate everytime someone asks "What is
his masterpiece?"  Is it 'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial' (1982)?   This was a
gentle and loving film about the child in all of us and a moving, simplistic
fantasy with religious implications done in a most tolerable fashion.  Is it
'Schindler's List' (1993)?  This harrowing story about the holocaust and one
of the most original looking and important film of the twentieth century was
the film that earned Spielberg recognition among his peers with seven Academy
Awards including Best Picture and Best Director for Spielberg himself.  I
suspect that if you ask Spielberg what the crowning achievement in his career
is, he will vote for this one and rightfully so.
But what about 'Close Encounters of the Third Kind' (1977)?  It too is a
subject for debate when considering what exactly is Spielberg's masterpiece.
Written as well as directed by Spielberg himself, the film was a creative
odyssey which was released the same year as the phenomenal 'Star Wars' and
the strength of 'Close Encounters' along with most films that year was
diminished quite a bit by George Lucas' vision of other worlds aside from our
own.  Like Stanley Kubrick's '2001: A Space Odyssey' (1968), 'Close
Encounters' was a motion picture well ahead of its time.  Also like '2001',
'Close Encounters' failed to secure a Best Picture nomination but Spielberg
like Kubrick for '2001', respectively, was nominated as Best Director.  The
creative culture lessons of the 1950's showed beings from another planet as
mostly hostile towards Earth with 'War of the Worlds' (1953) and 'Invasion of
the Body Snatchers' (1956).  These films acted as metaphors for communism as
the cold war reached its peak in the 1950's.  Even 'The Day the Earth Stood
Still' (1951) has a classic presence in motion picture history as it serves
as a message for peace among Earthlings with drastic consequences from other
worlds if that cannot be attained.
It has been reported that like 'Star Wars' and the recently released twenty
fifth anniversary edition of 'The Godfather' (1972) that 'Close Encounters'
will get a release sometime later this year for its twentieth anniversary.
It was a huge box office success for its time and will undoubtedly do well
again as its closest ally (television's 'The X-Files') will serve as an
unintentional promoter because its subject matter is obviously a parallel to
'Close Encounters' but the television series takes it one step further by
implying government conspiracies and colonies of aliens living among the
people of Earth.  'The X-Files' is definitely about having a close encounter
with aliens and while there is no direct connection between it and 'Close
Encounters', they are distant cousins whether they want to admit it or not.
Richard Dreyfuss stars in 'Close Encounters' as a working man from Indiana
who is confronted on a dark road one evening by an alien space ship which
causes his vehicle to disrupt in many different ways and as the film develops
Dreyfuss becomes obsessed with meaning of his encounter and becomes involved
with a single mother (Melinda Dillon) who has lost her little boy to an alien
abduction.  Throughout the course of the film there is a constant theme of
preparation for an alien visit as two men (Bob Balaban and the late Francois
Truffaut) supposedly two scientists with government connections, travel to
distant places like Mexico and India to follow up with people who have had an
alien encounter of some sort.  There is the development of language and
communication as hand signals and musical riffs are used to make contact with
the the extra-terrestrials who would surface in the film's hypnotic climax
set at Devil's Tower in Wyoming.
With eight Oscar nominations and one win for the searing cinematography by
veteran cameraman Vilmos Zsigmond as well as being voted a special award for
Sound Effects Editing, 'Close Encounters of the Third Kind' is definitely one
of Spielberg's finest films and is one of the most original movies dealing
with the concept of determining what exactly this man's masterpiece is.  The
debate continues.....     

Title
Review for Godfather: Part II, The (1974)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
There are very few movie sequels that are better than the original and
while most are not, there have been some exceptions.  Personally, I
enjoyed the second installment in the 'Alien' series, directed by James
Cameron which, so far, has been the most exciting.  'Lethal Weapon 2' is
better than the original and along with 'The Empire Strikes Back', 'The
Godfather Part II' is debated by more people, particularly film buffs,
as being superior or almost as good as its original.  'The Godfather' is
my favorite film of all time and 'The Godfather Part III' in 1990 serves
as an entertaining film in which director Francis Ford Coppola finds a
new angle worthy of exploring.  It details how the Corleone family tries
to go legitimate and how their destiny prevents them from doing so.
'The Godfather Part II' falls just short of being better than the
original 'Godfather' film for two reasons.  It has a more cerebral pace
than the first film and it's technically flat.  Coppola hardly moves the
camera at all and the editing is standard with no real inventive cuts
possessing greatness.  Don't get me wrong, the film is still brilliant
and ranks as #3 on my all time list.  I am only comparing it to 'The
Godfather' and not other films in general.  The academic qualities in
'The Godfather Part II' are its saving grace.  Character development,
clandestine scenes of criminal activity and thought provoking dialogue
with a dramatic wit are in many ways, as compelling as the first film.
'The Godfather' starts in 1945 and spans approximately ten years.  As
'The Godfather Part II' opens, Michael Corleone is now head of America's
most powerful organized crime family and a servant kisses his hand over
the opening theme music and the two of them leave Michael's office with
Michael's leather backed chair in focus symbolizing the throne of a
king.  Next, the setting is Sicily, circa 1901.  The lettered message
across the screen tells us that Vito Corleone (Marlon Brando's character
from the first film) was born Vito Andolini in the town of Corleone in
Sicily.  His father and brother were murdered by the local Mafia
chieftain who murders Vito's mother and the young boy Vito, nine years
old in 1901, is sent by friends to America where he arrives at Ellis
Island.  The film then shifts forward to 1958, three years after 'The
Godfather' left off and we are witnessed to Anthony Corleone's first
communion ceremony.  Anthony is Michael's son, and the Corleone family
has now moved all of their business interests and living quarters to
Lake Tahoe, Nevada.  There is a big party on the property to celebrate
the boy's important religious occasion; much in the same way a wedding
was used in the first half hour or so in 'The Godfather' to introduce
its characters to the audience.  Michael (Al Pacino) returns with his
brothers Tom (Robert Duvall) and Fredo (John Cazale).  Their mother
(Morgana King) and sister Connie (Talia Shire) are shown along with
Michael's wife Kay (Diane Keaton) and a new character named Frank
Pentangeli (Michael V. Gazzo) would turn out to be a pivotal character
later in the film.
One of the first meetings we see is between Michael, his associates and
a corrupt and mean spirited Nevada senator, played with a sinister
sliminess by G.D. Spradlin.  Michael then meets his sister Connie who is
engaged to marry a man she hardly knows and comes to Michael for money.
The sense of family bonding and loyalty is missing from the first film
by the time the first half hour or so is up in 'The Godfather Part II'
and this is a clever tone that Coppola gives the film, signifying the
downfall of the Corleone empire from its once great place on the map of
American organized crime.  An attempt is made on Michael's life as
bullets come whizzing through his bedroom window as he and his wife are
about to retire for the evening.  Michael is a more ruthless and cold
hearted boss than his father was.  His father (Marlon Brando, not seen
in Part II) always rejected the notion of narcotics and referred to
gambling as "a harmless vice".  We assume that Michael has made a move
towards the narcotics business in Part II since he is questioned about
it in a Senate committee hearing on organized crime later in the film.
One of the big acquisitions the Corleone family has made is in Nevada
casinos.  They next plan to make a move to take over casinos in Cuba and
the character of Hyman Roth (Lee Strasberg) is played in reference to
Meyer Lansky, a real life mob figure.  Roth lives in Miami and Michael
travels to see him.  Michael and Roth are business partners who plan to
take over the Cuban casinos together.  We then learn through a reference
to the attempt on Michael's life earlier in the film that Roth was the
one who set it up.  He says to Michael:  "I heard you had some trouble.
Stupid, people behaving that way with guns."  How would he know what
happened to Michael unless he gave the order, particularly involving
guns.  Not realizing he has given himself away to Michael, Michael plots
to kill him on their trip to Cuba.
At some point around this time and throughout the entire run of 'The
Godfather Part II', we shift back and fourth from the present to the
past to tell two stories, Michael's control of the family towards the
end of the fifth decade of the twentieth century to the days around
World War I in New York City where Vito Corleone (Robert DeNiro, playing
Brando's character from the first film as a young man this time), is
seen in his beginnings as a humble and hard working immigrant to his
rise as THE GODFATHER.  Robert DeNiro is the only member of the cast
that was honoured with an Oscar for his work.  He won the Best
Supporting Actor prize and Brando and DeNiro are the only two actors to
date, to win an Academy award for playing the same character.
Vito Corleone works in a grocery store and spends his time as a loving
husband to his beautiful wife and as a loving father to his newborn son
Santino (James Caan in 'The Godfather) and he sees how the neighbourhood
he lives in is prey to the delight of Don Fanucci (Gastone Moschin).  He
collects money from all the merchants and takes things without paying
for them.  The citizens kiss his hand upon seeing him and he controls
the police and keeps the neighbourhood living in fear.  Determined not
to be a puppet, held by the strings of big shots (the logo for the
'Godfather' films), Vito Corleone along with a young Peter Clemenza
(Bruno Kirby) and Sal Tessio (John Aprea), slowly begin claiming
neighbourhood territory for themselves.  They begin as petty thieves and
work their way up to establishing a front for their illegal business
which is the legitimate Genco olive oil company.  Vito Corleone would
later settle the score with the Mafia chieftain responsible for killing
his entire family.
As 'The Godfather Part II' becomes more and more engrossing with each
passing frame, the film shows family betrayals and some historical fact
as well.  The scenes with Michael and Hyman Roth in Cuba are set at the
end of 1958.  The Cuban presidential palace is host to a party of
international dignitaries on New Year's Eve when the current president
steps down during a bloody revolution and the birth of the Castro regime
was formed, kicking out the Mafia under the communist ruled system and
everything to do with their business, including control of the casinos.
Michael's marriage to Kay falls apart throughout the film, and Michael
begins to see that he constructed his empire the wrong way, a way in
which resistance to his plans was easy.  Michael lacked the political
skill his father had to keep everything in line and Michael's under
handed control of the family is something his father would not approve
of.  There are references to Shakespearean themes in 'The Godfather Part
II" and Part III has a more clearly defined passage of them and a
clearer and less cerebral pace.  'The Godfather Part II' is certainly
the most ambitious movie sequel ever made.  Its determination to be on a
larger scale in terms of its production values and diversification of
characters within organized crime is to be admired.  To many, it was a
film that had an acquired taste.  Coppola is quoted as saying in a
documentary on all three films that there were disastrous previews for
Part II and he was nervous about its release.
Critics were impressed.  Audiences were slower and less fouthcoming but
the Academy gave it six Oscars, three more than the original.  'The
Godfather' won three for Best Picture, Best Actor (Marlon Brando) and
Best Screenplay Adaptation (Francis Ford Coppola and Mario Puzo), based
on Puzo's novel.  'The Godfather Part II' was honoured with Oscars for
Best Picture, Best Director (Francis Ford Coppola), Best Screenplay
Adaptation (Francis Ford Coppola and Mario Puzo), Best Supporting Actor
(Robert DeNiro), Best Art Direction/Set Decoration and Best Original
Music Score for Carmine Coppola, Francis' father.  The film has the
distinction being one in only a handful of films in history to receive
five Oscar nominations for acting.  Al Pacino for Best Actor, Talia
Shire for Best Supporting Actress and Michael V. Gazzo, Lee Strasberg
and Robert DeNiro for Best Supporting Actor.
'The Godfather Part II' is an example of how a carefully crafted sequel
to a great film can work when attention is paid to its artistic
quality.  An element of distinction between integrity and a film's
dollar value can be the difference between a director who lives for the
moment or one that lives forever.  Like the music of Mozart and
Beethoven, the paintings of Michaelangelo and the invention of aviation,
Coppola's 'Godfather' films will live and fly forever.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Spike Lee disregards many aspects of the Hollywood establishment and makes
films his way and for good reason.  Because he is such a socially aware film
maker, his subject matter cannot fall victim to the studio system because it
simply wouldn't come off as credible.  I've liked and recommended every
Spike Lee film I've ever seen, including one from 1996 entitled 'Get on the
Bus' about a group of African-American men who drive across America to
attend the million man march in Washington D.C.  A small film of large
academic proportions, it is one of Lee's most under rated films and in many
ways is as good or better than his masterpiece, 'Do the Right Thing' (1989)
or his runner-up 'Malcolm X' (1992).  1995's 'Clockers' stands out as one of
Lee's most lethal film of the 90's and all of the films I've mentioned have
one thing in common: focus.  Unfortunately, Lee's latest film doesn't have
it.
'Summer of Sam' is a well acted, well directed but poorly written film about
the hellish summer of 1977.  I turned 12 in 1977 and have some vivid
memories about that year.  Entertainment losses were astonishing that year.
The world parted ways with Elvis Presley, Groucho Marx, Charlie Chaplin, and
Bing Crosby.  The biggest pop culture phenomenon of the 20th century, 'Star
Wars', was born on film and there was so much snow that fell where I live
that nearby Buffalo, New York was shipping much of it to Florida in train
boxcars and a local t.v. station in Buffalo created and sold a board game
based on that weather blister called 'Blizzard of '77'.  It was also the
year when a summertime horror story, that spanned over a year, was told in
New York City which serves only as a minor point in Lee's latest film when
it should have been the central focus of his story.
David Berkowitz, a man who claims Satan spoke to him through the mouth of a
big black dog and urged him to kill, went on a mass murder spree, attacking
at night and shooting young women with dark, shoulder length hair and even
attacking them most helplessly while sitting in their cars with a companion.
This would have been a fascinating story to tell because combining the
sympathy felt for Berkowitz's victims along with trying to find out what
made him do it and having debate among people who enjoyed such films as 'The
Silence of the Lambs', could have made 'Summer of Sam' a classic but I was
shocked to find out what the film does instead.  It takes a handful of
crude, unmannered people and tries to tell a story nearly two and a half
hours long based on their domestic problems, sexual escapades, ignorance and
shallow approach to life.  It's one of those movies that slips into enormous
tedium after the first half hour is up and you still have almost two full
hours to go!
Meet Vinny and Dionna (John Leguizamo and Oscar winner Mira Sorvino).
They're a young married couple who have a problem.  Vinny likes to play the
field.  He cheats on Dionna with her own cousin and chases anything in a
skirt including his boss, a much older woman at a beauty salon.  Vinny and
his pals hang out by dead end streets near the waterside, some dealing drugs
and there is always the "tough guy" factor where the guys are always getting
into scraps to see who is the toughest.  A stand out member of the cast is
Adrien Brody ('The Thin Red Line') as Ritchie, a punk rocker wannabe who is
suspected by his friends later in the film as being the serial killer.
Other major members of the cast are Jennifer Esposito, Anthony LaPaglia, Ben
Gazzara and Bebe Neuwirth.
Strangely, I kept thinking about Paul Thomas Anderson's 'Boogie Nights' from
1997, another film set in the disco era where a group of similarly
unattractive characters appeared in an attractive film about the lives of a
group of adult film personalities and the porno business was used as a
metaphor.  This film spanned a total of six years and gave the character's
lives focus as they progressed, matured and made choices affecting the rest
of their lives.  This was an appealing story with excellent execution.
'Summer of Sam', as well acted and directed as it is puts one in mind of a
car lost on a belt way and going around and around in circles..  The film
goes around and around and when the final act is played out, you feel the
same way about its main personalities as when the film began.  What little
progress there is is muffled by the fact that the murder plot is a throw
away and you're not exactly sure what the film's message is when it's all
said and done.  It all looks like no one cares.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
In the spirit of 1994's 'The Crow' and 1997's 'Spawn', 'Blade' has an
irreverent comic book style presentation lacking in any emotion or
original style.  It is, however, a fairly decent movie if you know this
going in.  Decent in the sense that it is truly brimming with excellent
action sequences, special effects to rival any vampire movie and stunt
work that cannot be dismissed as routine.  It also has a good story of
conflict and pokes fun at big corporations as the vampire cult in the
film is shown in the form of businessmen sitting around a boardroom
table in conflict regarding their next move.
The film opens in a haunting fashion in 1967 as a woman, injured and
bleeding severely is admitted to the hospital where she is about to give
birth.  The film skips forward to the present day.  A vampire cult is
bent on taking over the human race.  Blade (Wesley Snipes), is the child
of the woman seen giving birth at the beginning of the film and is half
human and half vampire who works for the forces of good as a vampire
killer.  We come to realize that Blade's mother was attacked by a
vampire which explains her injuries also seen at the beginning of the
film.  Blade relies on a formula, injected into him intravenously to
keep his human side alive but his body is weakening and a permanent cure
must be found for him to sustain his present state of being.  Blade's
sidekick is Whistler (Kris Kristofferson), who manufactures the formula
and helps Blade like Robin would help Batman.  Blade meets a blood
scientist (N'Bushe Wright), a victim of being bitten herself, who helps
him find a cure for sustaining his human side.
Blade's arch-enemy is Frost (Stephen Dorff), a chilling outcast from the
group of vampires, who has his own followers and Frost's ideas for
taking over the world are very different than some of his peers, putting
him in direct conflict with them.  He and Blade meet on several
occasions in classic comic book style confrontation.
'Blade' is written by David S. Goyer based on characters created by Marv
Wolfman and Gene Colan. Director Stephen Norrington gives the film a
look that is a cross somewhat between 'The Terminator' and 'The Lost
Boys' and the film is strangely empty in many spots, relying on its eye
candy to do most of the work.  Snipes and Dorff make for good opposites
but the story can't sustain itself to the point of remaining interesting
for its running time of exactly two hours.
Perhaps in setting a trend for the future, 1989's 'Batman' has done more
for the technical side of films and less for the academic side of them.
The triumph of the hero's accomplishments came across much more
powerfully in 1978's 'Superman', which offered sub text in its first
hour to explain the man of steel's origins.  Most comic book stories
I've seen since haven't been as expressive in giving audiences a total
look at comic book characters, only their superficial side.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
Tom Cruise, #3 on the list of box office stars who have generated the
most income for the studios at a take of 1.51 billion dollars.  Tom
Hanks, #2 at 1.52 billion and Harrison Ford is #1 with a take of 2.08
billion dollars.  After all the years Harrison Ford has been around,
I've never seen a guy who can be so likable, even when he makes a bad
movie.  Born in 1942, his early roles in 'American Graffiti' (1973) and
'The Conversation' (1974) had him in gear as an interesting looking
character actor who was about the same age as I am now.  Then, of
course, his breakthrough film, 'Star Wars', had him engulfed in the full
context of success and the phrase, "never looking back", can rarely be
applied as strongly as in the case of Ford, who later took on the
challenge of a leading man and 'Raiders of the Lost Ark' made him a full
fledged superstar.  Thankfully, Tom Selleck's schedule made him
unavailable as Indiana Jones and stories I've read from multiple sources
said Harrison Ford was Oliver Stone's first choice to play Jim Garrison
in 'JFK'.
'Six Days, Seven Nights' has Ford under the direction of Ivan Reitman,
the man who made Arnold Schwarzenegger funny in such films as 'Twins',
'Kindergarten Cop' and 'Junior'.  Too bad Sylvester Stallone's voyage
into comedy was a disaster.  Maybe Reitman can do something for his
career later on.  In 'Six Days, Seven Nights', Ford looks entirely like
an everyday common man playing his role with a likable quality in a
mediocre film.  Ford plays a somewhat broken down commercial pilot who
lives in the South Pacific who meets a New York City magazine editor
(Anne Heche) and her fiancee (David Schwimmer).  He flies them to their
eventual destination and Heche and Ford later travel alone as Heche's
boss asks her to interrupt her vacation and make a 15-hour stop over in
Tahiti to do a magazine layout.
As they are flying, a violent storm kicks up forcing them to turn back
and upon doing so, the plane is struck by lightning and they crash land
on a deserted island in a 'Gilligan's Island' type of scenario.  Spoiled
with her bottled water, business lunches and NYC lifestyle, Heche can't
comprehend this disaster and asks Ford what he's going to do.  There are
some clever lines as Ford talks about the plane's landing gear and says:
"Sure, I'll just glue it back on".  Her sarcasm is not to be out done as
she says: "I've flown with you twice and you've crashed half the time".
Her best line is when she asks Ford if he's "One of those guys.  Those
handy guys who, when you give them a pocket knife and a Q-tip, they
build you a shopping mall."
Their isolation on the island puts them into an unpleasant confrontation
with some modern day pirates.  They also deal with the conflict of each
other's opposite tendencies, the humourous pratfalls of inexperience in
their situation and the unexpected situations in nature.
I couldn't quite get my mind around the fact that I was watching some
scenes straight out of movies such as 'Butch Cassidy and the Sundance
Kid', 'Romancing the Stone' and others and while pleasant enough in
content, the movie is a one time deal you want want to re-visit and
while Ford isn't quite upstaged by his female companion, Heche is still
more believable in her role and gives a better performance.  I was
surprised.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Patton (1970)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
'Patton' is the film the elevated many careers.  It also caused controversy,
inspired bravery and honour, and made a false prophecy in its opening
monologue that is now legendary.  Combine it with its intellectual look at
war (there isn't that much action) and you have the makings for one of the
20th century's top five films about war.  Many say that 'Patton' is a great
biography.  If you want to talk about two to three years of a man's life, I
suppose you could make that argument but it's a weak one.  A character study
would be a more appropriate description of this great motion picture set in
World War II.
Although he is known for the 'Godfather' films and 'Apocalypse Now', people
should be constantly reminded that one of the authors of the film's
screenplay is none other than Francis Ford Coppola who shared an Oscar with
Edmund H. North for this film.  A winner of six other Oscars ----- Best
Picture, Best Director (Franklin J. Schaffner), Best Actor (George C.
Scott - who refused the award), Sound, Film Editing and Art Direction/Set
Decoration, 'Patton' has the dubious distinction of producing a leading
actor in his most famous role and wondering if at times you're being fooled
into thinking the real Patton is on screen.  George C. Scott is absolutely
riveting as the no-nonsense, outspoken and mean tempered general with a
compassionate side and knows when to use these two main sides of his
personality.
The film begins in a glorious manner with a platoon of soldiers being
brought to attention as General Patton makes his way to the platform and
discusses all that is American about war with a huge American flag hanging
in the background.  When he's done, you're ready to sign up!  He says at one
point that "Americans have never lost and will never lose a war.  Because
the very thought of losing is hateful to Americans."  Upon the film's
release in 1970, right in the middle of the Vietnam War, the general would
turn out to be wrong about this.
The film then opens after its credit roll to a massacre of American troops
under British command in North Africa during the middle of the war.  A new
commanding general is assigned and it is none other that Patton himself.
Working with Patton is General Omar Bradley (Karl Malden) in a top
performance that should have netted Malden a Best Supporting Actor
nomination but didn't.
The two sides of Patton's moody personality come into full view in a tent in
Sicily when he comforts the men wounded seriously in battle and kneels at
the bedside of one soldier who is incapacitated with his eyes bandaged and
oxygen being fed into him.  Patton whispers something in his ear which the
audience doesn't hear and he then lays a medal on the soldier's pillow and
gives him a gentle touch on the head.  Patton then turns around and sees a
soldier crying and after repeated attempts at getting him to stop, Patton
slaps the helmet right off his head and curses at him.  He orders the man
out of the tent and threatens to shoot him before two men forcibly remove
him from the tent.
After this incident, Patton must apologize to the soldier he slapped on
direct orders from his superiors and the scene where he apologizes is
probably Scott's best scene in the film.  A real life performance by Scott
shook up the motion picture academy when he refused to accept his Best Actor
award by saying that he felt the acting community was a group effort and
that actors shouldn't be in competition with each other.  Scott received two
other Oscar nominations previously for 1959's 'Anatomy of a Murder' and 'The
Hustler' in 1961 and had asked that his name be removed from the list in
both cases.  He would receive one more nomination to date after 'Patton' for
his 1971 performance in 'The Hospital' and how his performance in 'Dr.
Strangelove' in 1964 wasn't nominated is only one of many Oscar mysteries.
The climax of 'Patton' is memorable from a scene involving Patton's request
to an army chaplain where he wants a weather prayer to relieve blizzard like
conditions and he gets both the prayer and relief.  Director Franklin J.
Schaffner cross cuts Patton reading the prayer with intense battle scenes
which is haunting, moving and unforgettable.  A testament to how serious
Patton was about winning the war with the enemy comes in a scene in the last
third of the film where he shouts "If we are not victorious, let no one come
back alive!"  This film is alive and well today and is one of the most
victorious films of all time with its peers, historians (both film and war)
and with audiences.  As long as there is war in the world, it will stand the
test of time.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
I've never seen a more blistering hatred of a PROVEN movie star, Academy
award winning motion picture director/producer and fine actor than I
have of Kevin Costner.  Before 'Message in a Bottle' was released, some
showed their unprofessional bias by saying things like: "This film has
Kevin Costner in it, and therefore it will be bad".  Many have attacked
Costner unfairly and have been dedicated to ruining his career since he
went against the establishment with director Oliver Stone in making
1991's 'JFK'.  That was probably Costner's last truly great film and
while 'The Bodyguard' and 'Tin Cup' were successful hits for Costner,
they were forgettable movies and can't compare to his 'Bull Durham',
'Field of Dreams' and 'Dances With Wolves' days.
'Message in a Bottle' works for one very big reason: it's tasteful.  In
an adult romantic drama, there is little or no noticeable swearing, no
villains and a bedroom love scene that is the most tasteful I've seen in
years.  You can take anyone to see it from your girlfriend/boyfriend to
your mother or grandmother.  These factors alone don't make for a good
film but in addition to these qualities, 'Message in a Bottle' creates
characters that you care about.  I felt by the end of the picture, that
it was a bit too talky and perhaps that made for a disappointing overall
presentation, but it's one of those films that you have to watch until
the very end before you realize what an absorbing and lightly flowing
film it really is.
Robin Wright Penn plays a Chicago journalist named Theresa Osborne who
finds, literally, a message in a bottle on the beach one day and the
writing is a two page love letter to a woman named Catherine and through
good investigative journalism tactics, Theresa tracks the origins of the
note to a man living in North Carolina named Garret Blake (Kevin
Costner).  Catherine was Garret's wife.  Now deceased, we learn that
Garret wrote the letter and threw it into the ocean, intending for no
one to find it, let alone read it.  Theresa and Garret start a romance
that leads farther than either one of them anticipated and Theresa's
motivation for seeking out Garret and telling him the truth of why she's
with him becomes more and more difficult for her after she falls in love
with him.  Garret refinishes boats and builds them from scratch for a
living and lives with his likable but sad sack father Dodge (Paul
Newman).  Dodge knows he's capable of being the definition of what is
called an 'old fart' but he avoids this knowing that he needs his son as
much as his son needs him.  Both men are widowers and equally feel the
loss of a daughter in law and a mother as much as they do the women they
were closest to in life.
One of the disappointments in the film is that many notable and talented
actors are once again wasted to a certain degree.  There is Garret's
former brother in law (John Savage), who, along with the rest of his
family, blames Garret for his sister's death.  Back at the Chicago
newspaper, Theresa's colleagues in print are Robbie Coltrane and Illeana
Douglas who never really develop into anything more than caricatures.  I
suppose, in fairness, there really isn't much you can do with these
characters without taking away the impact of the main character's
destinies.
There is a description of Costner's character made by Newman in the
film.  In regards to losing his wife, the father says of his son to
Penn:  "It's like he's been hit by a truck and is only half alive".
Costner plays his role very well and his character reminded me a lot of
William Hurt's character from 1988's 'The Accidental Tourist' when
Hurt's character lost his son in a violent crime.
'Message in a Bottle' is written by Gerald DiPego based on the novel of
the same name by Nicholas Sparks and is directed by Luis Mandoki.  Luis
Mandoki takes a very simplified but powerful form of direction in hand
to make this film and while the film is somewhat predictable in it's
last half hour, it still is a good film using input from a talented cast
(I would argue led by Newman) and a story that will require plenty of
handkerchiefs that theatres should be required to pass out as you leave
the theatre.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
As a Canadian and fellow countryman of director David Cronenberg's, I have
always appreciated his visionary style of movie making with all the subtlety
of a violent storm.  Cronenberg rips into the very body of science fiction
and horror and then stands back and  holds its beating heart in his hand.  I
admire his approach to the material and the films where he has served as
both director and author or co-author of the screenplays are among his best
work.  Cronenberg's vision is comparable to that of a mad scientist.  His
work is always layered with the unorthodox and sinister sides of the human
soul and by this description I mean it as the highest possible compliment
because after all, his intention is to scare movie audiences into a frenzy
and although his films often have a sickening side to them, that's just in
his nature to show it that way.
Cronenberg began his career making short films in 1966 with a little number
entitled 'Transfer'.  Not only did he serve as the film's writer, director,
and producer, but he photographed and edited the project himself.  He first
gained a major following with his 1975 effort 'Shivers' and made 'Rabid'
(1977), 'Fast Company' and 'The Brood', both in 1979 before the film that
really would solidify him as a major film maker, 'Scanners' (1981) which was
about a form of mental telepathy that could pressurize and explode human
heads.  That film is his most cult like and chilling statement and he would
tackle Hollywood productions with 'The Dead Zone' (1983), and 'The Fly'
(1986), which won an Oscar for its incredible make-up.  Cronenberg's last
four films before 'eXistenZ', 'Dead Ringers' (1988), 'Naked Lunch' (1991),
'M Butterfly' (1993) and 'Crash' (1996) all show his ability to get better
with age and his maturity as a film maker remains intact.  'Naked Lunch' was
thought to be a story impossible to film, based on the literary work of
William S. Burroughs, and while I didn't like the film, I could see its art
which was brought to new heights by the incredibly droning and dream like
dialogue Cronenberg injected into the film.  'eXistenZ' is certainly made
with the Cronenberg stamp placed on it and the film is a perfect way to
usher in the new millennium as it plays on our fears and intimidating
feelings about technology.
Jennifer Jason Leigh is Allegra Geller, a designer of virtual reality games
who wants to test her latest invention on a focus group gathered one
evening, and they see her as a god who has designed some of the best games
ever made.  A member of the security team named Ted Pikul (Jude Law) fails
to protect her at the meeting and she's shot and pursued by her competitors
who want her dead for their own agenda.
The game is called eXistenZ and it's played by plugging into a human being's
bio port which is on the lower back and is sort of like an electrical outlet
inserted through the area to put a hole in the spine where all data connects
and draws the user into a virtual reality game where it is impossible to
tell reality from all the rest.  Allegra and Ted flee the shooting scene and
stop on a country road to assess their situation and Allegra persuades Ted
to have a bio port installed on his body and it's done at a small,
by-the-road service station by a character named Gas (Willem Dafoe).
Apparently, having a bio port installed is as easy as having your ears
pierced and we assume that this film is set many years in the future because
real life technology like this hasn't even been invented yet.  Let alone the
fact that a patent on such an idea would be very hard to get.
And that's where 'eXistenZ' really picks up and runs with the ball as it is
an original idea done with all the wet gore you would expect from a David
Cronenberg film.  It's suspenseful, darkly lit, but is really for die hard
Cronenberg fans who will enjoy it best.  The chemistry works well between
Jennifer Jason Leigh and Jude Law and other interesting performances in the
film come from Don McKellar, Ian Holm and Callum Keith Rennie with a cameo
by Sarah Polley.  The only thing missing is a cameo by Cronenberg himself in
some small way which would have been a nice touch.  The film's subject
matter is a metaphor for drug use, sexual escapades and violent frustrations
and Cronenberg's the sole author of the film's screenplay and calls his own
shots all the way.
Not only is the film a story about virtual reality but that's exactly the
way the film plays before an incredible twist comes near the end of its
appropriate running time of 97 minutes.  Not too short and not too long is
the way a film like this should be made.  By making it appeal to our
attention span which would probably hold up as long as if we really were
playing a game.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
'Stepmom' has the worst screenplay I've ever seen for subject matter
contained within its genre.  Contrived, pretentious, corn ball, and
shallow are just a few adjectives that would be accurate in describing
it.  Releasing it during the holidays and using two cute kids in
marketing it is shameful as this is NOT a family film.  Don't
misunderstand.  It is about family but the bad taste it leaves in the
mouth is unacceptable for children.  It starts out by telling you that
two women who interact with the same man---one the ex wife, and one his
current lover, will naturally hate each other at first but will come to
accept and even like each other later on.  I've known families and have
seen it within my own family and circle of friends that once somebody
hates another person, it's permanent.
Julia Roberts is a photographer in love with lawyer Ed Harris (in a
completely wasted role).  Harris' ex-wife (Susan Sarandon) lives alone
and the couple have an older daughter and a younger son.  The kids hate
dad's new main squeeze and despite her attempt to like and please them,
they stick it to her every chance they get.  Every time Sarandon and
Roberts see each other, they are like oil and water.  One thinks the
other is a b**** while the other sees her rival as inexperienced and
unable to cope with family.  Caught in the middle of all of this,
naturally, are the children.  One of the kids has a laugh that is so
irritating that it will make you shriek to the point of wanting to throw
stuff at the movie screen.
This film is like a rock that has been thrown into a pond.  It sinks
straight to the bottom.  It goes nowhere in a credible fashion in a
running time of more than two hours.  The performances in 'Stepmom' are
somewhat admirable but it's too bad the actors didn't have the wisdom to
realize that by making the most of a bad script can't make for a good
movie.  'Stepmom' has the worst poker face I've ever seen.  It's obvious
and doesn't know how to cover-up its sugar coated shortcomings and
therefore it fails.
Chris Columbus ('Home Alone', 'Mrs. Doubtfire') directs this film
without a clue as to how you go  about the usual input of a director's
own idea of how a film is shaped to decide its final outcome.  Upon
reading a script, a director can make a fairly good film from a
superficial screenplay and therefore a film can be redeemed at least
part of the way.  The screenplay by Gigi Levangie, Jessie Nelson, Steven
Rogers, Karen Leigh Hopkins and Ron Bass (five people?) has enough
laughably bad dialogue to insult the intelligence of even the most
casual movie fan who only sees about five or six movies per year.
As studios continue to take away more and more of a director's artistic
licence, movie audiences will find less and less to appreciate,
especially film buffs.  With standards being lowered, box office figures
continue to rise, not because audiences are pleased with the results of
a final cut and keep coming back but because movie theatres are being
built with bigger and better technology to distract us away from the
movie and into the theatre's coffee shop, restaurant or arcade which
sometimes are more entertaining.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Director Frank Darabont's 1994 classic 'The Shawshank Redemption' has become
such a hit with the public that it's incredible the way people still talk
about it five and six years after its release.  It received seven Oscar
nominations including one for best picture but didn't win in any category.
Initially a box office flop with a take of only 28 million dollars, the film
gained steam in the second run media such as home video, pay t.v., and
recently, on a much welcomed DVD.  Consistently maintaining a position in
the top 5 on the Internet Movie Database's top 250 films of all time, and
right up their in the opinion of film buff's with films such as 'The
Godfather', 'Schindler's List', 'Casablanca' and 'Citizen Kane', 'The
Shawshank Redemption' now provides Darabont with a variation on that film.
Like 'The Shawshank Redemption', 'The Green Mile' is also based on a Stephen
King novel (and is written for the screen by Frank Darabont) and is a prison
film set in the past but with a twist, it's about miracles and the presence
of supernatural goodness witnessed by guards and inmates on a death row
section of prison in the south in the middle of the 1930's.  The title of
the film refers to the surface of the floor on death row, covered with green
tile and that walk to the electric chair can certainly seem like a mile with
the thought of where you will spend eternity hanging in the balance.
The film begins in the present day where a nursing home patient reflects on
his past and then we go there to see that as a young man he is portrayed by
Tom Hanks who stars as Paul Edgecomb, the head of the death row guards.
Included in the men under him are Brutus "Brutal" Howell (David Morse) and
the slimy and weasel like Percy (Doug Hutchinson) who has connections in
government and can have any job the state offers and wants to be a prison
guard because he views prison as a "bucket of pi** to drown rats in".
Hutchinson provided many chills for me in the first season of television's
'The X-Files' in 1993-94 in an episode and later in that same season, a
sequel to it where he played a liver eating mutant over a hundred years old
but looking like a man in his early thirties.  Sort of an alternative
vampire if you will.  The conflicts of duty and conduct on the job for these
death row guards makes the story watchable every second and their eventual
fates are just what the audience deserves to see.
One day, a prisoner is brought in.  He is a large black man named John
Coffey and is seemingly over seven feet tall (Michael Clarke Duncan in an
Oscar-worthy role).  He is set to be executed but his nature convinces
Edgecomb he is innocent of the crime he was convicted for.....murder.  We
see that he has healing powers so great, they are almost God like in helping
many people shake off their physical ailments such as a urinary track
problem that Edgecomb suffers from.
Darabont structures his film in three parts.  The execution of three
prisoners, one white, one native-American and the other black, all separated
about an hour apart over the film's three hour running time and the movie
has an anti-climax about hope, faith and showing an eventual injustice by
the time it's all over.
In many ways, the film is better directed than 'The Shawshank Redemption'
since the story is more confined and it is harder for Darabont to find
avenues of interest and the film looks like a play in many spots and its
deliberate slow pace at times is reflective of the very nature of death row,
a process that takes far too much time in the minds of many, especially
those convicted and the surviving members of a victim's loved ones.  'The
Green Mile' is filled with little elements of detail about the day to day
life of both prison guards and inmates and its humanity is countered by the
prejudices and injustices of a darker time where justice seemed to often be
discarded for the sake of comforting those desperate for a conviction.
Something that really hasn't changed in many situations all that much after
all these years gone by.
As of the date of this review, (February 7, 2000), the state of Illinois has
recently suspended the death penalty to look into flaws in the system where
many more people than first thought on death row may actually be innocent.
'The Green Mile' is one of 1999's best films because it centers on making
the film entertainment and emotion first and social commentary second.
After all, the movies should often provide us with thoughts other than those
in our own world and Stephen King's touch of the supernatural in this film
gives us an alternative and original look that can make us feel somewhat
good about a bleak and tragic situation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
Like the art of music, the art of film draws its influences from many
different sources and the key to making a good motion picture is to
present your own idea and make it unique without ripping off someone
else's work.  'The Negotiator' works on several levels.  As a taut and
melodramatic hostage situation, it boils over with memories of 'Dog Day
Afternoon' attached to it.  With its story of an honest man framed for a
crime he didn't commit, and set in Chicago, 'The Fugitive' comes to
mind.  It's strange how 'The Negotiator' works on its own merit, but it
does.  I tried at every point to look for some major flaw that would
bring it down and I couldn't find one.  Besides its believable and
gripping story line, it works at the acting level just as strongly with
Oscar worthy performances from two of its cast members.
Samuel L. Jackson is a Chicago police officer who is also one of the
city's chief hostage negotiators and he is very good at his job indeed.
Not because of his willingness to put his life on the line like every
cop does but because his ability to use psychological pressure on his
targets is so intense with a cool measure of duty that you actually
believe that Jackson IS his character.  The film opens with dialogue
exchanged between a hostage taker and Jackson in the hallway of a run
down Chicago apartment building.  Jackson's mission is successful, and
later his partner (David Morse) tells him that some corrupt cops are
stealing money from the police pension funds.  Before he can fill
Jackson in further, he's murdered, and Jackson is framed for the crime.
After the district attorney gives him one day to think about striking a
plea bargain, Jackson visits an internal affairs official (J.T. Walsh)
and demands to know what is going on, believing Walsh is somehow mixed
up in the corruption at hand.  All hell breaks loose in the office and
Jackson takes four hostages and demands to resolve the situation by
investigating the case that will prove his innocence.  Jackson agrees to
speak only to one hostage negotiator (Kevin Spacey).  We later find out
why.
At 139 minutes, you would think that the film would be too long but this
isn't the case at all.  Screenwriters James DeMonaco and Kevin Fox have
written a convincing screenplay that doesn't use a phony sense of
audience manipulation to make its case.  Director F. Gary Gray uses a
powerful tone of authority on this picture as the film is a good
character study, exciting thriller and it stops just short of being an
action picture, probably the director's most intelligent decision that
keeps 'The Negotiator' from becoming a throw away action picture.
Samuel L. Jackson's portrayal of a police officer is probably the most
intelligent and believable I've seen since Al Pacino's turn as a
ferocious cop with attitude in 1995's 'Heat'.  Jackson should be
seriously considered for an Oscar nomination for this role.  Spacey is
admirable and worthy of an Oscar nomination himself, but the picture
belongs to Jackson.  Both actors get to showcase their talent vividly.
Much better in fact than their appearance in 1996's 'A Time to Kill'
when both of their characters in that film were underwritten and ended
up flat in the film's final outcome.  Spacey doesn't materialize in 'The
Negotiator' until 45 minutes into the film but his presence is well
noticed and the matching of wits between two men of the same profession
at odds with each other on opposite ends of the law is like watching a
strategic chess match between them.
'The Negotiator' is a clever film which prevents itself from going over
the top and its characters remain people you'll care about.  Rare in a
summer release!
Visit the 'new look' FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Cast - Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, Richard
Harris, Derek Jacobi.
Directed by - Ridley Scott.
Written by - David H. Franzoni, John Logan, William Nicholson.
Produced by - David H. Franzoni, Branko Lustig, Douglas Wick, Steven
Spielberg.
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted) - Rated R
for intense, graphic combat.
Running Length - 154 minutes.
Distributor - Dreamworks.
Ridley Scott is one of those directors that makes good quality films but yet
has no stamp of his own.  Watching 'Alien', 'Blade Runner', 'Black Rain',
'Thelma and Louise' and 'G.I. Jane' would give you no hint that it's the
same guy.  Even though most directors have that look or feel that ignite
their names in the minds of audiences through camera angles or injections of
sub plot, I have never felt that way about Scott but I do admire his films
greatly.  'Gladiator' is a broad, sweeping epic film that pays tribute to
Shakespeare in its tone, 'Ben-Hur' in its combat scenes and 'Spartacus' in
its heroics.  What makes the film work is that these influences are not
obvious.  The film is skillfully presented in such a way as to give the
viewer a fresh perspective of the Hollywood epic without ripping off those
that came before it.
One thing that has to be mentioned right off the bat is the performance of
Russell Crowe.  This guy is one of the next generation, an actor of
downright diversity and intensity who thrives at not being stereotyped.
>From an unorthodox cop in early 1950's Los Angeles in 1997's 'L.A.
Confidential' to a whistle blowing, conscience stricken tobacco executive in
'The Insider' to a vengeful Roman army soldier, Crowe, along with the likes
of Kevin Spacey, Edward Norton and Tom Hanks, will takes over for Pacino,
Hackman, Hoffman, De Niro and Nicholson when they retire from films.
In 'Gladiator' Crowe plays General Maximus, a loyal and seemingly
unstoppable combat soldier in the Roman empire's army some 2000 years ago
who builds a family like relationship with the Caesar of the times named
Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris).  The bond between these two men is similar
to the bond between a father and son but evil would soon lurk its ugly head
between the passage of this great bond.  After winning a major battle,
Marcus Aurelius secretly tells Maximus that he will name him as successor to
the throne of Rome and this does not go over with Marcus Aurelius' son
Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix).  Before news of the succession can get out,
Commodus murders his father and tries to kill General Maximus and
does kill Maximus' entire family.  Maximus thrives on his fugitive
situation and has one goal: survival.....so he can have his vengeance later.
Connie
Nielsen plays Commodus' sister who was once Maximus' flame and is sort of
caught in a catch-22 in all of the treachery that plays out and Derek Jacobi
is casted well as a Roman senator.
In the slave world Maximus is purchased by Proximo (Oliver Reed) and this
man makes his living training gladiators and finds a hot property with
Maximus who is victorious at every turn and even defeats well established
legends in the minds of the spectators and quickly becomes a new hero to
them.  There are greats scenes of sword play, brutal hand to hand combat and
confrontations with such fierce creatures as tigers.  The cinematography by
John Mathieson is breath taking and his work is an early contender for an
Oscar.
One thing I didn't like about this film is the fact that Ridley Scott, in
filming his action sequences, plays with too many close up shots where the
action scurries around in a whirlwind of dust, smoke and fast moves so much
so that we cannot focus entirely on the action at hand and the editing
process throughout all of this is somewhat rushed and comes off as aloof at
several points.
One thing that makes 'Gladiator' work well on many levels is the advent of
computer technology.  There are many crowd scenes and architectural
landscapes that were obviously generated by computers because if the cost of
so many extras were put forward along with the cost of building and erecting
many Roman like city structures for the given era, the film would have cost
about the same as it did to make 'Titanic'.....a cool 200 million dollars.
Compared with that film, 'Gladiator' came in at a much lower 103 million
dollars because things were not built to scale the way they were in
'Titanic' where James Cameron had a relic of the famous boat built 90% to
scale.  I remember someone from the cast of 'Ben-Hur' saying that if a film
like 'Ben-Hur' were made in this day and age it would probably cost 200 or
even 300 million dollars to produce.  'Gladiator' has now been made in a
time where computer effects look authentic and not cheesy and combined with
many other scenes, I defy anyone to tell the difference between the fake
stuff and the reality in every single detail of the film's labour.
Through the eyes of death, the struggle between good and evil and the
resolution of the film's climax, 'Gladiator' pays tribute to the most high
end of Shakespearean art and will leave the audience finding a whole new
perspective on a genre of film some thought might be buried indefinitely.
Thank goodness it's not.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
Shock jock Howard Stern's rise to stardom in the radio business is profiled
in 'Private Parts'.  The picture is based on Stern's best selling novel and
literally traces the earliest days of his life as a child growing up on Long
Island to his rise and eventual success as a media phenomenon.  Despite
intense controversy over Stern's vocal tactics which include topics dealing
with just about everything explicit and sexual in society, the choice is
easy, like him or hate him.  Those who hate Stern need to simply tune him out
but his fans (who have been criticized by media analysts as 'undesirables')
have launched his program to national syndication for well over ten years.
The central focus of 'Private Parts' is not just Stern's dealings in the
media but rather on his personal life as we see him go through college to his
humble beginnings at radio stations in Detroit, Hartford, Washington D.C. and
New York City.  All the while the movie centres on Stern's relationship with
his wife Alison (Mary McCormack).  The movie strives to inform us that Stern
isn't who he seems to be on the radio but that it's all just an act and that
he's really a decent, loyal and loving husband and father of three.
Unfortunately for the audience, the entire film is dull, flat, repetitive at
times and makes its point and yet continues to bash us over the head with
Stern's antics.  Director Betty Thomas ('The Brady Bunch Movie') is not the
best person qualified to sit at the helm of this very intense and mesmerizing
adult subject matter.  The movie is disappointingly tame for Howard's true
fans and for the rest of us, we wonder exactly what the point of the entire
picture is since it seems to have a split personality.
Filmmaker Ivan Reitman ('Stripes', 'Ghostbusters', 'Twins', 'Kindergarten
Cop', 'Junior') is in the producer's chair for this one and along with
screenwriters Len Blum and Michael Kalesniko they have made what isn't
necessarily a bad film, just one that isn't very exciting and Stern's fans
should be patient as I'm sure the next film ( if there is one) will be much
jucier and at par with what Howard Stern's career is really all about.  There
is an interesting rumour circulating that may interest a lot of movie fans.
 'Batman and Robin' which is the fourth chapter since 1989 in the story of
the Caped Crusader is due out June 20th and if 'Private Parts' does well at
the box office, there's talk of approaching Howard Stern in the hopes of
casting him in the fifth chapter as one of the film's villains.  I'm not
kidding!!!

Title
Review for Paths of Glory (1957)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Stanley Kubrick began the art of dehumanization in film early in his
career.  One of his earliest and least well known films is 'Paths of
Glory'.  At a running time of only 88 minutes, the film is a perfect
example of what film is supposed to do:  Get to the point and get off
it.  I don't think I've seen a more sweeping film about war with such a
short and most appropriate running time.  War films often repeat
themselves by showing the injustice of its subject matter as men die in
senseless battles.  Lives are lost at the hands of a court in Kubrick's
most alternative film about conflict.
The blind insanity of war can be summed up in 'Paths of Glory' by one
statement made by Kirk Douglas: "Patriotism is the last refuge of a
scoundrel."  Now, I don't agree entirely with that statement --- and
that quote, I'm sure, is not meant to be taken to the extreme.
Patriotism is a wonderful thing but like religion, politics and anything
else in life, it's best taken in moderation.
The result of extreme patriotism leads to the execution of three
innocent men in the French army in 1916 during World War I.  A fanatical
French general named Mireau (George Macready), orders his lower level
officers to engage his men in a suicide mission during an attack in
battle, and when the mission fails because of the refusal of committing
men to a certain death, one man from each of the three divisions is
selected almost at random and are made scapegoats for the failed attack
and are subsequently tried for cowardice which carries the penalty of
death.
Colonel Dax (Kirk Douglas) acts as counsel for the men.  Dax is the
example of an officer who strives for a fair trial on behalf of the
men.  On the day the trial is announced IT IS CARRIED OUT THAT DAY!
There are no formal stenographic notes kept, the trial is biased in
favour of the prosecution and the audience will quickly recognizes it as
a kangaroo court.  It is one of the greatest injustices in the history
of war.  Perhaps, dare I say, more of an injustice than dying on the
battlefield.
The three men to be executed are portrayed by Joseph Turkel, Timothy
Carey and Ralph Meeker.  Each one is a well developed character and
while it would have been easy to make them caricatures, their roles are
well thought out and are portrayed just as impressively as any other
character in the film.  Kubrick adapted the screenplay based on the book
by Humphrey Cobb.  As he does in many of his films, Kubrick strains the
human condition in a most unsentimental way and his films have never
been tame and this film shows no mercy for any of its stark subject
matter allegedly based on a true story which was made public a few years
after the war ended.
Kubrick uses his camera the way he does in all his films.  He plunges
them into our souls with characters who rarely crack a smile and with
dark and haunting shadows accompanying them. Adolphe Menjou portrays
General Broulard in this, one of his last films, and is sort of on the
fence in how his character will be judged by future film historians.
His character is perhaps one of the most debatable in the film as to
where his loyalties stand.
As Kubrick's films about war evolved throughout film history from 'Paths
of Glory' to 'Dr. Strangelove' to 'Full Metal Jacket', the man with the
vision of film serving as a tool to judge society well ahead of its
time, Kubrick has managed to find tragedy, excitement, humour and traces
of sarcasm which will cause selected audiences to mock what they don't
understand.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
In order to make true movie satire work, you have to keep the running
time relatively short and the target of your subject matter should be
something or someone that movie audiences despise.  1964's 'Dr
Strangelove' which elevated director Stanley Kubrick's career and showed
technology running amok and the eventual dehumanization of 'the system'
for which Kubrick became famous, was an important first step in the
intellectual progression of movie making which allowed its
creators to become more daring with every attempt.
When I first saw screenwriter Paddy Chayefsky's 'Network', made in 1976,
a scathing satire and indictment of the television industry, I was
completely taken with its message of powerful corporate types engaged in
an illegal lust for power by doing whatever was necessary to keep their
television company on top of the world, including killing a former news
anchorman turned tabloid prophet because he had low ratings.  I never
thought I would see such a film again and I still haven't but 'Wag the
Dog' is the best satire I've seen since the two movies mentioned above
were made.
'Wag the Dog' hides nothing from the audience in showing political
advisers counting on the major population's lack of attention span and
virtually insulting the average person's intelligence in diverting the
facts away from the real issues of presidential misconduct.  The current
president is accused of having sex with a teen aged girl who belongs to
an organization similar to the girl scouts and the election is less than
two weeks away.  The president's opponents get wind of the story and use
This movie showcases the theory that asks: "If a tree falls in the
forest and no one is around to hear it, does it make a sound"?  You'll
find this to be true as the film dives right in in the opening ten
minutes and shows the president's top advisers meeting with a political
spin doctor (Robert De Niro) who is an expert at drawing the public's
attention away from the facts by using the media.  It's a meeting that
takes place deep within the farthest basement of the White House and
although the public never sees these meetings, we know they take place.
'Network' used the medium of television and accomplished the task of
increasing public cynicism for the greater good of shaking up 'the
system' and now 'Wag the Dog' does the same in a different story.
To truly accomplish the mission, De Niro and a top aid to the president
(Anne Heche), travel to Los Angeles to seek the help of a top Hollywood
producer (Dustin Hoffman) to succeed in their task.  After explaining
the situation, Hoffman is both shocked and somewhat fascinated with the
prospect of engaging in a deliciously tempting project, seduced by the
fraudulent aspects of it and the challenge of creating a fraud and if
the public buys it, Hoffman knows it will be the best work of his career
even though he can't ever tell anybody about it.
Hoffman's portrayal of this magnificent character is one of brash vanity
combined with a slightly eccentric twist of personality.  De Niro is
somewhat sedated in his role but it is clear that his character is one
of a low profile so audiences shouldn't mistake it as a slacking
performance, just one suitable to the movie's plot.
Based on the book 'American Hero' by Larry Beinhart, Hilary Henkin and
David Mamet's script has a back up plan, a plan 'b' if you will, that
takes shape in light of the partially failed attempt by the movie's
characters to totally carry out the plan outlined in the basic plot.  It
moves to create a false sense of hope and patriotism among the public
that makes the presidential scandal at hand mild and innocuous.
Barry Levinson's light handed direction and crafty decision to make the
screenplay the picture's real star are balanced with the cast's
willingness to do the same and at a running time of 96 minutes, 'Wag the
Dog' has a conclusion which enforces its basic theme and message of
deception while never losing sight of the fact that it's a comedy!
Visit 'FILM FOLLOW-UP' by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
If any conclusions are to be drawn from 'A Simple Plan', one could not
just dismiss it as simply another morality play about the darker side of
the human conscience.  It shows us more than anything else that every
single human being has the potential for good and/or evil.  Of course,
everyone knows that as well but what makes this film so much better than
most morality tales is that the majority of films that showcase good vs.
evil usually have their players rooted in character as the film begins.
Not so with 'A Simple Plan'.  The film begins with ordinary people who
possess all the decency you could ask for.  Bill Paxton portrays a
family man whose wife (Bridget Fonda) is expecting a baby any day now.
Paxton works at a modest job for modest pay. His older brother (Billy
Bob Thornton) is a screw-up and has an IQ a little below Forrest Gump's
and a personality similar to one of the Newhart show's "Daryl"
brothers.  Thornton's best friend (Brent Briscoe), along with the two
brothers, find a bag of money stashed in some plane wreckage and the
total is somewhere around four million dollars.
There is a struggle of wills about what to do with the money.  Thornton
and Briscoe want to keep the money but Paxton is all for turning the
money in.  He says that you're supposed to work for the American dream,
not steal for it.  Paxton eventually agrees to go along with the scheme
of things and keep the money and the three of them all become embroiled
in a quagmire of crime involving greed, deceit and most horrible of all,
murder.  Complicating things further is the advice that Fonda gives
Paxton about what her husband should do about covering his tracks so
nothing can be traced back to him.  Every shred of advice backfires and
lands the players in this movie further and further into the moral
abyss.
Now comes the tricky part.  How do you make a film like this truly
entertaining?  You can't.  Director Sam Raimi, known mostly for horror
films makes a horror film of sorts that showcases reality but because
it's real doesn't mean that its enjoyable.  Certainly, the film isn't
entertaining from a high powered point of view.  It has a deliberate
slow pace and is a film many will want to see only once.  This doesn't
mean that it's a bad movie.  I am recommending it for two key reasons.
First and foremost, the performance of Bill Paxton.  After years of
playing second string supporting characters, he gets the chance to shine
as a leading man in a heavy drama and proves he can handle a monumental
part where he's in 99% of the movie.  Next is Billy Bob Thornton.  After
turns in 'Sling Blade' and 'Primary Colors' where he demonstrated his
range, he comes across as a never do well simpleton who isn't evil, he's
just lead down its path easily.
Much like 'Fargo', 'A Simple Plan' is set against the winter tundra
backdrop of Minnesota for an even darker and more stark look at the
bleak.  Sam Raimi uses a surrounding central theme of visual content in
the form of black crows that encircle many scenes as a metaphor for the
film's tone.  There isn't a wasted character in the entire production
and as 'A Simple Plan' draws to a conclusion, it serves not so much as
an entertainment piece as it does a mirror for audiences to take a look
at their own sins and repent for them as they see others in a much
sadder predicament.  A standout film that keeps reminding us that no one
is above the moral spectrum of perfection.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
I don't think any one director's film stands out as clearly as his or
her masterpiece as '2001: A Space Odyssey' does for Stanley Kubrick.
Amazingly, in my opinion, the film doesn't look dated at all.  On DVD,
the clarity, colour, resolution and overall presentation have held up
remarkably well.  It's the kind of film that contains hypnotic elements
directly intended to stir any imagination and conjure up debate
contained in its religious overtones.  It's also the kind of film that
means different things to different people.  The entertainment value of
it's beginning, middle and ending depend entirely on your views of
evolution vs. creationism.
In 1989's 'Field of Dreams', Ray Kinsella (Kevin Costner) observes while
speaking to Terence Mann (James Earl Jones) that he once read a passage
he wrote that speaks of all the cosmic tumblers of the universe falling
into place and for a brief moment the universe opens up to show you
what's possible.  This was never more true than for the film '2001: A
Space Odyssey', as it is a film far ahead of its time and when it was
released in 1968, it kept in line with director Stanley Kubrick's
central theme of technology running amok.
Failing to earn a Best Picture Oscar nomination, '2001: A Space Odyssey'
did get nominations for Kubrick as Best Director, Best Screenplay, based
on the work of author Arthur C. Clarke's 'The Sentinel'.  Clarke
co-wrote the screenplay with Kubrick.  The film received additional
Oscar nominations for its sets and Kubrick won an Oscar for creating,
supervising and executing the film's tremendously revolutionary visual
effects.
Beginning in prehistoric times with what the film's opening caption puts
forward as 'The Dawn of Man', apes move around on a huge open wasteland
and display the barbaric attributes that would remain intact as
evolution would eventually make them humans.  A group of the beasts
awaken one morning to find a a large rectangular black slab among the
natural landscape of desert rock.  The primates are astonished by its
remarkably smooth texture and divine construction, perhaps it served as
a stepping stone (no pun intended) for mankind's progress in the things
he later invented.  Perhaps the wheel, the printing press and other
forms of ancient technology could be derived from this.  The large
rectangular black slab is known as the monolith.  The monolith appears
later in the film and its purpose remains a mystery.
>From a slow motion shot of a primate throwing a bone in the air, the
film cuts to a time we now know as being near to the 21st century as a
space craft in the similar shape of the bone travels through outer space
and we are treated to some wonderful classical music by Strauss as we
gaze in splendor at Kubrick's fantastic visual style.
The monolith appears again in 1999 on the moon near the Sea of
Tranquility as an expedition team of American astronauts finds it and
the monolith omits an eerie ringing to deafen all who come into contact
with it.
Next is the Jupiter mission in the year 2001. Astronauts David Bowman
(Keir Dullea) and Frank Poole (Gary Lockwood) lead an expedition team
aboard the spacecraft Discovery.  They are seen as the rest of the crew
is in hibernation for the long trip.  The computer overseeing the
mission is HAL 9000.  I noticed that the three letters after H, A and L
are I, B and M.  Coincidence?  Who knows?  Seems clever to me.  HAL 9000
is voiced by actor Douglas Rain who has an eerie emptiness in his voice,
making HAL a most chilling character and the best developed one in the
movie, even more so than his human counter parts.
As the mission proceeds there is an apparent malfunction by the HAL 9000
computer and this leads to the beginning of the film's stunning climax
where silence is used as powerfully as any loud, expensive action film
where the noise is deafening.  This is the film's greatest asset.  The
terror of being alone in space where the silence is extremely loud to
the human condition is felt as clearly as actually being in the film.
The term 'Space Odyssey' pertains mostly to the film's last half hour as
astronaut Bowman is transported to a part of the universe not only
unexplored by man but unimagined as well.  The mansion style
surroundings contained in the film's lavish conclusion where a bedroom,
bathroom and dining room are seen by Bowman observing his own origins
and future lend suspicions that mankind's origins have an outer space
connection which is a theory put forward by many scientists.
I must confess that I am not a student of literature.  I don't read
books.  When I observe a film, I judge it only on its own merits and any
comparisons I may draw to its literary origins are based on what I've
heard and researched.  One thing I didn't like about the sequel to
'2001: A Space Odyssey' entitled '2010: The Year We Make Contact' is the
explanation of why the HAL 9000 computer failed.  The computer was
apparently told of the true nature of the mission and instructed not to
reveal anything to Bowman or Poole so when HAL was questioned by the
astronauts in the original film, he became trapped and not having the
human capacity to lie, he malfunctioned.  This seems like a cop out to
the original film's theme of technology running amok as I mentioned in
the second paragraph as '2010' explains that human meddling caused HAL
to malfunction rather than HAL malfunctioning on his own.
'2001: A Space Odyssey' is a marvel of film making not for what it does
but for what it doesn't do.  It doesn't try to be a film with a formula,
primary character development or scathing amounts of dialogue.  There is
in fact, very little dialogue in its running time of nearly two and a
half hours and Stanley Kubrick's intention is to leave his audience with
something to take home in their minds and reflect upon it as not only a
work of art but as an experience designed to push the full limits of the
human imagination.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
Val Kilmer has an alleged reputation of being difficult to work with.  On the
set of 'The Doors' (1991) reports circulated that he didn't want anyone to
talk to him as he was getting in character to play Jim Morrison.  Recently,
on the set of one of his latest films it was also alleged that he demanded to
know the astrological signs of the crew and cast members.  Regardless of
whether or not these rumours are true, it certainly raises some eyebrows.
In 'The Saint', Kilmer plays Simon Templar, a renegade professional thief and
master of disguise whose latest coup takes him to capitalist Russia where a
former communist and now famous oil tycoon wants Kilmer to steal a formula
essential to making cold fusion work in producing energy to substitute the
world's need for oil.  The oil tycoon (Rade Serbedzija) is also running for
the Russian presidency and uses his secret hobby as leader of a Russian Mafia
branch to strong arm his way to his nation's highest office.  The scientist
responsible for developing the formula (Elisabeth Shue) has a romantic fling
with Kilmer and they are eventually forced to run for their lives when things
go awry.
How is 'The Saint'?  It can be best described as protracted, muddled, shallow
and downright boring.  Kilmer has all the savvy of a James Bond stunt double
only stunt doubles don't talk in movies and Kilmer revolutionizes that
theory.  His portrayal of the leading character is terribly inept and Shue
fares no better as a flimsy and helpless character (caricature).  
Director Phillip Noyce ('Patriot Games', 'Clear and Present Danger') is a
director of organization rather than of creativity.  His instructional
authority on this movie looks amateurish and the film is almost entirely void
of action as the plot chooses to focus on the romance rather than the
intrigue.  That's fine but let's not over do it.  
'The Saint' is based on the classic television series with Roger Moore whose
suave, charming persona would later land him the role of James Bond and 'The
Saint' may appeal to the fans of Val Kilmer.  As for being creative and
shrewd filmmaking, 'The Saint' ain't.

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
Cast - Bruce Willis, Matthew Perry, Rosanna Arquette, Michael Clarke Duncan,
Natasha Henstridge, Amanda Peet, Kevin Pollak, Harland Williams
Directed by - Jonathan Lynn
Written by - Mitchell Kapner
Produced by - Allan Kaufman, David Willis
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted), Rated R
for some sexuality/nudity and violence.
Running Length - 98 minutes
Distributor - Warner Bros.
'The Whole Nine Yards' plays out with a series of in-jokes, no doubt many of
them planned and executed by the cast but has a few too many pratfalls for
its own good and also has, at the root of its story, a lining of old
fashioned material greed as its theme.  It tries to be many things.....a
comedy, an intriguing thriller, a mob story, a take on marriage, a depiction
of the theory about honour among criminals and last but not least, it tries
to be entertaining and earns an 'A' for effort.  Unfortunately, the film has
to throw in stereotypes and some unbelievable finishing touches in its
climax where things work out just a bit too perfectly for its own good.
Matthew Perry plays a struggling dentist from Chicago named Nicholas
Oseransky (later given the nickname Oz) living in Montreal, Canada with his
French-Canadian wife Sophie (Rosanna Arquette) and her witch of a mother and
the two of them make fun of Oz whenever they can.  They accuse him of not
being able to make money (with a large debt to pay off), despite being a
dentist, and they poke fun of him at every turn.  Needless to say, Oz's
marriage is on the rocks.  His wife and mother-in-law are painted as
materialistic and/or evil.  Oz comes across as a wimp and lives up to this
tag admirably.
Oz welcomes his new neighbour, a seemingly nice guy named Jimmy Jones (Bruce
Willis)....as he introduces himself that way to Oz.  He is in fact Jimmy
"The Tulip" Tudeski, a ruthless Chicago hit man who has killed almost 20
people in his illustrious career and Oz recognizes him from the tattoo on
his arm.  There is a funny sequence where, upon recognizing Jimmy for who he
is, Oz has a noisy flashback in his mind of newspaper articles and other
mental passages that clue him into the fact that his new neighbour is a mob
connected mass murderer.  What a predicament!  Oz later breaks the news to
his wife about who their new neighbour is and he mentions that rival crime
organizations have put a price on Jimmy's head and Sophie forces Oz,
reluctantly, by threatening to make his marriage more of a hell than it
already is, to go to Chicago and give information to Jimmy's enemies as to
his whereabouts and perhaps collect a hefty finder's fee in the process.
Upon his arrival in Chicago, Oz is greeted off guard in his hotel room by
Frankie Figs (Michael Clarke Duncan), a man who supposedly works for a mob
boss named Yanni Gogolack (Kevin Pollak), who wants Jimmy dead.  Oz can't
figure out how the mob got a hold of the information detailing his arrival
and he had no intention of ratting Jimmy out as he later tells a friend he
just came to Chicago to get away from 'the bitch'.  Oz is caught up in a
whirlwind of playing all sides against each other and falls in love along
the way with Jimmy's estranged wife Cynthia (Natasha Henstridge).  Oz's
dental assistant is named Jill (Amanda Peet) and she has a secret fantasy
about career choice that we find out about a little too late in the film
which gives the film a bitter red herring and many will find it too
preposterous to accept.
As an overlapping story of double crosses, cleverly woven plot intimacies
and character development, 'The Whole Nine Yards' works just fine but as a
superlative comedy, it stops just short and reminded me at many times of
what the Three Stooges would come off like without belting each once
throughout the course of one of their movies.  You know, the dialogue
without the slapstick finish and the ability to make an alternative form of
comedy fall flat without your trade mark finish.  No one in this movie has a
truly great trade mark for comedy and many of them are not good at comedy at
all but some of the in-jokes help.  There is a clever reference to
mayonnaise put on hamburgers used by Willis as John Travolta and Samuel L.
Jackson did in their exchange about what's put on french fries in France
instead of ketchup in 'Pulp Fiction', which of course, co-starred Willis
(and Rosanna Arquette).  Arquette seduces a policeman in this movie (Harland
Williams) in a rather shameless manner which again, just isn't funny or
totally necessary to the plot.  She wants to use him for something she can
do herself without anyone else being involved or finding out about what she
has in mind.
Director Jonathan Lynn who has done 'The Distinguished Gentleman', 'My
Cousin Vinny' and 'Greedy', lets the comedy spiral out of control at many
points and allows his cast to take a few too many liberties with the
original material written by Mitchell Kapner and turn it into amateur comedy
often seen too much in variety shows and hapless sitcoms (Perry IS from
'Friends').  Still, 'The Whole Nine Yards' runs a very acceptable 98 minutes
and all comedies should run well under two hours as most of them in this day
and age simply aren't funny and look more recycled than they do original.
Not quite the case here but then again, it is still a little too low brow
for a recommendation.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Smile Like Yours, A (1997)
I really enjoyed Greg Kinnear's performance as Harrison's Ford's younger
brother in 1995's 'Sabrina'.  Kinnear had a charm that ensured he had the
potential of paving a prosperous career in movies for himself.  Lauren Holly
is a very beautiful woman who has a charming presence of her own on the big
screen and the two of them provide some interesting chemistry in 'A Smile
Like Yours'.
Kinnear and Holly play a young married couple living in the beautiful
surroundings of San Francisco who deal with the joyful prospect of having a
child but suffer from the problems of infertility.  They seek medical
counseling and treatment for the problem which all make for touching and
mildly amusing results.  How can the problems of infertility be touching and
amusing you might ask?  That's the magic of this luke warm love story which
treats its subject matter by making the dialogue and personalities of its
characters both quirky and likable.
There are sub plots involving Kinnear's occupation as a construction
professional who rubs elbows with a seductive and tempting architect (Jill
Hennessy) who tries to snag him.  Holly meanwhile works at developing a line
of perfume with her sister (Joan Cusack) and Kinnear finds male bonding with
his best friend played by Jay Thomas.
The film tinkers with being a straight laced movie formula and pretty much
succeeds at it but it also provides some honest moments of love done with
comedy to stimulate the heart and that is pleasing to say the least.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
This film marks the last screen appearance by comedian Phil Hartman who
died in May of 1998.
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Director Joe Dante is darned if he does and darned if he doesn't.  He
was criticized somewhat in 1984 for his fantasy film 'Gremlins' in which
a cute and fuzzy little pack of creatures that sort of resemble a cross
between puppies and bear cubs, became bizarre little trolls if they were
fed after midnight or if they got wet.  For those who haven't seen
'Gremlins', 'Small Soldiers' will do nicely because Dante uses the same
pace, camera lighting effects and elementary school level action climax
that 'Gremlins' had.  Dante's film 'Small Soldiers' is receiving
criticism for many of the mean spirited antics seen in 'Gremlins' while
others are saying that 'Small Soldiers' isn't mean enough to pass as a
convincing movie where danger looks certain for its cast of human
characters
Perhaps appealing to children more than any other target audience,
'Small Soldiers' will undoubtedly inspire an entire line of merchandise
that will pick up where the box office left off.  By now, life in the
1990's is one big marketing blitz where subliminal ads are seen in
movies and audiences better get used to it because it isn't leaving big
screens anytime soon.
In 'Small Soldiers', a toy manufacturing company owned by a corporate
honcho with little human emotion (Denis Leary), is obsessed with the
idea that a proposed new line of toys, in the form of mighty military
men can be built and be so smart that when kids play with them, they can
play back.
The chief designers of the new wonder toys (Jay Mohr and David Cross)
are intimidated by their boss and are determined to satisfy his desire
for these misguided material play things and Mohr orders highly
sophisticated military chips to be implanted in the head of the action
figures.
500,000 units are shipped consisting of two factions.  There are the
soldiers whose leader is Chip Hazard (voiced by Tommy Lee Jones) and his
elite squad of goofy henchmen some of whom are voiced by such veteran
actors as George Kennedy and Ernest Borgnine and there are the
Gorgonites whose leader Archer (voiced by Frank Langella) make for the
best toys as they are docile and peaceful but are the main target of the
military toys for a humourous confrontation later in the film.
The human hero in 'Small Soldiers' is Alan (Gregory Smith), a rather
bland and lifeless young man much like his 'Gremlins' colleague Zach
Galligan and Alan desires the girl next door named Christy (Kirsten
Dunst).  Alan convinces a local delivery man to leave a shipment of the
toys, meant for a rival toy super store, at his father's toy
neighbourhood store so he can sell them and make a little money for the
store which has fallen somewhat on hard times.  The toys get loose and
begin acting up with predictable results.
First of all, 'Small Soldiers' uses some ingeniously clever gags to sell
its shortcomings.  The soldiers put together gadgets made from ordinary
household items such as cheese graters, fishing rods, chain saws and cds
and they power up a collection of female dolls to act as their
counterparts in mischief and some of the attack scenes are really
convincing.  It's a fun film which isn't action packed as much as it is
introductory in its presentation of multiple play things similar to the
many characters seen in 1995's 'Toy Story', although 'Toy Story' is far
superior to this film.  Another thing that 'Small Soldiers' has going
for it is its benign presentation of the film's cartoonish violence
which is tastefully presented and appropriate for children comparable to
a Coyote and Road Runner cartoon where the violence is so absurd, you
know it isn't perceived as reality.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Director Anthony Minghella was challenged to come up an encore to his
runaway 1996 hit 'The English Patient'.  That film won nine Oscars, some of
the most in history, and although Minghella will be hard pressed in the
minds of many to top that effort, 'The Talented Mr. Ripley' has a curious
air of looking like Minghella isn't even attempting to top it and that's a
good thing.  The same can be said for Quentin Tarantino when he made 1997's
'Jackie Brown', knowing it would never be as good as 'Pulp Fiction',
Tarantino didn't try to top it and good directors know their limitations and
when their opportunities to exceed present themselves.  The only time a
director tries to top a previous effort is usually when a previous film is
made for commercial reasons and studio interference is instrumental in
overkill for its sequel, usually in the case of a splashy, big budgeted
action film or a half baked comedy and these films usually have a different
director than the original film.
Matt Damon.  A talented actor and writer.  How many of you remember that he
DID win as Oscar for 1997's 'Good Will Hunting' as the film's co-author
along with Ben Affleck and Damon gave a dynamite, hard edged Oscar nominated
performance in it and the same year, played a young and determined lawyer
battling the odds in Francis Coppola's 'The Rainmaker'.  Damon couldn't have
looked more different in those two films and now plays the heavy in a film
that asks us to be happy with who we are and to truly not covet anything
that belongs to somebody else.
Set in the 1950's and based on the novel by Patricia Highsmith, 'The
'Talented Mr. Ripley' has an aristocratic look of Hitchcockian elegance and
doomed fate for many of its characters and treats the subject of murder as a
chilling and memorable nightmare for the audience and the people up on the
screen.  Tom Ripley (Matt Damon).  We see early that he isn't happy with who
he is because he borrows a Princeton University jacket one afternoon for a
reception in New York City where he plays the piano and is approached by a
rich husband and wife who ask if he ever knew their son Dickie Greenleaf
(Jude Law) at Princeton.  They offer to pay Tom's expenses to Europe with
the hope that he can go to Italy and convince their son to return to
America.  Tom's trip to the continent of culture is made difficult by his
encounter with Dickie.  When he does find him, he turns out to be a wholly
rude and obnoxious lout.  A man who thinks he is too good for his own
country and slices through his fortune with great comfort without any
appreciation of how he got it (from his rich parents) and treats only his
girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow) with the slightest amount of courtesy.
Key to the plot are two other characters who are in the mix of things to add
tension and authenticity to the film's plot.  They are a wealthy woman
traveling in Europe (Cate Blanchett), who befriends Tom, and Dickie's
equally obnoxious peer Freddie Miles (Philip Seymour Hoffman).
Matt Damon's performance as Tom Ripley is rather low key but this is a
clever choice and decision on the part of both Damon and Minghella for
allowing it to be that way since the film's second half has a different and
totally appropriate look and we, the audience, are treated to a film with a
slow beginning that picks up later rather than one that starts off great and
then loses steam.
Mingehella uses a very even handed approach to the material and illustrates
his characters as a cross between high art and the bankrupt culture of
criminal violence and never lets one element rise above the other.  His
lavish and exquisitely filmed scenes around the European scene are marvelous
to watch and director of photography John Seale, who won the Oscar for 'The
English Patient', uses lighting as mood swings that look almost as good as
the personalities of the film's human contributors.  It's almost as if the
camera is a character in itself.  An unusual and impressive feat that looks
original and the film has lethal shots of beauty (and sometimes horror) at
almost every turn.
The film will have problems however, when it comes to Oscar nominations.
Jude Law's character disappears too quickly and Matt Damon has been upstaged
this year by too many other good performances.  Minghella also will suffer
comparisons to 'The Englsih Patient'.  It will be a sub-conscious thing with
Academy voters who would sing a different tune if this film had not been in
the shadow of another so revered.  What does all of this add up to?  For me,
one of the ten best films of 1999 since it pays tribute to great films of
the past, has a shocking and unexpected criminal twist for layers of
superlative suspense and teaches us all to be happy with who we are,
something so many of us have forgotten, often because of our overlearned and
under appreciated existences which in many cases are a lot better than we
give them credit for.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for JFK (1991)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith.
If anything, Oliver Stone's 1991 pseudo propaganda film 'JFK' certainly
infuriated many who believed that Stone had no right to mix together
film clips of authenticity with his own injection of the truth.
Outraged media jackals still draw references to Stone and this film when
making a point, mostly to complain about the inaccuracies of a certain
scenario.  It just so happens that I admire Stone for his complex and
PROVEN statement that a conspiracy took place in the murder of John F.
Kennedy.
Because of the shocking nature of the assassination, a quick rush to
judgment, called the Warren Commission, tried to calm America's fears of
a government over throw and blamed everything on a half baked ex-Marine
using a rifle with a faulty scope.  Like most important fragments of
historical documentation, they sometimes aren't recognized for what they
are at the time of their occurrence until years later when the whole mix
has time to settle and the public ranks it in order of importance.  Most
surveyed at the time 'JFK' came out, believed that the Warren
Commission's findings were severely flawed.  A much different opinion in
contrast to the first release of the report in 1964.
I'm not about to go over the entire process of re-creating the
assassination scenario but over 80% of people surveyed believe there was
a conspiracy.  Where Stone makes a mistake in his film is in the
outright declaration of multiple government forces strung together to
kill the president.  Certainly, it is a good theory that some body of
government probably had a hand at bringing down Kennedy's presidency but
Stone should have pin pointed one theory instead of speculating on many
different organizations.  Television's 'The X-Files makes assumptions
that a government conspiracy is on its way to changing the outright 
lifestyle of America's (and perhaps the world's) civilization, but the 
show only portrays dark figures in the commission of these crimes and 
points the finger directly at no one.  A smart style of presentation.  
In fairness, Stone does point out that Kennedy was killed because he
would have withdrawn troops from Vietnam and eventually the profitable 
war machine would have slowed down and the war never would have taken
place.  A good theory but as debatable as any other to come along.
The film opens with a startling mix of edited clips from documented 
history which have a narrative added to them and the moments leading up 
to the assassination are pin pointed.  Word of this reaches New Orleans
district attorney Jim Garrison (Kevin Costner) who witnesses the
breaking news of it all on television along with a colleague and the 
weekend that follows is as crazy to everyone in the D.A.'s office as the 
entire staff witnesses on television the murder of JFK's accused
assassin, Lee Harvey Oswald (Gary Oldman).  Things settle down but 
Garrison is strangely drawn back into the investigation of the
presidents death three years later, in 1966.
Throughout the course of the investigation which wraps up after a trial 
in 1969, when Garrison unsuccessfully prosecuted an internationally
known businessman named Clay Shaw (Tommy Lee Jones), 'JFK' movies like a 
high tech thriller which combines the most gripping photography and 
impressive editing ever seen in motion pictures.  Both the editing and 
camera work were awarded well deserved Oscars.  
Oliver Stone's "in your face" style of film presentation is done with
the most multi-media like tools.  Using echoed and sharp sound effects,
black and white photography, slow motion and many other mixes of film
enhancement, Stone certainly holds nothing back and those who criticized 
the film as fiction only did more to enhance the film's appeal in making 
people want to see it.
'JFK' answers no serious questions for most who were around at the time
of the assassination, but the film raises some very interesting points
and although Oliver Stone's career has been sagging somewhat since it
came out, at least Stone's protest against the alleged cover-up that
took place in 1963 is a testament to one man's courage using the world's 
most emotional medium.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
The man who has brought audiences his very unique directing style with such
daring and bizzaro films as 'Eraserhead' (1977), 'The Elephant Man' (not so
bizzaro) (1980), 'Blue Velvet' (1986), 'Wild at Heart' (1990), 'Twin Peaks:
Fire Walk With Me (1992)', and 'Lost Highway' (1997) has now decided to
embark on a real life subject with docile characters, no insanity contained
in his subject matter, and a dose of what it feels like to take your grand
parents to the movies in this day and age.  A real comfort with safe, tame
and extremely likable aspects.
Director David Lynch is getting almost no recognition (and that's a shame)
for 'The Straight Story', a wonderful and low key film that is the most
fondly remembered of its kind since 1983's 'Tender Mercies' which wasn't so
much a motion picture as it was a series of still photographs brought to
life through the miracle of characterization.  That's what 'The Straight
Story' looks and feels like.  And it shrinks the marvel of the big screen
motion picture into a compact memory of finely wrought images and the story
of a simple man who really did exist.
Based on a true story, in 1994, a 73 year old man named Alvin Straight (who
died in 1996), drove his lawn mower some 300+ miles from Iowa to Wisconsin
to see his brother who has suffered from a stroke and Alvin wants to make
peace with him since the two men last spoke because there has been some bad
blood between the two of them.
The film begins in Alvin's home town in Iowa.  Alvin is poverty stricken.
He lives in a small run down shack with his simple minded daughter Rose
(Sissy Spacek).  One day he falls in the kitchen of his home and needs to
see the doctor.  Alvin suffers a series of physical ailments.  He has bad
vision.  His hips are shot etc., etc.  He can't afford treatment and tells
the doctor that.  Alvin then needs to walk with two canes instead of the
doctor recommended walker (he can't afford that either).  Upon receiving the
news that this brother has had a stroke, Alvin under takes a project that no
one (not even the audience) knows about until it completed.  He fixes up his
John Deere lawn mower and welds a trailer like contraption to the rear that
will carry his supplies and provide his shelter, including a place to sleep.
His first trek is unsuccessful.  He gets a few miles from town but then has
to come back.  He buys a better lawn mower and then takes off for a bumpy
but successful go of it.
Alvin has many encounters on his trip.  One night after parking for the day
and relaxing, Alvin meets a young female runaway and invites her to spend
some time with him by his camp fire.  He is roasting wieners on a stick and
offers the lady one.  She asks him if he's afraid to be an old man at night
by the wayside with no one around.  Alvin tells her that as a war veteran,
if he could survive the trenches, he can't be afraid of anything.  They
strike up a conversation where Alvin does most of the talking and he tells
of how his daughter Rose had a tragedy in her life that saw the removal of
her children from her home because authorities thought she was a danger to
them because of her Forrest Gump/Rain Man personality and acts of the mind.
Alvin meets college kids and a group of ordinary, middle aged folks.  He is
almost killed when he loses control of his lawn mower while rolling down a
steep hill.  The town's folks find out about his trek to see his sibling and
they help Alvin fix his lawn mower, give him lodging and even offer to drive
him the rest of the way.  Alvin accepts their help except for the part about
being driven to his destination.  He wants to do that himself.
The film has little or no music score.  It looks extremely easy to make but
that's the deception.  This is an extremely difficult film to pull off
because the subject matter is so ordinary that unless it is told in a simple
fashion it will look like more than it really is.  There are no fancy camera
tricks, no sharp, quick witted editing flashes, and virtually no technical
marvels at all.  Richard Farnsworth's Oscar worthy performance is the best
thing the film has to offer.  While Alvin is something of an enigma to
behold, Farnsworth portrays him as a wise, level headed man who never gets
angry and while the performance is one track for the most part, it's done
with the quality of making those who see the film, want to adopt Alvin as a
foster grand parent because he hasn't let life get him down.
'The Straight Story' is just the kind of slapping down many of us need in
our homogenized, digitized and computerized worlds of high technology with
cell phones, DVD players, fax, e-mails and other gadgets that make society
seem artificial as we forget where are roots are.  Alvin never lets us
forget who we really should be at certain moments in our lives.
Extraordinary!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
I admire the way foreign films manage to tell a story without standard
Hollywood trappings.  This is a good thing most of the time but in the case
of 'Shine' the emotional impact needed to sustain a film of family, genius,
insanity and redemption is missing.  Based on a true story, the Australian
made 'Shine' is the story of a musical pianist/genius (Geoffrey Rush) driven
to the brink of insanity through the pressure of obtaining success and the
break-up he has with his family after turning against his father's wishes to
leave home in Perth, Australia to pursue his studies in London, England.
 Given the fact that most psychological studies have concluded that genius is
often associated with insanity is a factor as well.  His father (Armin
Mueller-Stahl) disowns him but the emotional bond between them remains.  The
film opens on a rainy evening in the present day and Rush's character is
approaching 50 and the movie is then told in flashback from his days as a boy
growing up in Australia and becoming a legend at 14 with his gift of tickling
the ivories.  I wasn't moved by this picture the way I thought I would be and
'Shine' doesn't have a lot to offer the average movie goer as it is a film
better suited to film buffs rather than for general audiences.  It's art must
be appreciated and I suppose the film's admirable qualities depend on your
point of view and for a look at the life of a musician with emotion and
Hollywood running rampant you can look at 1995's 'Mr. Holland's Opus,' a film
many considered overly sentimental but a balance is not struck with 'Shine'
as it is just the opposite and my preference is the former.  Judge for
yourself.  Other notable members of the cast are Noah Taylor, Lynn Redgrave
and Sir John Gielgud.
Coming Soon: Reviews of 'Secrets and Lies,' 'The People vs. Larry Flynt,'
'Michael' and 'Evening Star.'  "SEE YOU AT THE MOVIES."

Title
Review for Officer and a Gentleman, An (1982)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     'An Officer and a Gentleman' did an extraordinary thing when it was
first released in 1982.  Not only did it showcase the best performance of
Richard Gere's career, but it found the perfect balance necessary in
appealing to both men and women.  Many of my friends saw the movie on their
first dates and it struck an emotional chord with many of them.  It also
made personality the main focus of its moral overtones and while it did
appear at times to play out like a soap opera, no one can accuse it of being
a false statement on life.
     Set in Seattle, Washington, the opening scene is rather unattractive as
it shows Gere in a hotel room pulling up the blind and the camera shows two
naked people embraced together in bed.  It turns out to be Gere's father
(Robert Loggia) and a prostitute.  Gere informs his father (an alcoholic and
womanizer) that he has joined the officer's candidate school of the local
Navy branch.  His father laughs and Gere walks out on him.
     The film's opening credits are displayed as Gere rides his motorcycle
to the military academy and he along with a host of others are grilled in an
opening monologue by their drill sergeant (Louis Gossett, Jr. who won the
Best Supporting Actor Oscar).  He immediately takes a disliking to Gere and
his ways.
     Gere turns out to be a hustler for profit.  Selling things like boots,
belt buckles and other accessories to the men in his bunkhouse.  The film
also shows his developing friendship with a fellow officer candidate (David
Keith) and Gere has a romantic fling with a local factory girl (Debra
Winger) who turns him into what the title suggests, 'An Officer and a
Gentleman'.  It was an Oscar nominated role for Winger which she excelled at.
     What is most enjoyable about the film are the one-on-one scenes which
involve Gere and Gossett.  Gossett certainly is a major factor in molding
and shaping Gere into becoming a better person but more importantly he is
the ideal authority figure in Gere's life and he's like one of those
teachers we hated at the time we were learning but later we realize that
their methods were for are own good and we come to admire them.
     Another bonus to the film is seeing how negative moral choices can play
a permanent part in life and while the film doesn't try and force the issue
of morals, it simply paints them as unavoidable parts of out existence.         
VISIT FILM FOLLOW-UP BY WALTER FRITH AT
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
The most disappointing thing about 'The Ice Storm' is that despite the 
strength of its characters, it is a tediously flat and unoriginal film that 
breaks no new ground in exploring marital infidelity, adolescents coming 
of age or the human condition in general.  
Based on the novel by Rick Moody and scripted by James Schamus, it's 
set in New Caanan, Connecticut in 1973. 'The Ice Storm' begins as the 
story of a middle class family headed by Kevin Kline and Joan Allen who 
have two children.  Kline is having an affair with his next door neighbour 
(Sigourney Weaver) while Allen confronts her own suspicions about the 
affair.  Their daughter (Christina Ricci) is a socially aware adolescent 
who follows the Watergate hearings with great enthusiasm.  All the 
adolescents in this film begin exploring sex, drugs and rebellion against 
their parental authority figures.    
After looking hard at the film what struck me most curiously is why would 
you make a film audiences have seen over and over again? Director Ang 
Lee ('Sense and Sensibility') tries to build a film with intense dramatic 
overtones with little or no music score, starkly bleak camera work which 
in fairness is appropriate for the depressing conditions of the main 
characters lives but although I enjoy motion pictures which don't have 
the conventional happy endings (and I'm not giving away the ending by 
saying this) this film puts no new spin on creating any difference in the 
film whether its the opening ten minutes or the final ten minutes.  The 
tone and character portrayals are unmoving for the film's entire running 
time.  
The only thing slightly unique about the film is the concept of wife 
swapping.  At an adult party in the film, men put their car keys in a bowl 
and at the end of the night, women fish out a pair of keys and go home 
with the owners of that set.  I once saw a half hour episode of 'All in the 
Family' which explored this issue in a deeper and much more meaningful,  
entertaining manner.
'The Ice Storm' isn't a bad film, it just didn't strike a nerve with me and 
perhaps that fact the its dramatic shadows are so hard to spot, it might 
have played better with a couple of re-writes.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Marvin's Room (1996)
There are few movies from 1996 with a more realistic look at everyday life
than 'Marvin's Room.'  Meryl Streep and Diane Keaton play sisters who haven't
seen each other for twenty years.  Meryl Streep is a frumpy and belligerent
woman with a large chip on her shoulder whose course personality has had a
devistating effect on her seventeen year old son (Leonardo DiCaprio) who has
burned down their home and is sent to a mental institution.  She has another
young son in tow and her Ohio lifestyle and potential career in cosmetology
is disrupted by a call from her sister (Keaton), a woman of family dedication
and sunshine personality who has just been diagnosed with leukemia and needs
here sister and two nephews to come down to her Florida home and test as
potential bone marrow matches.  All the while Keaton is nursing her weak
minded old aunt (Gwen Verdon) and her bed ridden father (Hume Cronyn).
 Everything goes fine in the process of breaking the ice after a relationship
gap of twenty years between the sisters but hidden feelings begins to surface
and the family is brought to terms of recognizing and confronting each
other's faults and frailties.  This movie is a stimulating and relentlessly
emotional odyssey with touching and heartfelt performances from a
professional cast of actors resembling the visuals of a stage play.  The
movie has no pretentious Hollywood trappings and director Jerry Zaks earns
high marks for his interpretation of presetning a simple fact in life which
is "you can't choose your family."  'Marvin's Room' is headed for that
treasure chest of celluloid to become a burined treasure.  When Robert DeNiro
is asked to do a meaningless bit part as Keaton's doctor and makes it
memorable then you know this has got to be a gem.

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Of all the notable actors who have portrayed Satan in the last decade or so,
among them Jack Nicholson in 'The Witches of Eastwick' (1987) and Robert
DeNiro in 'Angel Heart' (1987), none have captured the charismatic style
quite like Al Pacino has in 'The Devil's Advocate'.  The latest film from
director Taylor Hackford ('Dolores Claiborne', 'An Officer and a Gentleman',
'Against All Odds') uses conscience as a metaphor to tell an old fashioned
morality tale that avoids using cliches to transmit its dreamy message of
morality.  It uses each scene as a carefully thought out stepping stone to
reveal its real intentions late in its running time of 141 minutes.  Not
always on target but never boring, the audience is given clues to the film's
resolution in leading up to its chilling climax enhanced with some of the
most mind twisting visuals seen on film this year.
Keanu Reeves is a young, ambitious and talented defense attorney in Florida
who has never lost in over 60 cases he's been associated with and upon
representing one client whom everyone believes will be convicted, Reeves gets
him off and meets a representative from a New York City law firm who has been
scouting his talents and persuades him to travel to Manhattan with all
expenses paid to meet the firm's mentor (Pacino) in an attempt to obtain his
services.  Reeves agrees and along with his wife (Charlize Theron), they are
introduced to a world which seems alien to them but the goodies seem to
attractive to resist.  As the film progresses there is a feeling that
something is not quite right in their lives and the wife wants to leave.
 Reeves tells her that his career is going well and that leaving is out of
the question.
The first thing that should be said about this film is noting the progression
of Keanu Reeves as an actor of some merit.  Although his southern accent is
sometimes used inconsistantly in the movie, he holds his own for the most
part with any other actor in the picture and is totally convincing as a fiery
lawyer.  He is the reason the courtroom sequences in the film are so
pleasantly executed and director Taylor Hackford has extracted a complex and
multi dimensional performance from Reeves.  As for Pacino, what can you say
about an actor who has triumphed at every role he's ever played.  Even in his
films that have bombed in both a critical and financial manner, Pacino always
burns up the screen with his authoritative manner and disciplined command of
character.  Portraying Satan is another triumph for Pacino who delivers a sly
and slightly over the top performance.
If you are turned off by movies which deal heavily in explicit and
supernatural gore and violence and are offended by openly sexual scenes and
nudity then 'The Devil's Advocate' should be avoided because the film is
shockingly explicit on all of these counts but for others it will scorch your
senses with an original twist but it has an ending which may leave you cold
and unconvinced but it's still a good ride most of the way.

Title
Review for Airport (1970)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
1970's 'Airport' is an example of how you can take a perilous situation and
replay it over and over again in three sequels.  'Airport 1975', 'Airport
'77' and 'The Concorde: Airport '79' were mediocre at best with the latter an
absolutely disastrous disaster film but the the first film is entertaing to a
point but can't back away from becoming a full blown soap opera.  
The movie is based on Arthur Hailey's best selling novel and takes place at a
hectic airport on a winter night smack dab in the middle of a treacherous
snow storm.  
For an actor of his stature, Burt Lancaster is completely wasted as an
airport official managing a crisis in the air from the ground assisted by
Jean Seberg and George Kennedy and the rest of the cast is a mix of talent
and movie stars thrown together for an odd mix.  Dean Martin (yes, the
crooner and Jerry Lewis's former partner) is an airline pilot in love with a
flight attendant (Jacqueline Bisset).  Veteran actress Helen Hayes is a
little old lady who takes pleasure in being a stowaway on flights time and
time again and Van Heflin probably has the best role in the film as a
suicidal maniac on board with a bomb in his briefcase and sympathy is
garnered for his wife (Maureen Stapleton) to whom he has left a life
insurance policy before getting on the plane. 
The man who made 'Airport' is George Seaton, a director not really suited to
this material but he does do a somewhat decent job although he's no Irwin
Allen.  Dean Martin was never much of an actor and perhaps his biggest claim
to fame in movies was as the James Bond rip-off character Matt Helm.  George
Kennedy is sharply perceptive as an aviation specialist describing how to
manage the crisis on hand and what will go wrong aside from the obvious if
the bomb on board detonates.
While 'Airport' is no classic, is does have a few trashy moments of cheap
thrills but nothing you'll jump up at.  It simply can't decide what kind of
movie it is, thriller or character study. It never fully succeeds at either.

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
There is a rule among entertainers.  Never perform with children and/or
animals because you'll be upstaged every time.  Eddie Murphy performs
with both in 'Doctor Dolittle'.  The first film version of this story
appeared in 1967 and starred legendary actor Rex Harrison in the title
role and while the film was a critical disaster, it received a Best
Picture Oscar nomination and won an Oscar for Visual Effects.  One thing
that puzzled me upon watching this film is the fact that many references
in the film's comedy are made to body parts and bodily functions in
general and that is a little hard for some very conservative parents to
handle in allowing their children to see it.  The matinee performance I
saw was full of kids and they seemed to handle it well and the parents
laughed right along with their little ones and they seemed to be
enjoying themselves as well.  The film runs a short 85 minutes, perfect
for appealing to the attention span of youngsters.
'Doctor Dolittle' opens about 30 years in the past, in the late 1960's
and a little boy named John Dolittle is discovering that he understands
animal language and can make conversation with animals in general.  No
doubt concerned for his well being, his parents, in particular his
father (Ozzie Davis), try and put him on the right track and send away
his pet dog when they feel he's spending a little too much time with it
while talking to it all the time.  Skip forward to the present day.
John Dolittle (Eddie Murphy) is now a doctor.  Don't be confused.  He's
an MD of the people and not a vet.  He has a wife and two young
daughters.  One of the daughters has a guinea pig, voiced by Chris
Rock.  He's one of the first to make conversation with Murphy.  The
other main characters (if you can call them that) are a tiger, voiced by
Albert Brooks and a dog, voiced by Norm Macdonald.  The plot that
unfolds around the whole thing is the sale of Murphy's large clinic to a
potential buyer (Peter Boyle).  Murphy's two partners at the clinic
(Oliver Platt and Richard Schiff) are portrayed as buffoons and are
wasted characters.
I enjoyed the film for several reasons.  First off, it's summer and its
a pleasure to see a film entertain children and adults on the same level
and while the Disney franchise has gotten stale, a film like this with a
major star like Eddie Murphy, in something he's never done before, is
quite interesting to watch in light of remembering some of the very
adult films that Murphy has done in the past such as '48 Hours' and
'Beverly Hills Cop'.  Murphy shows he can do a family film.  The film is
simple, straight forward and has some genuine belly laughs and clever
wit in its presentation by director Betty Thomas ('The Brady Bunch
Movie', 'Private Parts').  Not a classic and a film you'll probably want
to see only once, 'Doctor Dolittle' is a film that I can see having a
sequel because its box office strength so far is strong.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
Cast - Michael Douglas, Tobey Maguire, Frances McDormand, Robert Downey Jr.,
Katie Holmes, Richard Thomas, Rip Torn.
Directed by - Curtis Hanson.
Written by - Steve Kloves based on the novel by Michael Chabon.
Produced by - Curtis Hanson and Scott Rudin.
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted) / Rated R
for language and drug content.
(Rating) > Ontario Film Review Board - AA (Adult Accompaniment) / Rated AA
for
mature theme.
Running Length - 112 minutes.
Distributor - Paramount Pictures.
A lot of what plays out in 'Wonder Boys' resembles what happens when you
tinker with a jack-in-the-box.  Things pop up unexpectedly, and for the
film's characters, sometimes in a pleasing manner and sometimes not.  The
film brings up the stereotype that has followed many writers around their
entire lives.  The booze, the womanizing, the drugs, and their sometimes
whacked out personality that have inspired such great works in the literary
field and the whole film is a merry-go-round of hilarious pop culture with
redemption as its true message.
Set mostly in Pittsburgh, Michael Douglas gives his best performance in
years, probably since his Oscar winning turn for best actor in 1987's 'Wall
Street', as a seemingly washed up college professor named Grady Tripp who
teaches writing but can't teach himself how to get his own life in order.
He carries on an affair with two women from opposite ends of the spectrum.
One is with a student named Hannah Green (Katie Holmes) and the other is
with the institution's Chancellor, Sara Gaskell (Frances McDormand).
Plaguing Grady is the fact that he has promised his long time editor Terry
Crabtree (Robert Downey Jr.) that he would have a book completed for him in
time for their next meeting when Terry flies in from New York City.
Bothering Grady further is a writer named Quentin "Q" Morewood (Rip Torn),
who cranks out a novel every eighteen months which causes Grady to be
extremely jealous.  One night at a party at the Chancellor's home, Grady
comes face to face socially with one of his students named James Leer (Tobey
Maguire).  James is the deadpan weirdo that most of his class have come to
despise.  He writes obtuse material that is somehow absorbing, shocking and
funny and carries his writer's technique into his real life.  He often makes
things up, such as the fictional town that he says he's from, as he goes
along to tell others about his life and it all seems incredibly plausible,
the mark of a successful writer.....I suppose.  At the party, James gets
into some serious mischief involving a jacket that used to belong to Marilyn
Monroe, a vicious blind dog that meets with the discharge from a firearm and
the fact that he has dragged his beloved professor through all of it at the
same time.  The after math of this bizarre social gathering is sort of what
makes 'Wonder Boys' the entertaining film that it is.  It starts off rather
slowly but propels itself like fireworks when it finally gets going.
For the average movie person with upstanding tastes, 'Wonder Boys' is a film
that may be hard to focus on.  Don't think that the title means all the
characters are WONDERful in terms of their upstanding traits.  You have to
accept its moral abyss in order to enjoy it.  The characters are all
fractured inside somehow by life's twists and turns.  The sex, the downbeat
feeling that shows why few smile in this film and the messed up activities
at times resemble a frat party and all the while you somehow want to be in
on the action which is strangely seductive.
Curtis Hanson, who directed and co-wrote 1997's 'L.A. Confidential', does a
complete 180 here in brilliant fashion.  The material in 'Wonder Boys'
couldn't be more different.  'L.A. Confidential' was a hard boiled, hard
nosed and hard edged film about police corruption with zero tolerance for
humour while 'Wonder Boys' relies entirely on humour, sometimes the kind
that feels like you've hit your funny bone on something hard but with so
many wonderful performances on the plate, why leave anything on it.  One of
the most intriguing scenes has Douglas on the phone with the Chancellor's
husband (Richard Thomas), telling him that he's in love with his wife and
all the while acting stone faced through it.  For reaction purposes, one of
the most difficult challenges for an actor is to do a successful phone
conversation as you have to act like you'll never know what you'll hear and
Douglas pulls it off superbly.
More importantly than that is the performance of Tobey Maguire.  He upstages
Douglas at many points and to do this to an Oscar winning actor, is a
marvel.  It's probably the best upstaging from a young performer on a
veteran since Juliette Lewis did it many times to Robert De Niro in 1991's
'Cape Fear'.  This is Maguire's breakthrough role as performances in
'Pleasantville' and 'The Cider House Rules' have sort of warmed him up for
his first truly spectacular role and this is it.  He and Douglas could be
Oscar bound next year for these truly human performances of candour and
sharp wit.  'Wonder Boys' is hardly conventional film making.  It's genius
layered with sensational off beat characters who are the real wonder!
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
     Anyone who has ever been deeply involved in a wedding party knows that
sometimes a wedding is not always so wonderful and romantic as some
sentimentals make it out to be. Julia Roberts has a first hand experience at
this in 'My Best Friend's Wedding'.  Roberts plays a food critic in NYC who
gets a phone call from her best (male) friend (Dermot Mulroney) and he
informs her that he's getting married.  It comes as a shock since its
Wednesday and the wedding is in four days.  Roberts tells her gay editor
(Rupert Everett in the film's best performance in a sly supporting role that
will grow on you) that she has four days to 'break up the wedding' because
she feels the woman marrying Mulroney (Cameron Diaz) is all wrong for him and
that she has secretly been in love with him all these years but somehow
didn't tell him. 
     As I was watching this movie I loved part of it and hated part of it.
 That is really strange.  I don't consider myself a romantic and I've only
been to one wedding in the last ten years.  Don't get me wrong, I believe in
marriage; heck, my parents just celebrated their 49th wedding anniversary on
July 1st.  What I really found odd was the mixture of characters being in
this situation and at times appearing very unattractive in their qualities
and at other times I wanted to give each of them a hug.  It was like I was
watching two different people (especially in Roberts and Diaz) with split
personalities.  Julia Roberts is somewhat inept in this film and I didn't
believe it could have taken her so long to confess her love to the man of her
dreams especially when she does it on the day of his wedding.
     'My Best Friend's Wedding' is a fantastic date movie even though it
falls victim to the trappings of old fasioned Hollywood movie making in the
most sentimental of ways and in many ways this in uncharacteristic of the
film's writer (Ronald Bass who won an Oscar for co-writing 1988's 'Rain
Man').  The film's director (P.J. Hogan) must have been responsible for this.
 There is a just ending to this film but it doesn't conclude the way you
might think it will and I wish I could believe that someone as attractive as
Julia Roberts could stay single until she was three weeks away from her 28th
birthday (her age in the film) but women this gorgeous are usually taken long
before that.  At least the movie is honest enough to relay the fact that in
most cases men and women can't have a close platonic relationship without
taking things further because as Billy Crystal said in 'When Harry Met Sally'
-----> "the sex part always gets in the way".  

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Cast - Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Ben Kingsley, Blair Underwood,
Guy Pearce, Anne Archer, Philip Baker Hall, Bruce Greenwood
Directed by - William Friedkin
Written by - Stephen Gaghan based on a story by James Webb
Produced by - Scott Rudin and Richard D. Zanuck
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted) - Rated R
for scenes of war violence, and for language.
Running Length - 128 minutes
Distributor - Paramount Pictures
I had an acquaintance who aspired to be a film maker.  He had worked on a
number of low budget Hollywood productions as an associate film editor and
as an extra in others.  He went to film school and understood that mechanics
of film making.  His favourite movie star, actor and film maker was Warren
Beatty.  Upon watching one of William Friedkin's films with him, he quipped
at one point: "Typical William Friedkin direction".  He has a point.
Besides 'The French Connection' and 'The Exorcist', what has this man done
that is really considered landmark film making?  Friedkin's career seemed to
dry up after 'The Exorcist'.  Perhaps it was because of his frightful
reputation for allegedly abusing his cast and crew.  A real life priest
named Reverend William O'Malley, who played Father Dyer in 'The Exorcist',
administers the last rites to father Damien Karras (Jason Miller) at the end
of the film after Karras crashes down a flight of stairs.  If you watch
carefully, O'Malley's hand shakes as he makes the sign of the cross.  This
was NOT acting.  According to various reports, Friedkin slapped him across
the face to get him in character for that tragic scene and it worked
magnificently.  Friedkin is also said to have thrown the original music
score for 'The Exorcist', by Lalo Schifrin, into the studio parking lot in a
fit of rage because he thought it was so bad.  Credit the 25th anniversary
release of 'The Exorcist' on DVD for this information.  Friedkin never even
came close to re-gaining legendary status for any film after 'The Exorcist'
and 'Rules of Engagement' has Friedkin written all over it.  The
semi-documentary style of photography, long tracking shots, and blistering
performances make it a return to the old days for the Oscar-winning
director.
Colonel Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and Colonel Terry L. Childers (Samuel
L. Jackson) play friends who have put their lives into serving their
country.  Childers has an important mission go awry in the eyes of some and
he has to go on trial for it.  While protecting U.S. Ambassador Mourain (Ben
Kingsley) and his family, including his wife (Anne Archer) in a third world
country, shots are fired at the embassy through a  protest turned violent by
the crowd and the lives of the Americans are clearly threatened.  The order
is given by Childers for his men to return fire and many civilians are
killed.  The entire fiasco is captured on video by the embassy's camera and
Childers is informed by his superior officer back home that he will go on
trial for murder as it is believed that Childers opened fire for for no
apparent reason!  It turns out that the military doesn't want a black eye
and the U.S. National Security Advisor, William Sokal (Bruce Greenwood),
destroys the tape that could clear Childers at trial and wants one man to
take the fall for the entire episode of events.
Childers enlists the aid of Colonel Hayes Hodges (Jones) to defend him at
trial.  Hodges' record is shaky and he tells Childers he needs a better
lawyer to go up against the government's top gun and prosecutor Major Mark
Biggs (Guy Pearce).  Other supporting players in the film such as
performances by Philip Baker Hall as Hodges' father and Blair Underwood as a
loyal and fellow officer side by side with Childers during the battle add
little to the film and this movie has a weird scope of academics about it.
My eyes were glued to the screen during the embassy shoot out and the whole
thing is staged very well.  Another plus to the film is the research put
forward by Hodges as he travels to the scene of the alleged crime by himself
and makes some interesting discoveries.  The court room scenes are also very
compelling but much of the film drags at other times.  The performance by
Guy Pearce as the military prosecutor is comparable to the performance by
Kevin Bacon in 'A Few Good Men' as Capt. Jack Ross, who prosecutes the case
against two young marines accused of murder.  Guy Pearce is best known for
his turn as the straight laced policeman Ed Exley in 'L.A. Confidential'.
He's an actor who is English born but who works the American accent very
well.
'Rules of Engagement' is one of those touchy/feely films that may strike a
nerve too close to government that will make some disregard it and want to
bury it.  Its entire structure is based on distrust of those in government
and the film will have a tough sell on many fronts as many politically
charged films usually do.  It has a believable ending, crisp performances
from its leads and William Friedkin doesn't exactly set any new trends but
his experiences as a calculated film maker save this from being a failure.
It is a watchable piece of entertainment that is somewhat predictable and is
another film since 1998's 'The Negotiator', and 1996's 'A Time to Kill',
that places Samuel L. Jackson's character on trial, whether it be in a
courtroom or in the minds of others.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Norman Jewison's attachment to racial issues in film is hardly new for the
great director.  Before 'The Hurricane', he has tackled the issue with two
of Hollywood's more under appreciated films, 'In the Heat of the Night' and
'A Soldier's Story' (which helped Denzel Washington gain major recognition).
Neither film made the 1998 list of 100 greatest films as selected by the
American Film Institute and the latter wasn't even a nominee in the final
400 nominees out of 40,000 American films from the first century of film
1896-1996.  In fact, from 'The Cincinnati Kid' to 'Fiddler on the Roof' to
'Moonstruck', Jewison didn't get a film on the final 100 list and that's a
travesty.  As a fellow countryman from Canada, I admire Jewison's trek to
get international recognition and he still may win an Oscar one day.  But
'The Hurricane' won't earn him one.  This is an absorbing but slow moving
motion picture that only has one great performance from a cast that could
have performed in top fashion but didn't.
Many films have one great performance that save them from failure.  Michael
Douglas' Oscar winning performance in 1987's 'Wall Street' (the film
received no other Oscar nominations) was the only thing that helped the film
fight off charges that it was a sexist and chauvinistic portrayal of high
rollers in the financial world.  The film was also criticized for its nasty
portrayal of bankers and stock traders as all being evil, weak minded or
completely greedy.  Jack Palance's Oscar win in the 1991 caper 'City
Slickers' (the film received no other Oscar nominations) was more than a
career award.  In my opinion, Palance truly deserved to win but many thought
it was a year in which the Oscar then should have gone to Anthony Hopkins in
the supporting category for 'The Silence of the Lambs' (Hopkins WON in the
lead best actor category for having less than half an hour on screen in a
two hour film) and to Warren Beatty in 'Bugsy' in the leading actor
category.  And finally, Marisa Tomei's performance in 1992's 'My Cousin
Vinny' earned her a best supporting actress Oscar and the film, again,
received no other Oscar nominations.
At the time of this review, Denzel Washington stands alone in this film as
the only Oscar nominee.  He is nominated in the best actor category for 'The
Hurricane' and stands a good chance of winning.  His courageous performance
as a man standing almost alone against the system is one that reminded me of
Daniel Day-Lewis' performance in 1993's 'In the Name of the Father' as a man
wrongly sent to prison.
In 'The Hurricane' Denzel Washington portrays Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter.  In
the late 1960's, he was on his way to a glorious and successful boxing
career before it ended tragically at the satanic hands of racism.  The film
states that a New Jersey police officer name Det. Vincent Della Pesca (Dan
Hedaya) helped frame Carter in a multiple murder case and sent him to prison
for over 20 years before Carter had any real chance for his case to be heard
with new evidence.  Della Pesca had a run-in with Carter when Carter was a
little boy as Carter was brought in for assault (actually self defense) at
about the age of 10.  It was as situation where the boy looked guilty but
was very much innocent.
Carter writes a book about his trials and tribulations and many years after
his incarceration, Carter's book about his unjust prison sentence finds its
way into the hands of Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon), a young black
teenager from Brooklyn, New York whose parents are alcoholics and Lesra is
adopted by a group of young Canadian commune individuals from Toronto,
Ontario, and is in part, raised by them in learning how to read and write
and be sent off to college to pursue his dream of becoming an attorney.
Lesra's passion is to meet Rubin Carter face to face in prison and tell him
that he believes in his cause and offers to help fight his conviction with
the help of his Canadian pals.  Their investigation sheds new light on
Carter's possible innocence and the information is presented before the law
for serious consideration.
Denzel Washington does it again.  He plays a real life character as he did
in his first Oscar nominated role as Steven Biko in 1987's 'Cry Freedom' and
his only other Oscar nomination in a leading role to date is for 1992's
'Malcolm X'.  Washington lets the layers of his acting ability do the
talking like other actors such as Gene Hackman, Nicolas Cage and Tom Hanks
who all use very little if no make-up and rely on good old fashioned
academics to enhance a movie.  As Rubin Carter, Washington has many points
in the film where he flat out carries the film himself.  'The Hurricane' is
long, drawn out and worth one viewing as far as I'm concerned but Denzel
Washington does his job and the film only thrives when he's on screen and
many would argue he's absent in this film a bit too much.  Still worth a
marginal recommendation, however, for Washington's amazing performance.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for My Fellow Americans (1996)
In recent years we have had some humourous and uplifting films dealing
with the highest office in the world.  'Dave' (1993) and 'The American
President' (1995) are examples of movies done with the look of a Frank
Capra classic i.e. 'Mr. Smith Goes to Washington.'  In an age of the
anti-politician, 'My Fellow Americans' is the perfect lampoon on the
men who often seem out of touch with the people they represent.
Republican one term President Russell Kramer (Jack Lemmon) and
Democratic one term President Matt Douglas (James Garner) are
inadvertently thrown together in a survival for their lives after they
uncover a scandal in the current White House where a present day
Republican President (Dan Aykroyd) sits.  Some great one liners and a
few nifty stunts make for good entertainment and it would have been
appropriate to entitle this 'Grumpy Old Presidents' as the humour is
similar to that of 'Grumpy Old Men' (1993) and 'Grumpier Old Men'
(1995) both starring Jack Lemmon.  As the movie progresses we see some
very serious moments as Kramer and Douglas are put in touch with real
Americans who are given the opportunity to explain how their lives have
been ruined because of policies the Presidents implemented when they
held office.  Surprisingly, Jack Lemmon is upstaged by the relaxed and
hilariously moody performance turned in by James Garner who settles
into his character almost with poetic ease while Lemmon plays his role
with stiff uptightness but both profiles work on a professional actor's
level and the contrasting personality of the two is convincingly
executed.  It's the perfect holiday movie which goes overboard at times
by being extremely silly but its redeemed by an entertaining climax and
a good ending.  It's fun watching two actors like Lemmon and Garner who
can hold their own with anyone in Hollywood but who have the sense of
humour not to take themselves too seriously from time to time.

Title
Review for Misrables, Les (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
>From the first film version of Victor Hugo's classic novel 'Les
Miserables' in 1935 with Fredric March and Charles Laughton, to the
latest (not counting this one) in 1995 with Jean-Paul Belmondo and
Michel Boujenah, there have been four other notable versions sandwiched
in between.  Two in 1952, one in 1957 and a television version in 1978.
Hugo's fascinating novel of forgiveness and redemption is a timeless and
literary classic message to be passed down for all generations to come.
I've read the book twice but the last time was some 15 years ago or so
and I must confess that I've never seen any of the staged versions but
so what?  Motion pictures capture the true essence of eternal human
expression better than any other medium.  Just my opinion, of course,
but seeing visuals spring from the pages of artful writing is truly one
of life's greatest pleasures.  The latest version is a pleasing, but is
at times a muted adaptation that might disappoint the hard core fans of
the story but will satisfy most others.  I'm somewhere in between and I
recommend the picture either way.
Set in early 19th century France, Liam Neeson is Jean Valjean, a man
convicted of stealing bread from a merchant's window display and is
forced to spend 19 years in prison, suffering the harsh labour of a
punishment that doesn't fit the crime.  The hypocrisy of 19th justice
comes to complete fruition as people are judged in the workplace on
their morals, but a completely immoral punishment such as this comes to
pass.  Upon his release on parole, he examines his future through the
kind actions of a monsignor who spares him from a return to prison and
Valjean rises above the social cellar to become a man of political
influence and considerable wealth.  Neeson is towering in the role of
Valjean, uncompromising in his righteous path of redemption while
retaining the strength of character he learned the hard way in prison.
Geoffrey Rush ('Shine') is Javert, a man who served as an official who
supervised, abused and humiliated Valjean in prison and now recognizes
Valjean twenty years later, determined to see Valjean arrested for
circumstances that he considers to be a violation of Valjean's parole.
His intention is to expose Valjean for who he once was.  In this time
and place, you don't have the chance to reform as society always judges
you by what you've done in your past life.   Javert is a man so rigid in
his moral high ground, that he fails to see the errors of his way.  Rush
is completely different from the role he played in 'Shine'.  He proves
he can make a villain just as memorable as a hero and he is truly a
gifted performer.
Valjean now owns a factory and is the local mayor and takes pity upon a
former worker, Fantine (Uma Thurman) who was dismissed for having a
child out of wedlock and is now forced to work as a prostitute to
support her daughter that she sent away to live with others.  As he is
forced to leave his business behind because of the relentless pursuit by
Javert, Valjean adopts Fantine's daughter Cosette (Mimi Newman as a
little girl and and later Claire Danes as a young woman) after Fantine's
death and as the years pass, they try an make a life for themselves
around the time of an uprising against the French monarchy.  Cosette's
semi-romantic involvement with a young revolutionary (Hans Matheson) is
the film's weak spot, an underwritten sub plot that detracts for the
overall impact of the film's climax.
As a richly textured and deeply felt part of literary history, Les
Miserables transforms well into a motion picture but it is impossible to
portray all of the book's elements in a 2 hour and 13 minute film but
director Bille August and screenwriter Rafael Yglesias have fashioned a
version of the story that moves well, is easy to understand, and despite
the lack of French accents among the cast, it's a story of redemption on
many levels, most notably that of souls tormented by their past.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
A couple of years ago, my favourite director, Oliver Stone, and the world's
greatest actor, Al Pacino, were going to get together and make a movie about
Panamanian general Manuel Noriega.  The project was shelved but it's not
like Stone and Pacino don't have a past.  Stone wrote one of Pacino's best
parts, 1983's 'Scarface', directed by Brian DePalma.  So when I heard that
my favourite actor and favourite director were gearing up to make a movie
about one of my favourite sports, pro football, it filled me with great
anticipation but the final cut is a muddled and badly edited slice of pure
Americana that uses its camera like an untamed animal, and in a running time
of nearly three hours, there could easily have been an hour cut from the
final product.  'Any Given Sunday' also stereotypes the very nature of pro
athletes, based on their bad behaviour and seduction by the big time.
The best movie ever made about the gridiron is still 1979's 'North Dallas
Forty' which showed the intimacies of the business, the sport, the players
and the effects of the game in a more calculating way than anything put
forward by 'Any Given Sunday'.  Al Pacino stars as coach Tony D'Amato of the
pro football team the Miami Sharks.  The Sharks are fighting to make the
playoffs and for the sake of profit, the prospect of a new stadium and
overall prestige.  The team's unqualified owner (Cameron Diaz) makes a
mockery of something she doesn't understand...the bond between players and
coaches.  She's a Cornell University educated business woman whose father
put her in charge of the team after his death through the conditions of his
will and doesn't know how to balance the tactics of her coaches and her
board of directors.
D'Amato's loyalty to the 39-year old washed up quarterback named Jack "Cap"
Rooney (Dennis Quaid) is blind.  D'Amato refuses to accept the fact that
Rooney is washed up and can't mold the new flashy third string quarterback
Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx) into his style of player.  Beaman likes changing
the plays sent in by the coach, often vomits in the huddle before executing
a play and makes the cover of every major magazine and is more concerned
with celebrity than with the concept of being a team player.  This
frustrates two of his most important team mates (LL Cool J and real former
NFL player Lawrence Taylor) and the team is thrown into chaos with in
fighting among the players.  This film makes a very debatable point.  Can
you hold the coach of a team responsible for the actions of his players and
the quality of his team's performance?  Yes and no.  A coach needs to
communicate with his players but it's difficult when you have a hands on
owner who also tries to run the show and the debate in pro sports in perhaps
hotter than any other form of human interaction.
Other notable characters are the team's head doctor (James Woods) and the
secondary intern waiting to take his place (Matthew Modine).  Woods'
character goes along with each player's every desire...despite the fact that
their play could kill them based on an overdose of drugs or another hit
which could be tragic or fatal.  He ignores the sacred oath doctors take for
the health of their patients while Modine's character is a by the book
physician.  Ann-Margret is the mother of Diaz and misses her late husband
and can't relate to her daughter as being the team's leader from the
business end of things.  Lauren Holly is Rooney's materialistic wife and
Charlton Heston is football's commissioner who says that Diaz's character
would "Probably eat her own young if she could".
'Any Given Sunday', a heavy handed film about male bonding looks more like a
beer commercial in many spots rather than the actual game itself.  There are
slow motion, hard hitting and musically dominated scenes of action on the
field and not enough quiet moments of reflection for the audience or any of
the film's characters.
Oliver Stone has been plagued in recent years with big budget overkill
contained within his films.  I would like to see a studio give him a total
of about 5 to 6 million dollars and force him to make a film about academics
rather than technical flashes of grainy black and white, metaphors drawn
from other films, in your face shocks of fast editing and camera spins and
the return to great film making techniques like 'Platoon' and 'Salvador'
which gave Stone his status as a household name and only 'JFK' and perhaps
'Natural Born Killers' saves Stone from being a non factor in the 90's.
Perhaps Stone can take a lesson from his past in order to know where he's
going in the next decade....and century!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
It took me a little while to figure out why I didn't like 'Apt Pupil'.
At first, I was intrigued by its thoroughly original premise.  A high
school student (Brad Renfro) digs up some information about one of his
elderly neighbors (Ian McKellen).  He comes up with information that
proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that the old man is a Nazi war
criminal who escaped punishment after World War II and now lives in
America.  Renfro uses the information in his possession to essentially
blackmail his latest study.  Study, you ask?  Yes.  Renfro's plan is to
have the old man tell him stories about the Holocaust, perhaps things
that aren't in any of the history books that the Nazi himself remembers.
The tables are turned on Renfro in a way that will land him in a lot of
trouble if the authorities find out he knew about the old Nazi and
didn't report it.  There are some other plot twists that occur in the
film that are clever but they're only executed with about half the
strength they're capable of.
The film is directed by Bryan Singer ('The Usual Suspects') and Singer
has made a reasonably well crafted film that could have used a little
more thought in its writing (the screenplay is by Brandon Boyce based on
the novella by Stephen King) that it unfortunately relies too much in
some spots on the "schlock" value which is contained in many of Stephen
King's stories that are turned into films.  These elements of the film
undermine and undercut the value of the film's principal psychological
subject matter which are memories of the Holocaust.  The film,
unintentionally I'm sure but nevertheless cheapens the memory of this
historic injustice  One scene has McKellen cradling a cat from his
backyard and bringing in to the house and trying to throw it into his
gas powered oven and another scene involves McKellen's torture and
murder of a derelict male prostitute (Elias Koteas) to an extent where
he involves Renfro in the crime.  I still couldn't figure out what the
point of these two things were, significant to the film except to
illustrate that McKellen is shown to be an unrepentant Nazi, past
redemption and not seeming to care about it.
What's also upsetting is the way the adult characters are portrayed in
this film.  Renfro's father (Bruce Davison) is made to look like an
uninformed stooge, unaware of his son's activities which I suppose no
one can really blame him for but the situation is still annoying to
watch at times and Renfro's high school guidance counselor (David
Schwimmer) is portrayed basically as a jack ass whose job it is to
socially guide the students under him and he has the table turned on him
by a high school kid to the extent where he will be in serious hot water
legally.
I saw so many directions this film could have gone in and while I don't
usually judge films for what they COULD have been rather than what they
are, the paths of choice about the way the subject matter is handled in
every aspect from start to finish are so obviously the wrong ones that
in some respects, a first year film student could have diagnosed a
better treatment.
The film's saving grace from getting a thoroughly negative review is the
totally convincing and chilling performance by Ian McKellen.  His
performance as a former Nazi living with a soul that is no doubt damned
for eternity is so chilling because his character is one who would live
his life over again exactly the same way if given the chance without any
remorse for what he's done.  McKellen could get an Oscar nomination for
this role but it may be a long shot.
'Apt Pupil' is not a disappointing film to a large extent but it is a
disappointing after thought when you consider what might have been.
Another missed opportunity on celluloid to push a film's subject matter
to memorable proportions.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
The 1970's are on a roll.  In 1997, the film 'Boogie Nights' opened to
critical success.  It's box office numbers were not as impressive,
however.  There was also 'The Last Days of Disco', released earlier this
year and the Fox network is hoping to score big with 'That 70's Show'
which just debuted recently and a brand new re-mastered version of the
'Saturday Night Fever' soundtrack is available on CD.  Personally, I
found the 70's, as tacky as they were, as the decade with the best
movies.  I suppose some of the worst movies were also released in this
time frame but checking the list, it certainly seems impressive.
There's nothing tacky about such films as 'The Godfather' and its
impressive sequel, 'Star Wars', 'The Deer Hunter', 'One Flew Over the
Cuckoo's Nest', 'Chinatown' and the list goes on and on.
Like 'Boogie Nights', the protagonist in '54' is a teenager on the verge
of becoming a man.  Ryan Phillippe stars as Shane, a dreamer and
decadent minded young 19 year old who lives two miles across the river
from New York City in New Jersey.  He observes that while it's only two
miles away, it seems like a whole other world.  He lives with his two
younger sisters and his father.  His mother died when he was 12 and he
struggles to find his way in life.
The film is set in 1979 and one night Shane and two of his friends make
their way into Manhattan, hoping to get into the hottest nightclub in
the world named 54.  Hundreds gather outside the club each night in the
hope of being admitted entrance to the club and the hopeful sheep are
scrutinized carefully by the club's owner, Steve Rubell (Mike Myers).
Most are turned away.  Rubell only wants the best looking to mix with
the VIP's in his club.  He notes at one point that the nephew of the
king of Saudi Arabia travels 7000 miles to come to the club for one
night and then leaves the next morning and observes that it's the only
place on Earth where he truly feels free.
Shane is later hired by Rubell as a bus boy and the constant theme that
runs here and there in the film is a possible audit by the IRS.  Rubell
is fixing the cash register tapes and pocketing some of the cash as we
see in some of the film's scenes.
Shane makes contact  and eventually becomes friends with a young married
couple who also work in the club.  Greg and Anita (Brecklin Meyer and
Salma Hayek) help Shane in showing him the nightly operations of the
club and the demands Rubell makes on his staff are high indeed.  Some
prominent visitors the club are a wealthy socialite (Sela Ward) and a
daytime soap opera star (Neve Campbell).
'54' is a film that is high on the intimacy of its characters but short
on plot substance.  It's atmosphere is well captured but the film ends
up becoming a watered down version of 'Boogie Nights'.  Director Paul
Thomas Anderson, who made 'Boogie Nights', wrote his characters in close
proximity with each other and gave their lives progress as he set the
film over a course of six years.  '54' barely makes it out of 1979 and
has scenes of a repetitive nature and is riddled with cliched dialogue.
Writer/director Mark Christopher doesn't want to escape from the film's
limited diversity but does make his characters interesting and Mike
Myers is good as Steve Rubell.  Myers has his accent down very well and
the film is a good dramatic turn for Myers and he keeps pace with his
colleagues Jim Carrey and Robin Williams who have jumped into the realm
of serious films with great success.  '54' won't quite do it for Myers
but if he stays on track, he can hold his own with those other actors.
The rest of the cast in '54' reminded me somewhat of the characters in
1980's 'Fame'.  A group of young people with dreams of reaching the big
time and finding it through any means necessary.  As the closing credits
of '54' come into focus, snapshots of the real Steve Rubell are shown
with very famous VIP's who frequented his club which closed in 1986 and
Rubell died in 1989, closing the book on a chapter of popular culture
which takes its place in the history of the 20th century.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
If you look up the term 'overkill' in the dictionary you will see a
picture of movie producer Jerry Bruckheimer.  His production company
tries to top itself with each outing and 'Armageddon' is no exception.
For a movie critic and in many ways it's the same for the general public
at large, the film doesn't require a lot of thought, if any at all, and
is meant to be a big budgeted, loud, extremely edited film with special
effects that look like they're straight out of a comic book and the
film's gothic design of a giant meteor is a glimpse straight into hell.
One thing you have to understand in seeing a film like this (and it's
something I've said over and over again and I'll always say it) is that
it is beyond the realm of high brow criticism and deserves to be put in
the category of happy medium.  If you criticize the film too harshly,
you'll look like a snob and if you judge it too well, you'll look like a
fool.  The genre of action films should be given a new category, that of
'expected action' film as you know what to expect as soon as you see the
coming attractions.
'Armageddon' certainly aims to please and has more edits in a ten second
span than any other film I've seen and corners are not cut in the
special effects department.  My harshest criticism of this film is that
it doesn't require any big name stars because the film is so
overwhelming technically that the biggest movie star in the world would
get lost in the mix.  And yet, the big names are there.
As the film opens, the narration is conducted by Charlton Heston, whose
biblical past in films seems appropriate here as he describes an event
of biblical proportions.  We hear how a description of a meteor's impact
65 million years ago on Earth comes to fruition which allegedly wiped
out the dinosaurs.  Some theories I've read over the years tend to
favour that that impact is now the Grand Canyon in Arizona U.S.A.  Skip
forward to the present day. A meteor the size of Texas is on a collision
course with Earth and the only way to destroy it seems to be to land a
space shuttle on it with a group of core drillers that will grind a hole
in it, drop a nuclear explosive in it and break it up so that the
concussion that follows will cause the remaining particles to miss our
planet.  I'm not sure that this would necessarily work but then again
bad science is always a factor in films like this just as it was
ludicrous to believe that Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum could fly that
alien space craft into the mother ship in 'Independence Day' and upload
that infamous computer virus to destroy all the surrounding ships
hovering over the major cities of the world.  Dumb?  Sure.  But
embracing the idea of suspension of disbelief is as old as the film
industry itself.
Bruce Willis stars as the best core driller in the world.  He's an
aspiring oil man and the first time we see him he's chipping golf balls
from his off shore rig at a Greenpeace boat, filled with protesters who
duck each time a golf ball comes their way and clangs off a beam just
over their heads as Willis laughs.  One of his crew (Ben Affleck) is
having an affair with his daughter (Liv Tyler) and other members of
Willis' crew (Will Patton, Steve Buscemi) work closely as his best
friends.  Willis is called in by a NASA chief (Billy Bob Thornton) who
explains the impending doom and asks Willis to apply his core drilling
skills and destroy the rocky menace.  Willis agrees only if he can have
his own men brought along and their training is a scene straight out of
'The Right Stuff' only it crosses with some slapstick and looks more
like the wrong stuff and this scene is aloof.  In reality, not all of
these men would pass the training course to cut the mustard is taking a
trip to outer space and this plot hole is about the silliest the film
has to offer.
The most unusual character in the film is a Russian cosmonaut on board
the space station Mir played by Peter Stormare.  The 'Fargo' reunion is
in this film.  He and Steve Buscemi appeared in 'Fargo' and are in this
film.  You remember Stormare as the thug who didn't say too much in
'Fargo' and who eventually cuts Buscemi's head off with an axe and
stuffed him into a wood chipper.  Stormare even sports the same type of
winter hat he had in 'Fargo' and I'm wondering if it's an in joke here.
Ditto on the 'Pulp Fiction' reunion.  'Pulp Fiction' even gets mentioned
in 'Armageddon' by one of the cast.  'Armageddon' has Bruce Willis and
Steve Buscemi.  Buscemi plays the Buddy Holly waiter in 'Pulp Fiction'.
The other giant meteor film, 'Deep Impact', released earlier this year
is better than this film because it had the human element more tightly
wound around it plot line and there really is no good reason why
'Armageddon' has to be two and a half hours long.  There are too many
silly scenes of corny dialogue and too much time is spent at the site of
the meteor which doesn't look convincing but the film's saving grace is
its eye popping special effects, booming sound effects and clever sets
which tower over the entire production.  Director Michael Bay ('The
Rock', 'Bad Boys') never gives the audience a chance to breathe and a
bit more subtlety would have been nice and while it is often said that
less is more, 'Armageddon' is still good to look at and a treat to
listen to and while the film comes out looking exactly the way the film
makers intended it to, it can't be all that bad but it's a film you'll
only want to see once.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
DIRECTOR SIDNEY LUMET'S LATEST FILM COVERS FAMILIAR TERRITORY WITH A NEW
TWIST 
His first big screen film as a director came in 1957 with '12 Angry Men' and
he was already showing dimensions of talent that would place him in film
history as one one Hollywood's most searing and dramatic filmmakers.
 Throughout they years that have passed since then his other films such as
'Long Day's Journey Into Night' (1962), 'The Pawnbroker' (1965), 'Serpico'
(1973), 'Dog Day Afternoon' (1975), 'Network' (1976) 'Prince of the City'
(1981) 'The Verdict' (1982) and many others have served not only as obvious
social commentary but as scorching indictments of the 'system'.  His name is
Sidney Lumet, a man with a mind as diverse as the subject matter he
successfully tackles and rarely does he miss the mark.  
His latest effort 'Night Falls on Manhattan' shows signs of a well seasoned
mind ready to bring an old story to the screen with a very new twist.  Based
on the novel 'Tainted Evidence' by Robert Daley it focuses on a police
officer turned lawyer (Andy Garcia) who wins an important case as an
assistant D.A. for the city of New York in the trial of a major drug dealer
and is nominated to run as head D.A. when the one in office (Ron Liebman)
suffers medical problems.  During the trial that made his career he butts
heads in court with a liberal, idealistic defense attorney (Richard Dreyfuss)
and falls romantically for Dreyfuss' assistant (Lena Olin).  This needless
romantic subplot is about the only thing that's really not necessary to the
film's success.  Garcia's father (Ian Holm) and his father's partner (James
Gandolfini) are under suspicion as rogue cops who may have accepted money
from the dealer convicted by Garcia and the story gains depth and subtext
better than practically any other film released so far this year with a top
notch cast in fine form all around.
What makes 'Night in Manhattan' such a credible and well textured film is the
fact that Lumet served not only as the film's director but worked directly
from the adapted screenplay he wrote on his own without anyone else's point
of view disrupting his work and does justice to Robert Daley's novel in the
process.  With overtones of 'Serpico' mixed in as well, Lumet has not
duplicated his own success but has created a film brimming with emotional,
moral and legal factors that are credible and ones that make us shake our
heads while watching the evening news or looking at our daily newspapers.
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review 

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
Kenneth Branagh's 'Hamlet' is perhaps the most ambitious working of the
Shakespeare tragedy ever brought to the big screen.  Intelligent, literate,
exquisite and breathtaking are other adjectives that come to mind when
describing this film.  The Prince of Denmark and Shakespeare's nobel
protagonist is played by Branagh himself.  In comparison to Olivier and
Gibson's portrayal of this character, I was impressed by the way Branagh was
able to add a dimension of subtext in order to make it a four hour and two
minute journey well worth the time.  The story of Hamlet as almost everyone
knows is his determination to avenge his father's death at the hands of his
uncle.  But the story of this character is much more than that.  It's about
searching for what being human is all about and how life's complexities and
frailties can drive men insane.  Hamlet's uncle Claudius portrayed by Derek
Jacobi is a sharp and well meaning portrait of evil which Jacobi executes
with acute brilliance and his character is just as compelling as any in the
film.  Jacobi has played Hamlet many times in his career and relates to the
story very well in this film playing an opposite character.  Lord Laurence
Olivier who died in 1989 is perhaps the most famous Hamlet as his 1948 film
production won Oscars for best picture and for Olivier himself in the best
actor category.  Mel Gibson's Hamlet from 1990 was an interesting journey for
the superstar who proved there's more to film than 'Lethal Weapon' and 'Mad
Max.'  Other members of Branagh's production include Julie Christie, Kate
Winslet, Jack Lemmon, Charlton Heston, Billy Crystal and Robin Williams.  It
was photographed in 70 mm and looks spectacular on a movie screen displaying
that format which I was fortunate enough to see.  Certainly not original but
definitely ambitious and alternative, Kenneth Branagh's 'Hamlet' is one you
soon will not forget.

Title
Review for My Giant (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
     Billy Crystal's films are innocuous.  They don't say a lot but they
they do manage to entertain with language kept tasteful and in a mixture
of immature and downright stupid comedies, Crystal finds the wit and
charming self-consciousness that appeals to all age groups.  His best
film, 'City Slickers', spawned a sequel that was more contrived and less
ambitious and his most talked about film is probably 1989's 'When Harry
Met Sally' in which Crystal and the extremely likable Meg Ryan starred
as a pair of on again off again relationship seekers who find each
other's true nature after many years.
     'My Giant' has two things going for it.  An original story and the
unusual presence of a nearly 8 foot tall actor named Gheorge Muresan who
is extremely likable and remarkably, holds his own with Crystal in his
film debut.
     Crystal plays Sam, an agent travelling through Romania and a client
whom he represents is the star of a 'Braveheart' kind of film, full of
men in armour, wielding large swords, riding swiftly on horses and
Crystal is fired by his client and in the frustration and shame of being
fired, crashes his car into a ditch attached to a river and is saved by
Max (Muresan) who works at a monastery helping with the daily chores who
longs to be reunited with a teenage sweetheart who moved to America
years before.  Sam tells Max he can put him in the movies and after a
hard sell job of convincing Max that he can be a movie star, Max agrees
and the two of them are in tow.
     Watching Muresan walk down the streets of New York City is funny
with everyone looking up and a scene where Muresan gobbles up twenty hot
dogs in a couple of minutes and runs up a vendor's bill of over 50
dollars is what audiences probably remember most from the ads promoting
the film.  Crystal also takes his new client home to meet his family and
there are some funny scenes at the dinner table that contain some
genuine belly laughs.
     The film fails to expand on some characters that have potential
such as the boy who plays Cystal's isolated son and even Crystal's wife
in the film (Kathleen Quinlan) has a role that is key in the film's
final minutes but her talents are far above that of only one key scene.
     Crystal always looks to be playing himself in his films as his
personalities are always the same but Crystal gets away with it
constantly surrounding himself with other talent.  Sometimes with actors
better than him (Jack Palance, Debra Winger) and other times by telling
stories that sell on the strength of their appeal which ordinary people
can relate to ('City Slickers').  You can accuse Crystal of being a one
dimensional comedian but for an actor who started in television ('Soap'
and a little known appearance on 'All in the Family'), he's done quite
well for himself with acceptance among both critics and audiences alike.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for GoodFellas (1990)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
When the 1990's wrap up at the end of this year, Martin Scorsese's
'GoodFellas' is certain to be in the top 10 of many critic's lists.  Being
Scorsese's best film, 'GoodFellas' is one of the best mob movies ever.
Scorsese's 'Raging Bull' was at the top of many critic's lists as the best
film of the 1980's but that film really stood out as being most dazzling
when the action was inside the boxing ring.  Outside the ring, the film is
over rated.  There were major script problems in terms of plotting and
making anything seem truly outstanding, except Robert De Niro's Oscar
winning performance.  But 'Raging Bull' was still authentic movie making
that re-created an era that is now long gone.  'The Godfather' is still the
granddaddy of all gangster films but 'GoodFellas' moves along like a fast
paced game of cards and Scorsese leaves you guessing all the way down who
has the best hand.  Is it Scorsese's frenzied direction?  Is it the
brilliant, funny, shocking, and mesmerizing script by Scorsese and Nicholas
Pileggi based on the novel 'Wiseguy'?  Is it in the performances, including
Joe Pesci's Oscar winning role as a sawed off runt who's gun happy
tendencies sometimes get the best of him?  Actually, it's a combination of
all these things including the fact that it's all a true story.
The film benefits tremendously from Ray Liotta's narration as a real life
character named Henry Hill.  As a boy, he observed the activities of local
gangsters while growing up in Brooklyn.  He ran illegal errands for them
part time and turned it into full time work and gradually rose among their
ranks to become a trusted member of the crew and a somewhat right hand man
for gangsters like Paul Cicero (Paul Sorvino) and Jimmy Conway (Robert De
Niro).  Liotta's narration as Henry Hill are a series of pride swelling
accomplishments.  These guys are actually proud of the fact that they steal,
kill, and go through life taking anything they want at the expense of others
and at one point actually make fun of honest folks who work hard for
everything they have.
As the film opens, Henry Hill is a boy whose parents gradually fear he will
never amount to anything in life because of his association with gangsters.
For the first 10 or fifteen minutes, the story is brilliantly set up with
narration from about 1955 to 1963 when Henry Hill becomes a man and the
story really picks up steam from there.
Scorsese has always been good at mesmerizing audiences with his style of
visual violence and captures it better on film than practically any other
director and secretly taps into our dark side and shows us things we don't
really want to see, but when we do, we enjoy it strangely enough.
Henry Hill takes a bride named Karen (Lorraine Bracco), and the two of them
have a seemingly good life for the first few years of their marriage until
Hill starts cheating on her and spending night after night away from home
with his friends.  Karen is seduced by the high powered world of money and
power and gets drawn into helping Henry with his lifestyle, most notably,
drugs.
This film was Ray Liotta's break though performance and he deserved an Oscar
nomination for it but never received one.  Robert De Niro's character is
more of a father figure and there is a curious style of detachment in De
Niro's performance but who can argue with the fact the Joe Pesci gives the
film's most brilliant performance?  He combines horrific violence with wise
cracks and the most despicable humour and rolls into one neat package and
sells foul language better than almost anyone else I've ever seen in a film.
Michael Ballhaus' cinematography is a marvel in itself.  Ballhaus does
almost everything imaginable with light in this film.  He bounces it, bends
it, shifts it and Scorsese plunges his camera right into the violent abyss
and never makes it seem mindless but yet an important part of the story.
The only portion of the film that could have been trimmed out and left on
the cutting room floor is most of the last half hour.  The film is somewhat
bogged down by Henry Hill's drugged out haze and paranoia that he is being
pursued by the law.  The film goes on too long in this regard but with so
much else it gives us, this seems like such a little thing to point out in
light of how quickly the rest of the film moves along.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Buddy Holly Story, The (1978)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Chuck Berry.  Born 1926.  Elvis Presley.  Born 1935.  Buddy Holly.  Born
1936.  Elvis Presley died on August 16, 1977 at his Graceland Mansion in
Memphis, Tennessee and Buddy Holly died way back in 1959 in a plane crash
near Clear Lake, Iowa.  That plane crash also took the lives of Ritchie
Valens and the Big Bopper and was the subject of a musical masterpiece by Don
McLean in 1972 entitled 'American Pie' in which he proclaims "the day the
music died".  It almost did.  The three men mentioned in the first sentence
of this paragraph, represented the total package in the pioneering of rock
and roll and of course many others contributed after that. 
Almost 30 years old when this new form of music debuted world wide, Chuck
Berry wrote and performed his own music which had a mature sound to it.
 Buddy Holly was the first artist to produce his own artful contributions and
of course there was Elvis Presley's showmanship which was the selling point
of it all.  In fact, Buddy Holly once said "Without Elvis we might never have
made it."  Aside from rock and roll, Elvis' diversity stemming from his roots
in old country music allowed him to perform ballads and the most beautiful
gospel compositions.  Presley won three Grammy awards in his lifetime, all
for gospel recordings.  It's hard to imagine that he never won one for his
rock and roll proving just how ahead of his time he really was.  Chuck Berry
was the very first man inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 1986
in Cleveland, Ohio, U.S.A. and Elvis Presley was second and Buddy Holly was
also one of the first inductees that same year.
As I write this review, the date is August 17, 1997.  It is exactly one day
after the 20th anniversary of Elvis Presley's death.  But let us not forget
the other pioneers of rock and roll itself including the Cleveland DJ, Alan
Freed who coined the phrase 'rock and roll'.  The 1978 movie 'The Buddy Holly
Story' was a success largely in part because of Presley. In the twenty years
since his death have you noticed that there hasn't been a big screen movie
about his life?  In 1979 there was a television movie called 'Elvis' in which
Kurt Russell played the King of rock and roll quite well and surprised many
critics and received an Emmy award nomination for his work.  I supect that if
there ever was a big screen Hollywood movie about Elvis that it would be
controversial to say the least.  Besides, who would play Elvis?  Is Kurt
Russell too old?  Any casting agent handed that assignment would certainly
have their work cut out for them. 
It took Sir Richard Attenborough 20 years to bring the story of Mohandas K.
Gandhi to the screen with 1982's 'Gandhi' and it had astonishingly successful
results.  The most famous baseball player of all time, Babe Ruth has had two
movies made about him, 'The Babe Ruth Story' in 1948 (the year the real Babe
Ruth died) starring William Bendix and 'The Babe' in 1992 starring John
Goodman.  Both were disappointing and sometimes a historical figure is too
monumental for any motion picture to be made successfully about their life.
 Given the fact that Elvis Presley is the 20th century's largest cultural
icon, it is perhaps wise that no movie has been made.  Buddy Holly was just
as important in the development of rock and roll as Elvis was but because he
a lesser known figure, the 1978 movie about the final two years of his life
succeeded quite well.
'The Buddy Holly Story' opens at a roller skating rink in Lubbock, Texas in
1956 in which Buddy Holly and his band 'The Crickets' are about to perform.
 Gary Busey is Buddy Holly  and 'The Crickets' are played by Charles Martin
Smith and Don Stroud.  Astonishingly, the three of them played all their
pieces live in the movie and Busey is electrifying in looking and sounding
just like Holly in a role that brought him and Academy Award nomination as
Best Actor and the film won the Oscar for Best Adaptation Score by Joe
Renzetti.  
Their show at the roller rink is picked up live by the local radio station
and after starting out with a soft country and western piece, Holly then
switches to rock and roll which has yet to receive its name and the sponsors
of the radio station begin calling in to express anger at what they're
hearing and one sponsor quips that he is not buying 'be-bop'.  Holly gains
recognition and is given his first record deal in Nashville which falls
through after a run in with the producer when they try and make one of
Holly's biggest hits, "That'll Be the Day", into a country recording.  The
next meeting Holly has is with a record company executive in New York City
who at first resists the idea of Holly producing his own music but gives in
at the end after a convincing speech by Buddy about the artistic preservation
of an artist's unique and individual sound thriving around inside his head.
 He and 'The Crickets' earn $75,000 for their single, Buddy gets married and
goes on tour but things start falling apart within the band as jealousy and
resentment over where the band will live take issue.  Holly continues his
career apart from the band and the movie builds a sentimental conclusion
without ever becoming weepy or pretentious.
Director Steve Rash and screenwriter Robert Gittler have cleverly made a
motion picture classic that is one of the strongest biographies ever made
about an entertainment personality.  Everyone knows how Buddy Holly's life
came to an end but the movie treats that issue by reflecting in a unique
visual style the way Holly lived instead of the way he died and it is to be
admired for that first above anything else.  

Title
Review for North Dallas Forty (1979)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     Peter Gent's best selling novel about dirty dealings within a fictional
National Football League team was turned into a borderline satire for the big
screen in 1979 and it's title was 'North Dallas Forty'. Frank Yablans, the
film's producer, also scripted from Gent's novel and depicted its focus
primarily on a star wide receiver (Nick Nolte in one of his finest
performances) and his relationship with the team's front office, star
quarterback, the women in his life anda large part of the movie showcases his
performance on the football field.  
     Nolte's character is probably just as unattractive as most of the other
characters in this film yet there seems to be a dose of moral integrity
within his character placing him above the rest of the cast.  The only
exception to this is the team's star quarterback (Mac Davis) who turns in a
fine performance and proved he's more than just a country and western singer.
     The football team showcased in 'North Dallas Forty' is primarily made up
of macho misfits and a few wise cracking no-talents who are promptly dealt
with by the team's coach (G.D. Spradlin) who is obsessed with winning a
championship.  The team's owner (Steve Forrest), his little brother (Dabney
Coleman) and a team co-ordinator (Charles Durning) are all embroiled in the
business end and politics of the game and have no tolerance for those players
who won't "play ball" OFF the field.
     The spirit of competitive action is predominant throughout 'North Dallas
Forty' and its rough edge is indicative of one of the world's most physically
demanding sports.  There are plenty of scenes on the gridiron showcasing the
dirty play that was most dominating in the 1970's and the NFL has cleaned up
its act greatly in the last 20 years and some of it may have been influenced
by this film.  Truly a stunning and realistic presentation of gritty
characters and explosive personalities and definitely not a film for the
faint of heart.  Directed with hard hitting drive by Canadian born filmmaker
Ted Kotchoff.   

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Does anyone remember a movie from 1979 entitled 'Meteor'?  It starred
Sean Connery, Natalie Wood, Karl Malden and Brian Keith and the premise
was a giant meteor 5 miles wide that was going to strike Earth.  The
United States and the Soviet Union worked together in firing their
nuclear weapons at it in the hopes that it would be destroyed.
Throughout the course of the picture, splinters of the meteor were seen
from time to time, landing on different parts of our planet before the
big strike.  The film lacked any type of depth.  It basically had very
little intrepid dialogue detailing the effects of such an event and it
felt very out of place in the realm of science.  Of course, it was 19
years ago and progress has been made in the detection of such a
phenomenon since that time and I was impressed with most of 'Deep
Impact'.
Director Mimi Leder ('The Peacemaker') and writer Bruce Joel Rubin
('Ghost', 'Jacob's Ladder', 'My Life',) along with fellow writer Michael
Tolkin ('The Player'), have crafted a very special film that seems
disjointed at first but later becomes a truly worthy film that plays at
the very heart of a potentially emotional situation.
A comet the size of New York City is on a direct collision course with
Earth.  This information comes to the attention of a reporter (Tea
Leoni), who, believe it or not, begins tracking the story as  she
believes it is about a politician and his mistress.  Sound bizarre?
After seeing the film, it all makes sense.  Her efforts to report the
story are thwarted by the FBI, working closely with a liaison to the
U.S. President (Morgan Freeman) and the President himself is directly
involved.  Leoni is run off the road by a fleet of cars and the FBI
agents take her for a direct one on one conversation with the
President.  There is still a misunderstanding about who believes what,
and the President makes a deal with her that if she holds off on
reporting the story for a couple of days, that she will be given access
to a Presidential White House conference and will be allowed the first
question.
The President reveals the truth about the comet and announces the
government's plans on how to handle it.  The U.S. and Russia are working
together on the largest space ship ever constructed to approach, land
and plant nuclear missiles on the comet at its core.  The mission is led
by an ex-Apollo astronaut nicknamed Fish (Robert Duvall).  He was one of
the men who walked on the moon and is the ideal candidate for the
mission, along with several others by his side.  There are also plans to
shield part of the population away underground until the catastrophe is
over.  Explaining things any further would basically give too much of
the movie away so I now zip my lip.
'Deep Impact' is told from the perspective of many different characters,
so young, some old, some in-between and while many of the scenes are
scatter shot, the film's overall presentation is unique.  It gives way
to emotion with some characters you'll care about and others you'll care
less for but the special effects are truly dazzling in showcasing the
effects of a comet impacting with Earth, giving way to a chain reaction
of 1000 to 3500 foot tidal waves, earthquakes and other natural
disasters complete with a booming soundtrack and a nice music score from
Oscar winner James Horner ('Titanic').  The movie had me in the palm of
its hand at the end while I was asking myself..."Could this really
happen"?  After some research, I found out that the answer is 'yes' and
it made the film that much more significant for me in contrast to the
usual bad science found in many adventures related to it.
Other notable members of the cast are Elijah Wood, Vanessa Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, James Cromwell and Mary McCormack.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
'The People vs. Larry Flynt' is a flagrant and courageous success in tackling
the subject matter it set out to conquer.  Hustler magazine publisher Larry
Flynt took a civil case against him all the way to the Supreme Court of the
United States claiming his right under the first amendment of the U.S.
Constitution to publish his material anyway he saw fit.  You may not like
Larry Flynt or what he stands for but the amazing thing about this film is
that despite the repellent nature of the characters and ideas shown to the
public at large, sympathy and tolerance is created for Flynt's situation
symbolizing the fact that if his rights can be protected then so can anyone el
se's.  Two time Academy Award winning director Milos Forman ('One Flew Over
the Cuckoo's Nest,' 'Ragtime,' 'Amadeus') is a master of making intellectual
artistry alive and vibrant and he is helped by head producer of this movie,
Oliver Stone (himself a two time Oscar winning director) who is no stranger
at being socially aware.  Together along with the antics and reality of Scott
Alexander and Larry Karaszewski's screenplay, this team has fashioned a story
of society's ethics (or lack of them) against the backdrop of freedom which
so many of us take for granted.  Woody Harrelson portrays Larry Flynt with an
eccentric quality of flamboyance and unintended humour along with
intelligence and a daring dose of questioning authority at any cost to
himself or his business.  The real scene stealer in this movie is Courtney
Love who portrays his wife and unquestionably his best friend who stands by
him during and despite an assassination attempt and court battle.  Her
characterization of Flynt's wife is savagely loyal and we see her life played
out on the screen eventually contracting AIDS from her morally decaying
lifestyle.  A breath of fresh air for this movie is delivered by the straight
laced performance of Edward Norton ('Primal Fear') who plays Flynt's
attorney.  He is dedicated to his client's cause even though he dislikes
Flynt's tactics and publication business.  His character is both interesting
and tips the scales as the centre of the movie's legal interpretation.  Look
for this one to score big at Oscar time.  Updating my pick of the best film
of 1996, 'The People vs. Larry Flynt,' is probably going to remain intact.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Member of the ONLINE CRITIC'S ASSOCIATION AT:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
It looks more and more like Hollywood is running out of ideas.
Remember a little space horror film entitled 'Event Horizon' from
1997?  'Sphere' has almost the exact same plot and manifestation of
visual output except that 'Event Horizon' is a lot scarier and I
actually recommended that one for the kind of film that it was because
it was the first film in a long time that made me jump in my seat at
the movies as it was genuinely scary with religiously sublime
overtones.  I can't recommend 'Sphere'.
I get so angry at Hollywood marketing through coming attractions on
posters, trailers, newspaper, t.v. and radio ads when they say
'Sphere' is from "Michael Crichton, the author of 'Jurassic Park' and
'The Lost World'" and immediately people begin saying, "Wow, if it's
from that guy, it must be great".  To no one's surprise, in many cases
advertising is an insult to the intelligence and we've all fallen for
it at one time or another.
'Sphere' is from director Barry (in most cases--'yawn') Levinson who
has concocted a flat and lifeless motion picture disguised as science
fiction but looking more like a low budget episode of any paranormal
television series with a cast of actors far beyond the realm of this
mess.
Dustin Hoffman (a psychologist), Sharon Stone (a biologist) and Samuel
L. Jackson (a mathematician) along with two others are sent on a
mission to the bottom of the Pacific Ocean to investigate an alleged
alien spacecraft that landed more than 300 years ago.  As they
investigate further, there is a strange transmission coming from
somewhere on the ship that allows the crew to communicate with an
unseen force and later they discover a gigantic golden sphere which
reflects everything in the room except the people looking at it.
Members of the team get drawn into it and they later draw conclusions
that it has the power to inhibit mind control at will and visually
enhance a person's sub-conscious thoughts.  At one point Jackson is
reading the book '20,000 Leagues Under the Sea' and says to Hoffman
that he can never get past page 87 because it's "too scary".  Later,
Hoffman finds the cupboards of the ship filled with multiple copies of
'20,000 Leagues Under the Sea' all with blank pages after page 87.
The film is just downright boring and never gets off the ground with
any substance or point of interest worthy of a plot twist and the film
feels like a nightmare you have trouble describing to people the next
morning because it was so weird, people look at you funny.  There's
also no reason for it to be well over two hours with a running time of
132 minutes.  I looked at my watch about every fifteen minutes after
the first half hour and I was drawn into a tedious and restless
odyssey of blandness.
There isn't much more to write because there isn't that much more to
say about a film that looks so similar in many of its scenes.  The
only thing memorable about 'Sphere' is telling people that for quite a
while, Dustin Hoffman appeared in a movie about every five years and
now that he's been in three in the last 6 months ('Mad City', 'Wag the
Dog', 'Sphere') perhaps it was a good idea for him to remain absent
until a good project came along, one that he could really believe in.
There certainly isn't a good film contained in this block of
celluloid.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for From Here to Eternity (1953)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Frank Sinatra.  The comparisons are long and debatable and my preference
as the twentieth century's greatest entertainer/singer is still Elvis
Presley for his diversity in country, western, rock 'n' roll, ballads,
gospel, blues, and although Presley and many others after him enjoyed
success based on the influences of Sinatra and those from his
generation, Presley still has more gold records than anyone else.  Frank
Sinatra was a legendary performer who passed away on May 14, 1998.  I'm
writing this movie review one day after his death to celebrate the most
successful film work he ever turned in.  He won a Best Supporting Actor
Oscar for his work as the noble soldier Maggio in director Fred
Zinnemann's powerful 1953 adult drama, 'From Here to Eternity'.  It was
this film that revived Sinatra's career and he never looked back after
it.   This movie is #4 on my all time list, behind (3) 'The Godfather
Part II' (1974), (2) 'Platoon' (1986) and 'The Godfather' (1972).  Other
films that Sinatra enjoyed success in such as 'The Man With the Golden
Arm' (1955), 'The Manchurian Candidate' (1962) and 'Von Ryan's Express'
(1965), were all a result of his success in 'From Here to Eternity'.
It was based on the novel written by James Jones and was toned down
somewhat by screenwriter Daniel Taradash (an Oscar for him) and the film
proved that times change but people don't.  I often listen to the
stories a lot of older folks tell about how morality was at its peak
fifty or sixty years ago compared to today but this film proved with its
adult oriented theme and ground breaking manner that nothing could be
further from the truth.  The film contains heavy references to adultery,
prostitution, alcohol abuse, violence, military injustice, murder and
the outbreak of war.
It begins in 1941 at an army barracks in Hawaii, shortly before the
Pearl Harbor attack, and we are introduced in the first scene to an army
private (Montgomery Clift) who has transferred over from another unit
and meets Sinatra in the first scene as we learn later in the film that
the two of them are good friends.  Clift meets a base Sergeant (Burt
Lancaster) who introduces him to the company commander who we learn has
pulled some strings to get Clift on his boxing team.  Clift has quit
boxing because he once blinded a man and his refusal to fight angers the
company commander to the point where he instructs his fellow officers to
put the screws on Clift until he agrees to box.
The film moves very leisurely from there and the character's personal
lives are displayed in great detail.  Lancaster has an affair with his
company commander's wife (Deborah Kerr), a woman bitter about her
husband's infidelities and drinking and who lost a child through a
painful and disruptive birth which prevents her from having any more
children.  The film's trademark scene is Lancaster and Kerr kissing
while they lay in the sand on the beach as a wave washes over them and
it is one of the most romantic scenes in movie history.  Clift has an
affair with a girl who works at a social club (Donna Reed - Best
Supporting Actress) and their conflicts are as important to the film's
tone as any other.  Sinatra locks horns with a stocky piano playing
military prison officer (Ernest Borgnine) which has tragic results.
The film earned 13 Oscar nominations and won 8, Best Picture, Director
(Zinnemann), Supporting Actor (Sinatra), Supporting Actress (Kerr),
Adapted Screenplay (Daniel Taradash), Sound, Film Editing and
Cinematography.  The stark black and white photography by cameraman
Burnett Guffey is perhaps its greatest technical achievement.  Many
scenes are photographed with little camera movement, giving the film's
most well acted scenes their own strength but using light and shadows in
many other scenes of tragic occurrence to enhance those scenes of
memorable emotion.  Burt Lancaster and Montgomery Clift split the vote
in the Best Actor category and the award went to William Holden in
'Stalag 17'.  Deborah Kerr lost Best Actress to Audrey Hepburn in 'Roman
Holiday' and the film also lost in the Costume Design and Original Music
Score categories.
Throughout the 60's, many ground breaking adult films in the
contribution to great American cinema such as 'Who's Afraid of Virginia
Woolf?' (1966), 'The Graduate' (1967) and 'Bonnie and Clyde' (1967) are
direct influences of 'From Here to Eternity' and Frank Sinatra probably
gives the film its most memorable performance, to be enjoyed by
generations to come from a man who could entertain tremendously at the
musical level and was also a top notch actor, without a doubt.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
It's early August 1998.  Steven Spielberg has been in the news a lot
recently.  Thankfully, a man was just sentenced to a hefty jail term for
stalking the director.  His recent release of 'Saving Private Ryan' is
the most harrowing war picture to come along in years and ranks up there
with the director's best work and five of Spielberg's films (more than
any other director) recently made the American Film Institute's list of
the top 100 movies of all time in the first century of film
(1896-1996).  They are, in order from lowest to highest on the list,
'Close Encounters of the Third Kind', #64, 'Raiders of the Lost Ark',
#60, 'Jaws' #48, 'E.T., The Extra Terrestrial', #25 and rightfully so,
as a Spielberg film and a great film in general, 'Schindler's List' in
the top 10 at #9.  I would probably shift that list around a little
because I don't think E.T., is Spielberg's second best film, 'Jaws' is.
Both 'Jaws' and 'Schindler's List' are in my top 10 films of all time
with 'Schindler's List' finishing ahead of the famous shark movie.
Plain and simple, 'Jaws' was the movie that got me interested in film.
Like a roller coaster ride with shrieks and movements of excitement from
the theatre audience, for me it is the definition of what's called 'the
audience picture'.  'Jaws' has one of those talked about and memorable
opening scenes where the young girl, jumps into the ocean at dusk and
goes swimming in the nude and is consumed as a meal.  The poster for
'Jaws' is also one of the most famous as we see the shark swimming up to
the surface to eat his dinner as the young female swimmer passes by and
'Jaws' was the first movie to earn at least 100 million dollars at the
box office and it eventually earned 260 million domestically and 470
million worldwide.  Not to shabby considering the price of a movie
ticket 23 years ago.
'Jaws' also earned three Oscars on four nominations for sound, original
music score by John Williams which is one of the recognizable motion
picture scores in film history with its towering and haunting passages
and an Oscar for what is probably the film's most important contribution
which is the sensational, revolutionary and overall brilliant film
editing by Verna Fields.  The fourth nomination 'Jaws' received was for
best picture and it lost out to 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest' and
was also up against 'Dog Day Afternoon', 'Barry Lyndon' and 'Nashville'.
Plagued with production problems and a budget that went from four
million to ten million dollars, Steven Spielberg did not receive an
Oscar nomination as best director but he should have for making a film
work in the final cut that many predicted would fail miserably.
For those of you that have seen 'Jaws' (if you haven't, see the wide
screen version), you'll probably agree that many of the films best
scenes have nothing to do with seeing the shark.  Conversations in and
around and about the menace that's swimming off the shores of Amityville
Long Island, NY are the main topic of many scenes in this brilliant film
that are funny, turbulent, moving, surprising and the film gave rise to
increasing the adventure, horror and action genres.  The film was
actually shot at Martha's Vineyard in Massachusetts during the summer of
1974.
The term 'old salt' has never been better visualized on film than in the
character of Quint, played by Robert Shaw who died of a heart attack in
1978, three years after 'Jaws' came out.  Shaw was a brilliant actor.
His interpretation of the movie villain was diversified in many films
and among them are the Russian assassin in the second James Bond film,
'From Russia With Love' in 1963.  The film for which he received his one
and only Oscar nomination which was for Best Supporting Actor in 1966
for 'A Man For All Seasons' for his portrait of King Henry VIII of
England and his turn as the ruthless depression era gangster in 'The
Sting' in 1973 are probably some of the most most under rated bad guys
in movie history.
In 'Jaws', Shaw's portrayal of the fisherman Quint grabs your attention
quickly.  At a meeting of the town's political council, disagreements
break out and with everyone shouting and exchanging words of chaos,
Quint restores order to the room by scratching his nails on a blackboard
and tells the mayor (Murray Hamilton), the police chief Martin Brody
(Roy Scheider) and everyone else that he will catch and kill the shark
in question for a sum of $10,000.  The town takes it under advisement
and Quint is seen mostly in the film's last hour as the shark hunt gets
serious.  The giant great white shark has already killed two people and
in addition from offered help by Quint, Brody gets help from a shark
expert named Matt Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss), who, along with Quint but
toned down a lot more, is much of the film's comic relief while he also
brings reason and common sense in the pursuit of nature.
'Jaws', along with '12 Angry Men' and 'The Treasure of the Sierra
Madre', illustrates extremely well, men interacting with one another as
Brody, Quint and Hooper are portrayed as truly human characters,
constantly at odds with each other on the boat but who, in one memorable
scene involving dinner, display their humanity and Quint's long but
fascinating talk about life on the U.S.S. Indianapolis during World War
II is the film's best package of dialogue which reportedly was written
by Shaw himself.
I always thought that the great visionary mind of Steven Spielberg had
intended audiences to see very little of the shark in the film's first
hour but Spielberg says that that wasn't the plan at all because the
remote controlled shark simply didn't work when called upon.
Screenwriters Peter Benchley and Carl Gottlieb wrote a truly great
academic script based on Benchley's novel, passing over the opportunity
to make 'Jaws' an exploitation picture by creating great characters,
believable situations and an insight into what was at the time, a truly
original subject.
Visit the 'new look' FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
     The computerized, synthesized and homogenized society we've built for
ourselves in the 90's takes its toll on one man in 'Mad City'.  Director
Costa-Gavras ('Z', 'Missing', 'Betrayed', 'Music Box') presents a
psychological, sympathetic and sometimes compelling portrait of a man whose
fight for simplistic values forces a nightmarish confrontation in a small
California town.
     John Travolta plays a security guard who loses his job due to economic
cutbacks at a museum where he was formerly employed and he walks in one
afternoon to ask the 
museum's curator for his job back.  He is dismissed quickly as a complainer
and is made to feel like a loser when he snaps.  He produces a shotgun and
fires off a round in anger.  While this is happening, a local television
reporter (Dustin Hoffman) happens to be on the scene and witnesses the
unfolding events from a crack in the men's room door at the museum.  To
further complicate matters, the shot Travolta fired off in anger ends up
wounding a fellow security guard who was friends with Travolta and the shot
was accidental and a group of children and their teacher are enjoying a
field trip at the time of the siege and needless to say, they're all held
hostage.  Hoffman is able to use the pay phone inside the men's room and
gets hooked up with his station to go live as the story is breaking.  He is
discovered by Travolta and becomes part of the hostage crisis.  The local
police, FBI and every media outlet in the area scramble for spot a the scene.
     For a film set basically in one location for almost two hours, 'Mad
City' is a well crafted but yet low-key story involving a man's loss of
dignity and the measures he will go to to get it back.  The film harnesses
its emotions to breed a look totally convincing and it refuses to become
pretentious while examining media ethics at the same time.  Involved in the
ensuing mayhem is a big time commercial anchorman from NYC (Alan Alda) who
used to be a colleague of Hoffman's and co-worker but the two of them had a
falling out when Hoffman embarrassed him during live coverage of a plane
crash back in New York.  Alda flies to California in an attempt to boost his
career by getting inside facts on the breaking story as it continues to unfold. 
     'Mad City' drags at certain points and Dustin Hoffman is upstaged by
the nerve ending performance turned in by John Travolta.  Hoffman's
performance is not to be 
misunderstood.  He is in a desperate situation and remains calm and does a
good job of it.  It's just that Travolta's character is better written.  One
interesting piece of information to pass along revolves around the fact that
in the original casting of this film, Hoffman was slated to be the hostage
taker and Travolta the reporter but things changed and for the better I
might add as the characterizations are more believable in this dramatic
grandstand.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
The author of 'The Thin Red Line' is the man who wrote the novel that
made for my fourth favourite film of all time, 'From Here to Eternity'. 
I'm talking about James Jones.  Jones' autobiographical 1962 novel, 'The
Thin Red Line', about American bravery, is certainly some of his best
work.  Jones' life was examined somewhat in 1998 in the film 'A
Soldier's Daughter Never Cries' which told the story of a successful
writer from the point of view of one of his children, and the novel on
which it is based was written by Jones' daughter Kaylie.  Jones died of
heart failure in 1977 at the age of 55.  His legacy as one of America's
best contemporary writers is still intact.
If you need twenty years off from the time you made your last film, what
better way to make a comeback than with a war film.  Certainly the most
harrowing of all genres, 1998 serves as a reminder that the greatest
conflict in human history, World War II, never seems to get tiresome and
audiences will pay big money to see stories about it.  'Saving Private
Ryan' decided to make its first half hour better than the rest of the
film but it never faltered for a second and Tom Hanks' performance can
be summed up by asking one question: "Would you want to go to war with
this guy?"  The answer is an overwhelming "yes!"
'The Thin Red Line' marks the return of director Terrence Malick, whose
last film, in 1978, entitled 'Days of Heaven', earned an Oscar for
cinematography, and Malick knows how to visualize his films in an almost
flawless fashion as he plunges his camera into 'The Thin Red Line' and
stirs it around until the picture on the screen comes to a boil. For
many, the film will be considered too graphic and that's just fine. 
Like 'Saving Private Ryan', it details a mission of American soldiers,
this time in the Pacific and details the Guadalcanal conflict which is
one of history's most written about events in dealing with the American
war effort.
Malick uses poetic metaphors in many sequences as a haunting afterglow
instead of any narratives that may have accompanied the film and it
works on several levels but 'The Thin Red Line', in many scenes, is more
about the illustration of motion picture technology than it is about
war.  Too much of the film details battle and not enough attention is
given to characterizations.  How can a war film be truly great unless
you care deeply about its effects on people you've come to know after
some rich character development.  This puts the film in a rather quirky
situation.  Is it disappointing?  No.  It's never boring and it's use of
explosive imagery is impressive for the most part but with a cast of
such noted people as Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Woody Harrelson and some
lesser known actors, not considered stars but still worth their weight
in talent such as John Cusack, Ben Chaplin, Adrien Brody and Elias
Koteas, 'The Thin Red Line' works only on a superficially modest level
and time will tell if it will obtain classic status.  Some films take
time to be regarded for what they are but others, like 'Saving Private
Ryan', are instantly recognized and are truly the great films.  
Terrence Malick should receive an Oscar nomination as Best Director but
the film probably won't receive a nomination for its script, adapted by
Malick or for Best Picture as it lacks that touch of greatness that
Oscar looks for.  It doesn't have that one talked about scene that will
stir up conversation like the opening battle scene in 'Saving Private
Ryan'.  'The Thin Red Line' is only a series of vignettes strung
together with one big mid section that have a documentary style about
them.
'The Thin Red Line' is excellent film making but only average story
telling and while the latter is clearly more important as an audience
takes it with them through the exit doors at the movie theatre, this
film will still please fans of the war genre, but a lot of them will
only want to view it once.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Someone once wrote that in order to preserve liberty, freedom may have
to be suspended occasionally and someone wrote back that he who would
suspend freedom for the sake of liberty deserves neither liberty or
freedom.  Interesting semantics.  In my country, Canada, we had a
national crisis in 1970 when a group of separatists using terrorist
tactics and who kidnapped and murdered a government official, were
rounded up when our Prime Minister used the war powers act and order was
quickly restored.  I happen to agree with that call simply because civil
liberties are already suspended so why not put that power in the hands
of people who are trying to restore order rather than the ones who try
and take it away.
In 'The Siege', not only is martial law brought to the forefront for the
prevention of terrorism, but it also shows that no solution is perfect.
The film is a good mix of domestic law enforcement countered by the
debate of what measures are acceptable in fighting terrorism.
Director Edward Zwick ('Glory', 'Legends of the Fall' and 'Courage Under
Fire') has crafted a suspenseful and meticulously loud batch of social
commentary to get this debate under way.  Denzel Washington stars as an
FBI agent in New York City who works to combat recent acts of terrorism
popping up all over the Big Apple.  He meets a covert (oops!, not
anymore) CIA operator (Annette Bening) investigating the terrorism from
a clandestine approach to the situation and eventually the two of them
work together.  The terrorism unfolds as the U.S. holds a middle eastern
leader as a suspect in other terrorist acts.  Washington butts heads
with a fanatical army general (Bruce Willis) who wants martial law
brought about to satisfy his own hunger for power.
'The Siege' has a very interesting message in that for every violent
action there is an equal and swift reaction as people begin
demonstrating as martial law rips apart civil liberties and Arab males
between 14 and 30 are rounded up and then put into concentration
camp-style incarceration.  One thing I admired the film for was the use
of dialogue and situations to explain and avoid any defamation aimed at
Arab-americans.  One scene has a meeting where a group of civil figures
from all points, law enforcement, the media, the army and Arab
anti-defamation leagues explain their desire that not all of them should
be stereotyped for the actions of a few.  Washington's partner in the
FBI (Tony Shalhoub) is shown as a law abiding and law enforcing
Arab-american who loves his country and puts his life on the line
everyday to serve it.
Denzel Washington does it again.  This is his third teaming with
director Edward Zwick after his Oscar-winning turn in 'Glory' and his
impressive leading performance under Zwick in 'Courage Under Fire'.
Washington is one of those actors who can rely on his own voice, look
and personality to get into character each time and still manage to look
different.  Without the benefit of make-up, heavy accent or other
altering factors most of the time, Washington can hold his own with any
of the world's top performers.  He has proven to be both sensitive and
tough on screen and his performance in 'The Siege' is totally different
than his excellent work earlier in the year in Spike Lee's 'He Got
Game'.
Annette Bening is the only wrinkle in the film.  I didn't really buy her
as a CIA agent and Bruce Willis is rather forgettable as the fanatical
general.  But these factors are compensated for by telling a gripping,
plausible and tense story.  Although terrorism has struck the United
States in the past with the Oklahoma City incident and the World Trade
Center bombings, it is reasonable to assume that these incidents while
tragic and unacceptable, have so far been isolated incidents and 'The
Siege' is  filled with the intention of deflecting the possibility of
such a thing ever occurring REGULARLY (terrorism) on American soil and
to be prepared for it if it does.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Annie Hall (1977)
Woody Allen's unique style as a motion picture director, writer, actor and
overall consumate professional make him one of the great American treasures
in the history of cinema.  His films are disliked by many; primarily by those
who don't understand his neurotic flamboyance with dialogue to the point
where it seems almost too real for average movie goers to understand that in
many cases they're really looking at themselves up there on the big screen.
It's hard to believe that Allen will be 62 years old this coming December
and his films are timeless classics focusing predominantly on relationships.
Only two of Allen's films have been nominated for the Best Picture Academy
Award and they are 'Annie Hall' (1977) and 'Hannah and Her Sisters' (1986).
Other masterpiece showcases such as 'Interiors' (1978), 'Manhattan' (1979),
'Broadway Danny Rose' (1984), 'The Purple Rose of Cairo' (1985) and 'Bullets
Over Broadway' (1994) had to settle for little or no recognition from Allen's
peers although 'Hannah and Her Sisters' did win three Oscars in major
categories---Michael Caine (Best Supporting Actor), Dianne Wiest (Best
Supporting Actress) and Allen for the film's original screenplay hailed by
many critics as the best original film literature of the 1980's.
Alvy Singer (Woody Allen) and Annie Hall (Diane Keaton) are the subjects of
examination along with other New Yorkers (some eventually become
Californians) in Allen's defining masterpiece which is his Academy Award
winning film 'Annie Hall'.  This picture was crowned with four Oscars (Best
Picture, Director for Allen, Actress for Keaton and Original Screenplay by
Allen and Marshall Brickman).  On its twentieth anniversary it remains as
fresh and original with high class wit and low brow production values perfect
for viewing a Woody Allen movie.  Allen often uses only one camera during the
prduction of his films and allegedly made a statement saying he is never
completely satisfied with any of his films.  Understandable since so many
artists don't like to look or listen to themselves in their selected fields,
among them Mick Jagger, Jack Palance and Harrison Ford.  A personal project
can cry out for perfection and Allen is about as close as you'll find on an
academic level but critics and film buffs respect and admire all that Allen's
genius has contributed.
'Annie Hall' opens with a brilliant in your face stand up routine in which
Allen is telling an old joke and comparing it to the way he feels about life
and his dissection of social empathy is nothing short of hilarious.  The
deadpan humour throughout 'Annie Hall' is neatly presented and timed to
perfection as each scene is well paced and knows when to exit once its made
its point.  Allen discusses the relationship with the many women in his life
and his relationship with his friend played by the under rated Tony Roberts
is pure gold. In one scene between the two actors there is a long tracking
shot of a sidewalk and street and we don't see them come into the camera's
range for quite sometime but all the while we hear their discussion about
life in New York and it's discussed in a way which defines Allen as a true
New Yorker.  Roberts has nicknamed Allen 'Max' in the film and this leads to
a discussion of what that nickname means.  Is it short for maximum?  It could
be since Allen uses so many hand gestures and levels so much speaking time in
the film to a "maximum" capacity that Roberts could be poking fun at his
every turn.
Diane Keaton made a name for herself as the strong-willed and no nonsense
girlfriend to Allen in the film as her character remotely subjects Allen to
take a good look at himself and to see that his unwillingness to leave New
York is not a selfish one but one that frustrates her as she makes California
her home later in the picture.  When the two of them first meet during an
afternoon of tennis and they retreat in seclusion for a drink there is a
conversation between them in which Allen interjects subtitles to show that
what they're saying is really being covered up by cautious dialogue pursuant
to what they're really thinking.  It's one of the most original things ever
seen in any movie and may be the film's best scene.  Another classic moment
comes when Allen is taking a drive with Roberts in California and an
observation is made about how clean California is compared to New York and
Allen suggests that all of California's garbage is recycled into t.v. shows.
Hysterical !
With a cast that includes Shelley Duvall, Paul Simon, Carol Kane, Collen
Dewhurst, and Christopher Walken, 'Annie Hall' is Allen's best film and
winning four Oscars out of five nominations isn't bad either.  That's a ratio
of 80%.  Oh, did I mention that the one it lost for was Allen as Best Actor.
That's hard to believe in a film where Allen doesn't just play himself, he
lives the part and that's an achievement all its own.    

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Cast - Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O' Connell and Tim
Robbins.
Directed by - Brian De Palma
Written by - Lowell Cannon, Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost
Produced by - Tom Jacobson
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - PG (Parental Guidance) /
Rated PG for sci-fi violence and mild language.
(Rating) > Ontario Film Review Board - PG (Parental Guidance) / Rated PG.
May offend some.  Frightening scenes.
Running Length - 110 minutes.
Distributor - Touchstone Pictures.
Brian De Palma.  A man I have trouble accepting as a film director.  Michael
Cimino wins the Oscar for directing 'The Deer Hunter' in 1978 and then flops
big time with 'Heaven's Gate', takes time off to recover and then is given
the opportunity to direct 1985's 'Year of the Dragon' and then he is all but
forgotten with the exception of only a few minor films since then.  De Palma
gets huge budgets for his films and flops at almost every single one of
them.  HOW DOES THIS MAN CONTINUE TO WORK IN HOLLYWOOD?
This can only be truly understood by the film buff who shakes his or her
head in
disbelief whenever a Brian De Palma film comes out.  De Palma just doesn't
understand sub text.  His films all have long static tracking shots of no
interest and
his films move along usually at the pace of being stuck in a traffic jam.
'Mission to Mars' has all of the ingredients of a Brian De Palma film
without the usual trait of trying to copy Alfred Hitchcock.
It is 2020 and people are still the same.  They live in houses, have kids,
barbecues, drink beer and appreciate their friendships.  Jim McConnell (Gary
Sinise) is a man still suffering the loss of his spouse.  Luke Graham (Don
Cheadle) is the captain of the first human exploration to the red planet,
Mars.  Jim and Luke take Woody Blake and Terry Fisher (Tim Robbins and
Connie Nielsen) and Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) and a couple of other
astronauts with them.  The space frontier holds many mysteries and NASA has
lost probes near Mars before so who knows if an exploration of Mars should
ever be attempted.  Some believe that a cosmic whirlwind or some other
scientific force caused particles from Mars to drift to Earth and that our
ancestry and entire life force is indeed Martian in nature and this is what
'Mission to Mars' tries to explain with an "in your FACE" style of
presentation.  You'll know what I mean by the quotation marks and capital
letters after you've seen the film.
Luke and some others explore Mars and all are killed except for Luke and a
rescue mission begins to find them.  This is the first major problem the
film has and it's a problem I had with Oliver Stone's 'Born on the Fourth of
July' in 1989.  We go from one normal scene to a completely different one
without any transition in viewing it.  In the case of Stone's film, it
showed Tom Cruise from his rainy prom night to his immediate tour of duty in
Vietnam.  'Mission to Mars' goes from Earth quickly to the mission without
showing us anything about the departure from our world.  A film needs a send
off like the launching of Apollo 13 in the film of the same name from 1995.
1997's 'Contact' had the major blast off shown in quite a different way but
at least it was there.  You simply can't get an audience fully interested in
your main frame of story telling if you don't show them how they get there
in order to know where they're going next.
There is one totally tedious part of 'Mission to Mars' where a space walk
takes place in order to retrieve a craft and one of the rescue crew dies and
it is one of the most boring things you will ever see on film.  In 1984's
'2010', we see two astronauts about to board the Discovery.  One is American
and one is Russian.  The space walk is quick, timed perfectly with
reflective dialogue of their situation along the way.  There are no long
shots that go on and on and on.  De Palma had me looking at my watch several
times during this scene and during the film in general.
The performances in this film are nothing to rave about either.  They are
standard, lack depth and have only a flurry of interest towards the end of
the film.  The film also has a problem with theories and proof of
geographical origins such as the notion of continental drift.  Many of the
insights the film projects about the world we know of make us say, "Okay,
I've known or suspected that for sometime.  Why can't this movie create a
situation or theory I can think about long after I leave the theatre."
Isn't that the point of most good science fiction?
About the only thing I liked in 'Mission to Mars' were the visuals and the
fact that the film did run under two hours, thank God.  It really looked and
felt like Mars and being partial to a good soundtrack, the film had many
sound effects that provided much needed ear candy and the eye candy helped
out a great deal.  The film sort of feels like ordering from a menu in a
restaurant and upon finding out that they don't have your meal on the menu,
you settle for second best and comment that although you didn't get what you
wanted, it was still pretty good.  De Palma does deserve some credit for
this film which is better in its second half but it still is a far cry from
good science fiction, which playing second fiddle to comedy, is the hardest
thing to pull off successfully in motion pictures.  Let's hope that De Palma
doesn't try to be (intentionally) funny anytime soon.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ordinary People (1980)
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
In the motion picture industry it's not easy to win an Academy Award for your
first effort on screen, especially if you hapen to be the film's director but
that's exactly what happened to Robert Redford as his emotional and
psychological drama 'Ordinary People' walked away with additional Oscars for
Best Supporting Actor (Timothy Hutton), Best Screenplay Adaptation (Alvin
Sargent based on Judith Guest's novel) and the most distinguished prize, Best
Picture of 1980.
The film starts off simple, almost non-effective and tells the story of an
upper class family whose struggle to stay together is constantly tested after
the eldest son dies at sea in a boating accident.  Donald Sutherland and Mary
Tyler Moore portray the parents and Timothy Hutton is their only remaining
son who was on the boat with his elder brother who died.  Hutton's character
develops a mind bending trauma based on self created guilt and a confusion of
conscience and seeks help from a psychiatrist (Judd Hirsch) for his problems.
As 'Ordinary People' progresses there is a steady deterioration of the
relationship between Moore and Hutton as their mother and son relationship
takes a turn for the worst every time they are forced to be close together as
one example points out when the family is visiting other relatives for a
gathering and Hutton stands with his arms folded in front of his body when
near his mother as she feels uncomfortable about having a picture taken with
her son because deep down, there is unjust resentment towards him for the
accident previously mentioned.
'Ordinary People' becomes a fascinating and grand character study each minute
more its on screen and concludes with what is a debatable ending of whether
or not the characters involved can truly get on with their lives in an
'ordinary' fashion.  One of the truly stunning and deeply moving films of the
1980's.  
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
How much trouble can you get into abroad when trusting strangers?  Quite a
bit if you witness the film 'Brokedown Palace' which is sort of a female
version of 1978's 'Midnight Express'.  In that film, based on a true story
(which won Oliver Stone his first Oscar in the category of Best Adapted
Screenplay), an American named William Hayes was caught trying to willfully
smuggle drugs out of Turkey and was caught at the airport and sentenced to
life imprisonment.  That film showed his criminal attempt, his capture, his
trial, his sentencing and his torture at the hands of prison officials which
was disturbing to watch at times.  Director Alan Parker was able to capture
the sadistic aspects of human rights gone awry and the film had depth,
brutal imagery and an overwhelming sense of violence necessary to the film's
point.  'Brokedown Palace' is a lukewarm version of this, told with a
sedated sense of benign occupancy and little power to really make it fly.
Two high school graduates from Ohio (Claire Danes as Alice Marano and Kate
Beckinsale as Darlene Davis) are about to enjoy freedom away from the
classroom.  They decide to embark on a journey for the summer to Bangkok,
Thailand where a friend told them that it is possible to spend the whole
summer there for about $500 U.S.  Deciding to expand their horizons, the two
young women go and find this third world tourist spot isn't all it's cracked
up to be.  Their $6 a night hotel is infested with cockroaches, and it's
dirty, tiny and they have to share the same bed.  After seeing the sites,
dancing away the night life and getting closer to the leisurely side of life
they meet a seemingly friendly Australian chap named Nick (Daniel Lapaine)
to whom they open their hearts.  He is able to convince them both to take a
trip with him to Hong Kong.  The girls are nabbed by Thai authorities at the
airport in the form of a small army, complete with machine guns to
intimidate the most erratic criminal and the girls are arrested.  Their
crime?  Smuggling drugs out of the country without their knowledge.  Of
course, they're innocent.  This happens when they trust a cab driver to put
their bags in the trunk on the way to the airport and the girls are duped
into being naive patsies and a diversion for the real drug smuggling to go
off without a hitch.
At their trial, they are both deemed to be of poor character.  An incident
is brought up by the prosecution regarding how the two tried to pass
themselves off as guests at a ritzy local hotel, sitting by the pool and
ordering expensive drinks.  This doesn't look good for them and based on
this fact and different circumstantial points they are convicted and
sentenced to 33 years behind bars.  An American lawyer practicing in Hong
Kong (Bill Pullman) tries to handle their case and finds little support from
a U.S. embassy official (Lou Diamond Phillips) who doubts the girls are
innocent.
Director Jonathan Kaplan who made the very lacerating 'Unlawful Entry' in
1992 and directed Jodie Foster to her first Oscar for 'The Accused' in 1988
strikes out this time around with a story too sedated for its own good.
There are some good moments in the film and there are moments of deep
dramatic presentation and a fairly good performance from Claire Danes as one
of the convicted but Kate Beckinsale gives a rather stiff performance and
the screenplay by Adam Fields and David Arata lacks emotional fire and the
overall presentation of the film is comparable to having the feeling that a
nightmare such as this should be more intoxicating and should put the
audience over more with its protagonists but little sympathy is generated
for them and this is wrong since they are innocent!  The film has a good
ending in my view.  It's a mix of sorrow and happiness together but may be
the wrong way to end the film in the eyes of many and you may feel that
nothing concrete has been accomplished and that the whole point of the film
may be lost since the bad will seem to over shadow the good.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
As you might expect, when you put someone who is a movie star first
(Billy Crystal) and someone who is an actor first (Robert De Niro)
together, there is an odd chemistry that allows both individuals to
showcase their talent.  Robert De Niro is a true movie legend and a rare
commodity: a great actor who is also a movie star.  Billy Crystal is a
great movie star who can also act, but only superficially.  Finding a
balance in giving each other an equal opportunity to tell a story from
their own point of view is a test that could have easily failed those
involved with this production.  And aside from being whimsically off
beat, 'Analyze This' works because the strength of its leading
characters carries those who choose to be slackers.  It's not really
their fault because they're just written that way.
Director Harold Ramis ('Multiplicity', 'Stuart Saves His Family',
'Groundhog Day') directs his latest film with more of an emphasis on the
characters than on any other part of his film.  The first half of this
movie is uproariously funny but the second part suffers by comparison
and what allows me to give this movie a marginal recommendation is that
it runs a perfect length of 103 minutes.
Billy Crystal plays Dr. Ben Sobel, a divorced shrink who is about to be
married.  He has a teenage son and does what a lot of us do from time to
time on the job: let our minds wander.  He doesn't always pay full
attention to his patients and one encounter makes for a funny scene as
we realize that what we just saw didn't really happen, except in
Crystal's mind as he would really like to tell one of his clients what
to do about their silly problems.  His bride to be (Lisa Kudrow) is a
slightly neurotic news reporter in Florida who has just given up her
job.  But all is not rosy for Crystal as he is about to meet the person
that will make him the most nervous, mob boss Paul Vitti (Robert De
Niro).  Vitti has been having a problem with his authority lately.  In
his line of work, authority means killing another rival, literally, so
his inability to pull the trigger, combined with fits of crying, don't
help his cause.
He decides to check himself in for therapy and chooses Dr. Sobel after
the doctor and one of his associates have a minor traffic accident and
Dr. Sobel gives one of Vitti's men his business card.  A real gem of a
movie from 1990 entitled 'The Freshman' with Marlon Brando showcased
Brando lampooning himself from his role in 'The Godfather' and De Niro
does the same thing here.  Taking all of the mob parts he's played from
'The Godfather Part II', 'GoodFellas' and 'Casino', De Niro rolls them
all into one bundle and puts on a dunce cap and red nose (a figure of
speech, of course) and clowns around and has fun with this role.  His
character is always in control of his life in other ways but it's funny
to see him break down and cry at the sight of sentimental television
commercials.  De Niro also employs many of the characters that appeared
in minor roles in a lot of his gangster films and uses them here.  You
know, those actors whose face you know but you can't place the name
because of their lack of notoriety.
As for Billy Crystal, he is excellent in this film for two reasons.
First is his reaction to many funny moments such as the one where his
future father in law gives away his bride to him at the wedding and
politely threatens him in hilarious fashion (to the audience only) if
anything happens to his "little girl" if his involvement with the mob
hurts her in any way.  Crystal holds his own in most of the scenes with
De Niro and carries a good part of the film's climax as he's forced to
sit in as a make believe "consigliere" before Vitti's arrival at a major
meeting of crime bosses from all over the country.  The film includes a
rather small but mostly meaningful part played by Chazz Palminteri as a
ruthless crime boss who wants to rule the underworld all by himself by
killing off all of his hated rivals.
Ken Lonergan and Peter Tolan have fashioned an original screenplay that
cooks up some really outrageous scenes that are startlingly real in
their initial measures as pieces of comedy.  Who's to say something this
outrageous couldn't happen.  The writers make the classic and near fatal
mistake, however, of cramming all of the best jokes into the first
hour.  I would have preferred to see the film switched in tones and have
many of the jokes from the first half displayed in the second because if
the movie had been built up slowly rather than drop off the way it does,
we might have had a truly memorable comedy instead of a film that is
good when it should have been great.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
Those who distrust government in many cases have good reason to do so.
Unfortunately, what many fail to realize is that while we should have little
tolerance for their incompetence, we must accept the fact that as human
beings like us, government is fallible.  There is an exchange of ideology
along these lines in a smart and restless film about domestic terrorism in
'Arlington Road'.
Matching wits with each other are Jeff Bridges as college professor Michael
Faraday who teaches a course in home grown terror while his next door
neighbour Oliver Lang (Tim Robbins), is hiding a past with a fake identity
and many visuals in his home that are strange to say the least.
What do they say?  You have to watch the quiet ones?  Who would think that
American suburbia would be the perfect disguise for such criminal behaviour
as terrorism.  No tents in the forest.  No cabins in the woods.  No little
farm house in the country.  Just your average husband and wife and their
kids, along with others who share in their cause, forcing their politics on
the world through the barrel of a gun and more forcefully through the touch
of a detonator.  Oliver's wife Cheryl (Joan Cusack) is a frightening picture
herself.  She's a woman with a quiet demeanor.  She surprises those lurking
about her and her family like a spider waiting to jump on its next prey.
She uses the element of surprise twice in the film in a very effective
manner.
Oliver and Cheryl live next door to Michael and his girlfriend and Michael's
son in a quiet Virginia neighbourhood where barbecues and kids at play are
the normal thing.  Michael is a father himself and the biggest mistake he
makes is in letting himself get too close to the neighbours to the point
where he inadvertently puts his son's life in danger.  Michael begins to
suspect that his neighbour Oliver is not who he seems to be.  His paranoia
may be justified.  In addition to teaching a course on terror, Michael lost
his wife, a 35 year old FBI agent, in a deadly shoot-out similar to the real
life incident involving federal agents in Ruby Ridge, Idaho in 1992.  After
some research through the Internet as well as some advice given to him by a
friend in the FBI, Michael exposes Oliver's true identity but this is only
half the story.  168 people died in the tragic Oklahoma City bombing in
April of 1995 and this film uses an incident taught in Michael's college
class that tones down the loss in a similar situation by mentioning that
approximately sixty people died in a government building.
'Arlington Road' makes itself out to be a story of terrorism made exquisite
on many levels.  It's a psychological thriller along the lines of 1990's
under rated 'Pacific Heights', where Michael Keaton played a menacing tenant
ruining the lives of his two landlords.  'Arlington Road' uses the same form
of psychological tension but on a much grander and wider scale.  It
challenges the viewer to guess how the climax will play out and it never
gets boring for a second.  It's also an angry film laced with political
overtones.  Any decent person knows that bad breaks in life do not justify
criminal behaviour but 'Arlington Road' shows us that some give in to their
hate and always seem to act with a reason.  Timothy McVeigh was said to have
been set off by the incident at Waco since the bombing he was convicted for
happened two years to the day after the raid on the Branch Davidians.
'Arlington Road' stays credible throughout most of its running time and it's
extremely hard to guess what its next move will be.
Many will find the subject matter disturbing but Tim Robbins is the perfect
psychotic and Jeff Bridges is excellent as the everyday man who, in this
case, gets in over his head and fails to go to the authorities until it
might be too late.  Done with the rippling style of a summer movie,
'Arlington Road' probably won't win any awards, but for a film I didn't
expect to see in a summer of juvenile lunacy ruling the box office,
'Arlington Road' stayed with me until well after I saw two other movies.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Cheer up.  This time you won't see the actors lips moving before or
after their out of synch dialogue.  This production of 'Godzilla' is a
high tech marvel from the team of Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich who
brought 'Independence Day' to movie screens in 1996.
Inspired by the revolutionary special effects of 1993's 'Jurassic Park',
'Godzilla', plain and simple, is a popcorn movie that is beyond the high
brow realm of major criticism and is one of those movie's that despite
the rigid criticism it will receive for its uneven concoction of action
and character fluff, still offers the pleasant and familiar cliches of
an electrifying monster movie.
A geographical map is displayed during the film's opening credits as we
see the South Pacific location of French Polynesia and the nuclear tests
being conducted by the French government in and around that region that
have been going for some 30 odd years or so and the genetic mutant of
the experiments gone awry is, or course, 'Godzilla'.  The first sign of
his existence comes at the expense of a Japanese boat crew who get
demolished one night in the Pacific Ocean and a member of the French
Secret Service (Jean Reno), confronts one of the survivors who describes
the eerie tale on videotape which later comes out.  The initial story is
also set up through a scene in Chernobyl, Ukraine where a nuclear
containment specialist named Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) is
measuring the effects of the 1986 Chernobyl disaster on earth worms and
discovers that a number of them are 17% larger than they were were
before the nuclear fallout and later applies this theory of nuclear
contamination to explain the Godzilla phenomenon.  Nick is re-assigned
from his current exploration of Chernobyl to other locations where signs
of the giant lizard appear and eventually come to fulfillment in the Big
Apple.  New York City is the perfect playground for the monster as
Manhattan is an island where the creature can roam at will on either
land or in the water.
The New York characters are stereotypical of the city that never
sleeps.  An aspiring and bubbly attractive young t.v. reporter named
Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo) and a camera man name Animal (Hank
Azaria) from the station she works at, work together despite the
objections of Animal's wife Lucy (Arabella Field) to get involved in the
Godzilla frenzy when all hell breaks loose.  Audrey is perceived as a
sex toy by a sleazy local anchor man (Harry Shearer) who refuses to give
her the big break in television reporting she so desperately wants.  She
and Matthew Broderick's character were old college flames who meet each
other during the breaking story and they rekindle their feelings for
each other in a somewhat awkward manner.
The NYC Mayor (Michael Lerner) and the leader of a crack military
operation (Kevin Dunn) exchange sparring words of conflict over the
handling of Godzilla's destruction and the movie glides along, somewhat
unevenly, during the attempts at dialogue the all around characters
exchange.
There are many scenes delivered in much of the same way they were
showcased in 'Independence Day'.  There are several scenes where the
military men go after the beast by air power and bombard it with
gunfire, missiles and other tactics as we witnessed in the attack of the
mother ship in ID.
Roland Emmerich directs 'Godzilla' in a typical way we've seen from time
to time where the creator doesn't want you to see the beast in its full
form as Steven Spielberg demonstrated in 'Jaws' where the shark wasn't
completely visible until well into its running time.  We see Godzilla's
tail, his foot, his eye, his head, all edited in quick and scattered
shots of temptation before the big show.  His rampage through New York
City is furious and heavy as several landmark buildings are destroyed
and Godzilla marks his territory with the next generation of lizards in
the form of unhatched eggs which work their way into the plot rather
well to give the film some meaning in its second half.
The screenplay by Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin isn't really clever
enough to offer any real surprises.  The film is an all out display of
big studio dollars spent during the first of many summer months to draw
a large crowd of movie goers who hopefully will enjoy a film that based
on its well established name, will self by itself.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
'Runaway Bride' is such a bad film that it's difficult to know where to
begin.  The poster for it certainly made it look like it was more interested
in showing the physical attributes of its stars rather than their talents.
Their smiles, their smirks, their way with each other that was all seen in
1990's 'Pretty Woman'.  The mismatched man and woman who dislike each other
at first but later fall in love in such an unconvincing manner that not only
is it an insult to the audiences intelligence but takes two very serious
subjects like prostitution (the background subject of 'Pretty Woman') and
libelous journalism ( the background subject of 'Runaway Bride') and sugar
coats them in a shameful manner.  If you're going to make a film like this,
why inflate it with such an overblown cast of characters who mean nothing to
the story except to the actors playing them as well as the people calling
the shots?
I think if you asked most movie audiences, they probably would have wanted
to see a sequel to 'Pretty Woman' nine years after the original with more
admirable qualities rather than another pairing of its two leading stars in
a movie with different material.  Look at 1997.  The cast of 1988's 'A Fish
Called Wanda' teamed up for 'Fierce Creatures' an abysmal attempt to go home
again and capture the magic of the original chemistry that 'Wanda' was able
to project.  Better yet, how about a prequel to 'Pretty Woman' showing how
the character's lives progressed into their eventual choices to make a
living and eventually meeting each other.  But no, director Garry Marshall
chooses to take his skill that has never really amounted to anything above
the level of television entertainment and make a movie that appeals only to
a certain audience and has very little to offer to anyone else.
In 'Runaway Bride', Gere plays Ike Graham, a journalist for USA Today who
writes a story that causes a firestorm of controversy.  His source, an
intoxicated guy in a bar, tells Ike that there's a woman in small-town
America named Maggie Carpenter (Julia Roberts) who has developed a habit of
being a man-eater.  She has allegedly dumped several would be grooms at the
altar and earned the nick name "runaway bride" because she literally runs
away, bridal dress and all and one incident shows here managing to escape on
a horse at full charge.  After writing an anti-female article that knocks
Maggie at every turn, women rap Ike on the head with a copy of the newspaper
as he walks the big city streets and his editor and ex-wife (Rita Wilson)
fires him after she says that the stuff he wrote is "actionable" on the part
of its subject.  Determined to stand by his story win vindication for
himself and investigate Maggie herself, Ike travels to her small town and
encounters its culture with all of its people and, of course, Ike and Maggie
fall in love but do they stay together?  You'll have to see for yourself.
'Runaway Bride' had me wanting to scream in disgust at many of the obvious
phony scenes of a relationship that is not in the least bit convincing and
its climax which involves the news of how the two leads lives turn out for
the moment, has all of the films characters receiving the news one way or
the other and projecting their reaction to it like you would react to a plot
twist in your favourite soap opera.  To further complicate things, there are
even some in-jokes about 'Pretty Woman' which aren't even funny.
The most manipulative film in the last ten years is 1989's 'Dead Poets
Society' which saved itself by giving the audience an original story to fall
back on and the outcome was both believable and flowed naturally and didn't
look manufactured.  When a film can manipulate its audience and disguise it
as genuine entertainment, it's still sort of a cheat but at least it can
make up for its shortcomings by injecting a sense of convincing traits.  The
manipulation here is both obvious with no redeeming qualities and a style
similar to fast food which is digested quickly and forgotten even faster.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
The third season of my favourite television series, 'The X-Files', has an
episode entitled Jose Chung's 'From Outer Space'.  Studying the title for
the first time and making a quick judgment of that episode would lead you to
believe that a man named Jose descends from outer space.  Upon further
review and seeing the episode, we learn that it is actually the title of a
book that he's writing.  So like: Stephen King's 'The Shining', we have Jose
Chung's 'From Outer Space'.  A cleverly written episode of 'The X-Files' by
the series' most bizarre and imaginative individual, Darin Morgan.  The
episode Jose Chung's 'From Outer Space' was about perception and how we
distinguish or how we may not be able to distinguish the real from the
unreal.  A girl was supposedly abducted by aliens but later we learn it may
have been the military using alien technology to distort her perception of
exactly what happened.  Later, Agent Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) meets a
military pilot at a diner who doesn't know if the things around him are real
or a distortion.  The episode even throws in a humourous jab at it all by
portraying a man in black (Jesse Ventura) as a great philosopher who gives a
sermon on how
human perception is not quite understood by Earthly scientists but that
somehow people declare that "Seeing is believing".  What's the point of all
this you ask?  To illustrate that 'The Matrix' is a similar type of story
with a more complex and serious tone that has no humour which in this case
is a bad thing.
Keanu Reeves stars as Thomas Anderson, a computer hacker who works for a
large and influential software company who makes a fortune in side projects
by pirating and selling high tech information.  His cyber name is Neo and
he's recruited by a renegade band of cybernetic crusaders whose leader,
Morpheus, (Laurence Fishburne) believes that Neo is the chosen one.
Morpheus' right hand girl is Trinity (Carrie-Anne Moss).  Morpheus tells Neo
that the people of the Earth are slaves and that the world is only a quality
of imagination and that it doesn't really exist.  He explains that people
rely too much on machines in their everyday lives and that today's Earth is
sort of like a virtual reality.  It was created by an outside force designed
to enslave humans.  It's THE MATRIX, but it can't be explained.  It has to
be experienced to be understood.  Morpheus compares the matrix to a dream
where it feels so real but it isn't so, and only those who have the dream
know how it is perceived.  Morpheus believes that Neo is the one who can
break it all up and save mankind and restore a sense of belonging and
happiness that human beings should experience everyday of their lives.  Sort
of like the John Connor character in 'The Terminator' saga who is the chosen
one to save mankind.  You can't have a movie like this without villains
trying to stop you.  They come in the form of artificial intelligence,
dressed in black suits with earpieces for communication, like secret service
agents and wearing dark sunglasses a.k.a. 'Men in Black'.
It's disappointing that I can't quite recommend 'The Matrix' for several
reasons.  Just when the film is getting really cranked  up for a grand
climax, they resort to formula (it was produced by Joel Silver) and the
climax is handled in a giant shoot out where the bad guys can't kill the
good guys no matter how many bullets they have.  It's almost as if a great
script had been written but the authors had writer's block going into the
final stages of its draft.  Maybe there was a different ending in mind.  I
like to think that the creative energy was there but that it was a studio
imposed ending with the ultimate decision on how to resolve things left up
to the suits instead of the artists.
It would be unfair to overlook the film's many virtues such as the
performances.  There is an intellectual and profound style of personality
executed very well by Laurence Fishburne, and Keanu Reeves is almost grown
up in his best performance since 'Speed' but he still can't make you forget
about his Bill and Ted days which will probably follow him throughout his
career.
Further hindering 'The Matrix' are too many references to other films in the
science fiction genre.  Obvious comparisons to other films this one makes
are to 'Total Recall', 'The Terminator' series, 'Invasion of the Body
Snatchers' and ironically, another Keanu Reeves movie entitled 'Johnny
Mnemonic' which was indefensible trash.  Many film makers, like Quentin
Tarantino, know how to draw on the past and take things from other movies in
order to make their own without making it look obvious.  'The Matrix' does
not do this.
The film is written and directed by the Wachowski Brothers, Andy and Larry
who made many 10 best lists in 1996 with 'Bound'.  As 'The Matrix' is their
sophmore effort, it fails like many others who come up with an encore for
previously praised work.  All you can do is re-group and hope that your next
film is a winner.  They just missed the mark here.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Director Atom Egoyan has made not only his finest film but his most
important statement yet with 'The Sweet Hereafter'.  Also written for
the screen by Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks, the film is a
grim tale of a small Canadian town struggling to get on with their
emotional lives after a bus accident in the town kills a group of
children.  This immense tragedy, told out of sequence, is told without
the trappings of the usual Hollywood standard, using no heroic
characters to bring justice to an injustice, using no courtroom scenes
with all their pretentious speech making and most importantly the film
moves in a dreamlike manner to echo the depressing manner of a
nightmare.
Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm), is a lawyer who is not out to be a heroic
star like he might be in a big Hollywood studio production.  He is an
honest and somewhat humble individual who makes contact with the
families of the deceased youngsters in the hopes of bringing a class
action suit against someone involved with the bus company.  Through a
calculated series of visits he begins to slowly turn the grief of the
families into a more intense anger than they're already feeling and I'm
sure his motives are all for the best because he is convinced there is
more to the incident than just a simple accident.  Stephens is facing
alienation from his own daughter as she eludes him to pursue a life of
depravity by becoming a drug addict, traveling with derelicts and
eventually testing positive for the AIDS virus.  Through several
telephone contacts he has with her in the film, the audience is drawn to
feel as if they aren't father and daughter at all although the film
makes it clear that they are through a brief series of flashbacks
involving Holm's care for his child when she was an infant.
More powerful than anything in the film is the intense bonding we see
between some of the parents and their children and the eventual
separation they encounter through death. Another character, Nicole
(Sarah Polley) is older than the other children who died and is confined
to a wheelchair, paralyzed from the waist down after the wreck.  Her
hopes of becoming a rock star are quickly dashed by her predicament and
she is instrumental in the film's outcome as her deposition given to the
case may decide things.  Her character is the most sympathetic and is
the best supporting performance in the film.  As for Ian Holm, I was
overwhelmed by his performance as the lawyer who wants to reach out and
also be a friend to the families.  Just one look at him tells you his
underlining concern is not profit but concern.  The performances of both
Holm and Polley are well worth Oscar nominations as is Egoyan's
direction and the film itself is a worthy contender for Best Picture..
The most impressive thing about Egoyan's direction of the film is the
way each family involved in the tragedy is interviewed and confronted by
Stephens.  The individual frustration each one of them feels and in the
case of the bus driver, guilt, is a testament to Egoyan's ability to
make a real story work by making each character as important as any
other.  This is as real a film as you'll ever see with the most searing
dramatic overtones you're ever likely to encounter in the movies.
Visit 'FILM FOLLOW-UP' by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Ninja (1997)

What do you get when you cross repetitive slapstick and wooden
direction?  Enough to fill a five minute skit.  Unfortunately 'Beverly
Hills Ninja' runs an excruciating eighty eight minutes and its bad
qualities and juvenile antics are visible in the first few minutes
which dominate the entire film.  Chris Farley stars as a ninja wannabe
who becomes involved with a sexy girl and a counterfeiting plot and
ends up on a journey from his Asian home to Beverly Hills, California
where he travels to follow up on a job he's performed for the beautiful
Nicolette Sheridan who plays the girlfriend of the movie's bad guy
who's really out to set him up as revenge for the death of her sister.
Chris Farley has appeared in supporting roles in 'Coneheads' and
'Wayne's World 2' (both 1993) and has since had leading roles
co-starring with fellow SNL comedian David Spade in 'Tommy Boy' (1995)
and 'Black Sheep' (1996).  'Beverly Hills Ninja' will be remembered as
one of the worst films of 1997 and perhaps of all time as Farley
projects a fake wisdom of the ninja culture in his dialogue while
coming off as phony and unfunny.  He just doesn't have it as a
slapstick comic and the entire movie runs like a single handedly played
out Three Stooges skit.  The plot holes and unresolved conclusion will
satisy anyone under the age of 12 and that's fine but is that the
extend of Farley's reach as a comedian?  The repetitive and
outrageously insulting so called gags in 'Beverly Hills Ninja' will not
do much for the career of director Dennis Dugan who made 'Problem
Child' (1990) and the people who will cheer for this movie will be
those who felt that 'Tommy Boy' and 'Black Sheep' were stiffed at the
Academy Awards.

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
When Jim Henson passed away in 1990, many of his fans doubted that the
Muppet franchise would carry on with the same wonder previously seen in some
of the most ingenious outings such as 'The Muppet Movie' (1979), 'The Great
Muppet Caper' (1981) and The Muppets Take Manhattan' (1984).  Steve Whitmire
does an incredible job of performing the voice of Kermit the Frog in the
same unique and memorable fashion of Henson himself.  Frank Oz and Dave
Goelz also contribute greatly to the icon voices of Miss Piggy and Gonzo.
The Muppet franchise seems to have survived but not with the same wonder and
amazement of the early years but its nice to see them try and provide
wholesome and quality entertainment for today's children.
The story of 'Muppets From Space' centres around Gonzo.  He's always been a
unique character and we find out that his roots come from another world and
that he himself is an alien and his people want to come and take him back in
a similar style seen in 'E.T.'  All of your favourite Muppet characters,
including Gonzo, Kermit, Miss Piggy, Rizzo the Rat, and others, all live
together in the same house.  It's a zoo (no pun intended) as they all fight
for bathroom time, a place at the breakfast table and room to movie about.
It's cute and harmless fun that in many cases is meant only for extremely
young children.  Older kids and adults especially may find the entire film
very boring at times and many of the characters aren't given the exposure I
would like to have seen.  That's one thing I always enjoyed about the old
television show.  There would be a segment giving everyone equal time and
everyone received their equal share of the pie.  In this one, you only end
up saying: "There's Fozzy", "There's Beaker", "There's Rolph", but we don't
see enough of them.
As Gonzo is discovered to be an alien, he is captured by a secret government
laboratory who want to experiment on him and it's up to the rest of the
Muppets to rescue him.  The whole thing is done in the most campy style
imaginable.  There is a spray carried by Miss Piggy where she can use it on
anyone and they're hypnotized into doing whatever she says and they all
carry a formula that will make them invisible.  It was nice, however, to see
the adult characters, such as Ray Liotta, Andie McDowall, Jeffrey Tambor, F.
Murray Abraham, Rob Schneider and the laughable Hulk or Hollywood Hogan,
whatever he's called these days, take a back seat to the Muppets and not
over shadow their presence.
Director Tim Hill and writers Jerry Juhl and Joseph Mazzarino have made a
film that looks more like television than the movies but considering that's
where the Muppets roots are, that isn't such a bad thing.  I just wanted to
see a less pretentious climax and more zest this time around that was
missing most of the way.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
As Jim Carrey's career moves forward, we are reminded that under the
rubber face of a stellar comedian is a man with the potential of being a
great actor.  Surely, Carrey has a long road ahead of him to prove he
has the endurance of Robin Williams, who began his career much in the
same way that Carrey did and is presently celebrating his career
achievements with an Oscar.  It will be interesting to see where Carrey
is in 10 years.  Definitely a bankable star, Carrey went for but fell
just short of the record for having five consecutive films earn 100
million dollars or more, domestically, at the box office.  'Ace Ventura:
Pet Detective' (1994), 'The Mask' (1994), 'Dumb and Dumber' (1994), and
'Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls' (1995) all made more than 100 million
but Carrey's disappointing romp in 'The Cable Guy' (1996) snapped the
streak he was going for.  In case you're wondering, the record belongs
to Tom Cruise, whose five consecutive 100 million dollar efforts are 'A
Few Good Men' (1992), 'The Firm' (1993), 'Interview With the Vampire'
(1994), 'Mission Impossible' (1996), and 'Jerry Maguire' (1996).  A
recent analysis of the movie industry reveals that Cruise is actually
3rd among active box office stars for total money grossed worldwide.
2nd is Tom Hanks and Harrison Ford is #1.
Meet Truman Burbank.  He's the first person to ever be legally adopted
by a corporation.  The reason:  to put his whole life on television for
the entertainment of a global audience, 24 hours a day, and without
commercial interruption.  As 'The Truman Show' begins, Truman (Jim
Carrey) is a happy go-lucky fellow, well into his thirties who lives in
the virtual reality town of Seahaven where some 5,000 hidden cameras
operate to capture the events that unfold in Truman's life.  Actually
and as described as virtual reality, Truman's world in the small town is
actually a giant television studio, the largest ever constructed, behind
the "HOLLYWOOD" sign and along with the Great Wall of China, is the only
man made object visible from outer space.  Truman's wife (Laura Linney)
and his best friend (Noah Emmerich) are actors and the town's population
are extras for the staging of the entire television production under the
control of a well meaning but misguided producer named Christof (Ed
Harris).
Truman's life is kept well under control and the film is convincing in
its explanation of why Truman has never left Seahaven, even for a
vacation.  He longs for his first true love (Natascha McElhone) who left
him earlier in his life when she was about to reveal the truth about
Truman's life as a t.v. show and the studio set up in general and she
was pulled from the production by Christof.  Even more convincing and
cleverly executed by the film makers is the way that Truman begins to
learn the truth about his life and how he has been deceived.  Little by
little and slowly but surely, he begins to discover elements that lead
him to believe that something isn't quite right with his life and he is
determined to seek out the truth.  Easier said than done as Christof
keeps him locked in the studio as his attempts to leave are usually
compounded with a weather storm, available by remote control or a road
block accompanied by some story of disaster such as a forest fire or
contamination spill, preventing Truman from leaving.
As described in 1976's 'Network' by news anchor turned tabloid prophet
Howard Beale (Peter Finch), television is in the "boredom killing"
business in which each scenario must be packaged into a neat 30 or 60
minute time slot.  'The Truman Show' elevates that theory as Truman
Burbank's life is real and the purpose of television is inverted in his
case and messages about the big brother syndrome are also well displayed
as a metaphor and the film's most important quality is the message of
how the human spirit will not be contained by anyone or for anyone.
Writer Andrew Niccol has penned an entertaining, evenly constructed and
strikingly original screenplay which is among the most interesting seen
so far in the 90's and director Peter Weir is the perfect man to have
made 'The Truman Show'.  His previous films such as 'Gallipoli' (1981),
'The Year of Living Dangerously' (1983), 'Witness' (1985), and 'Dead
Poet's Society' (1989), are all examples of how films can entertain
without injecting any elements of the usual Hollywood endings which are
often pretentious, a cop out or just downright unbelievable.  'The
Truman Show' will leave you wondering what is more important:  one man's
life living in Utopia or the challenge of living life with all of its
hurdles?  It's an interesting question not often asked by Hollywood in
such an original or thought provoking manner.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Fools Rush In (1997)
     I don't care how many times a certain premise has been exploited in
Hollywood because there are some stories that find a way to reach you by just
being well made films. 'Fools Rush In' isn't necessarily well made in a lot
of areas but it is a heartfelt romantic adventure with the right doses of
comedy and drama mixed together.
     Matthew Perry and Salma Hayek are two strangers from wildly different
backgrounds who have a one night stand and she shows up three months later to
tell him that she's pregnant!  After rushing into marriage a lot of things
such as religion, living arrangements and dealing with the in-laws are to be
sorted out as things begin to unfold in the life of this young couple who
have many hurdles to overcome.
     I laughed in all the right places and felt sentimental at other times
and this is a movie that remains faithful to its central characterizations
but does fail to develop its supporting players who could have added a lot of
zest to the story.  
     One of the problems I encountered with 'Fools Rush In' was the tempo
with which the story unfolded.  It basically tells you everything up front in
the first half hour, makes its point but then seems to get lazy before
redeeming itself later on.  It is an uneven and slightly aloof movie which is
pleasant enough and is unquestionably a great date movie.  It's one of those
movies that in many ways has to be accepted for what it is because extreme
criticism of a good natured film can be pushing the boundaries of escapism
and 'Fools Rush In' is acceptable escapism.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
'CON AIR' EXHILARATES INTO A SLAM BANG EXAMPLE OF SUSPENSION OF DISBELIEF
At first I thought 'Con Air' would be just another mindless action picture
filled with explosions, shootings, brawls and just about everything including
the kitchen sink but it has much more under the surface in its technique,
style and execution.  Although quite unbelievable at times it does use the
theory of suspension of disbelief quite well and is a satisfying way to spend
two hours in a movie theatre.
Nicolas Cage stars as a military soldier whose training makes him a lethal
weapon and one night while defending his wife he killed a man in a drunken
brawl and was sentenced to eight years in prison.  The movie shows small
scenes pieced together of his life in prison over the opening credits mostly
and the movie then picks up upon his release from prison.  He is to be
transported by plane to his destination of freedom.  Unfortunately for him
the plane also contains some of the most dangerous, smartest and low life
criminals in the United States.  Their leader (John Malkovich) practically
steals the show and the prisoners take control of the plane and the rest is
pretty obvious.  
'Con Air' is extremely slick and well paced and has appropriate humour from
time to time.  The criminals make the movie's colourful observations known to
the audience and the three outstanding portraits aside from Malkovich come
from Ving Rhames, Steve Buscemi and Nicolas Cage whose character is a nice
contrast and while he is a convicted criminal himself, he is the saving grace
in making the predatory criminals see that they aren't as invincible as they
think they are.
Cage is truly a gifted and smart performer whose risks in recent years in
choosing quirky and off beat roles have paid off handsomely and the icing on
the cake came with his Oscar win for Best Actor in 1995's 'Leaving Las
Vegas'.  'Con Air' is the kind of action film with good character development
and is not for the faint of heart but is for those who like their violent
action mixed with a sense of style and exhilarating stunts.
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
Director Peter Hyams whose films include 'Hanover Street' (1979) 'The Star
Chamber' (1983) and the protracted sequel to '2001: A Space Odyssey' entitled
'2010: The Year We Make Contact' (1984) and many other films, most of them
mediocre at best has emerged with his latest offering entitled 'The Relic.'
 A museum in Chicago is subjected to being terrorized by a South American
monster that is part insect, part amphibian and part human.  After setting up
the story it then turns into a cheap slasher film with little or no
imagination and is an embarassment to the film industry at large.  An
evolutionary biologist (Penelope Ann Miller) works at solving the origins of
this creepy beast and a homicide detective (Tom Sizemore) is along for the
ride.  The biologist, detective and even the film's portrayal of the mayor
are all stereotypes we've seen over and over again.  I was even further
appalled at the claustrophobic nature of this film which muddles its way down
dark tunnels and long corridors in an attempt to find the chilling effect of
any horror film we've seen before.  After a while the film becomes even more
boring and silly.  It's downright trivial the further and further it goes on.
 Director Hyams acts as his own director of photography like he has in the
past and his liking of lens flare for moody effects is hard on the eyes
before too long.  Academy award winning actress Linda Hunt and veteran actor
James Whitmore round out notable members of the cast and their talents are
way above this turkey of a movie.

Title
Review for Chariots of Fire (1981)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
The biggest surprise in the form of a Best Picture Oscar in the last
twenty years definitely came in 1981 when 'Chariots of Fire' upset
'Atlantic City', 'On Golden Pond', 'Raiders of the Lost Ark' and 'Reds'
to capture the Academy's highest honour.  It had been an interesting and
evenly balanced evening up to the announcement of its victory.  A Best
Picture winner is generally determined by a film's direction and screen
writing.  'Reds', 'On Golden Pond', and 'Chariots of Fire' all won three
major awards so the evening's momentum had been building to an exciting
finish.  'Reds' had captured Best Director (Warren Beatty), Best
Supporting Actress (Maureen Stapleton) and Best Cinematography (Vittorio
Storaro).  'On Golden Pond had won Best Actor (Henry Fonda), Best
Actress (Katharine Hepburn) and Best Screenplay Adaptation (Ernest
Thompson).  'Chariots of Fire' grabbed Best Original Music Score, its
greatest asset (Vangelis), Best Costume Design and Best Original
Screenplay (Colin Welland).  When actress Loretta Young opened the
envelope, even she was very surprised and the audience went into a
surprised frenzy itself when 'Chariots of Fire' was indeed named Best
Picture.  Producer David Putnam was very gracious in his acceptance
speech.  He invited director Hugh Hudson on stage to stand with him in
giving the Academy many thanks for acknowledging the film.
'Chariots of Fire' is a film that has been forgotten in many ways and
that's a shame because of the sheer nature of it's culturally nutritious
message in the form of demonstrating the triumph of the human spirit.
Upon seeing it for the first time, one may dismiss it as lacking in
character development, with a documentary style of direction and British
accents that may be too thick for many to understand.   My mother had a
hard time understanding many of the dialogue sequences but my father
actually did shed a few tears in the film's exposure of two athletes,
one from England, and one from Scotland, who capture gold medals at the
1924 Paris Olympics.  The film is an acquired taste for many and
actually improves with each viewing.
The movie tells the story of Englishman Harold Abrahams (Ben Cross) and
Scotsman Eric Liddell (Ian Charleson, who died in 1990 from AIDS).
Abrahams is a freshman at Cambridge University and Eric Liddell is a
devoted citizen of Scotland who believes deeply in his church and the
teachings of God.  He later became a missionary in World War II.  He
died in occupied China at the end of the war and his fellow countrymen
and women mourned such a great loss.  The film shows their lives before
the Olympic games, how they conduct their lives, their romances, their
passions, their training and their frailties.  Of particular note is the
performance of Ian Holm as Sam Mussabini, Harold Abrahams' trainer.  He
would receive the film's only acting nomination and received it in the
Best Supporting Actor category.
What works best of all in 'Chariots of Fire' is the music score by
Vangelis.  There are many scenes of competitive track and field, the
category that both men enter the Olympics under, and the music set to
some of the scenes is worth the price of admission alone.  Director Hugh
Hudson finds tremendous emotion in putting very fitting music to many
scenes and slowing the scenes right down and since I am a huge fan of
slow motion if it's used properly, I thoroughly enjoyed every minute of
this film since the slow motion scenes stand out perhaps better than
anywhere else I've ever seen them used.  Clint Eastwood never uses slow
motion and Brian De Palma uses it too much.
It's a shame that Hugh Hudson's career as a big time movie director
never really came to fruition after 'Chariots of Fire'.  In 1984, he
directed 'Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes' with little
success and his career was pretty much decided upon with 1985's awful
'Revolution' that caused Al Pacino to go into a four year hiatus.  At
least Hudson had one great film in him and I hope he finds a repeating
triumph later in his career as great as 'Chariots of Fire' and although
he didn't win the Best Director Oscar, 'Chariots of Fire' will live
forever in immortality with Oscar gold as its defence of greatness.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for He Got Game (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Depending on your preference, critics have debated for quite awhile now
on what exactly Spike Lee's masterpiece is.  Perhaps he hasn't made it
yet but in my opinion he has.  It is without a doubt 1989's 'Do the
Right Thing'.  As much as I admired 'Malcolm X' from 1992, I found it to
be too long, too preachy and a film not to be understood by everyone but
it is still a landmark film from a historical perspective.  'Do the
Right Thing' was one of the best films from 1989 and should have
received a Best Picture nomination in place of the manipulative 'Dead
Poet's Society' and 'Do the Right Thing' is on the American Film
Institute's list as a nominee to be included as one of the top 100
movies in the first century of film (1896-1996).  The honor is scheduled
to be held sometime in June.
'Do the Right Thing', 'Malcolm X' and Lee's 1996 sleeper 'Get on the
Bus' all made my top 10 list in their respective years and another
stellar effort as writer and director is put forward by Lee in 'He Got
Game'.
Denzel Washington is Jake Shuttlesworth, a convict in Attica's maximum
security penitentiary, serving what is believed to be a 21 year sentence
after being convicted of murder in the accidental death of his wife in a
domestic dispute involving their young son, Jesus.  Yes, that is their
son's name, Jesus, pronounced the same way as the biblical figure but
Jesus is actually named after another basketball player with the same
name.  After a unique opening showing slow motion basketball drills by
young people all over the United States, the story opens at Attica where
the warden (Ned Beatty), has a meeting with Jake.  He tells Jake that
his son Jesus is the number one prospect in the entire U.S. and that if
Jake can convince his son to play basketball at the governor's old
school, that an early release for Jake may be possible.  Jake has served
six years and tells the warden he has 15 left.  Jake agrees and is
escorted by two state chaperones who keep tabs on Jake using an
electronically monitored homing device strapped to his ankle and rules
of protocol are strictly enforced in contacting them while he is out of
the slammer.  Jake then meets with his son after his daughter takes him
back home.  The son is played by real NBA player Ray Allen who does a
good job but who shouldn't quit his day job.
What struck me as being overtly professional is the way the film doesn't
try to throw too much at the audience and overwhelm them with all the
trappings of college life.  The seduction of money, cars, women and
other forms of pampering are not overbearing in the film as Lee makes
his point and then moves to another scene before we, the audience, can
get too angry at the degrading lengths to which schools will go to
secure a player and possibly destroy them with underhanded corruption.
Is there any other kind?  Also, Lee makes certain that the father/son
relationship never comes to a complete formation from a sentimental
stand point and this is an admirable quality which keeps the film from
becoming pretentious.  Be forewarned that 'He Got Game' is extremely
adult oriented and really isn't a film you can take your mother to see.
Regardless of that, it works as social commentary, entertainment and is
a film that makes its high moments believable and at times tragic.  It
maintains a smooth and even flow from start to finish.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
I'm sure that there is something to behold within the personality and act of
the late Andy Kaufman.  But I just don't see it.  Director Milos Forman's
1996 bio pick on the life of pornographer Larry Flynt is a seriously under
rated and brilliant film that didn't get the credit it deserved.  I never
liked Larry Flynt or the things he did but his right to free speech was and
is absolute and although I never liked his lifestyle, I still thought the
film about him is a classic and it was my favourite film the year it came
out.  So my dislike for 'Man on the Moon' has nothing to do with the way I
feel about Andy Kaufman.  This is simply a one dimensional and totally non
lethal motion picture that never finds a way to tell its story above the
level of mediocrity, a quality a lot of people thought Andy Kaufman
possessed.
The first thing that has to be noted is the casting of Jim Carrey.  It came
down to casting either him or Edward Norton.  Carrey looks more like Kaufman
that Norton but what's really disappointing about the movie is that instead
of Jim Carrey playing Andy Kaufman, Carrey plays Andy Kaufman PLAYING JIM
CARREY!  And shame on the powers that be for selecting Carrey over a real
actor simply for box office reasons.
Andy Kaufman (1949-1984) died at the age of 35 of lung cancer and the film
opens in the late 1950's when he is just a boy and shows how he always had
the desire and ambition to become a performer.  The film then zips forward
to the mid 70's when Kaufman is in his mid to late 20's and how he got his
start in the profession of stand up comedy.  This is how the film begins its
downfall.  It fails to avoid mirroring its own subject and can't find a way
to be a grand piece of film making and can't elevate itself very far to give
its structure depth and remains totally mediocre for two hours.  There is
also no room for real characterizations.  Carrey as Kaufman is the only
mildly interesting character in the entire movie.  Danny DeVito plays his
agent, George Shapiro and is neither colourful nor absorbing.  Courtney
Love, who was so good in 'The People vs. Larry Flynt' isn't introduced in
the film until almost a full hour into it and never shows any strong
characteristics in a very pivotal role.
Aspects of popular culture cannot be explained to people.  You either see
the art of you don't.  It's like the Andy Warhol contribution of the
Campbell's soup can as art.  No one can explain it as you either see it or
you don't.  The only contagious part of 'Man on the Moon' is the pro
wrestling reference.  As a fan of pro wrestling myself, I thought the
segments involving Andy Kaufman and Jerry Lawler were worth watching.  Pro
wrestling is like a male soap opera with circus like performers who make it
big based on personality and microphone skills rather than pure wrestling
talent.  Again, when realizing this, you either see the concept or you
don't.
Another aching part of 'Man on the Moon' is that it spends too much time
showing Kaufman in his stand up performances and his antics on stage,
including the creation of a character Kaufman created named Tony Clifton.
Carrey brings aspects to the Andy Kaufman portrayal by using scenes from
'Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls' (the bongo playing) and 'The Cable Guy' in
the way he showcases Clifton.  There is a scene in 'The Cable Guy' where
Carrey, dressed up with bad hair and a bushy moustache, beats up a guy in
the men's room in comic fashion.  Carrey looks like that and acts like that
in his portrayal of Clifton.  There is too much Jim Carrey on screen and not
enough Andy Kaufman.  All of Kaufman's involvements with the entertainment
industry only scratch the surface, except for the pro wrestling stuff.
There was a need in this film to place more emphasis on the personal side of
Andy Kaufman's life with the woman he loved.  More interaction with the cast
of 'Taxi' was not shown and it should have been.  Writers Scott Alexander
and Larry Karaszewski have written what looks more like a television script
and you won't see director Milos Forman's stamp of sub text on any part of
this movie.
The movie also has serious problems with its continuity.  A reference is
made to Jimmy Carter as president of the United States and then it later
shows Kaufman on the first broadcast of Saturday Night Live which 1975.
Carter didn't take office as president until January 1977 so how could a
reference be made to him as president in 1975.  Also, a scene where Kaufman
and his lady go to the movies shows a poster of 1980's 'Coal Miner's
Daughter' and 1982's 'E.T. the Extra Terrestrial' side by side.  The film is
also technically flat.  The climax of a Christmas palladium act near the end
of the film looks more like a college production than a professionally put
together movie.
As movie making, 'Man on the Moon' fails on almost every level and was a
shocking disappointment from a two time Oscar winning director like Milos
Forman and as for Oscar talk about Jim Carrey, this film looks like Robin
Wiliams' first Oscar nomination for 'Good Morning Vietnam' in 1987.  It's
simply the comedian playing himself more and not enough of the character the
script called for.  What a let down!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Godfather, The (1972)
Celebrating its twenty fifth anniversary in 1997 is one of the most important
movies in the history of film.  Mario Puzo and Francis Ford Coppola's 'The
Godfather' is actually one of those very rare occasions when the movie is
actually an improvement over the book by Puzo.  Spanning approximately ten
years (1945 to 1955), the film tells many different stories.  To simply say
that this motion picture is about organized crime would be shallow and inept
to say the least.  To properly list everything 'The Godfather' is about would
constitute writing a book in the single context of this review so to make
things easy, see the film if you haven't already done so.  Those of you who
share the belief that it is one of the greatest films ever also must believe
that it's greatness is not only derived from what appears on the screen but
the events that transpired to make it happen.
Don Vito Corleone (Marlon Brando) is arguably the film's protagonist but that
view is not shared by everyone as we will discover later in this text.  Some
other contenders for the leading role as the head of the fictional Corleone
crime family (portrayed as the most powerful in America at that time)
included Danny Thomas, Ernest Borgnine and Laurence Olivier.  All of them
admirable choices but Brando brought a dapper quality of refined essence and
a sharply perceptive amount of dignity and wisdom to this role.  His three
sons by blood, Michael (Al Pacino), Santino or Sonny (James Caan), and Fredo
(John Cazale all display the highest amount of family love and loyalty
although Michael prefers to take a back seat to the "family business" and
decides to live a life separate from that of his brothers.  Also included as
one of the Corleone brothers is Robert Duvall as the adopted German-Irish son
whom Don Corleone relies on as his attorney.
Director Coppola is the real genius of this production which was originally
intended as a trashy, low budget money maker for the studio but Coppola
crafted it into a masterpiece of sublime and clandestine story telling with
character development of the highest order.  It's hard to believe that at one
point the executive, non-creative branch of the film's development actually
wanted either Jack Nicholson, Ryan O'Neal or Robert Redford in the part of
Michael and Coppola stood alone in his decision to cast Pacino and James Caan
also auditioned for the role of Michael and Coppola is rumoured to have asked
Diane Keaton who she wanted as Michael because her role as Kay Adams, the
woman who would eventually fall victim as Michael's wife, would prove to be a
pivotal one and the chemistry would have to be right.  Keaton reportedly
chose Pacino as her preference and most of the film's casting was set.
'The Godfather' opens with what we would eventually see is a family wedding
but before that we hear 'I believe in America...' before the film's first
visual frame opens and an undertaker is telling Vito Corleone that he needs
him to set up a hit on two men responsible for permanently injuring his
daughter in an attempted rape.  Corleone refuses and explains his philosophy
for the refusal and the film immediately displays a quality of intelligence
and depth.  As 'The Godfather' progresses the audience is drawn into the
family wedding scene which lasts approximately half an hour so the audience
would be fully introduced to the film's colourful cast of major characters.
 It's a repetitive trademark Coppola would use in all three 'Godfather' films
as a way to breed familiarity into linking all three films together although
they are all vastly different.
The real attraction in 'The Godfather' aside from Brando is Pacino.  His
characterization of Michael is impressive difference from the time the film
opens until it concludes.  Some would argue that Pacino and not Brando is the
film's true protagonist and the debate that has raged all these years among
fans of the film only re-enforces its stature as one of the best character
studies in film history.  Michael is a man who knows right from wrong but
eventually becomes drawn (somewhat reluctantly) into a life of crime after
his father is nearly murdered by a rival crime lord.  He is the logical
choice to replace his father one day as head of the family, something his
father was always against.  Sonny, the 'hotheaded' brother wouldn't have
lasted because of his temper constantly clouding his judgement and Fredo was
always the naive and weak son bent more on reaping the rewards of crime
rather than working to achieve them.  Robert Duvall probably has the most
under rated role in 'The Godfather' as the fourth son, made to feel somewhat
like an outsider as he is not a blood relative and his loyalty to the family
is constantly tested.  A test he always passed with flying colours.  One
classic scene has Brando and Pacino on screen together (they would share
surprisingly little time on screen together which would turn out to be very
effective) in a long conversation about the future of the family and what
Brando always aspired Pacino would become.
Many reviewers have stated over the years that 'The Godfather Part II' (1974)
is actually a better film than the original and having been the only sequel
to win the Best Picture Academy Award in history is proof that even many in
the film community feel the same way.  In the opinion of this reviewer I
believe that the sequel 'mushroomed' the story better and offered Coppola a
chance to go to a broader horizon but overall, the original is preferred
because of its freshness in breathig new life into the gangster category of
film history.  Its controversial subject matter stirred up much debate at the
time of its release and is also certainly one of the most talked about films
of all time.  As 'The Godfather' draws to a conclusion it sets up Part II in
such a way that you feel satisfied that you've seen Part I and it doesn't
have a cliff hanger ending which is frustrating and empty.  
Other members of the cast include Talia Shire (whose character would be
greatly improved upon in the other two films), Sterling Hayden, John Marley,
Al Lettieri, Al Martino, Abe Vigoda, Richard Conte, Morgana King and Alex
Rocco.
'The Godfather' is one of the pioneering films that will carry the film
industry into the next century and its important legacy is a testament not
only to the talent of its cast, filmmakers and their crews but it's a film
that will undoubtedly stand the test of time and is one of those classics
that simply cannot be remade better than the original.       

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
Good things come in small packages.  And that is a perfect description
for the film 'Little Voice'.  Set in England, this film is a triumph of
the spirit but is also a little sad at the same time, but only if you
consider the materialistic side of life and how it is denied to a small
group of people.  And the one in the centre of it all that can make
dreams come true for those around her is more concerned with the memory
of her deceased father and the visions she often has of him.
Laura (Jane Horrocks) or lv ("little voice") as she's nicknamed by those
around her, is a genteel, young little woman with a mousy voice who is
so shy that she's afraid of her own shadow and she rarely speaks.  She
sits in her room all day listening to vinyl records of Judy Garland,
Marilyn Monroe and Shirley Bassey left to her by her father who has
passed away and who used to run a record shop with her mother Mari
(Brenda Blethyn). Mari is a dastardly vain woman who wears tight
clothes, is overweight, wears too much make-up and is way past her prime
but still describes herself as having an a** to die for.  She curses,
stirs a hail storm of criticism at people, drinks heavily and lives like
a slob.  She's the perfect candidate for tabloid television and would be
referred to as trailer park trash if she lived in America.   
The old record shop has now been turned into a flat for residential
purposes where lv and her mother live.  As the film opens, lv and her
mother are having their phone repaired and the telephone repairman's
helper (Ewan McGregor) is attracted to lv.  He often comes by to see her
and on one occasion he propels the ladder bucket of his truck, you know
the kind used by hydro and telephone workers, up to lv's room to pay her
an intimate visit.  He also raises pigeons as a hobby which makes for
some of the film's more humourous scenes.
Lv and her mother come into contact with Ray (Michael Caine).  He's a
sleazy, small time talent agent (but is a pretty decent guy all around)
who helps the local night club find new acts and lv is his latest
discovery. He hears her singing from her room one night and gets her new
clothes, polishes up her appearance and wheels her out on cue.  The only
problem is that lv doesn't want to sing for an audience, only for
herself as a tribute to her deceased father.  She often looks at his
picture on the wall of her bedroom as she's singing.  Her debut at the
nightclub is made successful only when she imagines her father is
sitting in one of the chairs at the club watching her sing.  Lv sort of
reminded me of that old Looney Toons cartoon about the frog who would
only sing for the construction worker that found him and for no one
else.  Ditto here.  Lv only wants to sing when she's around or imagines
the appearance of her late father.
The film is written and directed by Mark Herman based on the stage play
by Jim Cartwright.  It's an excellent form of original movie
entertainment made superb by a cast of characters so different from each
other that real life couldn't be reflected more credibly than by this
film.  Jane Horrocks does her own singing in the film and is dynamite at
it.  Brenda Blethyn is totally convincing as her mother and does a
complete 180 degree turn from her role in 'Secrets and Lies' which
brought her an Oscar nomination in 1996.  What a pleasure it is to see
Michael Caine in top form this time around. One of my favourite British
actors, Caine appeared in 1997 with Jack Nicholson in 'Blood and Wine'
but had a secondary and rather forgettable role.  He's astoundingly good
in this movie by combining his knowledge of show business and his desire
to feather his own nest by using lv's talent.  He's the kind of guy you
should dislike but Caine finds a way to make his character likable.
The climax of the film is a little bizarre given the tempo of the rest
of the movie but 'Little Voice' will become a buried treasure that I
hope audiences will embrace long after its limited theatrical run which
is a shame because this film deserves to be seen by as many people as
possible.  It's just that good.  I hope in some small way, it is
remembered somewhat at Oscar time.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
1998 was an extraordinary year for foreign films that made a big splash
in North America.  Roberto Benigni's 'Life is Beautiful' was the first
film in almost thirty years (since Costa-Gavras' 'Z' from Algeria in
1969) to be nominated for a Best Foreign Language Film Oscar as well as
in the mainstream Best Picture Oscar category.  'Central Station' is a
touching story also nominated for a Foreign Language Film Oscar
(Brazil).  In the mainstream categories, it is a nominee for Best
Actress for Fernanda Montenegro.  A role she makes the most of and she
carries the entire picture pretty much by herself.
Set in Brazil, she plays a clerk name Dora who works at the central
train station in Rio and has a very special occupation.  She sits at her
desk in the middle of the train station lobby and writes letters for
people who are illiterate.  People dictate want they want said and she
writes it all down by hand.  Her expertise as a retired school teacher
helps her a great deal.  She often takes the letters home where she
reads them with her man hungry friend Irene (Marilia Pera) and she
destroys many of the letters by taking it upon herself to decide which
letters are appropriate and which are not.  Sort of a motherly figure to
the young people she writes the letters for or you get the feeling she
is sort of like the mother in law from hell by the way she remarks about
some of the literature she's written for others.
One ordinary day at work, she composes a letter for a woman who wants to
send a message to the father of her young son.  The letter is full of
scorn as she fills the composition with hateful remarks by telling the
boy his father is worthless and so on and so on.  Later, after changing
her mind and having the letter altered to be a little more sincere, she
leaves the station with the boy and is killed is traffic after being hit
by a bus when the child becomes separated from her.  Dora takes the boy
in for a short while and later sends him to an agency that supposedly
finds homes in more prosperous places for the children such as the U.S.
and Europe.  Finding out the the agency is really a place where children
are killed off and their organs sold at very high prices, she steals the
boy back and has the criminals searching for her.  Having the letter in
hand that was to be sent to his father, Montenegro helps the young man
find his father by going on a cross country search for him.  Brazil is a
larger country than most people realize and their sprawling adventure is
most unusual, enjoyable and totally believable.
'Central Station' is sort of filmed like a documentary.  Ordinary but
effective camera work, simple locations, standard costumes but excellent
acting from all including that of Vincius de Oliveira who plays the
child in need.  The film is directed by Walter Salles and written by
Joao Emanuel Carneiro and Marcos Bernstein by on an original idea by
Salles.
It's one of those tear jerker films that has a meaningful ending and its
heart warming story of a woman who never married but has deep maternal
instincts is one that can and should be appreciated by anyone who hates
reading subtitles.  This film makes you forget that you're reading them
and makes you feel like you're reading the character's emotions.
Extraordinary!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
     Face off.  It refers in many ways to two rival parties squaring off in
competition.  In this latest film from internationally acclaimed action
director John Woo, the title is literate.  John Travolta plays an FBI man who
assumes the identity of a terrorist he's captured (Nicolas Cage) in order to
get inside Cage's band of criminals by going undercover to prison to find the
location of a biological explosive set to go off somewhere in the Los Angeles
area.
     The procedure in which Travolta assumes Cage's identity is quite
unusual.  Cage is in a coma after being captured and his face is cut off with
lasers and is placed over Travolta's face and the only problem is that
Travolta's face has to come off as well and Cage awakes from his coma in the
hospital and calls upon his goons to force the doctor who performed the
surgery on Travolta to do the same on him using Travolta's face.  Travolta is
caught in a nightmare to say the least as he's now locked in to Cage's
identity and must remain in prison with no chance of reversal since the team
who performed the surgery is murdered by Cage.  Cage assumes the life
Travolta had which includes a promotion within the FBI and the pleasures of
Travolta's home life including a relationship with his wife (Joan Allen).
     This is a high-tech, original and slick minded action picture that has
both leading men in fine form and Cage is a treat to watch as the bad guy and
Travolta has Cage's mannerisms and style of presence down to a tee once he
assumes his identity.  It's a confusing parody to discuss and it's a little
bit like that old Abbott and Costello joke about who's on first.  When you
talk about the movie it's hard to distinguish between the two actors in the
reversal of roles and director John Woo has a knack for making action films
much more meaningful by utilizing the academics of craftsmanship from his
actors.  Even a terrible actor like Jean-Claude Van Damme came across well in
Woo's 'Hard Target' from 1993.  'Face-Off' suffers only from over length and
a screenplay that could have resolved things better in the end but with so
much to please the senses on the screen, these things seem innocuous.

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
Director David Fincher's films are ugly.  They present themselves as
psychological thrillers but to date are indirect imitations of Alfred
Hitchcock re-invented for a whole new generation of movie audiences.
 Although in a different style, isn't there a guy named Brian De Palma doing
that?  Was 1995's 'Seven' really that good or was it 'The Silence of the
Lambs' with two cops mainly involved instead of just one?  The third
installment in the 'Alien' series was criticized for having atrocious camera
work and it gave the word dread a whole new meaning.  'Seven' and 'Alien 3'
were also directed by David Fincher.
His latest psychological wannabe is 'The Game'.  I always give a film the
benefit of the doubt until its conclusion and I walked in without prejudice
to Fincher's latest film.  This time I was not only disappointed but
surprised how one dimensional this picture is.  A wealthy investment banker
(Michael Douglas) is given a rather unusual birthday present by his brother
(Sean Penn).  Douglas is to contact a company called Consumer Recreation
Services and they will provide him with an entertainment which consists of
fulfilling the empty and oblivious side of one's life in the form of creating
scenes real enough to surprise and sometimes torment any client.  
The audience knows all along that the whole thing is a game but 'The Game'
tries to fool us from time to time with unconvincing scenes and large plot
holes.  It's also silly and absurd to believe anything presented as a real
life situation like this could happen and it looks like the screenplay was
banged out over a couple of days of wishful thinking and the desire to
entertain an audience is instead an effort that moves in circles and ends up
nowhere special and has only one reasonably good performance by Michael
Douglas to its credit.  All the other cast members with the exception of
Deborah Kara Unger have about fifteen minutes of screen time or less.
What's most disappointing about 'The Game' is that it runs out of steam after
the first hour and ends up in a stream of repetition that serves no point and
its nightmarish theme of psychological ends will perplex the most intense fan
of film thrillers and 'The Game' would have worked better had it been more of
a one character story and if its focus had been on real peril threatening the
people involved instead of offering no surprises which draw to a very
frustrating and empty conclusion.

Title
Review for Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Why?  Why write a movie review in retrospective fashion that everyone
loves and adores and is so popular that the need for further say isn't
necessary?  In short, a lot of that is true but I feel the need to say
several things about Steven Spielberg's 1981 classic, 'Raiders of the
Lost Ark', that is so beloved by movie fans around the world, including
myself.  1998 marks 17 years since we first saw a 39-year old Harrison
Ford sport the dashing fedora which he never managed to lose until the
bug infested chamber scene in 1984's 'Indiana Jones and the Temple of
Doom'.  Luckily he got it back in the nick of time.  Not to mention the
crackling bull whip, physical endurance and sense of ruggedness
comparable to a Sean Connery James Bond and nobody could ever replace
Harrison Ford in the role of Indiana Jones.  In plain fact, I wouldn't
even see an Indiana Jones movie if Ford were not Indy.  Ford will be 56
this year and Roger Moore served as the oldest James Bond and made his
last film as Bond in 1985's 'A View to a Kill' when he was 57.  If a
rumoured fourth Indiana Jones film is in the works, they had better do
it before Indy needs a walker to replace his bull whip.  Ford is in
great shape for his age but it won't last forever.
In 1997, I wrote a retrospective movie review of Steven Spielberg's 1977
masterpiece 'Close Encounters of the Third Kind' and mentioned it a
possible contender as Spielberg's masterpiece along with 'E.T.', and
'Schindler's List'.  'Raiders of the Lost Ark' was not mentioned and for
good reason.  Every respected filmmaker has a reason for making a motion
picture and the ones that turn out to be the best ones are the ones with
emotion.  'Jaws' and 'Raiders of the Lost Ark' were grand showcases in
film making but not moving.  Certainly, you walked out satisfied with a
tremendous bang for your buck but did you cry or want to hug anyone?
'Close Encounters', 'E.T.' and especially 'Schindler's List' packed
genuine and powerful emotion which greatly elevated Spielberg to the
level of one of the twentieth century's top five filmmakers with his
diversity to entertain audiences, move them, make them laugh, make them
jump and most importantly, make them return for more.
With movie technology advancing every year, 'Raiders of the Lost Ark',
unlike '2001: A Space Odyssey' and 'Star Wars' is beginning to look
dated.  I watched it again the other night and noticed this very fact
which made me raise my eye brows now and then.  I hope the YEAR 2001,
three years from now when 'Raiders' will celebrate its twentieth
anniversary, that it will prompt Paramount Pictures to release the three
Indiana Jones movies and a fourth movie if there will be one by then so
it can enjoy the success that the 'Star Wars' films had upon re-release
last year.  I would like to tell them that they can spruce up 'Raiders'
in several areas like they did with the 'Star Wars' trilogy last year.
Hopefully, three years will be enough time to do it.
The opening scene in South America.  Indiana Jones scares off one thug
at the sound of the thug's gun being cocked.  Indy raises his head,
makes the turn and thrusts the gun free with his bull whip.  Indy and
his companion, an actor named Alfred Molina (who was Leonardo DiCaprio's
defence attorney in 1996's 'Before and After' which also starred Meryl
Streep and Liam Neeson) enter a cave and they encounter spiders, poison
darts, unstable ground and a door which will seal them inside an
eventual tomb.  Indy is double-crossed in the name of greed by his
partner and upon escaping the trap, Indy makes off with a gold statue
when (what the heck is that noise behind me?), a giant boulder is
visualized.  I read that it took 800 pounds of the material they used to
make the rock to ensure it would roll properly.  Watch the video tape in
slow motion at various edits as Indy is being chased by it and you'll
notice a pole on either side of the rock propelling it forward as Ford
is running away from it.
Later in the film, we come upon the Well of Souls, which after an
eternity of being sealed, has become a giant snake pit.  Director of
photography Douglas Slocombe makes a fatal error when Indy falls into
the pit and comes face to face with a cobra.  If you look carefully (it
helps to dim or turn out the lights in the room), you will see the
reflection of a sheet of glass between Indy and his hissing pal.  As
Indy and his girlfriend, Marion (Karen Allen) are escaping their
impending doom, Indy manages to knock over a big pole and strike the
back wall of the pit where all that is needed now is to push a big rock
out and, presto, they're free.  When Indy forces the rock out, watch
when it falls.  IT BOUNCES!
Next (yes there's more), I'm sorry, but that scene has to be fixed up
where Indy and Marion escape the scene of the plane after the Nazi goon
gets chopped up in the propellor.  The part I'm referring to is when the
plane explodes.  It looks like a cardboard plane has just been destroyed
with cherry bombs.
They find transportation back to England in the form of a boat.  The men
on board cover for Indy when a Nazi submarine crew board the boat
looking for the ark and Jones.  The men cheer when the Nazis eventually
leave and they spot Ford on the outside of the submarine, certain to
follow the Nazis to wherever they are planning to take the ark and I
hope someone can help me here. Indy is on top of the submarine, right?
It submerges and we see a map interfaced with the inside of the
submarine and its crew.  Where was Indy all this time?  He couldn't have
made the ride all along on the outside of the sub  Could he get inside
if the Nazis sealed it?  How did he make that long journey with them to
that little island for the film's climax?  If he did get inside, he
certainly would have been exposed for who he was in such close quarters
with the others before the sub got to its destination.
Certainly computer technology couldn't fix that problem as it is an
academic one so that will remain a permanent flaw in the picture but the
other things I mentioned can hopefully be fixed with a computer clean
up.
The final scene on the island when the Ark is finally opened also looks
dated.  When the faces of the French archeologist and the two Nazis
melt, they clearly look like mannequins and I had a problem with this
from the first time I saw the film and the technology involving the
giant light show to kill all the Nazis and those swirling ghostly images
mixed in with that scene didn't do a lot for me.
Here's another question.  Has anyone ever found a VHS VIDEOTAPE version
of the Indiana Jones trilogy in the letter boxed format?  Strange how a
film like that can escape from not having its full format displayed on
home videocassette for so many years.
Are you out there Steven Spielberg?  If you want to respond to my review
of this film, it will be our little secret.  As I'm sure you remember,
'Raiders of the Lost Ark' was nominated for eight Oscars and won four.
It included nominations for Best Picture and Best Director but not one
for the script.  I truly admire and respect the 1981 classic and perhaps
given the fact that the film had the script of a b-movie, some of the
b-movie elements in the film make the flaws in 'Raiders of the Lost Ark'
easier to tolerate.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
Picture a product assembly line going through the motions day in and day
out and you pretty much have the same definition of a movie formula.
You know what I'm talking about.  A movie that you've seen over and over
again done with a different idea that frankly, it could be conceived by
a journalism student in his first year of study.
'Desperate Measures' was in trouble when the first ads hit the media
comparing it to such films as 'The Hand That Rocks the Cradle' and for
heaven's sake, 'The Silence of the Lambs'?  Not even close, I'm sorry to
say.  Like all films reviewed, I always keep an open mind because the
talents of Michael Keaton and Andy Garcia are far above average and the
film's director, Barbet Schroeder ('Reversal of Fortune', 'Single White
Female') is pretty good at what he does as well.
There's nothing wrong with using repetition to make a point.  Gene
Siskel (of Siskel & Ebert fame) is always talking about how motion
picture technology is at an all time high while good motion picture
screenplays are at an all time low.  How right he is.  He mentions this
often and speaking for myself, 'Desperate Measures' is just another
example of this.
Set in the beautiful city of San Francisco (I've always wanted to live
there or close by), 'Desperate Measures' stars Michael Keaton as a
convicted killer who has one redeeming quality he doesn't know about.
Upon an illegal infiltration of an FBI database, a San Francisco cop
(Andy Garcia) finds that Keaton is the only hope he has in saving his 9
year old son who has leukemia.  It seems that Keaton is a compatible
donor for a bone marrow transplant that will save the youngster's life
and Garcia is determined in getting Keaton to agree to the procedure.
Keaton refuses at first but has a change of heart later in the film.
Keaton's real motive?  Planning and executing his escape, of course.
His attempt is pretty impressive and the film starts off in a very
promising manner but then the picture hits a brick wall.
It languishes in becoming an action, chase and pursuit picture in the
final process.  However, I hesitate to call 'Desperate Measures' a bad
film.  It isn't.  It is only mildly disappointing because Michael
Keaton's portrait of evil is very impressive and while not always
plausible, the film keeps you watching with constant interest.  I place
this film in the fast food category of motion pictures along with many
other that may at first taste good but aren't good for you.
Andy Garcia has a gritty style of acting well suited in playing the part
of a loving father who will risk his career, his safety and his life to
save his son's life.  Not much chemistry between the two leads but a
good 180 degree portrayal on the part of both actors is worthy of
honorable mention.
Director Barbet Schroeder's interpretation of the script leaves little
room for the director's improvisation, something many directors do quite
well, injecting their own sub text, finale or scenario timed at exactly
the right moment that makes a movie memorable.  David Klass' screenplay
could have used much more creative input from Schroeder, the cast and
other members of the creative process because in the final analysis,
writing is a motion picture's brain.  The director is the heart and this
film has a both of these in medium supply.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Tron (1982)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
One of the few motion pictures to be filmed in Super Panavision 70 in the
last 15 years is the Walt Disney Pictures presentaion of 'Tron'.  Usually I
am very hard on a film that ignores the academic responsibility it has to
quality writng, directing and acting.  Some films are exempt from this rule
and this is one of them.  
I decided to write about this film in particular because every age has its
state of the art advancement in special effects.  In my generation (and in my
opinion) it's been '2001: A Space Odyssey' in 1968, 'Star Wars' in 1977 and
'Tron' in 1982.  Of course in the 90's the film that's paved the way for
computer visuals is 'Jurassic Park' but that's a story for another time.  I
am not comparing 'Tron' to '2001' and 'Star Wars' but what I am saying is
that it has its place in recognizing important advancements movie audiences
sometimes take for granted.  It's a film that's become lost and that's a
shame because it is worth a look for a whole new generation of movie fans.
I saw it on the big screen when I was younger and its colourized light show
and stereo soundtrack blew me away.  It's an absolutely dizzying display of a
computer user who finds a master computer that isn't exactly user friendly.
Jeff Bridges plays a computer genius who has had some very pioneering ideas
in his profession stolen from him and decides to tinker with the master
computer storing his discoveries.  The master computer sucks him into
cyberspace and he is forced to play game after game to win his freedom.  The
illuminating style of 'Tron' will delight kids and adults will ask the age
old question "How did they do that?"  This is a Disney production worthy of
any viewer because what makes it great in part is that unlike other computer
films such as 'Wargames' and 'Sneakers', you don't have to know anything
about computers to enjoy it.    

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
'LOST WORLD STILL MANAGES TO BE COMPELLING DESPITE LOST FRESHNESS IN SUBJECT
MATTER'
Comments on this review may also be sent to wfrith@icom.ca
Technology is the saving grace that ignites 'The Lost World:  Jurassic Park'.
 That and a commanding presence by leading man Jeff Goldblum who reprises his
role as a scientist trying to bring reason to a chaotic scenario known as
dinosaur reproduction.  His theories were correct four years ago and while
the people in charge in 1993's 'Jurassic Park' didn't listen to him, you
would think they've learned their lesson, right?  Wrong.  
Richard Attenborough also reprises his role in a cameo appearance as the
developer of the original theme park in which dinosaurs ran amuck who tries
to persuade Goldblum to return to a location close to the original film's
sight and it seems that the first film was the exhibition sight and now they
go to the island where the manufacturing is actually done.  This means an
increasing number of prehistoric creatures since the last time we saw them
and a lot more people are involved this time around as well.  Goldblum is
re-united with his female companion (Julianne Moore) who was also persuaded
to go along for the ride and their small team of observers is joined by a
crew aiming to capture the dino beasts and take them to a newly created theme
park built in San Diego, California.  
Steven Spielberg said he wouldn't make a sequel to the original film unless
it could be better and Spielberg is indeed a man of integrity as far as his
word is concerned and proof of this is in the fact that no sequel was ever
made to 'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial' (1982) and Spielberg has done it with
the Jurassic story by increasing the amount of excitement in the form of
dazzling technology which he was correct in assuming would look better than
his original film.  'The Lost World' is also enhanced with nail biting
suspense and excitement just as compelling in many areas as the first film
and has a climax better than 'Jurassic Park'.  Overall it is not better than
the original film because the dinosaur concept was so original back in 1993
and kept our focus unparalleled to any other film in special effects history
but now the original magic is gone and while 'The Lost World' is not a
sensational film, only Spielberg could find ways to make it nearly as
enjoyable as his first effort in this series.
Visit Mr. Frith's 'Movie Reviews' section of 'The Review' at
http://www.arrowweb.com/review 

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Where's Bob Barker when you need him?  Seeing him pound Adam Sandler
senseless in 1996's 'Happy Gilmore' was a scream (because this guy
sucks!) and that film along with 1996's 'Bulletproof' are the only two
films I've enjoyed seeing the amateur comedian in, but just mildly.
'The Waterboy' is filled with enough stereotyped comedy to offend
everyone and while most people are expected to have at least some sense
of humour, this film clearly crosses the line and enough is enough.
Let's see, we are to believe that everyone in the southern United States
is a redneck, a bible thumping fanatic who thinks everyone and
everything is the devil, that they all are incoherent when they speak,
that they're cross-eyed or just plain backwards.  Am I from the south?
No.  I'm a Canadian but it still filled me with a sense of indignity to
see such politically incorrect humour taken to the extreme.  P.I. humour
is fine here and there but not to the point where it scars your
equilibrium so you can't think straight after the film is over.
In 'The Waterboy', Sandler plays a 31-year old water boy for the worst
college team in Louisiana.  He talks with a lisp, and an unappealing
southern accent that whines.  Sandler is no Meryl Streep or Laurence
Olivier and his attempt at accenting is not acceptable nor is it
convincing.  He lives with his mother in their bayou home where
everything is decorated for the classic southern stereotype.  Mama
(Kathy Bates) believes that girls are the devil and even has her pet
donkey tied up in the living room and it drinks from the toilet and
hee-haws at will.  I'm glad it didn't have to sit through this movie.
It seems that dad left many years ago and Sandler and his mama are the
only ones at home.  The players tease and torment Sandler as the water
boy to the point where he gets himself fired by the redneck coach (Jerry
Reed).
Sandler gets re-hired by another school football coach (Henry Winkler)
to be the team's water boy and after experiencing the same torment from
the players the same as in his last job, Sandler's boiling point erupts
and he tackles one of the players on the field in anger and devastates
him.  The coach is so impressed he asks Sandler to play on the team as a
linebacker.  He has no clue how to play ball but learns the hard way.
He is inspired to play by a girl he always fancied (Fairuza Balk), a
woman with tattoos and a criminal record who mama refers to as
the.....well, you know.
Sandler clearly wants to aim his meager abilities at the under 18 market
where a film like this would get an Academy award if they had their
way.  Just as in 'Happy Gilmore' when Sandler discovered he had a hidden
athletic ability to drive a golf ball 400 yards each time, he finds here
that he has a hidden athletic ability to tackle.  The only tackling
dummy here is the audience as we get our intelligence insulted at every
turn and to be fair, while the film does have some good football field
action and a few genuine laughs, it's shallow stuff at best.
Director Frank Coraci was clearly hired to supervise the editing, sound
and other technical mixes because he looks about as capable to direct a
movie as a water boy on the set of a movie.  No, wait, that's the guy
that gets coffee for everyone, isn't it.  Since Sandler co-wrote the
film with Tim Herlihy, it's clear that he called a lot of the film's
shots as the film is similar in nature to other films bearing Sandler's
childish humour.
I'm glad 'The Waterboy' was released in November as it becomes a fresh
minded candidate for one of the worst films of 1998.  By the way Adam,
the title of your movie, just so you can learn how to spell, is actually
two words. Some teenagers I'm sure would like to "moon" me for this
review but I would consider it a compliment after viewing this mess of a
movie.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Murder at 1600 (1997)
Another conspiracy movie?  Maybe.  Plausible story?  Yes.
Entertaining?  Definitely.  For all the complaining people do about
government (and a lot of it is justified), it's refreshing to see a
movie that keeps those who think they are above the law within its
boundaries.  Maybe this only happens in the movies but it is a nice
thought.
A murder has occurred at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue (The White House,
Washington, D.C.) and a homicide detective (Wesley Snipes) is assigned
to investigate the crime and runs into stiff opposition from the head
of White House Secret Service (Daniel Benzali) and is aided in his
search for the truth by a conscience-stricken female Secret Service
agent (Diane Lane).  The President's national security advisor (Alan
Alda) is also part of the intrigue as he resists any attempt to link
the first family with the crime.  Snipes is forced to investigate
certain venues in secret which puts his life in danger and the movie
takes many different turns before arriving at its conclusion which
unfortunately isn't disguised too well and many film buffs will have
the story figured out before the climax arrives.
That is about the only flaw keeping 'Murder at 1600' on the money at
all times and is a taut and suspenseful thriller detailing not only the
murder investigation but it also contains a sub plot which involves the
White House dealing with a crisis of military hostages held overseas in
Asia.  It's also too bad that in every film dealing with suspicions at
the highest levels of government, that those central figures remain as
caricatures to the plotline and we never really get to know them as
part of the film's central focus.  It's true in this case with the
President being portrayed by Ronnie Cox ('Deliverance', 'Beverly Hills
Cop', 'Robocop', 'Total Recall') and was also the case in 1994's 'Clear
and Present Danger' in which that film's President (Donald Moffat) was
secondary to the story and 'Independence Day' which portrayed its
President (Bill Pullman) rather poorly.  Even the recent 'Absolute
Power' failed to show its President (Gene Hackman) as anything more
than a second rate characterization.
Wesley Snipes gives his best performance since 'White Men Can't Jump'
(1992) in this picture which makes his character not only intelligent
but determined to get at the truth.  Its a deep portrayal from Snipes
who has been so good and so focused on the characters he's played.
'Murder at 1600' is a step in the right direction for his career.  It's
also a film in which the entire cast figures prominently and delivers
the goods.

Title
Review for Selena (1997)
Jennifer Lopez gives a star making performance in the biopic 'Selena'.  This
energizing look at the life of a blossoming music superstar whose life ended
in tragic fashion in 1995 at the hands of her fan club manager at a hotel in
Corpus Christi, Texas is an in-depth, creative and fascinating look at a life
based not only on talent and decication to one's craft but also to the bonds
of family life which is so splendidly played out by the entire cast.  
In 1987, 'La Bamba' starring Lou Diamond Phillips had a similar look as it
too was the story of a Mexican-American music legend whose life ended too
soon in a plane crash on February 3, 1959 that also took the lives of Buddy
Holly and The Big Bopper.  As well as documenting the final three years of
Valens' life, that film characterized the rivalry between Valens and his
older brother while 'Selena' chooses to focus on her family struggling and
working hard as children from the time Selena is nine until her death at age
twenty three.  
Led by the belief of their father (Edward James Olmos) that they can make it
big in show business, the family's other children aside from Selena learn to
play musical instruments and are by Selena's side as she climbs the ladder of
success.  Lopez looks astonishingly similar to the real life Selena and the
movie is an indication that her career can go far because of her dedication
to this role.
Director/writer Gregory Nava ('El Norte') brings a hard edged and straight
laced look to this film and makes Edward James Olmos as Selena's father the
pillar of strength as his towering performance as the family's bonding elder
is the best one in the film.
For movie lovers interested in knowing something about the life of this
talented superstar, 'Selena' takes the time to also be a sweet, tender and
caring film about family, success, disappointment and tragic circumstance
juggled for a perfect balance.

Title
Review for Places in the Heart (1984)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     There were three films in 1984 relating to a family's struggle to save
their land.  Two of them were modern tales, 'The River' with Mel Gibson and
Sissy Spacek and 'Country' with Jessica Lange and Sam Shepard.  The other, a
depression era tale entitled 'Places in the Heart' was the most heartfelt and
sincere effort of this trio.
     Set in Waxahachie, Texas during the most gruelling years of the 1930's,
it tells the story of a farm widow whose struggle to save her land is indeed
a challenging one.  Her husband was the local sheriff who was accidentally
shot to death at the town's train tracks by a drunken drifter.  The body is
brought directly home to the shock of the entire family and is prepared for
burial.  
     After the funeral there is a tender moment shared between Field and her
sister (Lindsay Crouse) as the former tries to figure out what direction her
life will take as a widow.  The bank is persistent in keeping the mortgage
payments up on the family's land of almost 40 acres and the only way Field
can do it is by planting,  nursing and harvesting a field of cotton.  The
bank manager gives her a boarder (John Malkovich in one of his first film
roles) who is blind from having fought in World War I and he spends his time
making brooms and chatting with the family members.  A drifter (Danny Glover
also in one of his first roles) stops by one evening to ask if there are any
odd jobs he can do to earn some extra money. Field offers him a plate of food
but has no work for him.  The next morning she finds him chopping firewood
out back and he won't take 'no' for an answer and tries to make friends with
the family.  It seems he's been chopping cotton since he was a child and
helps the family in their cotton harvest to save the land.
     There are many more powerful moments in this film that play out like a
series of family photographs and personal tributes courtesy of director
Robert Benton who is a native of the small town in the film and his story
telling is both relevant and deeply intense in bringing ordinary people to a
movie audience with the deepest of dignity.  A treasured film classic with an
ending that should bring people closer together, 'Places in the Heart' is a
drama that was nominated for several Academy Awards including Best Picture
and Best Director for Robert Benton who would win the film's Original
Screenplay Award and bring Sally Field her second Best Actress Oscar which
she accepted with the now famous --- "You like me, you really like me!"---
speech.  See this movie with someone very special in your life. 

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
     I must confess that before I went to see 'Dante's Peak' I was expecting
it to be a repetitive disaster movie fashioned after the succes of last
year's 'Twister'.  A quick studio cash grab to capitalize on the tremendous
box office rewards reaped by that film.  'Twister' has made well over two
hundred million dollars and there are usually copycats abound after a hit
like that.
     'Dante's Peak' is nothing like 'Twister'.  It's a film that builds
momentum slowly before unleashing its fury of special effects.  'Twister'
took a dive right at the beginning and was nothing more than a lamentable
chase picture and gave us characters we never really cared about where as
'Dante's Peak' is a thoughtful rendition of characters and technical
academics blended nicely for pure entertainment courtesy of director Roger
Donaldson ('The Bounty', 'No Way Out'.)  
     The town of 'Dante's Peak' is on the verge of a major volcanic eruption
after lying dormant for quite a while.  A geologist (Pierce Brosnan) who lost
his wife in a volcanic disaster in Columbia four years earlier is sent by his
superior along with a research team to investigate disturbing activity around
that area.  Brosnan is convinced that the town is in for a major eruption but
his superior and the town's politicians urge him not to jump to any
conclusions which could upset major economic plans to be set in motion by a
businessman who will pump eighteen million dollars into the local economy and
create about eight hundred jobs.  Should word of a natural disaster get out,
then they can kiss the cash goodbye.  The town's mayor (Linda Hamilton) leans
towards Brosnan's theory of a disaster brewing but goes along with the
majority and puts off alerting the town.
     This movie has state of the art special effects which are truly
convincing and eye popping.  If you think the movie will only display visual
effects of volcanic activity, you are very wrong.  Bridges collapsing, hydro
lines falling, buildings breaking apart and mine shafts in chaos are only a
few goodies to enhance the audience's viewing enjoyment.
     In film, the rule of suspension of disbelief should be applied to truly
enjoy 'Dante's Peak' but it is a slam bang adventure film which takes its
time to get where its going and never looks back once its there.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
As the 20th century closes out at the end of next year, 'Saving Private
Ryan' is a timely release that reminds us that the last 100 years has
been a time of warfare unlike any other in history and that six of those
100 years, 1939-1945, were the most horrific times in the broad spectrum
of human conflict ever seen by mankind with unmatched weapons of
devastation and the senseless slaughter of millions of lives both on and
off the fields of battle.
Director Steven Spielberg has ventured into World War II territory twice
in his career before this film.  His flawed but mildly satisfying
'Empire of the Sun' (1987) and his masterpiece 'Schindler's List' (1993)
are films that show the diversity of war from the concentration camps of
the Pacific to the holocaust the plagued Europe.  On both occasions,
Spielberg plunged his audience into the insanity of war, with all of its
evil qualities but found a curious sense of pride and redemption among
noble characters on each attempt and taught movie audiences of the way
film should be used as not only an entertainment medium of visual
extremes but as a redefined account of human conscience.
D-Day:  June 6, 1944.  Omaha Beach on the shores of Normandy (France).
This is the setting for the opening half hour of 'Saving Private Ryan'
but shortly before the battles commences, the opening scene is set in
the present day where an elderly man and a couple of generations of his
family visit the landmarks erected to Omaha beach veterans.  There is no
dialogue and the scene ends with a slow zoom into the man's eyes as they
fill the movie screen completely and we later realize that this elderly
man is one of the film's central characters and then the film moves to
the past and shows the D-Day carnage.
Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) leads his infantry into battle.  You
will never experience the impact of bullets upon human bodies more
realistically than you will see in this film.  Heads, legs, and arms are
mangled and one soldier's guts are spilled into full view of the
audience and another soldier picks up his arm and walks away with it
after it is blown off.  It is a shocking and difficult thing to watch
but Spielberg is to be commended for his immediate and unglamourous look
at the realities of war.  As the battle winds down the film takes a
sympathetic turn which will later put Hanks and his men in the arms of a
mission that will turn out to be the most important one in the eyes of
one Iowa family.
Private James Ryan (Matt Damon, whom we don't see until the last hour of
the film) has lost his other three brothers in combat and the war
department decides to send Hanks and his men on a mission to find him
and bring him home to his family.  The family has already received three
telegrams of regret with three folded American flags in memory of the
men lost and the mission is set in place. Tom Hanks is brilliant in this
film as he plays his role of the leader with a quiet sense of authority,
gaining admiration from his men, and his character is sympathetic but
never sentimental. He has seven men with him and the most noteworthy
members of his squad are actors Tom Sizemore ('Natural Born Killers',
'Heat') and Edward Burns ('The Brothers McMullen') who each turn in
brilliant performances as soldiers who feel uncertain about the mission,
questioning the logic in sending eight men to find one, and the mission
is described as "finding a needle in a stack of needles".
The mission sends Hanks and his men into the fields of Normandy as they
experience combat, the personal bonding that soldiers experience during
war time and the realistic killer instinct that all humans have and
although Spielberg is credited largely with the film's success,
screenwriter Robert Rodat has written an evenly paced script that
carefully illustrates and details the total scope of tension among the
film's characters that looks and feels like nothing a war film has
accomplished before.
The most impressive technical aspects of 'Saving Private Ryan' numb the
human mind as the hand held camera, used in many scenes (Spielberg
actually held the camera himself at times), plunges its way into battle,
complete with constantly changing shutter speeds, frenzied shots of
action and the film's sound effects will leave a permanent impression on
your brain as bullets hit their mark and mixed together with the film's
sensational editing, the constant thuds heard in the film as soldiers go
down in tragic fashion are haunting to say the least.  I was seeing and
hearing the film vividly, a few days after I saw it.  Director of
photography Janusz Kaminski and longtime Spielberg editor Michael Kahn,
both of whom did 'Schindler's List' with Spielberg, and the sound team
of 'Saving Private Ryan' are Oscar bound as is the rest of this film.
I doubt a better film will come along in 1998 to match the intensity of
'Saving Private Ryan'. After all, Spielberg is the century's most noted
and impressive film maker as five of his films, 'Schindler's List',
'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial', 'Jaws', 'Raiders of the Lost Ark', and
'Close Encounters of the Third Kind', recently made the American Film
Institute's Top 100 list of all time greatest films from 1896 to 1996.
No other director, not Wyler, Ford, Hitchcock, Coppola, Wilder or
Kubrick have matched Spielberg in the eyes of his peers and the cultural
historians who have judged him in the first century of film.  Even when
Spielberg makes a mediocre film, it seems to grow on you after a while
and the amazing thing is, Spielberg's only 50.
Visit the 'new look' FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
     When Pierce Brosnan came on to the scene as James Bond in 1995's
'GoldenEye', there was new hope for the classic spy character.  There
hadn't been a Bond film in six years since 1989's 'License to Kill' and
there hadn't been a truly great Bond film since 1983's 'Octopussy' which
was the second last Bond movie featuring Roger Moore as 007.
     The 007 franchise has been lacking in insightful screenplays in
recent years and while 'Tomorrow Never Dies' is an average action film,
it certainly shows no relation to the Bond tradition.  It's one of the
most poorly edited films I've ever seen and Brosnan's take on the
British secret service agent this time around is the shallowest I've
ever seen from any of the men who have portrayed the man who likes his
Martinis shaken and not...you know the rest.  Brosnan has very little
dialogue and the plot is a lackluster and cynical one which may not be
too far from the truth the future may hold for planet Earth but its
music video style presentation and protracted action sequences make it
utterly forgettable.
     Jonathan Pryce plays the super villain who happens to be an
extremely powerful international media mogul who is behind the crimes
that eventually make news which his organization capitalizes on and he
draws many parallels to some of the corporate manipulation which is very
real and there are some good inside jokes on the essence of life in the
technologically advanced 1990's.  Pryce's wife (Teri Hatcher) is an old
flame of Bond's and along for the ride is a Chinese government agent
working to achieve the same thing as Bond for her government and she
reluctantly hooks up with 007 at the right moments.
     For some reason, the forces behind the creation of any James Bond
movie seem to think that audiences will enjoy over and over again the
fact that James Bond's cars will be jazzed up with violent gadgets and
self defence devices and it would be nice if they would look for a
different angle.  How about something hidden in 007's bow tie, his
cigarette lighter or even his belt buckle?  In 'Tomorrow Never Dies'
Bond has a remote controlled car that saves his life at just the right 
moment and in many ways the car is more exciting than any of the 
characters, dialogue or situations that go down.  
     I felt as if I was watching a Steven Seagal or Jean-Claude Van
Damme movie instead of a Bond flick.  Trashy but flashy, not boring but
not 
memorable, 'Tomorrow Never Dies' will disappoint a Bond fan but may 
please someone who doesn't care about or has never seen a 007 entry in 
the series, mainly the new generation.  
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Director Jonathan Demme's vision of slavery and the memories contained
in its after life in 'Beloved', based on Toni Morrison's novel are
haunting to say the least.  Demme is a brilliant director.  I'm hard
pressed to find a more chilling example of intense psychological drama
when I think about the confrontation between Hannibal Lecter and Dr.
Chilton in 1991's 'The Silence of the Lambs' when Lecter focuses on the
doctor's pen as a tool in part to release himself from handcuffs later
in the film.  The way the camera followed Lecter's expression cutting
back and fourth from his face to the pen was so simple that it was hard
to believe.  Demme uses some of his psychological tricks in a similar
and unsettling way in his latest film.
In 'Beloved', Oprah Winfrey portrays Sethe, a former slave from a
Kentucky plantation who is now living on the outskirts of Cincinnati,
Ohio in 1865.  As the film opens, we are shown the full blooded makings
of what is in part is a ghost story.  The events are open to individual
interpretation.  Is the tiny farm house owned by Sethe actually haunted
or is it the horrible memories in the mind of a former slave brought up
from time to time?  At least that's the way I saw it.  Eight years
pass.  It is now 1873.  Sethe lives with her daughter Denver (Kimberly
Elise) and one calm afternoon, Paul D (Danny Glover) shows up and
rekindles his memories of the past (he is also a former slave) with
Sethe.  The two of them worked together on the same plantation and they
discuss events and realize that it's been 18 years since they last saw
each other.
Paul D moves in with the family and adjusts to the day to day life with
Sethe and Denver.  One day, after returning from a town carnival, the
three of them find a destitute young woman (Thandie Newton) who appears
to suffer from mental instability and sheer psychological trauma.  She
says her name is Beloved, and is taken in by the family.  For the
benefit of those of you who don't want the film spoiled, I will not
explain much more about the relationship between Beloved and the rest of
the family except to say that the outcome of her presence in the film
will leave you open to interpret it in your own way, much in the same
way the ghost story overtones are open to the same individual
interpretation early in the film.
Like any good story that gives meaning to the purpose of its characters,
'Beloved' takes movie audiences on a journey to the past and gives its
story a hard-core amount of depth with memories of the past from its
main characters, detailing the torturous aspects of slavery as one of
the most terrible historical events in human history.  It's story hasn't
been told enough and while this film does examine its aspects only in
flashbacks, it is an ample amount of education without being over done.
The performances in 'Beloved' are exceptionally strong and sympathetic
in and of themselves without robbing the characters brought to life of
what pride and dignity remain in their lives without being overly
sentimental.  Oprah Winfrey's performance IS the best one so far in 1998
by an actress and although Danny Glover is clearly seen in this film as
a supporting actor, I hope he earns a long deserved Oscar nomination for
his work on this film and Winfrey will enjoy her second Oscar nomination
if nominated for this film.  Her last Oscar nomination came in 1985 for
Best Supporting Actress in 'The Color Purple'.
Unsettling?  Yes.  Weepy and sentimental?  No.  Intelligent and
inspiring?  Definitely.  Those in search of light entertainment:
beware.  'Beloved' will stay in your memory for days after you see it
and isn't for those who like to forget about a movie a couple of hours
after they've witnessed it.  Oscar nominations are coming.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
Cast - Ben Affleck, Gary Sinise, Charlize Theron, Dennis Farina, James
Frain, Donal Logue, Danny Trejo, Clarence Williams III, Issac Hayes.
Directed by - John Frankenheimer
Written by - Ehren Kruger
Produced by - Marty Katz, Chris Moore, Bob Weinstein
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted), Rated R
for strong violence, language and sexuality.
Running Length - 105 minutes
Distributor - Dimension Films
If this person were alive today, the inventor of the gun might be troubled
by the lack of use of them at the proper time in 'Reindeer Games'.  While
there really are no good guys in this film, how many times have we seen the
Hollywood cliche of the villains holding someone at gun point while the
audience is frustrated that the silly and simple action of pulling the
trigger doesn't come at the right time.  Even when we don't want to see
someone get shot in the picture because he or she is the hero, it still
smacks of a lack of credibility.  The only time I found this acceptable was
in the old 'Batman' t.v. series, where the villains wouldn't or couldn't
shoot straight and the dynamic duo was always put into some kind of campy
trap from which they always managed to escaped.  To roughly quote 1976's
'Network', "No matter how much trouble the hero is in, just look at your
watch and you'll know when all will be resolved".  By rights, Ben Affleck
should have died about five times throughout the course of 'Reindeer Games'
and while I'm not giving away the fact as to whether he lives or dies in the
film, the keyword for this film is "duh"!
Affleck plays Rudy, a convict on the verge of release where, when released,
he will meet with a young woman who will help him get his life back on
track, supposedly.  He's never met her and she's never met him.  They met
through letters written.  But wait!  This is only a smoke screen.  Rudy
passes himself off as his cell mate, a man who was killed in a prison riot
who was supposed to meet this woman.  While finding the company of women
irresistible after getting released, Rudy gets more than he bargained for
when his new main squeeze Ashley (Charlize Theron), has a supposed brother
named Gabriel (Gary Sinise) who wants Rudy to help him knock over a casino.
It seems that Rudy's cell mate wrote Ashley that he used to work at this
casino, run on a native American reservation in Michigan, near Detroit, and
Gabriel, thinking this is him, wants instructions on the casino's
construction, pattern of security and other tidbits of information that will
make the casino heist successful.  Of course, Rudy can only bluff his way
through the scam since he isn't the right or real person intended for this
crime.
The film is so full of plot holes, you could drive a transport truck through
its openings and believe me, they try this also!  At one point Rudy tries to
explain that he isn't the right man and a hand written letter is produced by
Gabriel so to establish if this is really the right guy, why didn't they
just take a sample of Rudy's hand writing to see if it's the same guy.  Rudy
also has several chances to contact the police but we see that admitting to
the police that he is being held by criminals would be a violation of his
parole, therefore landing him back in the slammer.  Even if this is beyond
his control?  Several confrontations between the characters are also
laughable and the film is full of smug humour and novice plot twists that
don't seem exciting, plausible or even remotely entertaining and something
is also wrong when the leading man can't get any support from the audience.
Director John Frankenheimer ('The Manchurian Candidate', 'Birdman of
Alcatraz' 'Grand Prix', 'Black Sunday' and more recently 'Ronin', directs
this film with his usual look of perplexity.  The trouble is, that while
crafting his vision for this film, he overlooked the flaws in the screenplay
by Ehren Kruger who wrote 1999's 'Arlington Road', a crackling thriller
about
terrorism and 'Reindeer Games' doesn't even look like it's written by the
same guy.  Perhaps the desire to be completely different threw Kruger off
course and he faltered badly with this film.  Several other mishaps that
make the film somewhat aloof involve Rudy trying to make an escape from the
casino and getting caught in the wilderness.  We see that he has a knack for
hot wiring cars.  There are plenty around in this scene.  Why not just
hi-jack one and make a run for it.  Oh, the irony of it.  Geeeeeesh!
Characters played by Dennis Farina, James Frain, Donal Logue, Danny Trejo,
Clarence Williams III, and Issac Hayes are given no real focus and some of
them have major time on screen and this is only an added and unwanted
annoyance.  John Frankenheimer has tried his hand at hack second rate
pictures before such as '52 Pick-Up', 'The Holcroft Covenant' and 'Year of
the Gun' and had little or no success with them.  He is a director capable
of so much more but falls into the rut of making movies like 'Reindeer
Games' and for a man whose been in the business for 50 years, you'd think
he'd know better.  It isn't evident here.  Perhaps a better name for this
film would have been 'Silly Games'.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
'Lethal Weapon 4' is the film Mel Gibson said he would never do.  Never
say never.  With a pay cheque of 20 million dollars and a guarantee of
20 per cent of the film's earnings, "never" is a word the isn't found in
Mel's vocabulary.  This is a film made for one reason and one reason
only:  pure profit!  That is always the case with sequels but in the
case of Warner Brothers, it is particularly a show of desperation since
they have had a number of flops recently and need a hit badly.  I don't
have a problem with movie sequels because in many ways, they're
equivalent to visiting an old friend as you come back for more and more
fun each time.
'Lethal Weapon 4' isn't a terrible movie, it's just one too many and the
franchise is starting to show one thing: AGE!  Mel Gibson, Danny Glover,
Joe Pesci and Rene Russo are all starting to show signs of aging.  Not
too badly but in comparison to the other films: a lot.
As 'Lethal Weapon 4' opens, the streets of L.A. are once again
endangered, this time by a psychotic, protected with body armor who
fires automatic rounds and shots from a flame-thrower in any direction
he pleases.  Riggs and Murtaugh (Gibson and Glover) eventually put a
stop to his antics with humourous results and the film move forward from
there.
The central plot of 'Lethal Weapon 4' is an immigrant smuggling ring run
by an old Asian warlord whose right hand man (Jet Li) is a cool and
frightening martial arts expert who silences his enemies by putting his
moves on them.
Some of the immigrants brought to America are to work as slaves and
Murtaugh takes a family under his wing and has them live at home with
his wife and children as a way of understanding how slavery affected his
ancestors.  All the while illegal but definitely the humane thing to do.
Riggs and his girlfriend Lorna (Rene Russo) are expecting a baby any day
now, as is Murtaugh's daughter who is married to a cop (Chris Rock), a
man who works with Riggs and Murtaugh and a man Murtaugh doesn't know is
married to his daughter because she was afraid to tell him since he was
always against her marrying a cop.  Murtaugh later finds out about his
new son-in-law while getting high on some dentist's laughing gas and the
humour is what has always saved these movies from falling into the
abyss.
This movie certainly stays within the tradition of slick action movies
with the key emphasis being on the word "slick".  The slickest and best
installment of all the 'Lethal Weapon' movies is #2 which had the most
bruising story and climax of all.  It also introduced us to Joe Pesci as
Leo Getz who became the comic relief of the series and although his
character was badly used in #3, he is better this time around.
Director Richard Donner keeps the movie alive with well photographed and
edited scenes of action and ranks as one of the action genre's most
talented contributors.  I'll probably put 'Lethal Weapon 4' in my video
collection for the sake of uniting it with other members of its family
but I'll probably watch it the least as it is the least of all the
'Lethal Weapon' movies, without hesitation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Fresh off of his Oscar winning performance as Best Supporting Actor in
1997's 'Good Will Hunting', Robin Williams is to be commended for his
efforts in continuing to find good dramatic roles.  In fact, teaming up
with 1996's Oscar winner for Best Supporting Actor in 'Jerry Maguire',
Cuba Gooding Jr., the two of them make an interesting pair on screen, if
only they weren't in such a hauntingly unpleasant film as 'What Dreams
May Come'.  Don't get me wrong.  Unpleasant films can make for good
entertainment if mixed with some elements of film making redemption
contained within the story but this film has about 90% of its running
time locked in the ultimate nightmare about the balance between Heaven
and Hell and then it pays off mildly at the end but I'm ruining nothing
because I won't tell you exactly how except to say otherwise that the
film suffers from over length and has a visual style that is comparable
to a tour of droll and unattractive art.  The acting in this film is,
however, simply superb from all involved.
Williams plays a doctor with two children and a wife (Annabella
Sciorra).  The couple are more than husband and wife as we discover in
the film, they are actually soul mates.  The children die in a dreaded
traffic accident and few years later, after stepping out of his vehicle
to help victims of another traffic accident, Williams is killed by an
oncoming vehicle.  He goes directly to Heaven where he is greeted by
Gooding who is the angel of explanation and a comfort in welcoming
Williams to his new and presumably eternal home.  But there's one
problem.  After being in Heaven for a while, Williams discovers that his
wife committed suicide and went to Hell.  Refusing to accept her fate,
Williams learns that he can go to the farthest depths of the black abyss
to bring her back.
Max Von Sydow plays The Tracker, a figure who takes Williams on his tour
of Hell in search of his wife.  Seeing Von Sydow in this film brings up
memories of 'The Exorcist' as this is another look at the elements of
Hell, striking terror into the hearts of people bound for that terrible
place.
Director Vincent Ward has made a film that is too offbeat to be seen
again and again by mainstream audiences.  Once is more than enough for
this film and the biggest problem the film encounters is that the
screenplay by Ron Bass based on the novel by Richard Matheson, tries too
hard to explain its message of the next world and eventually it over
emphasizes the bearings that make you eligible for your eternal destiny,
no matter what it is.  Vincent Ward's vision of both Heaven and Hell are
convincing but the film's explanation of what makes a person bound for
one place or the other is also confusing and it tries to cover all the
bases in what people have discussed in written theology over the years
or discussed with each other on talk shows, religious programs or even
around the water cooler at work about just WHAT EXACTLY Heaven and Hell
are.
The most exhilarating look at the after life and its qualities designed
to make you feel good are 1978's 'Heaven Can Wait', 'Always' (1989) and
'Ghost' (1990).  These films are a pleasure to watch over and over again
with a richly textured message that makes you feel positive about the
after life, if there is one.  Their entertainment value is simple and
these three films, unlike 'What Dreams May Come', have almost no
religious over tones to think about.
Visit the new home of FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
Orphans.  How they are often forgotten.  Having known a couple growing up, I
won't pretend to know what it feels like to be one, but some of their
stories are unforgettable.  'The Cider House Rules' takes a look at the
orphan's way of life, from a positive and very sensitive point of view and
stretches its story to include the adventures of one who is now a man,
setting off to experience the world for himself.  Tobey Maguire
('Pleasantville'), is Homer Wells, a young man working at an orphanage (and
abortion clinic) in Maine during World War II and is loved by all who live
and work there.  Homer is a right hand man to Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael
Caine...playing with an American accent in his finest work in years which
will bring him an Oscar nomination).  Dr. Larch sees Homer as the one who
will carry on his work at the orphanage when he leaves.  Community
bureaucrats want Larch relieved of his position.  Some critics are making
this film a political issue by saying that it is really about abortion at
its deepest roots but this argument doesn't wash.  Abortions are only a part
of the story to wash away the false notion that they didn't occur 50 or 60
years ago.  It's like a gangster film.  The main plot is about crime.  You
don't look at a gangster film as being a study of guns!
Dr. Larch comforts the boys each night as they get tucked in and as he turns
off the light and closes the door to the room, he says: "Good night, you
princes of Maine, you kings of New England!"  Homer desires to leave the
orphanage and see the world for himself.  He is tempted by Candy Kendall
(Charlize Theron) and her boyfriend Walter (Paul Rudd).  They arrive one day
at the orphanage clinic to have an abortion and Homer decides to go off with
them and experience the free side of life.  Homer says that he's never seen
the ocean and gets a chance to look at it.  He also takes up a job picking
apples at Walter's family owned farm and befriends Mr. Rose (Delroy Lindo)
and his daughter Rose Rose (Erykah Badu).  After going off to fight in the
war, Walter leaves Candy behind and she and Homer have an affair.
Meanwhile, the story shifts back and fourth at times to the adventures of
Homer's strengthening as a man and the events taking place at the orphanage.
One of the things most unexpected but welcomed as a piece of exceptional
drama, are the scenes which take place at the farm where Homer works.  There
is a story of disenchantment involving incest, violence and disagreement
about the way of life there.  The film is ideal at examining the reality
that people from "the greatest generation" were the same as people today in
terms of personal behaviour, and in the film industry recently, we have had
a number of examples that show that times change but people don't.
The film is directed by Lasse Hallstrom, the Swedish director responsible
for such films as 'My Life as a Dog', 'Once Around' and 'What's Eating
Gilbert Grape?', a movie with a curious tie-in to this film about a young
man coming of age and seeing the world in more realistic terms than he's
been used to.  The film is also written by John Irving, based on his novel
and his screenplay is without pretentious qualities, sentimentality or
cliches.
As for the cast, there are many things you can say.  I look back to 1987's
'The Untouchables' and my father and I still have a debate over the way
Kevin Costner played Elliot Ness.  My father called it a "wet wash cloth
performance" while I was impressed by it.  The whole point of the film was
to draw wisdom from a more experienced character, that of Jimmy Malone (Sean
Connery).  That's the way I saw 'The Cider House Rules' play out.  Tobey
Maguire's character of Homer is rather toned done but Maguire draws his
experience in life from those more experienced and becomes a better man for
it, especially when he finds out at the end what Dr. Larch does for him.
Charlize Theron, Delroy Lindo, along with Jane Alexander and Kathy Baker who
plays nurses at the clinic are characters who aren't really given a deep
sense of focus as much as they should be but their contributions to the film
and still significant.  Michael Caine is the real treat of this film, giving
his best performance since his Oscar win in 1986 for best supporting actor
in 'Hannah and Her Sisters'.  Caine won rave reviews in 1998 as a third
string English talent agent in 'Little Voice' and while winning a Golden
Globe for it, he was snubbed by the Oscars and didn't even get nominated for
the role.  'The Cider House Rules' may bring Caine another Oscar win as he
was sort of the surprise winner in 1986 and Caine's clever talent as an
actor is matched by his willingness to diversify himself and he is one of
the best at it.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for End of the Affair, The (1999)
Film maker Neil Jordan made one of the most controversial movies of the
1990's.  1992's 'The Crying Game' had a secret revealed by the now late
great former movie critic Gene Siskel and Siskel was heavily criticized for
revealing it.  He said that to make his point he felt it was necessary to
give away the secret that was shocking (and in some cases offensive) to many
people.  Jordan ended up winning an Oscar for the film's original screenplay
and stunningly original it was, filled with observations about the IRA, its
volunteers and the rash political and sexual overtones of the film's
characters.  Jordan seemed surprised by winning an Oscar and had to rush up
on stage after a quick trip back from the men's room.
Seven years later, Neil Jordan's 'The End of the Affair' feels like you
bought an old house, cleaned it out and in the process, found and read the
callous diary of an adulteress and you picture it with all of its soap opera
type qualities from stories you've read about and seen a thousand times.
This isn't such a bad thing but the movie's reasoning that it is great film
making is a legend in its own mind.  Actor Ralph Fiennes was said to be very
upset with the adult rating the film received but that rating is justified
as this movie displays acts of sex, violence and repressed feelings taken
during and after World War II.
The story of 'The End of the Affair' is based on an early 1950's novel by
Graham Greene, allegedly about his own experiences during WW II.  Stephen
Rea is a government member named Henry Miles and is married to Sarah
(Julianne Moore).  Writer Maurice Bendix (Ralph Fiennes) is her lover.  The
Catholic faith is used as a metaphor for the story's hidden range of ideas
and any film that combines a dash of religion and heavy doses of adultery
during the backdrop of history's darkest time certainly deserves a look.
It's just unfortunate that this film tries to use repetition to make a point
but makes it in a rather tiresome fashion.
The movie has a point of view from its main characters that is told
separately by each one and the perilous, if perhaps co-incidental fate that
comes to one of them, is rather pretentious and smells like a theme from the
golden age of cinema, unsuitable for many of today's movie buffs, but
fitting for others at the same time.
'The End of the Affair' may be too melodramatic for some.  It was for me.
It had me restlessly shifting in my seat at about half way through but I
found it very authentic looking.  There are three key scenes that glow with
authenticity.  The beginning where two of the male leads meet on a dark and
rainy English night is ripe with authenticity.  The indoor scene at the
Miles' residence is lavishly decorated with authentic props for its era.
There is also a diner scene where director of photography Roger Pratt takes
cues from Neil Jordan and moves his camera to play out the reeling emotions
the two lovers have in wrestling with their conscience.
What is disappointing about the film is the performance of Ralph Fiennes.
His turns in 1993's 'Schindler's List' which brought him instant fame and
stature in motion pictures and a well deserved Oscar nomination, along with
his dry and coldly laced Oscar nominated performance in 'The English
Patient' seem so memorable compared to his performance here.  I don't want
to be too hard on him because he is one of the best in the business but he
just seems to be saying his lines with all the feelings of a daytime soap
opera actor.  The same can be said for Julianne Moore.  Her performance is
better but is still one character we've seen played over and over again with
many of the similar qualities of past adulteresses.
Neil Jordan's direction is inventive at times, stiff at times and too heavy
handed in many places for me to recommend it but  there is an old saying
that goes: "The only thing new is the history you don't know".  'The End of
the Affair' isn't a new theme, it's a film with a historical past seen too
often in motion pictures and is wearing thin at the start of a new century.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Turbulence (1997)
A lot of films play in limited release late every year to qualify for Oscar
consideration and then go to wide release early in the new year.
'Turbulence' is not of those movies.  It's an early year filler that studios
have to get out of their system after the Christmas and New year holiday
seasons have passed and this is one of the worst times of the year to see a
new movie and this will go down as one of 1997's most badly made films.  A
serial killer, (Ray Liotta) and another federal prisoner are transferred on a
commercial airliner from Kennedy airport in New York City to Los Angeles on
Christmas Eve.  The bad guys naturally get loose and sanity goes out the
window as crime and mayhem break out aboard the plane.  The flight crew is
killed and the automatic pilot is activated and the long and short of it is
that Liotta and a flight attendant (Lauren Holly) are left at odds with one
another.  To put it directly, this movie is a combination of just about every
air disaster movie ever made but to make matters worse, the psychotic nature
of Liotta's character has him spinning off ridiculous and unoriginal dialogue
for cheap laughs and his character echoes that of one from almost any horror
movie you can imagine.  The movie has a dark and sadistic look from a grade B
horror film to boot and its production design, special effects and camera
work are on the amateur level at best.  The failing of Ray Liotta's career in
recent years is one of Hollywood's most puzzling mysteries.  He had such
marvelous promise in 'Something Wild' (1986), 'Field of Dreams' (1989) and of
course his most impressive film 'GoodFellas' (1990).  His last admirable
piece of cinema was 'Unlawful Entry' (1992) in which he played the
personification of evil as a corrupt police officer obsessed with another
man's wife.  I hope Liotta can resurrect his career as 'Corrina, Corrina'
(1994), 'Jade' (1996) and now 'Turbulence' have all been major
disappointments.  As for Lauren Holly (Mrs. Jim Carrey), her biggest claim to
fame was as Andrew Dice Clay's executive assistant in 'The Adventures of Ford
Fairlane' (1990) and as the wealthy socialite in 'Dumb and Dumber' (1994).
'Turbulence' is a movie that deserves to take a dive, literally, at the box
office and it's a film to be avoided at all costs as viewing it can be
hazardous to your mental health.

Title
Review for Metro (1997)
After coming off the tremendous success of 1996's 'The Nutty Professor',
Eddie Murphy has settled in with a slam bang action picture which is the most
vibrant and alive picture of his career.  A lot of Murphy's film endeavors
have been off beat successes starting with his film debut '48 hrs.' (1982)
and continuing into the nineties with his unconventional political statement
'The Distinguished Gentleman' (1992).  San Francisco is the setting for
'Metro' and Murphy plays a hostage negotiator who takes a young recruit under
his wing and trains him to take his place in the future.  That is only one in
a series of sub plots that lace this richly inventive and colourful
adventure.  There's the tracking of a psychotic jewel thief and Murphy's
relationship with that special lady in his life and the investigation into
the murder of his beloved superior officer.  One scene involving a runaway
streetcar in downtown San Francisco is worth the price of admission alone.
 There's a keen sense of maturity to Murphy's character in this picture as he
plays a complete opposite to his character of Axel Foley from 'Beverly Hills
Cop' (1984) and 'Beverly Hills Cop' (1987).  'Metro' finds itself almost
humourless and it works superbly as Murphy knows just the right place to ad
lib a few light moments.  The first half is more entertaining and thriving
with gusto than the second half but there is an explosive conclusion and a
continuing perception of crime which continues to plague American society as
we come closer to entering the third millennium.  Other members of the cast
include Michael Rapaport and Michael Wincott and writer Randy Feldman has
invented some clever and tense confrontations enhanced by the equally tense
direction of Thomas Carter.  Murphy continues to grow in the nineties after
some disappointments and downright bombs in the late eighties and early
nineties and he has the potential of finishing off this decade with critical
successes rather than box office hits which exploited him early in his
career.

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
As it moves from one scene to the next, 'The Rainmaker' contains no real
surprises.  What it does have is marvelous acting by the entire cast, some
of whom are underwritten and others that we don't see enough.  Directed by
Francis Ford Coppola and written by Coppola himself based on John Grisham's
book it reminded me of those films Coppola made from 1981 to 1990 that were
very low key but mildly effective and primarily well acted. Among them, 'The
Outsiders', 'Rumble Fish', 'Peggy Sue Got Married' and 'Gardens of 
Stone' spring to mind first.  They were made when Coppola dropped 'Ford'
from his full name and went by the credit Francis Coppola.  Only 'The
Godfather Part III' and Bram Stoker's 'Dracula' have stood out in the 1990's
for Coppola. 
Set in Memphis, Tennessee, 'The Rainmaker' is about a low-income family who
sue a gigantic insurance company for fraud and later wrongful death when
their son develops leukemia and can't get a bone marrow transplant because
the family's insurance claim for funding it is denied.  The attorney
representing them is a young and inexperienced newcomer to the legal
profession (Matt Damon) who is trying his first case.  His assistant is a
man who knows the law pretty well but strangely enough has failed the bar
exam exam six times (Danny DeVito). 
The lawyer representing the insurance company is a cold and calculating
smoothy acted in high capacity by Jon Voight who shines as the best villain
in a courtroom since James Mason in 1982's 'The Verdict'.  The courtroom
scenes are realistic and convincing as the usual legal motions are accepted
and declined and the twists in momentum from side to side make it hard to
figure out how things will be resolved. 
The ending is not as clear cut as you might predict and the only thing that
took 
away from the film's major enjoyment is a sub plot involving Damon's
relationship with a young woman (Claire Danes) who is caught in an abusive
relationship with a husband who almost kills her.  I felt this served as a
serious distraction from the film's overall impact involving the trial.
Another handicap for the film is the under played and under written part
DeVito plays in this movie.  He is a reasonably good actor if the right part
is there and he is not used to his full potential here.  Although it is
never moving but a film that deserves to be respected, 'The Rainmaker' is no
classic but does have a good performance from its lead in Matt Damon and
Coppola proves again that his demand for first rate casting will not be
compromised. 
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
A number of people who read my reviews have recently contacted me and
asked why I changed my rating system in my recent reviews of 'Firestorm'
and 'The Boxer' from five stars to four.  They mentioned to me that they
preferred the five star system and suggested that I return to it.  I
guess if something isn't broken, it shouldn't be fixed, as the old
saying goes, so, I will return to the five star rating system I am
humbly known for.  An now, on with the review.....
A division of society's classes has always offered the opportunity for
great film making.
'The Wings of the Dove' is based on the novel by Henry James and is
adapted for the screen by Hossein Amini and is set in the Victorian era,
1910 to be exact, and tells a very subtle story of poverty's desperation
striving for notoriety and a better way of living.  The book is actually
set closer to the turn of the century but is moved forward a few years
to 1910, perhaps as an attempt to show the more slowly eroding
traditions of the 19th century in terms of honour and tradition to the
very different social trends the 20th century would bring.
Two British lovers, Kate and Merton (Helena Bonham Carter and Linus
Roache) star in this rather cold yet meaningful study of morality and
conscience.  Kate's mother is deceased and her father is a hopeless
alcoholic living in the excesses of poverty.  Through the course of
their relationship in the film, they meet a young American girl named
Millie (Alison Elliott) whom they discover is dying from a disease that
is undisclosed to the audience.  They find that she is quite wealthy.
She meets Merton and later asks Kate what kind of man he is since she is
aware they know each other but never counting on the plot that is
devised against her by the two of them.  Kate and Merton plot for him to
marry Millie, suspecting and almost certainly counting on the fact that
she will leave her money to him upon her death and Kate and Merton can
finally be together enjoying a better way of life.  As the film moves
on, all the characters eventually know more or less what is happening.
The picture is nurtured and given a very gentle tone courtesy of
director Iain Softley who allocates a great amount of detail to the
overall quality and outcome of the film.  Helena Bonham Carter has won
virtually every major critic's award for this film and she has a good
shot at the Academy Award.
The Victorian era is paid tribute to in a very flattering manner as
everything from the costumes to the set design and the moody photography
is given great attention.
'The Wings of the Dove' runs a surprisingly short 108 minutes but
because it is such a laid back film with ongoing dialogue that is never
boring and is the type of story that is always interesting to watch, it
may have done its service as a short but satisfying offering to the
medium of film..
Visit 'FILM FOLLOW-UP' by Walter Frith at:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Hoodlum (1997)
Like any realistic gangster film, 'Hoodlum' contains plenty of gunfire,
explosions, confrontations and dirty business deals.  Unlike any gangster
film I've ever seen, 'Hoodlum' is disappointingly scattershot.  That isn't to
say its a bad film, it just lacks focus.
Set in New York City during the hey day of the gangster era at the early part
of the twentieth century, its main character, Ellsworth 'Bumpy' Johnson
(Laurence Fishburne) is an ex-con who makes a name for himself when gangsters
such as Dutch Schultz (Tim Roth) and Lucky Luciano (Andy Garcia) try and
disrupt and strong-arm their way by invading a peaceful numbers running
operation run by Madame Queen (Cicely Tyson).  The film reportedly tells us
at the beginning that this so-called peaceful numbers running operation was
undisturbed for a decade until invaded by the forces of Schultz and Luciano
but anyone with common sense knows that illegal solicitation involving
currency always brings trouble.  
Fishburne finds love in a no-nonsense, charity driven and kind hearted woman
(Vanessa Williams) but loses her not by death but by the life he chooses.
While authentic looking, 'Hoodlum' is sort of a cross between Francis Ford
Coppola's 'The Cotton Club' (1984) and the Coen brothers' 'Miller Crossing'
(1990).  Like 'The Cotton Club', it spells out the true psychotic nature of
Dutch Schultz played in that film by James Remar and has scenes involving the
club itself and like the relationship sub plot between Richard Gere and Diane
Lane in 'The Cotton Club', this one has the relationship between Fishburne
and Williams.  Like 'Miller's Crossing', it underlines the loyalty and
rivalry relevant to a good crime story.
'Hoodlum' tries to build too much too quickly and rather than focusing on a
couple of main characters and making them interesting, it underplays the
characters of Luciano, Madame Queen and the film's love interest and chooses
to make the bitter war between 'Bumpy' Johnson and Dutch Schultz its main
priority.  
Director Bill Duke has shown us how gangsters operate rather than telling us
anything about who they are.  It has an appealing quality to it but
unfortunately you don't really feel compelled to give any thought to the
characters who die and the ones who live and as it plays out its hand it
comes up with little instead of delivering a full house.

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
The after school specials that ABC television has produced in the past
are a good stepping stone for producing 'The Mighty'.  ABC has nothing
to do with this film but the makers of this one certainly look like they
watched a lot of them.  An intelligent, if somewhat overly sentimental
film, 'The Mighty' has some good performances from two young actors who
steal the show away from their adult colleagues but some of the writing
is a cross between corn ball and a lot of the dialogue and situations
are flippant.
Set in Cincinnati, Ohio, 'The Mighty' is the story of two boys and their
dysfunctional lives and how they become the best of friends.  Elden
Henson is an over sized seventh grader who refers to himself as Godzilla
and draws stares from the other children at school because of his size
and his homely features.  He is taunted by a gang of punks at school who
tease and harass him about his past and his father's imprisonment.
Henson's father (James Gandolfini) killed his mother in a domestic
dispute and is now serving time.  Henson lives with his maternal
grandparents (Gena Rowlands and Harry Dean Stanton) who care deeply for
the boy.
Henson gets a tutor at school (Kieran Culkin), a boy who is highly
intelligent at his level in life but he suffers from a disease that eats
away at his body slowly and he is supported by arm braces when walking.
The two meet awkwardly when Henson is blamed for an act of cruelty
against Culkin in the school gymnasium and has to serve detention for
it.  Later, the two of them become close friends and Henson serves as
Culkin's protector and is brought out of his shy shell after being
inspired from the stories of brave knights brought on by the fact that
Culkin also likes to draw references to medieval times and the sanctity
of knights when describing a situation or involving himself in it.
'The Mighty' is a good family film that has a good marketing strategy by
casting Sharon Stone as Culkin's mother.  The ordinary style the film
projects of everyday life in the surroundings of ordinary people are
quite admirable.  What I really thought was strange was how all the
adult characters in the film were under written.  I think it's a rather
cheap marketing trick to have popular stars like Sharon Stone and
Gillian Anderson in very under written roles.  Anderson plays a drunken
white trash individual living with her equally trashy boyfriend (Meat
Loaf).  Her character only appears in a couple of key scenes but
Anderson is an excellent actress capable of the most impressive
diversity.
Elden Henson and Kieran Culkin are terrific young actors but Henson
clearly steals the show as his character goes through a transformation
of soul searching and his life is clearly influenced for the better at
the teachings of a tutor who has much to teach him and makes his life
wholesome and determined to stay on the right track.  A lesson much of
today's youth needs badly.  Parents are encouraged to take their
children to see this film for a memorable experience that they will
remember fondly as they grow older
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Lenny (1974)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Searing black and white photography has always given a sense of authenticity
to motion pictures ever since colour was predominantly used from the mid
1960's on.  In the 90's we've had 'Schindler's List' (1993) which was filmed
with some colour and 'Ed Wood' (1994) which was filmed entirely in black and
white.  Bob Fosse's black and white masterpiece 'Lenny' is the story of acid
tongued comedian Lenny Bruce who died from a drug overdose in the mid 1960's
at the age of 39.  This 1974 film was made at the right time when Hollywood
was coming into a new age of artistic integrity. I think just about every
high school kid in the world was introduced to the classic novel 'The Catcher
in the Rye' by J.D. Salinger.  Speaking for myself it taught me that foul
language is an ugly and unappealing act in polite company but it has its
place at other times in life.  In motion pictures they often deal with real
life and the frustrations of characters locked in prison, mental
institutions, war and everyday conflict in general who REALLY do talk like
that.  Foul language is appropriate in film as long as its part of the story
and doesn't become too repetitive.  The most appropriate use of profanity in
my judgment was in 1975's 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest' and was used most
inappropriately in '48 Hours' (1982) and 'Scarface' (1983) in which the use
of bad language clearly went over the top.
Dustin Hoffman (who just turned 60 on August 8th) portrays Lenny Bruce who
played nightclubs, made record albums, some obscure films and got arrested
more than any other performer would today for his stand up comedy.  Bruce's
act was controversial at the time but his performances often revealed the
hypocrisy present in everyday society and since his death he has developed a
sense of cult status and the film about that part of his life is definitely
worth a look.  Hoffman is perfect in the part.  He looks comfortable in the
role and just as impressive is Valerie Perrine who plays his wife.  Bob
Fosse's direction is both insightful but somewhat cold which is perfect for a
film like this since Bruce's act wasn't exactly filled with warmth.
Hoffman and Perrine have a chemistry that is very natural on screen and the
film is told in flashback from the beginning of the picture as she talks
about him after his death.  Julian Barry's screenplay contains scathing
social commentary which will not be entertaining to some but should prove
very stimulating to others.   

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Suppose you are about to tie the knot.  You are forced to travel on
the road after your plane ride goes awry on the way to your wedding
destination, a number of strangers you pass like a ship in the night
strike up a friendly and time consuming conversation with you where you
hear alleged horror stories about the padlock known as marriage where
conservative belief is that in most cases it's all supposed to work out
and things will remain rosy but the truth is that people, as different
as they all are, sometimes have a hard time staying with the same person
for their whole life.  That is the premise behind 'Forces of Nature'.
Ben Affleck stars as Ben Holmes, a New York City writer who is engaged
to a southern belle from Savannah, Georgia named Bridget (Maura
Tierney).  Her family is wealthy. Her father (Ronny Cox) is a straight
shooting conservative businessman and her mother (Blythe Danner) voted
twice for Clinton because as she puts it: "All the best presidents sleep
around".  Ben's mother and father are upper middle class and don't see
eye to eye with their southern in-laws.  As his coach flight is about to
take off, a freak accident occurs that prevents the plane from taking
off and Ben now has to find an alternative form of transportation.  He
travels with a woman who believes he saved her life named Sarah (Sandra
Bullock), a free spirited woman who won't be held down by anything and
travels in whatever direction the wind is blowing.  They experience all
the bad luck you can imagine such as the kind of fun (for the audience
only) that Steve Martin and John Candy experienced in 1987's 'Planes,
Trains & Automobiles'.
The film's entertainment value trickles down slowly like a pleasant
light rain.  It's constant and very relieving and even manages to remain
very witty along the way.  If you're going to tell a story about two
people who learn something about each other and apply it separately to
their own lives, it's a good idea to balance the amount of time each has
on screen and this is done perfectly.  And what really makes the film
work is that neither Ben Affleck or Sandra Bullock try to upstage one
another.  Their personalities enhance the film extremely well and they
have the perfect on screen chemistry needed to make any relationship
picture work.
Director Bronwen Hughes ('Harriet the Spy'), gives his film a good pace
but about half way through, it slows down considerably --- more than it
should actually, but picks itself up for a satisfying conclusion.
'Forces of Nature' works for another good reason.  The script by Marc
Lawrence, Ian Bryce, and Donna Roth has a tendency to look for acute
social observations on marriage, divorce, parenthood and relationships
without making it look obvious.  The film's dialogue flows so naturally
that personality is the movie's strongest trait.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Blood and Wine (1997)
'Blood and Wine' has all the makings of classic 'film noir'.  It has two
legendary leading actors, a fortune, a beautiful woman and complications
arising from a robbery gone wrong.  Add that against the steamy backdrop of
beautiful Miami, photographed at times with obtusely graphic violence,
gorgeous sunsets and darkly inventive human conflict and you couldn't ask for
anything more.  
Jack Nicholson stars as a wine proprietor servicing a large sector of wealthy
Miami and its suburbs.  His wife (Judy Davis) is a character most ordinary;
lacking the strength of will but soon finds what she needs to survive.  Her
son and Nicholson's stepson (Stephen Dorff) earns his living as a fisherman
striving for more in life.  Nicholson becomes embroiled in mistrust and
suspicion with a crafty and sleazy jewel thief (Michael Caine) after the two
of them steal a million dollar necklace from the home of one of Nicholson's
clients.  They are aided in their crime by the beautiful Jennifer Lopez who
plays the nanny of the wealthy couple's child.  A heated argument which turns
violent one evening between two of the film's character's (I'm not saying
which ones) leads to a loss of the valuable necklace and vile determination
to reclaim it involving all the film's main characters.
Director Bob Rafelson ('Five Easy Pieces', 'The King of Marvin Gardens', '
The Postman Always Rings Twice', 'Man Trouble'), all of which star Nicholson,
has made a stark, gritty and hardboiled film mixing elements of suspense,
violence and sex all in good taste with unpredictable results. It's a film
embodied with style striving for originality and while it doesn't quite find
it at times and doesn't always hit the mark, it still has the
characrteristics of emotional drama and the ingredients to sustain a perfect
running time of 97 minutes.  It's not an ambitious film, just an odyssey of
clever film making and it knows its limits.  It's not too long and not too
short.  It's just perfect.
Nicholson and Caine are perfectly casted as two criminal adversaries out to
get rich quick and despite the cliche that 'crime doesn't pay', the movie
strives to enforce the unwritten rule that there is no honour among thieves.
 Stephen Dorff is effectively on target as the man caught in the middle and
plays his role with poetic ease with moments of heightened tension and this
could be a very important breakthrough film for him in his young career.
Dorff was most impressive as the little known real life character Stu
Sutcliffe who almost made it as a member of The Beatles in 1994's 'Backbeat'.
 He is one of Hollywood's rising stars.  Watch for him.  Davis gives a good
performance as Nicholson's wife, a woman with integrity and Jennifer Lopez is
interesting to watch as the 'other woman'.  She will soon be seen in a
biography of Mexican singing sensation Selena.  It's the story of the rising
rock star gunned down by her fan club manager.  
'Blood and Wine' is not playing in wide release but if you are lucky enough
to be living in a location featuring it, check it out.  It's a must see for
fans of Jack Nicholson and fans of 'film noir'.

Title
Review for Player, The (1992)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
I saw 'The Player' when it was first released in 1992 and I viewed it at
a 2nd run art house (that's a term used to describe a movie theatre that
shows films that don't make a lot of money), and I didn't hear one
chuckle from the audience in a building that was more than half full for
its first evening performance so it's puzzling to me how the film can be
called a "black comedy" by numerous other critics that have reviewed
it.  Black comedies are usually highly uneven because the comedy is so
sharp and penetrating that it has to let up at some point to prepare you
for the next strike by pounding your funny bone with a hammer.  When I
think of the term "black comedy" and ironically it's another film that
examines the movie industry, Blake Edwards' 1981 film 'S.O.B.' comes to
mind.  That film threw in everything but the kitchen sink in its
slapstick presentation of Hollywood politics and manipulating, and
Edwards put his own trademark silliness found in many of his 'Pink
Panther' films into the film's key moments.
Director Robert Altman's films are like documentaries in many cases but
they always retain the academic flare that rank right up there with the
most studio oriented films that are produced.  Altman is perhaps best at
developing the themes of his pictures in a very even fashion and the
climax of all his films aren't executed to detract from the enjoyment of
any other part of the film.
'The Player' is the type of non-Hollywood movie that almost every
celebrity wanted to be in.  It features literally dozens and dozens of
cameos by big stars that I'm sure had their share of nasty studio
politics and decided to slap the movie industry in the face by appearing
in this big winner of a movie.  The film's cynicism is so well hidden by
its main plot that it comes off not only as a smart film but one that
plays its main characters better and in a more realistic fashion than
almost any other film made in the 1990's, so far.
Having worked for many years at the corporate end of the entertainment
industry, I can tell you without hesitation that the type of wheeling
and dealing, back stabbing, decadent behaviour and day to day operations
in the movie industry are complete and on target throughout the entire
film and hit a truthful note in every frame.
In 'The Player', we are shown one of the most ingenious opening scenes
ever filmed as a long tracking shot (about 8 minutes) pans across the
lot of a movie studio as various characters interact.  Tim Robbins stars
as a movie studio boss who is receiving threatening post cards in his
office that contain death threats and he is determined to find out who
is sending them.  He tracks down who he believes is the culprit stalking
him with the threats and he may or may not be correct in his assumption.
Without telling you who does what to who (you can discover that when you
see the film), the film contains an old fashioned murder plot that fits
into the context of the movie's suspense and complex character study and
its story doesn't sell itself out at the end but rather has an ending
that you may not like on the surface but deeper thought will convince
you it's the right one.
'The Player' received three Oscar nominations (Best Director for Altman,
Best Screenplay for Michael Tolkin based on his own novel and Best Film
Editing).  Understandably, it didn't get a nomination for Best Picture
in a year that featured 'The Crying Game', 'A Few Good Men', 'Howard's
End', 'Scent of a Woman', and the winner, 'Unforgiven' as the selected
finalists.  There was no way the Hollywood crowd was going to nominate a
film mocking their industry and perhaps  become the representative (if
it won) of an award that is suppose to sugar coat the film industry, not
show its darker side.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
The last time Mel Gibson played anything resembling the heavy in
'Payback' was in 1988's 'Tequila Sunrise'.  That was a soft core
examination of a drug dealer and his relationship with a childhood
friend who became a cop and the film also involved what usually comes
between men to make them enemies---money and a woman.  That film was
easy to resist because its entire running time was equivalent to
watching a slow motion action picture but its characterizations made up
for its flaws.  Perhaps one of the reasons that 'Tequila Sunrise' was a
disappointment was because it was directed by a well known writer,
Robert Towne, perhaps one of the greatest screenwriters of the modern
era.  Towne won an Oscar for perhaps one of the cinema's most complex
screenplays of the modern era---'Chinatown' in 1974.  Towne also does a
lot of uncredited "touch up" work on screenplays that aren't quite right
for other people before and after they go into production.  As a rule,
writers don't translate well into good directors.
What had me nervous about 'Payback' was that it was directed by another
relatively well known screenwriter, at least among movie buffs, Brian
Helgeland.   Helgeland has to his credit another directing job from
1989's t.v. series 'Tales from the Crypt'.  He also co-produced and won
an Oscar for co-writing 1997's 'L.A. Confidential'.  His limited success
so far convinced the studio to let him try his hand at directing and I
was holding my breath.  I exhaled with delight as 'Payback' is one of
the best films released in the second month of the last year of the
twentieth century.  Perhaps an odd description for a film but I hope
1999 lets us leave the decade, the century and the millennium with some
dignity.  Hopefully more than 1998 did.
The characters in 'Payback' are the lowest forms of scum on the face of
the Earth but what's attractive about it is that although Gibson is one
of them, the others are ten times as bad so as the slogan for the film
goes, get ready to root for the bad guy.  Gibson is Porter and along
with a slimy accomplice named Resnick (Gregg Henry), they pull off a
robbery with the aid of Porter's wife (Deborah Kara Unger).  Porter is
double crossed by both of them and seeks to get revenge (and his share
of the money back).
This film does more for the strange art of revenge than most films of
its kind and it's refreshing to watch since revenge is something we've
all wanted at some point in our lives whether we want to admit it or
not.  What makes Porter stand out and more capable than his foes is the
fact that he is a former Marine with the tattoo "USMC" on his arm to
prove it.  There are three crime bosses to contend with (William Devane,
James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson), a weasel and wannabe big time
criminal (David Paymer) and a mob whose most attractive asset (in looks
only) is a hooker who likes to perform "crotch squash" on men who p***
her off.  Throw in another hooker, this time with a heart of gold, and
two crooked cops, and 'Payback' has all you could ask for in an
entertaining crime story that you feel embarrassed to laugh at but later
are glad that you did.
Perhaps something that I hope a lot of people will notice, is that
'Payback' is not set in the present day.  They don't tell you exactly
when but all of the phones are the old dial-up type, there are a lot of
big gas guzzling cars, a computer is not seen among the businessmen and
the wardrobe also gives it away to a certain extent.  My guess is it's
set in the early 80's.
'Payback' assaults the senses by making a vicious grab for the jugular.
It holds back nothing but portrays the cleverness of one criminal whose
sole purpose is not only to survive but to do it on a day to day basis.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
For browsers without java enhancement or if you experience problems with
the above link, go to:
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/mainpage.htm

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
There's an old episode of the sitcom 'Three's Company' in which Jack Tripper
makes a promise to himself that he will tell the truth no matter what the
consequences.  There is also a movie from 1977 entitled 'Freaky Friday' in
which a mother and daughter make a wish that they could be each other for a
day and it comes true as they switch personalities accordingly.
In 'Liar, Liar' slapstick funny face man Jim Carrey plays an unethical
attorney who is also a pathological fibber and is constantly letting down his
loved ones including his five year old son.  The boy makes a wish on his
fifth birthday that his dad will not lie for a day and it works and the
picture then moves into a phase of immature pratfalls and physical comedy
that Carrey is well known for and he often over does it.  Most of the laughs
I heard while attending a matinee of this movie came from children under the
age of ten and Carrey has fallen flat on his face again in the opinion of
this reviewer with his third critical misfire in a row after 'The Cable Guy'
(1996) and 'Ace Ventura - When Nature Calls' (1995).  Carrey's last mildly
entertaining role came in 1995 with 'Batman Forever' in which he played the
Riddler and while Carrey now enjoys laughing all the way to the bank at the
tune of twenty million dollars per film, he is no Robin Williams or Billy
Crystal.  These two men are performers of original and controlled comedy
(although Williams has sometimes overdone it) with far greater results as
they aim for genuine laughs instead of cheap ones.
There are a couple of good belly laughs in 'Liar, Liar' but that doesn't
constitute and entire film and Carrey's improvisational style of comedy in
which he often borrows from others makes him the director of the film at
heart instead of the man given credit (Tom Shadyac).  Shadyac is the man who
directed Carrey in 'Ace Ventura - Pet Detective' (1994) and I suspect Shadyac
is an easy director to control as Eddie Murphy pretty much had his way on
'The Nutty Professor' from last year which Shadyac also directed.  
If Jim Carrey can listen to a director and perhaps try his hand at drama then
his career would have much more credibility which would lead to acceptance
among those over the age of ten of what a fine comedian and actor he has the
potential of being.  Power trips can be fatal in an industry where you're
only as good as your last hit and while 'The Cable Guy' was a box office
disappointment, 'Liar, Liar' appears to have a chance but Carrey's act is
wearing mighty thin.

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
It's difficult to imagine a screenwriter like David Mamet not receiving the
respect he deserves from the Hollywood community.  In 1992 he presented two
screenplays which made one good and one great film.  'Hoffa', the good film
starring Jack Nicholson was an original screenplay written by Mamet based on
the real life Teamsters president and the great film was 'Glengarry Glen
Ross' based on Mamet's own Pulitzer Prize-winning play.  Mamet received no
Oscar nomination for either script.  In fact, I believe Mamet has only been
nominated once for adapting 1982's 'The Verdict' from Barry Reed's novel.
 Mamet also adapted 1987's 'The Untouchables' for the big screen.  Mamet
wrote and skillfully directed 1991's 'Homicide' which made many '10 best
lists' about a Chicago policeman coming to terms with his faith and his
duties of conscience.  Mamet is the finest writer in Hollywood along with
other greats like William Goldman, Woody Allen, Oliver Stone and the Coen
Brothers.  All of these people have won Oscars for their writing but not
Mamet.  To many the Academy Award is of no great importance but even though
some say it's no big deal, they're liars if they don't feel a certain sense
of pride in being recognized by their peers.
In 'The Edge', Anthony Hopkins and Alec Baldwin star as two men eventually
trapped in the Alaskan wilderness (the film was in fact shot in Alberta,
Canada) and they fight to survive the climate, hunger, the lack of shelter
and the occasional bear !  The story begins at a vacation getaway where we
learn that Hopkins is a billionaire married to a fashion model (Elle
Macpherson) and there are other assorted friends and business associates
tagging along including a fashion photographer, played by Baldwin who has an
eye for Hopkins' wife.  Baldwin suggests that he and Hopkins and another man
go on a short plane ride to visit a native American whom Baldwin feels will
be instrumental in photographing for his most recent layout.  Their plane
crashes and the pilot is killed and the third man along with Hopkins and
Baldwin is mauled by a bear leaving Hopins and Baldwin to fight for
themselves.  Before the plane crashes, Hopkins hints that Baldwin's agenda
for the trip is to kill him in order to claim his wife the fortune she will
possess.  
The interesting thing about this movie is that Hopkins plays his role of the
billionaire as a man who always desired to have something unlikely happen to
him so while he would like to be rescued eventually, the audience sees him
almost enjoying the challenge of being put to the test for his time in the
wilderness and his character never loses his cool and by recognizing the
potential of becoming a victim of his own panic and avoiding any sense of
shame that may do him in makes his character noble and beyond the stereotype
many have of the wealthy.  Baldwin's character is not nearly as interesting
but he pulls off his role with a passing grade.
David Mamet has addressed all the important formulas in screen writing such
as grabbing audience attention within the first ten minutes, having a plot
point turn setting up the important part of the story at about the half hour
point, keeping his writing alive and addressing the three basic points of
conflict, man vs. man., man vs. nature and man vs. himself.  With stimulating
direction from Lee Tamahori and sensational photography to boot, 'The Edge'
is a gripping morality tale which is absorbing, convincing and ends perfectly
in a very subtle fashion.

Title
Review for Out to Sea (1997)
     The talents of Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau are terrific.  They
probably have more comic chemistry between the two of them than any other
comedy team working today.  They are about four weeks into making a sequel to
1968's 'The Odd Couple' which is scheduled to be released next year to
celebrate the 30th anniversary of the first film.  'Grumpy Old Men' (1993)
and 'Grumpier Old Men' (1995) are hilarious parodies on finding love late in
life and both actors excelled in those movies as well as they did many years
ago in 'The Fortune Cookie' (1966) for which Matthau won the Oscar as Best
Supporting Actor.  Lemmon directed Matthau in a touching and poignant story
of elderly life in 'Kotch' (1971) for which Matthau was nominated for Best
Actor.
     'Out to Sea' has the two buddies playing brothers in law.  Lemmon was
married to Matthau's sister and she is now deceased and widower Lemmon
reluctantly goes on a cruise with Matthau and innocently searches for love
while Matthau's got (quote) "lonely rich broads" (unquote) on his mind.  Upon
arriving aboard the cruise ship, Matthau informs Lemmon that instead of
paying for the cruise, he signed them both up as dance hosts.  Lemmon is
outraged and tries to get off the ship before it sails to no avail.  
     This movie has all the fun of a jack in the box with jokes popping up
everywhere and the comedy is equally funny both verbally and physically as
Lemmon and Matthau avoid giving the film edge and cruise along smoothly
(almost effortlessly) in their comic genius much in the way they did in the
'Grumpy' movies but their characters are much different and much more
attractive.  Director Martha Coolidge does an excellent job of keeping the
timing intact in all the routines and the closing credits feature outstanding
and hilarious outakes which are only appropriate to show in comedy films.  To
dislike this film would be difficult because its simplicity and wholesome
appeal is equal to spending a quiet afternoon with your grandparents.  It's a
joy.
     Other cast members include Dyan Cannon, Brent Spiner, Gloria  DeHaven,
Elaine Stritch, Hal Linden and dancing legend Donald O'Connor.

Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
     Have you ever started watching a movie inside a theatre and about 15
minutes into the feature presentation you can't wait to leave?  That is
exactly the feeling created as 'George of the Jungle' unfolds.  Based on the
cartoon of the same name, 'George of the Jungle' is an absolutely abysmal
offering from Walt Disney Pictures and it looks as if Disney now believes
that movie audiences will buy into anything and I do mean ANYTHING.  The
first few minutes of the film features an exploration team deep in the
jungles of Africa whose leader (the cast mostly features nameless, tasteless
and untalented wannabe actors) is a rich snob and immediately sickens the
audience with his unlikable and obnoxious personality.  His bride to be has a
voice that could crack glass and torture the most vicious attack dogs all in
the same breath and she immediately becomes embroiled in a jungle
confrontation with a lion.  
     Enter George (Brendan Fraser).  He's a jungle hero raised by nature when
he was separated from his family in a plane crash when he was an infant.
 Naturally he saves her from peril and proceeds to use a few pro-wrestling
moves (clothesline, elbow drop and suplex) all in cartoon fashion which
exploits cruelty to animals in extremely poor taste.  We laugh about that
sort of thing in cartoons as politically incorrect as it may seem in today's
day and age but for some reason it doesn't work here in live action.
 George's companion is a gorillas named "Ape" voiced by John Cleese and
George is soon rewarded by the girl he saved as she takes him back to America
(San Francisco to be exact) and introduces her to her very wealthy family and
friends.  She is engaged to a man suited to her position and George returns
to his jungle for the film's climax.
     Brendan Fraser is such a talented young actor whose work in such films
as 'School Ties' and 'With Honors' was a treat and I don't understand the
reason he chose this jaw dropping project of extremely crude and unfunny
material.  I saw 'George of the Jungle' on opening day with a theatre filled
mostly with small children and their parents and the laughs were very few and
far between so there goes the theory of appealing to the kiddies and upon
looking around the theatre some parents were shaking their heads and putting
their hands in front of their face in embarrassment.  I saw it with my 69
year old father who kept falling asleep. 
     'George of the Jungle' is a live action film based on a cartoon that
features visuals and sound effects derived directly from cartoon antics and
it features people falling in excrement, animals expiring gas from the bottom
end in people's faces, wooden dialogue, quick scenes of lost logic, and
faceless performances with no creative turns from anybody behind the camera.
 If this film were edible, you would get food poisoning.  Definitely a
candidate for worst film of 1997 (that honor still belongs to John
Leguizamo's 'The Pest' until I digest this one further) and one of the worst
films of the 90's.

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
The teenaged no brainer duo of Beavis and Butthead are not for all tastes but
they're kind of like Wayne Campbell and Garth Algar a.k.a. 'Wayne's World' in
the fact that once you get to know them they grow on you and are definitely
an acquired taste.  I would describe 'Beavis and Butthead Do America' as one
of my guilty pleasures and I have no problem admitting this because I
actually admire in many ways the message that their creator Mike Judge is
sending out.  He has obviously fashioned these characters after the real life
situations many teenagers become involved in namely ignorance, sexual
curiosity and just being naive of the world around them.  Some clever visions
are realized by Judge who serves as this film's director and the sub text of
his movie is to be realized as an underlying message of recognition for young
people in these situations everyday throughout the world.  Judge of course
takes it one step further for the purposes of entertainment and makes the
plot of 'Beavis and Butthead Do America' one in which the comic duo become
involved with an estranged couple of involved in crime (voiced by Bruce
Willis and Demi Moore) who have murder and espionage on their minds.  B+B
quickly become the two most wanted men in America by federal law enforcement
agents and they float through the situation unknowingly all the while hoping
to finally lose their virginity.  It will be an outrageous and intolerable
film for many to accept especially those over the age of 25 but if you go
with what it's intended to be you will be entertained and its crude and
sometimes vile presentation is a sign of the times for the 1990's in the way
'The Simpsons' and 'Ren and Stimpy' are.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
In his youth and motion picture debut in 1982 with '48 HRS.', Eddie Murphy
was full of vigour and zest.  He never compromised with his overly brash
style of expressing four letter words.  As part of an adult movie story, it
worked.  His wise cracking and improvisation also helped many movie
screenplays when writers had trouble spicing up a scene.  Many criticized
Murphy for it and many other socially controversial things contained within
his comedy, and a lot of the criticism was justified.  But if you judge him
ONLY on his movie performances, he was great.  If any performer can
contribute between 5 and 10 great pictures to this world, they're lucky.
'48 HRS.', 'Trading Places', 'Beverly Hills Cop', 'Beverly Hills Cop II',
and 'Coming to America' are all great classic films in their own way for
their genre.
All of these things have gone the way of the dinosaur in the 90's.  The only
Murphy film I enjoy watching over and over again in this decade is 1992's
'The Distinguished Gentleman'.  It was a unique and refined comedy that
worked for Murphy that gracefully went with his aging into a new decade,
and his attempt to diversify was a good idea, especially after ending the
80's
with the disastrous 'Harlem Nights' in 1989 and entering the 90's with the
glib
'Another 48 HRS.', which no one asked for.  Since then, films like 'Vampire
in Brooklyn', 'Beverly Hills Cop III', 'The Nutty Professor' and 'Doctor
Dolittle' have all been tiresome, unoriginal, repetitive or shallow.  'Life'
changes none of this.  It's too bad that Murphy hasn't figured out yet that
to be a true and all around legend in the movie business, you have to
embrace film
audiences by appealing to different sides of their taste.  This has worked
for
Whoopi Goldberg, Robin Williams, Jim Carrey, and Dan Aykroyd, who have
all done serious roles and have won the respect of the critics as well as
audiences.  Murphy's career can best be compared to the great Laurel and
Hardy.  Not directly but only in the sense that their peak was in the 1930's
and
they totally crashed and burned in the 40's.  Ditto with Murphy when
comparing his 80's work with the 90's.
In 'Life', set at the beginning in 1932, Murphy, along with Martin Lawrence,
play two New Yorkers involved with a local gang boss in one form or another
who are in debt and must make good for it.  Murphy talks the boss man into
letting him and Lawrence go to Mississippi and bring back some moonshine.
Bootlegging.  Their first mistake.  While in the Magnolia state, Murphy
gambles away their traveling money and Lawrence flirts with a bar tramp
even though he has a steady girlfriend at home.  Their second mistake.  They
accidentally come across a dead body of a man who cheated Murphy at cards
earlier in the evening and they remain at his side for too long.  And that's
the last mistake they ever make in the free world.  Being in the wrong place
at the wrong time gets them life imprisonment, even though they're totally
innocent and the two of them spend the next 65 years together in the big
house.
The film is told in flashback at the beginning and takes us back through the
years leading up to the film's excellent finale.  Unfortunately, the film is
extremely uneven and is another misfire in the typical style of early spring
time releases.  Murphy used to get summer or Christmas time but now, has to
settle for having his film released at one of the worst times of the year
for quality.  The opening half hour is surprisingly too dramatic, the mid
section is loaded with gags that aren't funny, clearly seeing that Murphy's
heart is no longer in comedy.  The scenes strung together in this film look
like they were done in one take and what's most shocking of all is that I
liked
the out takes at the end over the closing credits more than a good portion
of the
film.  That's scary.
Director Ted Demme ('The Ref') stigmatizes his cast, is a slave to the
film's script and has no eye for comedy.  What really sold the film for me
was Martin Lawrence.  He doesn't try to over do it the way Murphy does.
Lawrence is steady, more relaxed and more polished and another good asset
the film has is its make-up.  Seeing the two of them at age 90, combined
with their excellent performances as extremely old men, make Murphy and
Lawrence an asset to the film's last half hour as the film really shines,
finally.  Too bad the mid section is as exciting as reading out dated
magazines in a doctor's office
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Tim Burton's films have always been filled with a sweet or sour amount of
gothic prancing.  The first 'Batman' movie he directed in 1989 was always
balanced with a sense of fun even though it was dark enough to startle the
most loyal fan of Bob Kane's comic book series.  'Batman Returns' in 1992
was a silly, repetitive and nasty assault on our senses with horrible
villains, an incoherent script and some very bad overlapping on the part of
Burton's direction.  'Pee Wee's Big Adventure' (1985), 'Beetlejuice' (1988),
'Edward Scissorhands' (1990) and 'Mars Attacks!' (1996) all have their
audience and it's easy to love or hate any film directed by Tim Burton.
'Sleepy Hollow', set in 1799 and based on Washington Irving's story "The
Legend of Sleepy Hollow" and adapted for the screen this time by Kevin
Yagher and Andrew Kevin Walker, is the story of New York City Constable
Icabod Crane (Johnny Depp) and his investigation into the stories about a
headless horseman who is murdering people by decapitating them while
charging in grand fashion on his horse.  Crane is sent to upstate New York
to investigate these disturbing events at the behest of a city judge
(Christopher Lee).  Some of the people Crane comes into contact with are
Baltus Van Tassel (Michael Gambon), his wife Lady Van Tassel (Miranda
Richardson), and their daughter Katrina (Christina Ricci).  Lady Van Tassel
is her stepmother and is a mysterious character who levels her own ideas
about the headless horseman which are startling and fun to watch during the
film's climax.  Other interesting local characters are played by Jeffrey
Jones, Casper Van Dien and Ian McDiarmid.
If you wanted to take the film seriously, you would have to look at the
characters first and foremost and unfortunately, Depp's is the only
interesting one in the whole picture.  The film seems obsessed, almost
addicted like an alcoholic would be, with showing the decapitation of heads
again and again and again.  The entire production is a well photographed but
familiar looking Tim Burton piece where bad hair and pale expressions extend
to the far ends of celluloid for maximum effect.
Perhaps the most impressive thing about this film is the cameo by
Christopher Walken as the headless horseman.  Many would argue it's a full
blooded role, but in my mind, Walken's not on screen enough to be given
major credit on screen and he isn't.  He is to be given credit, however for
his absolutely frightening portrayal of the film's chief villain (his teeth
alone were hair raising).  Burton directed Walken in 'Batman Returns' and
Martin Landau also makes an uncredited cameo as a man who loses his
head (literally!) in the film's opening scene.  Landau won an Oscar under
Burton's direction for 1994's 'Ed Wood'.
The element of beauty in this film is the cinematography by Emmanuel Lubezki
and the editing by Chris Lebanzon.  The work by these two is absolutely
riveting and may bring them Oscar nominations.  Credit also has to be given
to Johnny Depp.  He is a great performer and looks right at home in a period
piece role as comfortably as any other part he has ever played.  He adapts
to the role of Icabod Crane as well as any actor could have.  He combines
intelligence, bravery in the face of horror and a straight laced portrayal
of the law very well.
Any director deserves credit for putting his stamp on a film so well.  The
true key to a director's vision is for avid movie fans to view a film
without the credits being shown and then trying to guess who the director
is.  That's easy when watching a Tim Burton film.  If Burton hadn't been a
movie director I see him in one of two professions in life.....designing fun
houses for amusement parks or taking on the job of an architect, designing
gothic looking structures with the most bizarre detail given to every part
of his structures.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Secrets & Lies (1996)
Director Mike Leigh has the uncanny knack for making real life situations
about ordinary people sincere, heartfelt and entertaining.  His latest film
'Secrets and Lies' is no exception and could be the best film in Leigh's
career.  The movie is set in the U.K. and a young black woman named Hortense
(Marianne Jean-Baptiste) sets out to find her birth mother after she has laid
to rest her adoptive parents.  It turns out that her real mother Cynthia
(Brenda Blethyn) is a lonely, unmarried and pathetic woman who lives with her
resentful and hostile daughter Roxanne (Claire Rushbrook).  Cynthia is
shocked in a very frightful way to receive a phone call from her long lost
daughter some twenty-seven years later and the two of them arrange to meet.
 Cynthia's brother Maurice (Timothy Spall) is a successful photographer whose
wife Monica (Phyllis Logan) prefers the finer things in life and her
materialism is an unfair quality to her husband who is a 'down-to-Earth' kind
of guy.  Their life is the sub-text of this movie and the two families are
interwoven in a blistering climax which plays out like a wonderful stage play
involving a quirky and confused cast of characters coming to grips with the
realities of life.  'Secrets and Lies' is one of the best films of the year
and proves that smaller films are sometimes better than the big budget
Hollywood offerings in which executives call the shots poorly rather than
filmmaker's like Mike Leigh who call them brilliantly.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
How many of you have attended a high school or college production of a
famous piece or work previously produced or published by some other form of
medium?  Perhaps you attended your children's Shakespearean productions when
they were in high school, or even grade school.  Did you like an amateur
production of 'Julius Caesar' or 'Hamlet' better than renderings by Marlon
Brando or the great Lord Laurence Olivier?  I hope not.  'Go!' looks and
feels like an amateur production of 'Pulp Fiction'.  I assume that for all
of you who are sports fans, that you also like the major leagues rather than
the minors.  Now, it's true that filmmakers, musicians and artists draw
influences from others who lived before them or put out stupendous work in
their lifetime based on advice from others who have worked along similar
lines, but there is a huge difference between drawing a variation of
someone's work in contrast to deliberately ripping it off.  Further
illustrating this point is that critics everywhere are comparing 'Go!' to
Quentin Tarantino's 1994 masterpiece 'Pulp Fiction' which probably has some
of the most memorable dialogue and repeated quotations since 1942's
'Casablanca'.  It certainly ranks up there with any memorable film script
you can think of.
Set in Los Angeles like 'Pulp Fiction' was (do they have to be that obvious
about it?) 'Go!' basically centres itself around four major characters.
There is Ronna (Sarah Polley), a supermarket clerk who hates her job.  She
works long hours for little pay and is facing eviction if she can't pay her
rent.  She has a plan to deal some drugs on the side and winds up double
crossing a drug dealer after losing her stash which could cost her her life.
There is Simon (Desmond Askew), who embarks on a trip to Las Vegas with
three friends and upon doing so they get mixed up with dancing girls,
prostitutes and a nasty bouncer and his criminal father. There are Zack and
Adam (Jay Mohr and Scott Wolf).  They are facing criminal charges unless
they can help the police nab a suspect in which case the charges against
them will be dropped.  Other notable members of the cast Timothy Olyphant as
Todd, the drug dealer involved in Ronna's life.  Taye Diggs as Marcus,
Simon's main companion on the trip to Vegas and a cop named Burke (William
Fichtner) breathing down Zack and Adam's neck.  All of these stories take
place in conjunction with one another just like 'Pulp Fiction'.
In fairness, as I've said many times, a film should be judged on its own
merit but there are exceptions to the rule.  You can't help but compare
'Go!' to 'Pulp Fiction'.  What I really didn't like about 'Go!' was the fact
that while creating such a stark and obvious film, there is no development
on making the characters likable.  Many of the characters in 'Pulp Fiction'
were likable even though they were scum bags.  Tarantino had an uncanny way
of transmitting his vision to make it not only memorable but also separated
the good guys from the bad guys even though these were all wretched people.
You basically want to dismiss almost every character in 'Go!' as not likable
and the film gives you no one to root for.
The film is directed by Doug Liman who did 'Swingers' in 1996 and 'Getting
In' in 1994.  His style looks and feels a lot of Steven Soderbergh, George
Armitage and David Fincher.  Directors whose styles are better suited to a
technical job rather than as the man calling the shots on the set of a movie
in a very shallow and protracted manner.  It also seemed pretty clear that
'Go!' was trying to act as valid social commentary as well as entertainment.
It succeeds somewhat in doing so and the performances in the film are good
but the rest of the film and its attempt to put forward an original idea
just isn't there and the film comes off as aloof and totally forgettable.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
'At First Sight' is written by Steve Levitt, Irwin Winkler and Rob Cowan
and is based on the story 'To See and Not See' by Oliver Sacks.  Irwin
Winkler also lends his talents as director to the film.  You may
remember another Oliver Sacks story turned into a movie in 1990 entitled
'Awakenings'.  That film chronicled the experimental tests that led to
the temporary success of a doctor treating patients for a deadly form of
sleeping sickness.  Robin Williams was the doctor and Robert De Niro the
patient.  Two powerhouse actors that brought their consummate
craftsmanship to a very human subject.  The extremely subtle and
wonderfully crafted story of 'At First Sight' is no classic but takes
the idea of human sight, and how we all (whether we want to admit it or
not) take it for granted and how painful it would be to adjust to a
world of darkness.  Just turn the tables and try to imagine the story of
a blind man, sightless since the age of three because of severe
cataracts, and how painful it is to adjust to a world of sight where
you're used to years of adapting to the dark and not understanding the
three dimensional concept of perfect vision.
You wouldn't think that someone would feel more comfortable being blind
after being given the opportunity to see but truth is stranger than
fiction and that's exactly what happens in this film which is one of
1999's most pleasant early surprises.  The story has some of the names
changed and this is a mystery to me because the characters are so
inspirational that they should be proud to have their names displayed as
the real ones in this movie.  Val Kilmer portrays Virgil Adamson, the
individual in question who, until the age of 8, had his eyes worked on
by the medical community almost to the point of torture and his sister
(Kelly McGillis) is reluctant to have him go through the procedure again
as a fully grown adult.  He meets the love of his life, Amy Benic (Mira
Sorvino) who is more open to the idea of him seeing than he is.  Her
heart is in the right place but she realizes later that Virgil has his
own decision to make.  After meeting the leading eye doctor on the east
coast of the U.S. (Bruce Davison), Virgil agrees to the procedure and
the medical institute, using his case for their own experimental ends,
agree to pick up the tab.
The highlight of the film comes after the operation and while sitting in
his wheelchair surrounded by his love ones, the bandages are taken off
Virgil's eyes and he slowly begins to adjust to a world of sight.  Val
Kilmer is stunning in this film.  It's obvious that Kilmer has always
struggled to be an intense method actor.  He virtually threw himself
into radical research for the role of Jim Morrison for 1991's 'The
Doors' and was terrific in it.  He has had his misses like everyone
else, but he brings a sublime and memorable portrayal of a blind
individual to the screen with a likable persona but his character never
goes awry to making this a disease of the week movie with weepy
sentimentality.  Mira Sorvino's performance as the lady in his life is
wonderful.  She's every guy's dream girlfriend.  Considerate, tolerant,
patient and most of all understanding.  Their chemistry is convincing
and totally memorable.  Rather underwritten and not used properly in the
film is a therapist (Nathan Lane) who helps Virgil adapt to his new
world.  For his small part in this film, Lane is quite good at drama.
This film's strongest asset is its attention to detail.  It focuses on
the little parts of Virgil Adamson's therapy after receiving surgery to
correct his eyesight.  And while he never fully adjusts to a world of
sight, his brief journey into that world is one that should be cherished
by everyone who's ever thought seriously about any handicap -- whether
it's physical or mental.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Some Mother's Son (1996)
The makers of 1993's 'In the Name of the Father'  have re-united for this
project fashioned in the same manner involving the Irish Republican Army.
 Helen Mirren and Fionnula Flanagan portray Kathleen Quigley and Annie
Higgins, two mothers whose sons went on a hunger strike to protest treatment
in prison under British rule.  Their sons Gerald Quigley and Frank Higgins
(Aidan Gillen and David O'Hara) are associates of Bobby Sands whose name was
made famous around the world when he went on a hunger strike in prison in
1981 and died.  Bobby Sands is played by John Lynch who played Paul Hill in
'In the Name of the Father' and was one of the Guilford Four sent to prison
for bombings they never committed.  'Some Mother's Son' is directed by by
Terry George who co-wrote 'In the Name of the Father' with Jim Sheridan and
the two of them collaborate on this film which is not as good as 'In the Name
of the Father' but it is compelling and well made and has historical
importance in conjunction with events still being played out to this day by
the British government and the IRA.  Helen Mirren recieved an Oscar
nomination two years ago for 'The Madness of King George' and could find
herself nominated again for this movie.  Her character is one wrestling not
only with the will of her son and the laws of Britain but with her own
conscience and her compassion for her family is uncompromising and this is a
richly textured and multi-dimensional job by Mirren for what is the best role
of her career.

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
Anacondas are snakes that are primarily found to be living in the
Amazon jungle.  They  allegedly grow to be forty feet long in some
cases and can eat people.  Your enjoyment of the move 'Anaconda' will
depend entirely on how you accept the film's visual effects.  It is
obvious to tell that at most times they are computer graphics but the
chills and terror set fourth by the film are genuine.
A group of documentary filmmakers led by their director (Jennifer
Lopez) venture into the Amazon jungle to film a piece detailing the
existence of a South American tribe of natives.  She is accompanied by
her camerman (rapper Ice Cube) and an anthropologist (Eric Stoltz).
Along with a few others they rescue a stranded and mysterious stranger
(Jon Voight) from his broken down barge and he seems to be a nice guy
at first.  It turns out that Voight is bounty hunter whose quarry is
snakes and he sabotages the boat's crew at gunpoint and any other means
necessary in his quest for an anaconda which will make him a rich man.
This is a clever and enjoyably campy film from director Luis Llosa
('Sniper', 'The Specialist') who never over estimates the value of his
subject matter and directs 'Anaconda' in a frightfully pleasant way
reminiscent of 1990's 'Arachnophobia' which was about a gigantic and
deadly amazon spider on the loose in small town California.  That film
had more humour than 'Anaconda' but there isn't much to laugh about
when we see nature in its most furious and fatal moments.
Jon Voight makes a cunning and precariously acceptable villain along
with the snake and his character reminded me a little bit of Quint
(Robert Shaw), the salty and crusty shark hunter of 'Jaws'.  Both are
men of determination and both end up losing their lives in a struggle
to big for them to handle.  'Anaconda' has a biting and firey climax
which will leave you as mesmerized as any jungle picture you're ever
likely to view.

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Cast - Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Chloe Sevigny, Jared Leto, Reese
Witherspoon
Directed by - Mary Harron
Written by - Mary Harron, Guinevere Turner, based on the novel by Bret
Easton Ellis
Produced by - Edward R. Pressman, Chris Hanley, Christian Halsey Solomon,
Ron Rotholz
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted), Rated R
for strong violence, sexuality, drug use and language.  Previously rated
(NC-17).
Running Length - 101 minutes
Distributor - Lions Gate Films
Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale) will deceive you.  To women, his astounding
good looks, fabulous wardrobe and knowledge of mergers and acquisitions will
seem irresistible.  To men, his personality and personal life (at least what
they think they know about it), is one of envy.  Patrick likes to make
mention of the fact that when women ask him what he's "in to" he says:
"Murders and executions, actually".  From a distance across a nightclub
table with loud music playing, it sounds like "mergers and acquisitions".
There is much more to 'American Psycho' than this description and the film's
layers of artsy decorum crossed with bizarre humour and lacerating violence
makes for a film with an extraordinary vision on the part of Mary Herron who
captures the horrors of violence as well as any director praised in the
modern era.  It's an old story, but this is a film mostly for film buffs who
know what makes a good mix in the film industry and the average movie patron
may discard it as sick trash.  This hurts the film somewhat because its
limited appeal will get lost in an ever increasing amount of film
productions and a film like this may end up as a needle in a hay stack, for
lack of a better term.
Patrick Bateman has another passion.  After luring his prey to his yuppie
pad in the heart of New York City, Bateman has the seduction going
perfectly.  Champagne in the bedroom, a pleasant atmosphere and he puts
music on and critiques it in harmonious fashion before killing his victims
through strangulation, the use of sharp instruments or chain saws.....all
done with an intensity to bloody his hardwood floors, muck up his white
walls and clutter up his closet with dismembered body parts.  The film puts
an interesting twist on the "me" generation.  Set in the heart of the 80's
era of greed (1987 to be exact), all of the familiar wardrobes, music and
sets of that time come back to show what times were like and how the human
mind is capable of so many dark and evil things.  We get a sense early of
Patrick's violent tendencies when he goes to pick up his bed linen from a
Chinese laundry and shrieks at the fact that stains haven't been removed and
he bellows out: "I am going to kill you" to the owners of the laundry
facility after his frustration boils over from their inability to speak
proper English.  His over reaction and ability to make a mountain out of a
mole hill make Patrick Bateman a character to be feared and Christian Bale
pulls off the role perfectly and you may recall him as the young boy going
through World War II in Steven Spielberg's 1987 effort 'Empire of the Sun'.
One thing that LOOKS like it will hurts this film is the lack of
participation on the part of the other characters.  Willlem Dafoe plays a
police detective who investigates the murders that Patrick has committed,
Reese Witherspoon is his materialistic and semi-synthetic fiancee and Chloe
Sevigny is Patrick's executive assistant and Jared Leto is a colleague of
Bateman's in the high powered world of finance.  But as shallow as these
characters are, the film works just fine for one reason.  The film is told
from Bateman's point of view and his own obsession with the violent aspects
of his mind and the acts that come about as a result of his fantasies shuts
out all of the character's grasps on his life to the extent of only
rejoicing in his own violent excess.
'American Psycho' was originally intended as a turn for Oliver Stone to
direct Leonardo DiCaprio.  Given the fact that many consider Stone's
'Natural Born Killers' a cult masterpiece, he would have been a good choice
but this film needed a fresh vision from a relatively unknown film maker.
It's one of those subjects that's been done too often to put a familiar name
in the director's chair and the fresher the directing senses are for a film
like this, the more likely it is to rile up people to cause controversy and
talk which will only increase the film's success.
The film has a conclusion that will throw you off key somewhat in terms of
what actually DID happen.  The balance between comedy and horror in this
film is as difficult to pull off as a tight rope walker balancing himself on
a wire hanging over Niagara Falls.  A great deal of the credit for the film
has to be given to editor Andrew Marcus.  He sharply enhances Bale's
performance in the lead by inserting his image routinely like a pop up
target in many scenes to make the audience truly recognize him as a hard
boiled and classic movie villain.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
There are 20 James Bond movies counting 'The World Is Not Enough'.  Sean
Connery certainly has been the best Bond.  In fact, not a single
disagreement has come up when I discuss this with other people.  Connery's
combination of rugged timing, the smooth delivery of his lines and his
ability to woo women make him the ultimate lover AND fighter.  As the 20th
century closes out shortly, here's how the Bond franchise breaks down and
the actors who have played him.
You can even say there are 21 Bond films if you count 1967's 'Casino
Royale'.
'The World Is Not Enough' is vintage James Bond.  It resembles the old days
when Bond movies had great sub plots and a diverse number of characters,
including the variety of beautiful women who have been central to the plot.
Since the Bond films have resembled romance novels, comic books, car ads,
travel brochures and liquor spots, you would think that enough is enough.
But the films are addictive.  They are alluring to the most avid movie fan
and while some have failed in recent memory, such as the badly edited and
music style video presentation of 'Tomorrow Never Dies', it is always fun to
see how bad or good the next one will be.
Terrorism and revenge are the ingredients in 'The World Is Not Enough'.
James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) becomes involved with a beautiful socialite
named Elektra King (Sophie Marceau in a surprisingly good performance) who
wants to build a large pipeline across Asia and needs protection from having
it destroyed by her rivals.  Bond also locks horns with a terrorist named
Renard (Robert Carlyle, the skinny stripper with the son in 'The Full
Monty') who has a bullet lodged in his brain which is slowly killing him.
But for now, he has lost a couple of his senses, including the sense of
touch which makes him seemingly invincible since he can't feel pain.  There
is also a nuclear scientist named Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards) who
is the film's most annoying character and couldn't possibly survive
physically in the real world but manages to hold her own with Bond in the
movies.
Elektra was kidnapped by Renard many years ago and has a past with him.  She
was sort of brain washed and mentally drawn to him by the whole ordeal and
her loyalty may or not be to him as Bond finds out throughout the course of
the film.  A lot of intriguing thrillers have a complicated plot not easy to
follow and this James Bond installment has many cleverly interwoven plots
and sub plots with stories all on a collision course with one another.  It's
the best Bond film I've seen since 1983's 'Octopussy' which was the best one
featuring Roger Moore.
Other characters who return are "M" (Judi Dench), "Q" (Desmond Llewelyn).
Replacing "Q", who is retiring, is "R" (John Cleese, and he serves up the
gimmicks this time which are the contraptions that save Bond when he gets
into a jam.  Some of them this time are quite ingenious from any other
gadgets we've seen in a very long while.
Directed by the under rated Michael Apted and written by Neil Purvis, Robert
Wade and Bruce Feirstein, 'The World Is Not Enough' has good character
development, funny moments and all the trappings of early Bond.  In fact,
those who may not have seen one in over thirty years would never know how
diverse the series has been by viewing this one now.  It's a return to its
original roots.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Phantasm (1979)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
     For those of you who have seen 'Phantasm' and perhaps its two sequels,
you have to ask yourself a question.  Is it a bad film?  The answer is
definitely "yes".  But guess what?  It's one of the best bad films I've ever
seen.  Sound like a contradiction?  Maybe so but every movie fan has his or
her guilty pleasures.  Even super critics Siskel and Ebert for whom I have a
lot of respect, have admitted to liking certain films that most people despised.
     What 'Phantasm' does is it provides an example of how one man can craft
a film given the opportunity even though he has very little experience or
talent in doing so.  It seems like it's an experimental film, the kind you
would expect to find at a student film festival or on a video store shelf as
one of those forgotten movies that never got a theatre release but went
directly to video.  'Phantasm' did get a theatre release and came out in
1979, just a couple of years before the home video rental market took off.
     It takes place in California where two brothers become involved in a
menacing plot concocted by a funeral home director to abduct the dead from
his nearby cemetery and use them in a slave plot in another dimension apart
from our world.  As bizarre as this sounds, 'Phantasm' plays out like a
nightmarish scenario and has some oddly entertaining scenes involving a
flying steel sphere which performs brain drain and can move with the speed
of the most deadly flying predator.  With other assorted ghouls and gadgets
of terror, the movie is cheesy but indulgently campy and is a cult classic
although the term "classic" is used loosely.
     Director Don Coscarelli was in his mid twenties when he made the film
and acted as the film's writer, director of photography and editor along
with that.  He does what any aspiring young movie maker would want given the
opportunity.  The film looks more like a test product than a full length
feature film.  It does have a sharp villain called 'The Tall Man' played by
Angus Scrimm and 'The Tall Man' was recently inducted into the horror hall
of fame for his notoriety with horror fans.  
     Given its underground success, 'Phantasm' was released a couple of
years ago on laser disc with a new stereo surround soundtrack and in
widescreen format.  It's other two sequels, 'Phantasm II' (1988) and
'Phantasm: Lord of the Dead' but also known as 'Phantasm III' (1994) have a
bigger budget and better special effects and talk of a fourth film is in the
works for you 'Phantasm' worshippers (I know a few) which may be out in 1999.  
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
     Is it just me or is there something wrong with a hero who has to bow
twice in four movies to the villains in first billing?  Jack Nicholson got
billed first over Michael Keaton in 1989 and now Arnold Schwarzenegger has it
over George Clooney.  
     It took at least five movies before there was a change in who would play
James Bond and now we have our third actor in four movies playing Batman.
 Val Kilmer was nothing more than a totem pole and Michael Keaton was a
better Bruce Wayne than he was Batman but Keaton is still the best at both to
this point in the series.  
     Arnold Schwarzenegger is Mr. Freeze, a man who became a criminal after
an accident occurred in his laboratory trying to develop cryogenics to freeze
his terminally ill wife.  Uma Thurman is Poison Ivy, a woman whose noble
efforts as an environmental chemist go awry after a criminal act against her
in South America causes her chemicals to work at making her an evil
temptress.  Both villains are bent on revenge against the system and their
motivation is certainly nothing new for the criminal mind.
     Simply put, 'Batman and Robin' is one of the worst films of 1997 to this
point and has one of the worst screenplays I've ever seen in the history of
cinema.  Cliche ridden dialogue and incoherent situations are bad enough and
on the technical end there is sloppy editing and badly choreographed action
sequnces which are repetitive and boring.  Uma Thurman does the best job with
this awful movie but Arnold Schwarzenegger is laughably bad as Mr. Freeze and
you won't buy his attempt at a menacing presence for a second.  
     Alicia Silverstone is sadly miscast as Batgirl.  Her character is a
cross between a girl scout and a high school student.  Believing she can beat
up criminals is a belly laugh in itself.  Chris O'Donnell's Robin is more of
a spoiled brat than a crime fighter and Clooney's Batman is sorely under
written.  
     The first 'Superman' movie in 1978 was better than the last two Batman
movies put together and Tim Burton's clever and visionary style from the
first two Batman films is missing and director Joel Schumacher and writer
Akiva Goldsman are academic amateurs at best.
     Batman is a legendary crime fighting hero and now he is reduced to
taking a back seat to light shows, computerized special effects and art
direction done with over kill.  Doomed from the beginning, 'Batman and Robin'
is machine tooled junk.

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
Like 1987's 'Hope and Glory', much of the unpleasantness of war in 'Life
is Beautiful' is seen through the eyes of a child.  In reality, this
film isn't really about war as much as it is about one man's way of
dealing with it and finding enough humour to entertain his young son
throughout it all.  This film is the ultimate testament to the spirit of
the human condition in that its protagonist never waivers in the face of
tragedy, something that would be very easy to do, and he always finds a
way to make things seem good during a bad situation.
Italy's Roberto Benigni has made a truly classic film that details
family life in the simplest of texts and how the separation of it often
makes the heart grow fonder.  He is Oscar bound in several mainstream
categories, including Best Actor and Best Director, co-author of the
Best Original Screenplay and the film will almost certainly be nominated
for Best Picture and at the very least, Best Foreign Language Film
which, and if it is, it will be a hands down winner.
It opens in the pleasant countryside of Italy in 1939, just prior to the
outbreak of World War II.  Guido (Roberto Benigni) is a happy go lucky
fellow.  Never taking time to breathe between interludes of spreading
life's good cheer among his friends, relatives and anyone else who'll
listen.  He aspires to open a bookshop and meets a beautiful young
school teacher ((Nicoletta Braschi, who is Benigni's real life wife). 
He keeps running into her time after time and their partnership in life
seems almost set by destiny.  They marry and the film fast forwards to
1945 and they now have a five year old son (Giorgio Cantarini).  
Benigni's character is an Italian Jew, and he, along with his uncle and
son are rounded up by the Nazis and put into a concentration camp.  The
strong love his wife has for him and her son has her demanding to be
taken to the camp as well, and even though she is not forced to go, this
is one of the film's most memorable moments.  Throughout their time in
the camp, Guido tells his son that all the chores, hard ship and
suffering are a game and that the winner will receive a tank for first
prize when its all over.  Naturally, you can't tell a five year old boy,
if you have any human feelings, that you could be murdered at any minute
and this whole whimsical premise casts a new light on war that I've
never seen before and the film never makes you feel bad for a moment and
is as important, in many ways, as any film that details the horrors of
war strongly enough to repel an audience.
This is actually like two movies in one because the first half is
strictly about free civilian life and it plays almost like a one man
show as Benigni's character practically puts on a one man show.  The
jokes are slapstick like in many ways but the wit of the film's dialogue
and how it relates in resolving things is a marvel to behold.  The
second half of the film is the concentration camp suffering.  The ending
should be sad, but it isn't because its balance is intact throughout its
entire running time and you can't take your eyes off the screen for a
moment.    
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Jingle All the Way (1996)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, Sinbad, Rita Wilson and Phil Hartman.
Arnold Schwarzenegger's attempts at comedy have been pretty successful
with 'Twins' (1988) 'Kindergarten Cop' (1990) and 'Junior' (1994). 
'Junior' is certainly the least of these three films in the opinion of
this reviewer but Arnold has struck pure gold with 'Jingle All the Way.' 
This is an absolutely dizzying and rambunctious physical comedy which puts
Arnold in good standing with the genre of slapstick.  The big guy plays a
workaholic dad and husband who is always breaking promises he's made to
his young son and is now feeling the resentment not only from the boy but
from his wife.  To try and make up for things Arnie promises to get the
boy a Turbo Man action figure which is the hottest toy on the market.  The
only problem is that he procrastinates and on Christmas Eve day is forced
to rush all over town to find one which is practically impossible.  He is
in competition with Sinbad who is trying to find one for his own son and
Sinbad delivers some good physical comedy but lays on the laughs mostly
with his gift of gab.  Director Bryan Levant ('Beethoven') uses some very
unattractive characterizations which add an extra dose of laughing gas to
the formula of this already fast paced and loony looking farce which plays
like a cross between a comic book and Saturday morning cartoon with
delightful results.  Rita Wilson (Mrs. Tom Hanks) plays Arnold's wife and
Phil Hartman is Arnold's seemingly nice guy next door neighbor with a
hidden agenda for pursuing Schwarzenegger's wife in romantic fashion. 
>From devilish Santa Claus con men to a sadistic reindeer to a climax which
puts Arnold in Turbo Man's shoes, this is a sheer feel good and hilarious
film which had me laughing in all the right places and offers some
touching moments as well.  'Jingle All the Way' is the best escapist fare
Christmas film since 'Home Alone' and is far superior in every way.  This
movie's title doesn't only deliver but you will definitely find yourself
laughing all the way and if you don't then shame on you, Scrooge!

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
'The Newton Boys' does something clever.  It draws you in slowly after a
more than mediocre beginning and eventually has you rooting for a group
of wild west American outlaws who never killed anyone in their rampage
of robbing somewhere in the neighbourhood of 200 banks between 1919 and
1924.  Using a Robin Hood mentality of robbing from the rich to pay the
poor (in this case, however, they pay themselves), Matthew McConaughey
(Willis Newton) Ethan Hawke (Jess Newton) Skeet Ulrich (Joe Newton), and
Vincent D'Onofrio (Dock Newton) are featured as the four brothers who
are loyal to each other and to their profession.  Dwight Yoakam is an
explosives expert who hooks up with the brothers and his specialty is
using a nitro mix in blowing safes.  Rounding out the leading players is
Julianna Margulies who plays Louise, a cigar store clerk who becomes
Willis' girlfriend.
As the brothers plot each robbery, there is a hint of detail reminiscent
of a documentary style approach by director Richard Linklater ('Dazed
and Confused', 'Before Sunrise') and the visual style the film projects
is very impressive and candidly entertaining.  Matthew McConaughey is a
charismatic leading man and he is truly one of this generation's most
under rated actors and has a power capable of carrying an entire film on
his back.  His portrayal of Willis Newton, a man raised dirt poor who
had a tough life and claims to have went to prison as an innocent man,
is someone many people can generate sympathy for and these factors fuel
his desire to rob banks as we see him at the start of the film as an
ex-con as someone asks him: "How was prison?", to which he replies: "How
was the war?"
Despite the unusual place in history the Newton brothers have found,
they remain virtually unknown compared to the likes of John Dillinger,
Bonnie and Clyde and "Baby Face" Nelson.  Perhaps because the Newton
brothers weren't as cold blooded as their criminal peers and not just
the American but the human fascination with violence is something that
propels the most violent criminals to the top of the list in terms of
historical documentation.  It's a constant pleasure to watch the
creators of film pick up on a part of history that is relatively unknown
because the research proves to be more difficult and when you succeed,
it is a greater testament to your endeavour as a creative artist.
Everything is meticulously crafted in 'The Newton' Boys'.  From the
clothes, to the sets, to the music, even the dialogue and wild west
attitude are nailed down as impressively as any I've ever seen.  The
most interesting footage of the film comes in two places.  First is a
trip to Canada where they try and rob banks in Ottawa and Toronto and
find Canadian safes better built and harder to crack so they decide to
rob banks in broad daylight on the street as they witness bank
employees, in a more civilized and less dangerous society, openly carry
large bags of cash on the streets for transfer and delivery and as the
boys hold them up, they do what they can to get away without killing
anyone in the process.  Secondly is the film's closing credits which are
accompanied by footage of the Johnny Carson show where the real Willis
Newton is interviewed by Carson and we see the real Joe Newton in clips
of home movies and they tell how the brothers always viewed banks and
insurance companies as cheats themselves and that his gang was just one
thief robbing from another.
Not a great justification of their profession, and while some may
criticize the film as a glorification of bank robberies, it's
captivating simplicity and depth of academic focus make it entertaining
as an alternative form of social commentary and the film does something
rare.  It only uses violence when necessary to make its intended points.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Birdman of Alcatraz (1962)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
There is no prison film like 1962's 'Birdman of Alcatraz'.  In fact, many
don't view it as a film about prison.  It's more of a one man show with
supporting characters appearing every now and then.  It strikes at the very
heart of one man's life behind bars determined not to waste his years in
becoming just another statistic.  
In this true story, Burt Lancaster plays Robert Stroud, a man sentenced to
life imprisonment who becomes a world famous and respected authority on
birds.  After discovering how he will spend the rest of his life, he is
exercising in the prison yard one day when he finds an injured bird and
nurses it back to health and this leads him to dedicate his life to the
feathered creatures.  
Karl Malden plays Lancaster's adversary as the stern prison warden who
monitors Lancaster's years in prison.  The film's striking black and white
photography is used in one moody scene where Malden tells Lancaster he will
be in solitary confinement for the rest of his life and Malden's face is in a
total silhouette.  Director of photography Burnett Guffey adds greatly to the
film's personality of a darkened life away from society and each frame is a
work of art.  Photography inside cramped corners is often more skillfully
presented in contrast to the outside where scenes often light themselves and
there is plenty of room to move about.  'Birdman of Alcatraz' is one of the
most properly photographed films I've ever seen.
John Frankenheimer who has directed such sharply textured thrillers as 'Black
Sunday',  'French Connection II' and the documentary style feature 'Grand
Prix' has scored well with 'Birdman of Alcatraz' in working with a cast which
features Telly Savalas who would receive an Oscar nomination for Best
Supporting Actor and along with fellow actors Thelma Ritter, Betty Field,
Neville Brand, Edmond O'Brien and Hugh Marlowe, the film showcases one of
Burt Lancaster's most under rated performances.  It proves to be an
alternative biography without over blown emotion or elaborate sets and lets
the actors do their work well.     

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critic's Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Alexandre Dumas, the novelist who wrote 'The Three Musketeers' in the
19th century would be spinning in his grave if he knew that the only
Frenchman in 1998's 'The Man in the Iron Mask' would have the weakest
role.  Also written in the 19th century by Dumas, 'The Man in the Iron
Mask' was put into print after 'The Three Musketeers' and it, along with
'The Three Musketeers', actually contains four heroes: Athos, Porthos,
Aramis and D'Artagnan.  They are portrayed in this version of 'The Man
in the Iron Mask' by John Malkovich, Gerard Depardieu, Jeremy Irons and
Gabriel Byrne.  Set in 1662, their King, Louis XIV of France (Leonardo
DiCaprio), is a tyrant, watching his people starve while he lives in the
seductive life of luxury, and is a true law unto himself.
There have been many versions of both 'The Three Musketeers' and 'The
Man in the Iron Mask' produced for film and television and this one has
to ranks in the much lower half of all that has been accomplished.
The musketeers are defenders of the French crown, a high powered army of
loyal soldiers who possess a talent to wield a sword better than anyone
to protect their sovereign ruler.  D'Artagnan (Byrne), is the most loyal
and says he will not betray his King, no matter how ruthless his methods
are, somehow hoping his majesty will become a better man.  Athos,
Porthos and Aramis are past their prime and have retired to a more quiet
life and decide to replace the King with his twin brother, the man in
the iron mask who the King perceives as a threat to his power. They are
motivated to overthrow the King when one of them is unknowingly deemed
to be a suspicious traitor to the crown.
Leonardo DiCaprio and the rest of the cast are convincing in their
roles, despite speaking English and containing no French accents
whatsoever, except for Depardieu, but his role is the weakest and most
clownish in the film.  Malkovich is miscast as he was in the 1988 period
piece 'Dangerous Liaisons' and why an Englishman, complete with an
accent to boot (Irons) would be asked to play in this is a mystery.  But
their professional dedication to their roles make it work and DiCaprio
is believable as both the King and his more decent twin.
The real problem with the film is that by concentrating solely on the
dramatic set-up of the first 90 minutes or so, the finished product, at
a little over two hours, comes off as relatively lifeless and rather
stiffly written instead of sophisticated and high brow, as it should
be.  Written and directed by Randall Wallace who wrote director Mel
Gibson's 1995 Oscar winner 'Braveheart', Wallace shows he has no talent
as a director and his attention to detail is pretty superficial.  The
costumes in 'The Man in the Iron Mask' are noticeably "costume shop" in
their appearance and the art direction and sets are perhaps the only
saving grace, technically.
Teenage girls are sure to enjoy watching DiCaprio in his first role
since 'Titanic' but one misfired scene has DiCaprio standing still in a
room with his long hair, and some of it is draped over his face and with
his attire, it just looks too feminine.  I was imagining ear rings on
him at that moment and it actually seemed funny.  Something that I'm
sure wasn't intended and it shouldn't have been allowed to happen.
DiCaprio's hair in many scenes with his female companions actually looks
longer than theirs does.  Perhaps appropriate, but it just seems that
someone should have reminded director Randall Wallace that the film is
set in the 1660's and not the 1960's.  Peace.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Broadcast News (1987)
Politics, talent, attitude and perseverance can be crucial factors when
pursuing a career in the media.  In a business loaded with constant
restructuring, downsizing and often a push towards flash over substance, the
factors listed above along with ethics and some perky romantic escapades are
examined in James L. Brooks' 'Broadcast News'.  Brooks, the man responsible
for creating several successful television series ('Taxi' etc.) made a
successful transition to the big screen as a talented filmmaker who won three
Oscars in one night for 'Terms of Endearment' as that film's producer,
director and screenwriter based on Larry McMurtry's novel.  That was 1983 and
it would take Brooks four years to follow-up that film with 'Broadcast News'.
 I myself have worked in the media and having worked in the field himself,
Brooks was right on target in his depiction of three characters (William
Hurt, Holly Hunter and Albert Brooks) and their different personalities
leading to their eventual destinies in the workplace.  Their destinies in the
field of romantic endeavour also come into play and 'Broadcast News' has a
most generous and satisfying conclusion.  
Set in Washington, D.C., Hunter plays a producer for a major network while
Brooks is the enormously talented but under appreciated news reporter
constantly by her side who has the film's best lines.  Enter a future
anchorman (William Hurt) who knows almost nothing about the business of news
or understanding its impact and clarity but manges to land on his feet
because of what his employers feel is his attractive face.  Enraged by the
network's choice of flash over substance, Hunter turns sour at the thought of
having to work with him. Their is a constant rivalry between Hurt and Brooks
as Brooks despises everything Hurt is about and isn't shy about showing his
true feelings.
At a party for station employees at the home of one of the network's
wealthier participants, a call is made informing them that a major story has
broken overseas involving an attack on a U.S. military base in Sicily by the
Libyans and everyone races to get to the station and go on-air for live
breaking news.  It's one of the film's best scenes as Hunter is given the job
of executive producer for the segment and Brooks is shunned from any coverage
of the assignment at all and from home he phones in to Hunter his knowledge
of Libya and U.S. military aircraft and she relays it through the microphone
connected to Hurt's earpiece and he immediately relays it to the viewing
audience.  While he's watching television those immortal words are spoken by
Brooks "I say it here, it comes out there."
Towards the film's climax, which is the downsizing and frustration of the
employees affected, 'Broadcast News' reaches into the personal lives of its
characters and contains some of Brooks' best work as a director.  'Broadcast
News' in many ways was better than 'Terms of Endearment' for its use of
personal relationships done more cleanly than the soap opera atmosphere of
'Terms of Endearment.'  On its tenth anniversary and in the aftermath of the
media circus of both O.J. Simpson trials and the current Oklahoma City trial,
'Broadcast News' shows you what the evening nightly news doesn't
always......and that's detail !

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Down the halls of a royal palace lies a story based in fact about the
very essence of ancient English royalty and how its impact led to a
revolution of religion and a major turn in world history.  It's also a
story that makes for one of the best dramatic films of the year, if not
the last decade. Queen Elizabeth I ruled for 45 years beginning in 1558
and her reign was one of the most successful in the history of the
British monarchy.
'Elizabeth' begins in 1554 and Queen Mary, a Catholic, and daughter of
Henry VIII is on the throne.  Dying and fearing that the country will be
turned over to a Protestant revolution once her heir assumes the crown,
she has her half-sister Elizabeth (Cate Blanchett in an Oscar-calibre
performance), put into the Tower of London.  Elizabeth, in a show of
strong will, survives the punishment and assumes the throne upon Mary's
death.  Instantly, there are many problems such as a bloodline heir that
her advisers feel must be produced.  England's army is very weak and the
treasury is virtually empty.
Elizabeth is aided by three loyal advisers who help her even when it
comes to her life being threatened in her attempt to change the
country's religion.  There is the head strong William Cecil (Richard
Attenborough), the no-nonsense and most loyal Francis Walsingham
(Geoffrey Rush), and her lover Lord Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes).
The film's dramatic structure is impeccable.  Michael Hirst contributes
a wonderful script of authenticity. The performances are stellar and
this film is very well staged by director Shekhar Kapur who takes the
subject material in hand and never compromises an ounce of its impact
for the sake of any comic relief.  What's interesting is that another
film out at the same time, 'Shakespeare in Love', is a rousing,
humourous, romantic and feel good production that also features
performances by Geoffrey Rush and Joseph Fiennes.  The two of them
demonstrate their range in a most convincing manner and illustrate the
beauty of the English craft of acting which is perhaps the best in the
world.  I remember seeing an interview with an English actor who will
remain nameless and he said he felt that American actors were better in
the movies while English actors are better on stage.  While that is
somewhat of a generalization, I relish the opportunity to see actors of
their own ethnicity demonstrating parts of their own history.  'The Man
in the Iron Mask' from early in 1998 featured American and English
actors doing a take on French history and somehow it just wasn't
convincing and no accents were implemented to even make it sound
convincing.  This is the reason many critics were harsh on 1984's
'Amadeus'.  That film, as great as it was, had an Americanized version
of European culture which didn't cut it for many.  1985's 'Revolution'
was a disaster for Al Pacino as his New York accent spoiled the entire
production and likewise for Robert De Niro who just didn't have the
credibility for appearing in 1986's 'The Mission'.
'Elizabeth' has a look that shows its roots are in the English theatre.
The film has few special effects, plenty of dialogue for its period and
a rigid depiction of why some nations today live under the separation of
church and state.  This is a highly respectable looking film that has
its appeal geared toward the high brow movie fan.  Casual fans will like
it if they accept its heavy drama for what it is.....factual.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Soldier (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
I'll make a prediction right now.  Kurt Russell, whom I admire as an
actor in a lot of movies, will win the Razzie award for worst actor of
1998 in 'Soldier'.  I read somewhere that Russell utters a total of only
68 words in the entire film and to me he spends the rest of the movie
looking like a mindless version of Frankenstein's monster, one of the
living dead and a cyborg all rolled into one.  Russell gave an excellent
performance in 1979's 'Elvis', a television classic that brought him an
Emmy nomination as Best Actor.  Some of his best work can be found in
movies such as 'Breakdown', 'Unlawful Entry', 'Backdraft' and 'Tequila
Sunrise'.  But as an action hero?  Russell is too talented for that.
His portrayal of the ordinary guy in a lot of films makes his presence
work but 'Soldier' is junk.  An unsavory mix of several science fiction
films scaled down into one mess.
Beginning in 1996, Russell is taken from the maternity ward of the
hospital he's born at by a secret military attach that trains him from
the cradle to be an unbeatable, unstoppable and pure fighting machine.
We see his progression as a soldier at various ages until his training
ends at the beginning of manhood when he turns 17.  Several more years
pass and Russell is now around 40 and a new breed of soldier is created
and their Colonel (Jason Issacs) is arrogantly pleased that his men, he
feels, are superior to the men lead by a rather sedate Captain (Gary
Busey) who is Russell's commanding officer.  Issacs challenges Busey to
select his best men to take down his most effective new breed of soldier
(Jason Scott Lee).  Russell is one of the men selected and during the
hand to hand combat exercise, Russell is presumed dead along with a
couple of other men but not before he can take out one of the new
soldier's eye and scar part of his face.
The bodies of the now "obsolete" soldiers are disposed of on a desolate
planet but Russell turns out not to be dead and upon landing with a
large batch of space junk, meets the inhabitants of the desolate waste
planet and tries to lead them in the oncoming invasion to be carried out
by the deranged Colonel responsible for his current fate.  The people
are taken a back to Russell's deadly form of fighting power since their
way of life is relatively peaceful and the climax is pay back and
revenge in a most ordinary way.
Director Paul Anderson ('Event Horizon') has made an real turkey of a
movie that cries out as the definition of 'empty' if you were to look it
up in the dictionary.  The film's obligatory violence is meaningless and
to a larger extent, no focus is given to create any interesting
characters as a contrast to Russell's character.  What made 1984's 'The
Terminator' work was the fact that the characters portrayed by Linda
Hamilton and Michael Biehn were truly human and were a good character
contrast to Arnold's mechanical elements.
Trashy and exploiting, 'Soldier' will have you asking "What's the
point?" when you leave the theatre.  Not bad for the testosterone crowd
but for the rest of us, this film is an example of too much money spent
on a film that's been done a million times before.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
In 1978, when he was still a protg of Steven Spielberg's, Robert
Zemeckis directed a film entitled 'I Wanna Hold Your Hand', named after
the hit song by the Beatles and the story revolved around a group of New
Jersey teenagers in 1964 who take a road trip to New York City to see
the Beatles live on the Ed Sullivan Show.  It gave us a look at their
antics as the mischief and misadventures they got into were entertaining
as sort of a second class version of 'American Graffiti'.  The funny
thing about the film was that it worked because it didn't try and do
anything else besides entertain.  Ditto with 'Detroit Rock City'.  
Set in the year 'I Wanna Hold Your Hand' was made, 1978, a group of
Cleveland teenagers do anything they can to see what they say is the
greatest rock and roll band of all time, KISS.  There is Hawk (Edward
Furlong), Lex (Giuseppe Andrews), Trip (James DeBello) and Jam (Sam
Huntington).  This quartet of misguided youth sort of grow on you after
a while and you'll swear you knew someone like each one of them when you
were their age.  They have a band entitled Mystery.  They illustrate the
letter 's' in their band after the letters 's' in KISS and anyone who
knows KISS' style of design will know what I'm talking about.  
There always seems to be a monkey in the wrench that prevents young
people from having a good time and often rebelling because of it.  In
this case it's Jam's religiously fanatical mother, who says that KISS
stands for Knights In Satan's Service.  The opening scene has Jam's
mother taking out a vinyl record from a cover labeled after the
Carpenters and it turns out to be a mix-up as a KISS record plays and
Jam's mother goes into a frenzy of anger and frustration.  She
eventually finds the four tickets the lads have to see KISS down the
road a ways along Lake Erie in Detroit and she burns the tickets.  After
taking a Volvo belonging to one of their parents, they have to find an
alternate plan to see the concert and try at every turn to get in and
get more and more desperate as the film moves along.
Adam Rifkin, who has directed 'Denial', 'Welcome to Hollywood' and 'The
Chase', keeps 'Detroit Rock City' moving along in an extremely leisurely
manner.  You come out feeling good, as if you've had a vacation.  It's
also the kind of film that makes you a little embarrassed to admit you
like it.  The thing that makes the film work more than anything else are
the bizarre confrontations.  There are Jam's encounters with his mother,
the four teenagers confront a group of mean spirited disco lovers on
Interstate 90 and there are some hilarious confrontations with anyone
who stands in the way of the guys trying to see the concert.
Filmed in Scarborough, Toronto and Hamilton Ontario, Canada, the film
looks very authentic in its depiction of the U.S. and the era in which
its set, 1978.  The mischievous teenagers are convincing and like in
every good movie of its kind, one of them is a scene stealer.  Writer
Carl V. Dupre has the dialogue and style of the late seventies down
perfectly.  In a decade that gets a lot of ridicule for its fashions and
certain music, it also happens to be the decade with some of the best
rock music and some of the best movies ever made.  Like the seventies,
'Detroit Rock City' turns out to be nothing more than a guilty pleasure
as a party film for the summer, but that's all it needs to be and is a
refreshing look at teenage antics in a recent slide where so many of
them have just plain failed.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
Anyone who stays informed with the world around us knows that the city of Los
Angeles is capable of anything.  Fires, floods, earthquakes, mud slides, two
O.J. trials, incompetent D.A. officials and the list goes on and on and on.
One thing you wouldn't expect to find on that list is an active volcano
forming under the city's main core and that's exactly what happens in this
thrilling and strangely plausible film featuring a cast starring the movie's
special effects largely put together by visual effects supervisor Mat Beck
who has worked most impressively on television's 'The X-Files' and has a
bigger budget this time around to work with.
As for the human cast, Tommy Lee Jones stars as the head of the O.E.M.
(Office of Emergency Management) in L.A. and he is joined in the volcanic
discovery by a geologist (Anne Heche) and together they try and figure out a
way to minimize the human casualties and maximize the flow of deadly volcanic
lava away from the masses.  
Comparisons to 'Dante's Peak' from earlier in 1997 are inevitable but what
makes 'Volcano so much better is the sensation of finding this fury of nature
in a place where it's possible but unlikely.  Los Angeles is portrayed with
all its stereotypical trappings and they mix in an interesting way with the
disaster at hand.  
Another plus for this quality piece of filmmaking is the editing by Michael
Tronick and Don Brochu.  Under the specifications of director Mick Jackson,
they have constructed a movie with a lightning quick pace and you will be
hard pressed to look at your watch even once during the film.  The movie
takes an in-depth look at the beginnings of volcanic activity as we see many
hints of one developing and even many details of one in action courtesy of
the screen writing by Jerome Armstrong and Billy Ray based on Jerome
Armstrong's story.  
The acting in 'Volcano' is almost non-effective but that's perfect for a
disaster film and the only film in that genre I've ever seen with a cast of
well developed characters was 'The Poseidon Adventure' (1972) in which we
cared about the people involved and got a look at their lives in a memorable
fashion.  'Volcano' is an early contender for the Oscar for Best Visual
Effects and even though it's early in the year I predict this one will rank
as one of the year's best action/adventure films.

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
Cast - Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Peter Coyote, Conchata
Ferrell, Marg Helgenberger
Directed by - Steven Soderbergh
Written by - Susannah Grant
Produced by - Danny De Vito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey Sher
(Rating) > Motion Picture Association of America - R (Restricted), Rated R
for language
Running Length - 130 minutes
Distributor - Universal Pictures
Sometimes we as critics judge a film to harshly.  Admit it.  We sometimes
look at a film and question its credibility but take a look at life.  Who
would have thought that we would ever see a trial like that of the famous
O.J. Simpson case.  If a script like that, with the events depicted in that
trial had been offered to the studios for consideration, it would have been
thrown in the garbage.  I constantly heard it in the media that no script
could be written this way, but truth, as they say, is sometimes stranger
than fiction.  So how then does a borderline burn out with three kids bring
a multi billion dollar corporation to its knees and rake in two million
dollars from the case herself.  That's the question you'll be following in
'Erin Brockovich', a truly great film with the best performance of Julia
Roberts' career.
First of all, this is a real life character.  Erin Brockovich obtained a job
as a clerk for a bottom of the heap law firm and helped in a case where a
corporate injustice struck people down in the prime of their lives.  It
opens as we see Erin in a car accident and her representation is carried out
by a law firm headed by a man named Ed Masry (Albert Finney).  Finney is
great in this role.  He takes on an American accent and like his fellow
countrymen from the UK who have tried it, such as Michael Caine, Bob Hoskins
and Kenneth Branagh, he is great at it.  Erin loses her case and is stuck
with large medical bills.  She hounds Ed's law firm to give her a job and
won't leave until she has one.
Her mannerisms in court, that of a highly profane nature, helped her lose
her case but her firey p*** and vinegar attitude is sorely needed when she
investigates a case that the law firm is considering handling.  A property
case comes to her attention and she finds that the water pollution around
it, carried out by the neglect of a billion dollar corporation, can infect a
person's DNA to the extent of causing death.  This movie comes a little more
than a year after 1998's 'A Civil Action' entertained audiences in a much
more subtle manner with similar subject matter but 'Erin Brockovich' has a
protagonist who is determined to win.  She uses her feminine ways, such as
short dresses and skirts and plenty of cleavage to get the information she
wants from men.
I haven't really cared for Steven Soderbergh's films much over the years.
His over rated effort 'Out of Sight' from 1998 was too stilted to truly
enjoy with some actors in roles way over their heads.  1989's 'Sex. Lies and
Videotape' and last year's 'The Limey' are probably his best films but 'Erin
Brockovich' is a close rival to these films for Soderbergh.  The real beauty
of the film is the way Soderbergh pays close attention to detail and makes
every scene extremely believable in the pursuit of a small law firm taking
on a gigantic monster of a company and doing a good job of it.  It shouldn't
be too hard to figure out the ending of the film but films of this nature
rarely end any other way, especially with big Hollywood stars not wanting to
cheat their fans but I'm still not giving away the extraordinary details of
how the case ends up.
Erin involves herself with a guy named George (Aaron Eckhart), and this
needless romantic sub plot is probably what prevents the movie from earning
a four star rating but you can't have everything I suppose.  The film also
boasts performances from actors such as Peter Coyote, Conchata Ferrell, and
Marg Helgenberger and these roles could help their careers greatly.
With all of the advanced press Julia Roberts has been getting for this film,
I can't leave this review without mentioning the excellent work by Albert
Finney who should be Oscar nominated if Roberts is and both of them
certainly deserve it at this point.  Finney is a guy who has been nominated
four times the Oscar between 1963 and 1984 and all of the nominations have
come in leading roles.  His first role was in 1960's 'Saturday Night and
Sunday Morning' and David Lean wanted Finney for the leading Peter O'Toole
part in 'Lawrence of Arabia'.  He is one of the most under rated of the
British actors who makes a great comeback in this movie.
Julia Roberts proves here that she earns every penny of her salary and
audiences can revel in the fact that with so many disappointments early in
2000, this film is one of the early year gems that will carry it's quality
to next year's Oscar ceremonies.  Let's keep our fingers crossed.
A film must receive a three star rating or higher to be eligible for a
recommendation.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
In memory of Stanley Kubrick - July 26, 1928 to March 7, 1999.
Isn't it odd that on the day (July 16, 1999) that Stanley Kubrick's last
film, 'Eyes' Wide Shut' opens, that it marks the 30th anniversary of the day
the Apollo 11 space mission was launched and its occupants would be the
first men on the moon four days later on July 20, 1969.  Since a film about
a space odyssey is Kubrick's masterpiece, I feel the space time continuum
rumbling around us.  : - )
Where were you when Stanley Kubrick died?  Kubrick died in the early morning
hours of March 7, 1999.....a Sunday.  I had been out late with friends the
night before and slept in until about noon and I was lying in bed trying to
wake up by watching t.v. --- as if that works!  While channel surfing, CNN's
Headline News had the story at the top of its 30-minute newscast and I
jumped out of bed and ran out to tell my family of the news.  Kubrick's
death was overshadowed the next day as baseball legend Joe DiMaggio passed
away.  Since he hadn't turned out a film in 12 years since 1987's 'Full
Metal Jacket', Kubrick worked for two years in the final process, filming
his last picture which is an appropriate swan song for those who understand
his vision and those who don't.  That aspect of his work never changed
throughout the decades and there's no reason to believe that Kubrick would
change to conventional film making so late in life.  Kubrick would also
stick to his re-occurring theme of dehumanization for his final film.
In no small way, I am deeply convinced in the strictest of terms that 'Eyes
Wide Shut' ranks right up there with Kubrick's great classics such as 'Dr.
Strangelove' (1964), '2001: A Space Odyssey' (1968), and his most
controversial film (maybe not anymore) 'A Clockwork Orange' (1971).  Kubrick
has explored every aspect of human nature under the most meticulous
circumstances.  You could practically write an entire book on each one of
his landmark films.  His thorough examinations of war, social strife,
political incompetence, technology running amok, showing that times change
but people don't, prove that Kubrick was way ahead of his generation.  His
take on sex hasn't been seen with such broad study since 1962's 'Lolita' and
that film is now a Sunday school film compared to 'Eyes Wide Shut'.
Tom Cruise plays Dr. Bill Harford, an M.D. married happily (or so it seems)
for nine years to his wife Alice (Nicole Kidman).  The two of them have a
seven year old daughter.  One night will attending a party of high society
thrown by a colleague of Bill's (Sydney Pollack), some degrading things
begin to happen in the lives of the main characters that will affect them
over the next 24 hours that will undoubtedly change their lives forever.
Alice dances with a handsome and much older Hungarian man with some
distinguished grey whose personality is that of a poet who likes to seduce
women.  Bill is hit on by some young women at the affair, sometimes two at a
time and helps his colleague and party host out of a jam when a girl with
whom the host has been having sex, almost overdoes on cocaine and heroine in
the upstairs bathroom.
After arriving home, Bill and Alice let the pot they've been smoking open
some new sides to their personality.  As their minds expand, they find there
is great sexual tension in their marriage and Alice reveals that she once
made love with a navy officer and was willing to throw everything in her
life away, including her family, in order to be with this man for only a
brief time.  Bill is blown away by this.  From the audience's point of view,
his assumed fidelity towards his wife goes unrewarded and he leaves the
apartment for a sexual exploration of his own in New York city's
underground.  You must see the rest of this film for yourself to believe it,
enjoy it and be artfully shocked by it.  There is one harrowing scene at a
party attended by a couple of hundred people out at a mansion in the
countryside that is unforgettable.  It's a sex ritual and orgy that is
clandestine, posh and upscale, and for adults only where everyone wears
formal dress, cloaks and capes, and masks.  At one point, there are no words
spoken.  It is only what looks and feels like a soliloquy of mime art.  It
is a scene that ranks right up there with the opening war room scene in 'Dr.
Strangelove', the computer malfunction in '2001: A Space Odyssey' and the
climactic scene of Malcolm McDowell's lidlocked eyes during the final stages
of brain washing in 'A Clockwork Orange'.
At the centre of the film's main characterizations, 'Eyes Wide Shut' is more
about fore play than it is sex.  The scenes involving sexual display are
tastefully done and there is a lot more innuendo in the film than you may
have been led to believe during the film's advanced publicity.
Kubrick, for the last time in his career, uses many unknown actors to sell
his message and does it brilliantly.  He makes a mega star like Tom Cruise
fit in well with these people and never gives one character in a minor
supporting role domination over another.  In a major supporting role, Sydney
Pollack is sensational.  I always said that he should have received a Best
Supporting Actor nomination for 1982's 'Tootsie'.  Directing himself as
Dustin Hoffman's neurotic talent agent, Pollack was hilarious in a role he
made totally convincing.  Nicole Kidman is very admirable in her role in
'Eyes Wide Shut'.  I would have liked to have seen more of her acting talent
used in the film but she is not as dominating in the film's second half.
Carrying this film for the better part of the way the same as he did in
'Born on the Fourth of July' is Tom Cruise.  Forget his marketable name,
forget his early juvenile films and give this man the credit he deserves.
Cruise exhibits sexual frustration and a wrestling match with his conscience
superbly in this film as a man with an unwavering amount of decency in the
perverse world he discovers.  It's a challenge any actor would have
difficulty with and Cruise holds his own with any other actor that could
have played this role.  Two Oscar nominations and his ability to act equally
as well opposite Dustin Hoffman, Jack Nicholson and Paul Newman (who heaped
well deserved praise on Cruise), make Cruise that rare commodity of actor
AND movie star and those who don't see his talent can only hope to in the
future.
What is truly remarkable about the ending of 'Eyes Wide Shut' is the way it
is strangely fitting as to what happens to the film's characters.  Kubrick
intentionally leaves it open to intense debate as to whether or not it is
the correct ending and I'm sure he counted on this.  Not knowing he would
never see the reaction film audiences around the world would have to it
makes Kubrick's death all the more untimely and his movies will forever
speak to us in a way he never could personally.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Litigation and communication.  The key to being a good lawyer and having
a successful legal career.  Those unsuccessful at it usually become
politicians.  What do you call a thousand lawyers chained to the bottom
of the ocean?  Generally, a good start.  An old joke but usually it
works just as well as "Take my wife, please!"  Tom Cruise's character in
'A Few Good Men' said cases aren't won by the law, they're won by the
lawyers and a court case is a sales pitch and in 1990's 'Reversal of
Fortune', an observation is made that cases are usually won in the field
and not in the court room.
It isn't often that a court room movie comes along where the ending
isn't predictable.  Left off of the American Film Institute's list last
year of 400 films nominated as the best in the first century of film was
Sidney Lumet's 1982 masterpiece 'The Verdict'.  That film used silence
to permeate the film with astounding brilliance.  Director Steven
Zaillian tries the same thing here and it is generally successful but at
times muted.
'A Civil Action' stars John Travolta as a Massachusetts lawyer who,
along with three partners, (William H. Macy, Tony Shalhoub and Zeljko
Ivanek) takes on a civil case in the form of a class action suit led by
a mother (Kathleen Quinlan) who wants answers to why some of the
children in the small town where she lives, have died of leukemia. 
Twelve strange and unexplained deaths that all seem connected to the
town's drinking water and where a tannery operates - dumping thousands
of gallons of run off chemicals into the water.  Quinlan says she
doesn't want money, just an explanation of why the children died and for
someone to apologize.  The company hires a huge law firm whose lead
counsel (Robert Duvall) is an attorney who's practiced law for 45 years
and Duvall's character is one of the most interesting in the film.  Not
a great performance but one of sheer wisdom both in and out of character
as Duvall gets many chances to upstage the people on screen that he's
working with but he falls just short of doing so.
John Travolta's performance is somewhat contained.  He doesn't find a
lot of avenues to truly make his performance memorable but he does a
good job at making us believe he's a lawyer and our hearts go out to him
and and his partners when they make career decisions that bankrupt them,
and nearly destroy their lives.  Perhaps the most disappointing thing
about the film is the use of John Lithgow as the judge.  Like so many
other court room films, the judge is the least interesting character. 
The two performances that won me over the most in this flick were those
of William H. Macy and James Gandolfini who plays a conscience stricken
employee of the plant who wants to help the plaintiffs because he has
many children of his own.  One of the most memorable scenes in the film
has no dialogue.  It is a dinner scene where Gandolfini watches as his
wife pours each member of the family a glass of water and he looks
skeptical about its effects.  Macy is wrenching as the rebellious lawyer
wanting a quick fix and knowing when to cut his losses.  Too bad no one
listens to him.
Director Steven Zaillian ('Searching for Bobby Fischer') and the Oscar
winning writer of 'Schindler's List', structures his film with his own
screenplay based on the book by Jonathan Harr, in a credible and even
manner while letting the story tower over any other aspect of the film
and since it's based on a true story, Zaillian compliments the material
even more by letting it think for the audience rather than the other way
around and in a film like this it's more than a compliment to the
public, it's a welcomed public service announcement in the form of a not
so obvious morality play!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Reds (1981)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
It would have been easy for Warren Beatty to make his masterpiece 'Reds'
only about the Russian revolution of 1917.  The film is also a torrid
romance, a semi documentary feature in many ways, a panoramic and
exquisitely filmed motion picture that in many ways is better than David
Lean's great 'Doctor Zhivago' and, if you disagree with that, is
certainly a great companion piece to that film.  The thrust of Beatty's
sensational and provocative film lies in the fact that Beatty not only
tells a story about the revolution of communism in Russia, but tells it
from the stand point of an American journalist, himself a communist, who
was able to enrage and yet strongly soothe his colleagues with his ideas
of how the world should be run.  Beatty plays John Reed, an man whose
literary work 'Ten Days That Shook the World', would be the inspiration
for this film which includes Reed's passionate and stormy relationship
with fellow journalist Louise Bryant (Diane Keaton), who gives the best
performance in the film.
The film begins during World War I and has a very unusual narrative.
Witnesses in the form of ordinary people are displayed on camera as
being interviewed in documentary fashion and tell many aspects of the
film's story through their own experiences and the film displays the
pictures of it all.  John Reed believes that America's involvement in
the war is purely economical and is for nothing more than profit.  His
motives are found to be puzzling by many, including Louise Bryant, who
wants to interview him.  He explains that he doesn't do interviews (in
many ways, a reflection of the real Warren Beatty) but he is strangely
attracted to her and the two of them fall in love throughout the course
of the film.
John Reed's crusade takes him to Europe to spread his propaganda and his
words at home about the dismantling of all things capitalistic are seen
as treasonous by the government.  John has many friends, some of whom
are eventually exposed as mere acquaintances.  There is the great
literary genius Eugene O'Neill (Jack Nicholson) who has an affair with
Louise and mocks John's political beliefs.  Louis Fraina (Paul Sorvino)
who is one of Reed's somewhat confused political operatives.  Grigory
Zinoviev (Jerzy Kosinski), Reed's subversive revolutionary companion in
Russia and his hard line colleague in communist propaganda back in
America, Emma Goldman (Maureen Stapleton).  There are many other
character actors and great talents in the film such as Edward Herrmann,
Josef Sommer, George Plimpton, M. Emmet Walsh and the superb Gene
Hackman who, surprisingly, has a very small role in the picture as a
right wing magazine editor.
Where the film is a little weak is in the way that it tells its love
story between Reed and Bryant.  The outline and execution of it is a
little corny and detracts from the story of the revolution.  It isn't
bad beyond belief but it could have been trimmed a little bit.  To
compensate for it, the film tells of John Reed's battle with kidney
infections and his eventual loss of one of them and a warning from his
doctor that he must slow down if he wants to live a full and healthy
life and the film's most impressive turning point is when Reed is doomed
to come back to America after a warrant is issued for his arrest for
wanting to overthrow the government and Louise Bryant follows him to
Russia and searches for him vigourously.
'Reds' won three Oscars.  For Best Director (Warren Beatty), Best
Supporting Actress (Maureen Stapleton), and Best Cinematography
(Vittorio Storaro).  It had twelve nominations including Best Picture
and Best Original Screenplay by Beatty and Trevor Griffiths and Robert
Towne worked on the script in an uncredited manner as he does on many
films.
I find it interesting that at the time of its release in 1981, 'Reds'
was the heavy favourite for the Best Picture Oscar and lost to the very
deserving 'Chariots of Fire'.  With communism still a serious threat to
the world in 1981, it would be inconceivable to imagine the Academy
giving a Best Picture Oscar to the story of an American who believed in
communism.  Perhaps now that the iron curtain has fallen, the film would
have won if it had come out today since communism looks less likely to
impose any real threat to the planet.  It may have been an untimely
release but nevertheless is a pleasure to look back on as its subject
matter is fascinating and relatively educational for many generations
--- most importantly, those yet to come.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
John Frankenheimer's films are always perplexing.  They have a sharp yet
ordinary look to them and they still manage to entertain highly.
Frankenheimer's (and Frank Sinatra's) 'The Manchurian Candidate' from
1962 is perhaps the best espionage thriller ever made and
Frankenheimer's work as director on other films such as 'Birdman of
Alcatraz' (1962), 'Grand Prix' (1966), the disappointing but well
meaning 'The French Connection II' (1975) and 'Black Sunday' (1977) have
put him in an important light in the chapters of film history.
Frankenheimer doesn't always like to use a lot of music in his films
because his gripping plot lines can sing a different tune.
'Ronin' is a film that makes Robert De Niro look great.  His character
is an enigma and De Niro plays it exactly that way.  We assume that he
is or has been some sort of covert operator earlier in his life who is
now working in Europe with a group of others in the same business who
are all of different nationalities.  There is the Frenchman (Jean Reno)
who De Niro strikes up an off beat friendship with.  An Irish woman
(Natascha McElhone) and her companion (Jonathan Pryce), an ex-KGB
computer whiz (Stellan Skarsgard), a weapons specialist (Sean Bean) and
the group's driver (Skipp Sudduth).
They're all working together to obtain a mysterious steel suitcase which
contains something worth killing for and before its sold to a group of
high bidding Russians, the attempts to get it make for the film's best
action sequences.  The film's beginning and first half hour are
extremely simple and Frankenheimer turns the heat up slowly, comparable
to watching a pot of water boil on your stove.  Slow but worth the
wait.  The rhythm the film has is genuine in all its clever little
tidbits as the little things in this film truly count as much as the big
things do.
Exquisite European photography is the setting as Paris is the film's
central focus for the story and Frankenheimer uses his camera like a
bullet at times and stretches every action sequence's tension out to its
fullest extent.
De Niro's early work in the movies looked extremely low-key.  His
performances in 'The Godfather Part II' (1974) and 'Taxi Driver' (1976)
had De Niro doing a lot of method acting without a lot of emotion in his
roles, sort of like Gary Cooper.  Both of those actors and their subtle
ways actually had great strength.  Certainly, those roles were much
different than De Niro's roles in 'The King of Comedy' (1983) and 'Cape
Fear' (1991) where De Niro never did let up with those "in your face"
type of performances. 'Ronin' is vintage De Niro.  A film where De Niro
can give a good, low-key performance while giving the rest of the cast
their fair share of the spotlight and a film where director John
Frankenheimer can still exhibit his style as one of film's best
espionage directors.  A style that along with De Niro's, works for all
generations.
Visit the new home of FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
'Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me' (1999)
'Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me' is one of the most schizophrenic
films I've ever seen.  They thrown in some new characters that work and some
that don't.  Between the three characters that Mike Myers plays, one is
horrible, one is excellent and one is somewhere in the middle.  Throw in a
leading lady with a poor sense of comic timing and given very little
direction, and this sequel to the 1997 film caught me by surprise with just
how tastelessly bizarre and unfunny it actually is in many places.
The film opens pretty much where it left off and Dr. Evil (Mike Myers
character #1) is making a return to the Earth where he plots revenge against
Austin Powers (Mike Myers character #2) for foiling his plot in the first
film.  Austin and his new bride Vanessa (Elizabeth Hurley in a brief cameo
in bizarre contrast to the first film) are on their honeymoon when things go
awry and from there we learn that Dr. Evil's plan is to go back to 1967, the
time when both he and Austin Powers were both cryogenically frozen in the
first film, and steal Austin's "mojo".  This is apparently a chemical
compound that gives Austin his groove, his swinging sense of style and his
ability to do his job as a super agent with these qualities intact.  Once
weakened, Dr. Evil will attempt to blackmail world forces out of 100 billion
dollars or he will turn his deadly laser gun loose on the Earth from outer
space and will start by destroying Washington, D.C.
Dr. Evil's plan is to add some new and somewhat lethal characters to his
roster and they include one called Fat Bastard, a totally repulsive and
awful character played by Myers and an ingenious and totally whacked out and
hilarious creation Dr. Evil calls Mini-me, a clone 1/8 the size of himself
(Verne Troyer).  One of Dr. Evil's right hand men, Number 2 (Robert Wagner)
is portrayed in 1967 by Rob Lowe as a younger version of that character and
it took me a while to figure out if it was Rob Lowe speaking with Robert
Wagner's voice over dubbed or Lowe doing his own impression.  It sounded
like the latter which was mildly amusing.  Seth Green is back as Dr. Evil's
son Scott as is Mindy Sterling returns as the Nazi-ish Frau Farbissina.
On Austin's side of the playing field, there is the return of Basil
Exposition (Michael York), Austin's boss and a somewhat cardboard character
and this time, filling in for Vanessa Kensington is Felicity Shagwell
(Heather Graham) who looks great but is an extremely bland leading lady with
little life or zest for her role.
The only parts of this installment in the Austin Powers series I enjoyed
were the ones where Dr. Evil is on screen.  Austin Powers is only average in
this one and the fat Bastard character is repulsive, unfunny and disgusting
and may actually and literally make you sick.  Mini-me is a charmer and the
rest of the film's new characters are only average.  'Austin Powers: The Spy
Who Shagged Me' tries to copy 1998's 'There's Something About Mary' with
some gross-out gags that are unnecessary, jaw-dropping and unbelievably
repellent.  Perhaps they figured with such a different look, many wouldn't
notice but those who enjoy film viewing as a hobby can't help but notice.
The film intentionally leaves the door open for a third film and perhaps a
third film would do better if it relied on creating some original humour
rather than lampooning films like the 007 series, 'Star Wars', 'Apollo 13',
the Matt Helm series and others as well.  With all of its campy and silly
infrastructure, perhaps it might be better to get a new director as well.
The director of the two Austin Powers movies, Jay Roach, looks like he'd be
better at directing mindless and insulting television commercials.  How
about getting David or Jerry Zucker ('Airplane!', 'The Naked Gun') or even
John Landis who is great at irreverent comedy.  At least there would be
something to actually laugh at if these guys were at the controls.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Heaven Can Wait (1978)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Not to be confused as a remake of the 1943 film 'Heaven Can Wait' starring
Gene Tierney, Don Ameche, Charles Coburn and Marjorie Main, Warren Beatty's
1978 film 'Heaven Can Wait' is actually a remake of 1941's 'Here Comes Mr.
Jordan' starring Robert Montgomery, Claude Rains (as Mr. Jordan), Evelyn
Keyes, Rita Johnson and James Gleason (Jackie's father) in which a prize
fighter is taken to Heaven before his time by a blundering guardian angel and
upon attempting to return Montgomery's soul to his Earthly body, a discovery
is made that the body has been cremated and a new body must be found for his
spirit.  It's a pleasant enough film but Beatty's remake is far superior.
 'Here Comes Mr. Jordan' looks rushed at times with many scenes resembling
the mark of only a couple takes per scene being done but Warren Beatty is a
director who added more sentimental emotion to a fantasy film laced with
moments of comedy.  
Nominated for 9 Oscars - Best Picture, Actor (Warren Beatty), Supporting
Actor (Jack Warden), Supporting Actress (Dyan Cannon), Director (Beatty and
Buck Henry), Adapted Screenplay (Elaine May and Beatty), Cinematography and
Music Score (it would only win one for the film's Art Direction/Set
Decoration), Beatty starred as a quarterback for the Los Angeles Rams who
gets into the same predicament as Montgomery did mentioned in the first
paragraph.  James Mason co-starred as Mr. Jordan and the rest of the cast
shines very well in this film that is strangely moving towards the end but
gives no impression of that throughout its running time of only 100 minutes.
The interesting thing about this movie is that Beatty would be the only
filmmaker in history to receive Oscar nominations in the category of acting,
writing, producing and directing for a single film twice.  Once for 'Heaven
Can Wait' and again in 1981 for his epic true story of American communist
John Reed in 'Reds'.  Beatty would get one Oscar in all for directing 'Reds'.
It is rare for a remake to be better than its original but 'Heaven Can Wait'
is a film that looks better if you can see 'Here Comes Mr. Jordan' as a
companion piece around the same time.  Both are available on home video.

Title
Review for Inventing the Abbotts (1997)
A small town in Illinois in 1957 is the setting for the opening of 'Inventing
the Abbotts', a film about relationships that plays out more like a series of
home movies and family photographs rather than as a full length motion
picture.  Three young women from a wealthy family (Liv Tyler, Jennifer
Connelly and Joanna Going) examine their lives and make decisions about life
at home, careers, raising children and examing their own morals. They are
swept up in their tasks by two brothers (Joaquin Phoenix and Billy Crudup)
who desire to escape from their borderline poverty stricken lives to perhaps
marry into the wealthy family while providing love and companionship to their
widowed mother played by Kathy Baker ('Picket Fences').  
Will Patton is the head of the town's wealthy family who is strict in his
convictions about the future of his daughters.  At first one daughter, played
by Going, marries a wealthy young man at the insistence of her parents and
later has a child by him and ends up in an unhappy marriage.  Another
daughter (Connelly) who is the family tramp has a romantic fling with Crudup
while both brothers desire her.  Lastly, the nicest and most down to earth
daughter (Tyler) has a passion for Phoenix and thier relationship is the
centre of the film's focus and conflicts arise on all sides throughout the
course of the film.
"Bland" is the word to describe this slow moving and often lazy film which
has terrible performances from its leads (Tyler and Phoenix) and is a film
which never gets off the ground and offers no twists or surprises in its plot
to take it to another level.  The film spans its way well into the 1960's and
the characters are virtually the same at the end of the movie as they were at
the beginning with a predictable outcome as well.  Director Pat O'Connor has
no zest for filmmaking and his interpretation of boy meets girl, boy loses
girl and boy gets girl back is a tiresome one at best.  'Inventing the
Abbotts' is a disappointing slice of American life from an era in history
that many considered America's finest.  Too bad this movie doesn't live up to
the same expectations. 

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Written by Matt Damon and his best friend Ben Affleck, who also appears 
in the film as Damon's best friend, 'Good Will Hunting' was created on 
paper before the two of them were struggling to break into show business, 
growing up in South Boston and setting their own goals.  For Damon, it's 
a smart move, much in the same approach that Billy Bob Thornton took 
in 1996 as he wrote the screenplay to 'Sling Blade', and adapted it for 
the big screen as an independent film and Thornton had the starring
role.
Beginning at MIT (The Massachusetts Institute of Technology), 'Good Will
Hunting' begins with a math professor (Stellan Skarsgard), who gives a 
complex math problem to his class and offers an incentive to the first
one 
that can solve it.  It took the professor two and a half years to solve
it so
what a challenge for his students!  He writes the problem on the
blackboard 
outside the classroom and later a janitor in the building (Matt Damon)
solves 
the problem almost without thinking about it.  This really isn't work
for 
him but being a janitor is and he resists attempts at developing his
gift of mathematical brain power.
Damon later gets arrested for assault and the judge agrees to release
him to the care of the professor who arranges for several court ordered
tasks to be performed as part of an agreement to keep Damon out of jail
and he has Damon introduced to a therapist, (Robin Williams) and Damon
meets his match in this clever and eager elder who wants to help Damon
find his true inner self.
There are many observations one can make after viewing 'Good Will
Hunting'.  The most acute observation that will probably be made by most
is that it tells the story of an ordinary young man with extraordinary
abilities.  Although most of us can't identify with his genius for
solving mathematical problems, we can identify with the relationship he
has with his friends, his elders and the lady in his life (Minnie
Driver).  This is the most uplifting film I've seen since 1989's 'My
Left Foot'
and 'Good Will Hunting' leaps off the pages of its script and unfolds
like a 
play with a simple look, a complex set of characters and a desire to do 
what films of this type should always do, educate and enlighten.  It
also has brilliantly coherent dialogue and a story of many personal
bondings 
that will make movie audiences feel better about themselves when they 
leave the theatre.
The performances all around are nothing short of miraculous guided by 
the surprisingly inspired direction of Gus Van Sant ('My Own Private 
Idaho', 'Drugstore Cowboy', 'To Die For') who makes the entire film
bright with flashes of real life characters brought to the point of not
only 
becoming better people by the end of the film but Van Sant was able to
keep everyone on their mark by following his direction exactly.  This is
evident by the completely humourless performance by Robin Williams who
doesn't
inject one funny moment in his usual witty and manic style of comedy and
its
the best film role Robin Williams has ever had.  Even in two of his
three
Oscar nominated roles, 'Dead Poet Society' and 'The Fisher King',
Williams
still injected moments of unexpected humour but there is none contained
in
'Good Will Hunting' and it is a refreshing breath of air as Williams
finally
begins to explore his true potential. 
'Good Will Hunting' has a ring of Oscar potential to it but more
importantly 
than that, it really can provide lessons in helping people sort out
their 
lives with only one viewing. 
http://home.netinc.ca/wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
     The title of 'Speed 2: Cruise Control' is an oxy-moron.  The film is
anything but in control whether it's intentional or not.  What made the first
film so incredible was that confined areas had plausible scenes of tension
with a couple of exceptions.  There was also a genuine acceptance for the
second rate characters and a villain with panache and flamboyance.  A lot of
that is missing from this sequel that suffers from being nothing more than a
crashing bore.
     In one of the first opening scenes of 'Speed 2' we are asked to believe
that reckless driving is funny and is part of being a free spirit as Sandra
Bullock flunks out on her driving test and her boyfriend (Jason Patric) is a
member of the LAPD just as her companion (Keanu Reeves) was from the first
film.  We are told she apparently broke up with Reeves because of the
dangerous nature of his job.  Why would she hook up with a guy in the same
line of work?  You can tell that Patric's role was originally intended for
Reeves who decided not to make this sequel and he is off the hook from a
badly written movie.  
     Bullock is astoundingly annoying in this film and director Jan DeBont
who made the first film and 1996's 'Twister' should have recognized the bad
jokes, frumpy dialogue and razor thin interest that 'Speed 2' would generate.
 I guess his background as a noted cinematographer has not allowed him at
this point to catch these academic errors.  
     Willem Dafoe is a mad bomber this time around who sabotages Bullock and
Patric's cruise in the Caribbean with computers and gadgets of assorted
terror and his motivation is bent on revenge against the system that Dennis
Hopper's villain had from the first film.  Dafoe doesn't look like he's
having all that much fun playing the bad guy this time around and that's
suspicious.  Jason Patric, who is such a good actor is naturally expected to
save the day with his experience as a police officer but this time around his
faceless, dull expressions make Keanu Reeves look like a genius.
     This movie is an example that sometime less is more and while this
sequel is bigger in its presentation of special effects, it's a reminder that
quality and not quantity is what sells and that movie audiences don't want
their intelligence insulted

Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
Usually I don't compare sequels to their original.  This is an exception
to the rule because 18 years have passed between two films and you
instinctively will draw comparisons this time.  It's unavoidable.
You can't go home again.  Not true for all sequels but certainly for the
ones that try and top an established classic, especially when the
original classic has 18 years to gain status.  Jack Nicholson waited 16
years to make 'The Two Jakes', the sequel to 1974's 'Chinatown'.  It
failed.  James Cameron, currently riding high with the eventual Best
Picture Oscar winner for 1997, 'Titanic', made 'Aliens' in 1986 and it
topped the rather cerebral original 'Alien' from 1979.  The 'Star Wars'
franchise only had three years between all three films and the films
that followed the original 'Star Wars' weren't as good but they were
very close.
1980's 'The Blues Brothers' still defines itself as a cult classic with
a nutty blend of music, action, humour and cleverness and while that
film was original in its big screen concept, based of course on the
'Saturday Night Live' sketch, it still has a watchable presence which is
timeless.
'Blues Brothers 2000' doesn't understand that in order to make a sequel
work, you have to offer the same feeling of the original with a
different story.  This film couldn't be more different than the
original.  The film is almost totally lacking in action, it has TOO MUCH
music and not enough laughs, excitement, and it feels like a paper
weight laying still.
Why it's called 'Blues Brothers 2000' is a mystery to me.  Nobody in the
film is related and putting their band back together this time serves no
purpose.  The original had them putting the band back together to raise
money for the taxes due on a Catholic orphanage, but this time, there's
no reason to put it back together and no one cares.  This is a story
that didn't need to be told.  The original had all you could ask for.
Jake and Elwood were pursued by all the enemies you didn't want.  The
police, the army, rednecks, Nazis and even a scorned woman.  The premise
was so absurd that the way the films characteristics were shaped, it all
worked.
Jake Blues (John Belushi) is dead, in real life of course but also in
the story.  His brother Elwood (Dan Aykroyd) has been released from
prison after 18 years (remember the end of the original?) and he
searches for something to do with his life.  He visits 'The Penguin'
(Kathleen Freeman), the nun who raised him years ago in her orphanage.
She insists that Elwood be a mentor to 10 year old Buster (J. Evan
Bonifant) and later in the film, Elwood takes on two other members of
the band he will put together (John Goodman and Joe Morton).  Morton is
a commander with the Illinois State Police but later becomes a Blues
Brother when he "sees the light", literally.  Elwood also tracks down
other members of the band from the first film and they do it all again.
The film's music is by Paul Shaffer.  How did David Letterman's barely
passable sidekick get this assignment?  The film must have had a limited
budget which explains its lack of action and lack of memorable songs.
'Blues Brothers 2000' was directed by John Landis, who made the first
one and the picture is written by Dan Aykroyd and John Landis.  The two
of them wrote the original.
Many appearances made by celebrities and original cast members here have
far less bite than the original and the characters are reduced to
caricatures, especially in the case of John Goodman and it's actually
embarrassing at times.  So much so that the film's 122 minutes seem much
longer.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Tumbleweeds (1999)
I've always disliked the notion that a certain film has to be a 'guy' or
'girl' flick. It would be nice if directors, writers, and actors could give
a movie some interaction to make all films appeal at least in some part to
everyone. But I guess this is wishful thinking and while it's hard to make a
film like 'Rambo: First Blood Part II' appeal to women and a film like 'The
First Wives's Club' appeal to men, 'Tumbleweeds' has a look and feel to it
that appeals equally to men as it does to women whom I suspect were the
target audience. It's an interesting film that can be enjoyed by both
genders but I wouldn't recommend it as a date film.
There's a movie from 1990 with Cher, Winona Ryder, Bob Hoskins and Christina
Ricci entitled 'Mermaids'. In this movie, Cher plays a mother raising her
two daughters with a large degree of instability. She travels around the
United States from one city to another and takes odd jobs and when she's had
enough, she packs up and moves again. An experience which can be good or bad
for children growing up, depending, of course, on the individual.
'Tumbleweeds' has a similar pattern but is a rather scattershot way of
telling a story.
Janet McTeer stars as Mary Jo Walker, a mother with similar habits as the
Cher character....traveling from one city to another with a young daughter
in tow and as the film opens, there is a scene of domestic unpleasantness,
something that would sort of set the tone for the rest of the picture which
doesn't have a lot of focus but one that is extremely well acted by the
entire cast. McTeer's character echoes trailer park trash. The booze, the
men, the affairs, all done while her daughter Ava (Kimberly Brown) knows
exactly what her mother is up to. Given the fact that McTeer is English,
makes her performance all the more remarkable as she has to master a
southern U.S. accent and learn the habits of a completely different culture.
She has a knack for selecting the wrong friends, both male and female which
usually lands her in trouble.
Ava finds a leading part in her latest school's play and tries to make the
most of it and do something that will make herself and her mother proud.
Given the fact that her mother has been married four times, gives Ava the
longing to do something productive and it's rare and quite nice to see a
daughter teach her parent something rather than the other way around. There
is something unusual that gives Ava a different look at life. The play she
stars in at school is a version of 'Romeo and Juliet' where she will
play.....Romeo! The reversal of gender for the sake of a school play seems
like a good idea but not all are crazy about the notion.
Another plus for the movie is how it teaches us not to judge people so
quickly. There is strong shade of decency underneath Mary Jo's wild and open
lifestyle. She really cares for her daughter. She is willing to be a loving
wife to the right man and her
willingness to be accepted by other people seems secondary to her
independence.
The challenge for first time director Gavin O'Connor is finding something of
a revelation in the lives of these characters that embodies something
original or at least something familiar with a refreshing twist. One thing I
enjoyed was the fact that O'Connor plays one of Mary Jo's beau hunks in the
film, a truck driver named Jack. She is usually scared off by the wrong kind
of man. Imagine her surprise when she inflames his seemingly good nature and
scares him off with her wild ways.
Even with all of these good things pointed out about the film, it stops just
short of getting a recommendation for several reasons. The film looks
hurried and rushed through production. It smacks of a low budget that shows.
Low budget films are often better than the real expensive Hollywood
offerings, but in this case, it looked too much like a film that could have
used more rehearsals, sort of like those 1940's war time pictures that were
done with only a couple of takes because film, like all things during that
period, were rationed.
Secondly, as appealing as this film is to both men and women, the male
characters are given a rather secondary role in the film and we never get to
know any of them extremely well. The very under rated Jay O. Sanders isn't
given a whole lot to do and a familiar actor like Michael J. Pollard, who
plays Mary Jo's boss, is little more than a hack character, sort of like the
inept way he played in 1989's 'Next of Kin' where he played a flophouse
manager with an IQ of about 1. Here, his job is a little more important but
he still plays it like 'Forrest Gump'. 'Tumbleweeds', written by director
O'Connor and Angela Shelton, would have been better off as a play, with the
chance to re-vamp its story where you can do many things in live theatre but
the art of film is permanent, not always a good thing for those who don't
always make the right decisions.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
I've always been fascinated with crime movies and their stories of police
investigation that make them so memorable and while some are too obvious and
others are excruciatingly difficult to follow in detail, 'L.A. Confidential'
has found the perfect medium ground suitable to entertain, inform and move
its audience with stunning reality.
'L.A. Confidential' has such a wide variety of characters rich in personality
development that you'll probably find one of these people you'll most likely
identify with.  It has all the classic developments of a crime story but even
more significantly than that, this movie dwells not only on its characters
but on creating an identity which is separate from any other film like it.  
Set in the early 1950's in Los Angeles, 'L.A. Confidential' examines the
professional lives of three police officers played in brilliant ensemble
fashion by Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe and Guy Pearce.  Spacey is the veteran
cop who knows how to bend the rules when seeking justice but knows how to
restrain himself and escape the probes of Internal Affairs and he refuses to
testify in any way against any of his brother officers who may face criminal
charges while Crowe is the maverick cop who will kill, frame and beat
suspects he knows to be guilty in order to put them behind bars and Pearce is
the straight-laced, by-the-book and clean cut cop who wears glasses and is
told by everyone to 'lose them'.
Telling the story of crime in Los Angeles in the best style of film noir
possible, 'L.A. Confidential' proceeds with several sub plots including one
involving Spacey's professional relationship with a photo/journalist (Danny
De Vito) whose ethical practice is questionable and while he certainly is an
unattractive character, his information and dialogue exchanges with Spacey
enhance the story that many viewers should pay close attention to.  Another
bonus to this movie's credit is the way each of the three cops react when
faced with their most important scenes in the movie involving the discovery
of vital information which may cost them their lives.  It's a challenge that
director Curtis Hanson is constantly faced with in distinguishing his
characters apart from each other and it's a challenge he overcomes with great
results.  
At the core of this movie's fascinating and sharply perceptive theme is a
constant reminder of how far crime has advanced over the last four and a half
decades and the movie wrestles with the moral dilema and difficult question
of police ethics and will leave audiences debating the question of how far
cops can bend the rules in acceptable fashion if we are to agree that it's
acceptable at all.  
A coffee shop's mass murder dubbed the 'Nite Owl Massacre' is the focus of
the film's main investigation which leads the police to probing the
developmet of organized crime and which may involve corruption at a very high
level within the police force.  'L.A. Confidential' has a unique and vivid
style of keeping its writing fresh and alive courtesy of the film's authors
(Brian Helgeland and Curtis Hanson based on the novel by James Ellroy) and
has sultry photography and an over all impressive re-creation of the early
1950's and will leave a lasting impression on those willing to embrace its
classic style of story telling.  Other members of the notable cast are James
Cromwell, Kim Basinger and David Strathairn.  

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
'The English Patient' is a most lavish and exquisitely filmed epic set
just before and during World War II.  Producer Saul Zaentz who has won two
Academy Awards for his development of 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest'
(1975) and 'Amadeus' (1984) brings us this romantic saga that packs a
peculiar power in spite of its dramatic shortcomings.  A member of the
Royal Geographical Society (Ralph Fiennes) has crashed his plane in the
Sahara Desert and is aided by Arabs and a Canadian nurse (Juliette
Binoche).  He is treated for his injuries by her as Allied forces are
travelling through Italy and a Canadian spy, code named "moose" (Willem
Dafoe) arrives on the scene and suspects Fiennes is a member of the German
army.  There is a spark of romantic hint between Binoche and Fiennes which
puts him in mind of a past affair prior to the outbreak of the war with a
married woman (Kristin Scott Thomas).  The story travels back and fourth
from the present to the past told in flashbacks through Fiennes' thoughts.
 This film is based on the novel by Canadian author Michael Ondaatje and
is adapted for the screen by writer and director Anthony Minghella who
combines breathtaking photography by John Seale and rather low key but
interesting performances by this first rate cast.  Its running time of 161
minutes is rather absorbing beyond what it should be and the picture sags
rather badly in its midsection but it is redeemed by a satisfying
conclusion which is both moving and somewhat tragic depending on your
point of view.  Actor Ralph Fiennes is truly a compelling leading man and
proved his acting ability to audiences world wide by turning in a
superlative performance three years ago in 'Schindler's List' as a bone
chilling Nazi commander which brought him an Oscar nomination as Best
Supporting Actor for which he should have won.  'The English Patient' is
more for film buffs than for general audiences and is an intelligent and
literate story told with sensitivity and compassion.

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Imagine, if you will, the embarrassment of participating in a tabloid
t.v. talk show, believing you are going to get a free makeover and
instead your best friend reveals that that she is having an affair with
your husband.  Shocking?  Yes, of course.  Or is it?  Welcome to life in
the 90's.  We have been trained through the tabloid media (and in some
cases, the mainstream media) in our society whether its print, t.v.,
radio, Internet access, etc., to be less shocked at the outrageous than
at any other time this century; to accept the decadent behaviour of
others and laugh it off as if it were nothing.  Yet some are still
shocked by what happens to them in life.
In 'Hope Floats', Sandra Bullock stars as an average, everyday person
who gets duped by the situation described in the opening paragraph.  She
then leaves Chicago and travels to her hometown of Smithville, Texas,
and moves back in with her mother (Gena Rowlands).  She brings her
daughter with her (Mae Whitman).  Her little girl is about 8 and is at
that very impressionable age where observations can direct the course of
her life and disappointment can be difficult to deal with.  She begins
to re-unite with members of the community with whom she went to high
school and gets a job working in a photo shop.  Bullock was the "corn
queen" in her youth in the small town, a type of beauty or prom queen if
you will who still looks very good.  One of the people that she meets is
an old flame (Harry Connick Jr.) and while she isn't over the loss of
her husband, a little spark of romantic history between her and Connick
is visible.
In the first hour of the film, most of the best lines, written by Steven
Rogers, are delivered by the cast and while all the elements in the film
are obvious and predictable, I never get tired of watching ordinary
people living ordinary lives and I refuse to give in to the cynicism of
criticizing a film like this because of simple elements and there are
some very clever moments in 'Hope Floats' where dialogue floats like
spice and has a sugar coated core.
Directed Forest Whitaker has used his camera quite eloquently to capture
the hum drum (that's meant as a compliment) and likable elements of
small town life and guides his cast through the realities of life with
traditional elements of characterization developed in relating to the
everyday problems, joys and surprises of life's unpredictable path.
The film's strongest moments are when Gena Rowlands is on screen.  An
actress of vast experience and motherly charm in this film, she is the
rock of stability for her daughter and grand daughter and is the best
member of the cast.  The most under written member of the cast is Harry
Connick Jr.  His character isn't used to its full potential and this is
a disappointment.  At one point over dinner, Bullock refers to him using
her husband's name and this drew gasps of shock from some female members
of the audience with whom I viewed this film.
'Hope Floats' is a wonderful date movie, produced in part by Sandra
Bullock and despite its unoriginal story and overall presentation, I
can't disregard a movie that makes me feel good because that would be a
sin.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Blues Brothers, The (1980)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
Dan Aykroyd's best film as a talented writer is definitely 'The Blues
Brothers'.  His follow-up to it in 1998 entitled 'Blues Brothers 2000'
is simply horrible.  Testifying further to the fact that the worse the
sequel, the better the original really looks and is.  Only, however,
when you consider that the original people who put the first one
together also made this one.  'The Blues Brothers', written by Aykroyd
and the movie's director, John Landis, has so much going for it that it
works for one simple reason.  It achieved exactly what it was going
for..... irreverence.  It's the most irreverent film I've ever seen as
tons of cars are destroyed, every character is so unattractive and the
comedy avoids being mean spirited and comes off in a most delightfully
jabbing manner.  The movie is comparable to being poked in the ribs for
a good laugh and it's a shame that so many of its stars are now
deceased.
John Belushi (1949-1982), John Candy (1950-1994), and Cab Calloway
(1907-1994) are all deceased and the second film was no fun simply
because Belushi could not be in it and a film with such recognizable
cult status as 'The Blues Brothers' simply cannot duplicate itself
unless all of the original and important elements are intact.
Jake Blues (John Belushi) is released from prison at the beginning of
the film and is picked up by his brother Elwood (Dan Aykroyd) and the
two of them embark on a journey to pay a visit to a nun who was there
former guardian in an orphanage where they grew up.  She informs them
that $5,000 is needed to save the orphanage by paying its taxes and the
entire film is basically spent in the pursuit of raising the money as
the Blues Brothers get into more mischief and make more enemies in
comedic fashion than any other screen duo I can think of.
Things occur in their life that would scare the pants off of the average
man but the Blues Brothers seem so cool with their black suits, black
hats and black sunglasses (they even wear them at night) that nothing
gets them rattled.  Jumping over a raising bridge, nearly getting hit by
ammo from a rocket launcher and having their walls come literally
crashing down around them have them driving or walking away from it all
in style.  They really are more alike and truly act like siblings who
have a lot in common.
The real payoff in the film is the last half hour as a wild car chase
that lasts for 106 miles and peaks in downtown Chicago is truly a
classic and one of film history's most memorable action sequences.  Not
entirely noticeable when you consider that thrown into the mix are
persistent cops, gay nazis, country bar rednecks, jilted girlfriends and
the military.  The film's climax is way over the top but perfectly
executed as that is exactly what was intended and credit has to be given
to director John Landis as the king of irreverent comedy direction comes
across masterfully in making his best film.
There are more cars destroyed in this film than any other in recent
memory and even Steven Spielberg has a speaking cameo at the end of the
film as a tax clerk who is the Blues Brothers last contact with civilian
life before they get hauled away to.....well, see for yourself.  : - )
Avoid all television broadcasts of this film if you can and the only way
to truly appreciate it is on home video and DVD, and on DVD, extra lost
footage has been added that gives the film a running time of nearly 2
1/2 hours.  'The Blues Brothers' is either a film you'll love or despise
depending on your taste in comedy.  For low brow and non-critical fans,
you'll have a laugh since you don't care about much and for the more
serious and high brow movie fan, the wit and self indulgent tricks in
this film should be enough to give you one of the most memorable comedic
rides of your life.  Don't yield during this movie or you'll be
frustrated.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Characteristic of 1995's 'Toy Story', 'Antz', in my opinion is just as
good if not better.  It has all the classic makings of an animated
formula film which is ideal for somewhat older children, say those above
the age of 8 and isn't really suitable for very young children.  What I
enjoyed so much about the film was the abundance of rich detail brought
to every frame of this film which captures the everyday life in an ant
colony with humour, intrigue and an innocuous style of story telling.
Woody Allen is Z, the film's nerdy little protagonist, and the first
time we see Z, he's on a therapist's couch.  How appropriate.
Especially when we see Woody in his other films, sometimes playing a
neurotic in therapy as the character he voices here is.  Z is a
"worker".  At birth, an ant is judged by the colony as either a "worker"
or a "soldier".  The queen of the colony, voiced by Anne Bancroft, has a
beautiful (to an ant) daughter, the Princess Bala, voiced by Sharon
Stone.  The princess is engaged to the leader of the soldier's colony,
echoed by Gene Hackman as a cleverly created villain, giving 'Antz' the
strength it needs whereas 'Toy Story' lacked a villain you could really
latch onto for exciting leverage.
After finding out that the only way he can score with the Princess, whom
he is very fond of and whom he met one night at the ant nightclub of
sorts, Z changes places with his best friend, yo'ed!!! by Sylvester
Stallone, who is a soldier.  The adventure of being a soldier leads Z
into battle where the ants will battle the dreaded termites, a species
much larger and superior in weaponry, both natural and otherwise.  This
is the most impressive aspect of the film's entertainment value,
comparable in animated detail to the ballroom dance between Belle and
the beast in 1991's 'Beauty and the Beast' and the famous stampede scene
in 1994's 'The Lion King'.  As the lone survivor of the battle, Z and
the Princess leave together and the two of them are pursued by the
entire military branch of the ant colony.  Their adventure takes them
outside the colony into the human world where they come across the most
natural place you would expect to find an ant, a picnic location!
'Antz' is from the DreamWorks studio, the company started by Steven
Spielberg, Jeffrey Katzenberg and David Geffen.  The company has done a
good job diversifying its subject matter since its inception last year
with 'The Peacemaker'.  The studio's apparent attempt at both adult and
family entertainment is quickly being met with praise by critics in and
out of the Hollywood circle.
'Antz' is directed by Eric Darnell and Tim Johnson and is written by
Todd Alcot, Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz and while this collaboration
seems like a few too many cooks spoiling the brew, the film has a
cohesive structure and at a running time of just 83 minutes, it's ending
is clever, fitting in perfectly with the vision Woody Allen has in a
constant theme that usually runs within his film.
Other celebrity voices in this ingenious mixture of technology include
Christopher Walken, Danny Glover, Jennifer Lopez, Dan Aykroyd and Jane
Curtin and Aykroyd's voice is the one hardest to nail down for
recognition.  See if you can catch it.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
Some would accuse the makers of 'Spawn' of being creatively empty but that
would be unfair because this movie set out to be exactly what the final
product has become and that is a live action comic book.  Based on the
creation by Todd McFarlane, 'Spawn' is the story of a government assassin
(Michael Jai White) who dies and goes to the thresholds of Hell and makes a
deal with Satan concerning his return to Earth to participate in creating
Armageddon where the conflict between Heaven and Hell will ultimately be
decided.  White makes the deal because he is promised re-united companionship
with the wife he left behind at the time of his death on Earth.
John Leguizamo portrays Clown, a Devil's disciple sent by Satan to make sure
Spawn carries out his duty for the unspeakable forces of evil.  Clown
maintains an Earthly liaison with a government agent (Martin Sheen) who is
bent on bringing biological warfare to anyone on Earth who will not follow in
his quest for power.  What the forces of evil don't realize is that Spawn
receives visits from an English knight who died 500 years ago on Earth and
works to save Spawn's soul for redemption.
There are a lot of ingredients that went into this production and perhaps the
most distinguished compliment that anyone can pay this movie is to call it
technically efficient and a movie with extraordinary vision.  It shows us
things that will undoubtedly haunt us and has perhaps the darkest look I've
ever seen in a motion picture.  As far as the writing is concerned, the
characters are good but the story is a shallow one at best.  Its story is
overwhelmed by special effects and a thundering music score but unlike
'Batman and Robin', 'Spawn' is a story about a crime fighting hero that
certainly has many more colourful characters that audiences will remember
long after they leave the theatre.  
John Leguizamo puts a frightfully silly style of improvisation on his
character which doesn't always work but it is genuine to a certain degree in
keeping with Clown's personality and Michael Jai White is perfect as the
film's title character.
This movie is for adults and young people about 14 and over and may cause
nightmares for young children.  Would I want to see 'Spawn' again?  No, but I
was impressed at the technical aspects of the film which for me were
experimentation rather than genuine filmmaking.  It's fast food rather than a
home cooked meal.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Adam Sandler's movies are sort of like watching a performer on amateur
night at your local comedy club.  They serve a purpose (to make you
laugh, although just barely), and you hope that the next time you see
that particular comedic performer that he or she will be better.  In
fairness, Sandler has had some hysterically funny scenes recorded on
film.  The Sandler vs. Bob Barker bout in 'Happy Gilmore', Sandler
singing in the shower to Damon Wayans in 'Bulletproof' and Sandler
tackling a Colonel Sanders look alike in 'The Waterboy'.  When I'm alone
and reflect on the comedy films I've seen in the past few years, these
moments always make me laugh out loud.  Like other over rated comics
such as Jim Carrey and Martin Short, Sandler gets under your skin after
a while and I'm sure there will come a time when some people who support
the work of these guys will protest the motion picture academy to create
an Oscar category entitled "Best Performance By An Actor In A Silly
Role".
'Big Daddy' will offend some people who cling to the idea of traditional
family values and they will attack the film for setting a bad example
for children and while I'm one of the biggest supporters of family
values, this assumption would be wrong.  The movie IS NOT about teaching
the wrong values to impressionable children but rather one man making
the mistake of under estimating their impressionable minds and redeeming
himself by correcting the problem.
In 'Big Daddy', Sandler plays Sonny Kofaux, a man in his early thirties
who has all the qualities of a generation x-er.  He sleeps late, very
late.  He takes few things seriously in his life and doesn't quite
understand just where it is he fits in.  His apartment is a mess.  He
leaves potato chip bags and pop cans everywhere, never makes his bed and
won't fix the broken window next to the front garage like door of his
Manhattan apartment.  Sonny won $200,000 from a jury in a civil case
after a taxi cab ran over his feet and this accounts a lot for his
laziness and he has a one day a week job as a toll booth collector.  His
girlfriend Vanessa (Kristy Swanson) wants a more serious guy and ditches
him like Bill Murray's girlfriend did at the beginning of 'Stripes',
accusing him of never being able to do anything more with his life than
he's presently doing.  Sonny's room mate Kevin (Jon Stewart) is a big
time corporate honcho about to become a liaison executive for his
company in China.  After Stewart leaves, a little boy shows up at their
front door with a note claiming to be Kevin's son.  In Kevin's absence,
Sonny assumes his identity and tries to raise the little five year old
by himself with difficulty at first but later becomes attached to him
and vice versa.
Sonny life is layered with some interesting characters.  There is
Kevin's fiance Corinne (Leslie Mann), Corinne's sister Layla (Joey
Lauren Adams) who develops a romantic relationship with Sonny.  A
foreign delivery man who speaks broken English and who befriends Sonny
(Rob Schneider).  A totally uproarious performance by Steve Buscemi as a
homeless guy who likes McDonald's food and Sonny's dad who's a hot shot
lawyer and wants his son to follow in his footsteps (Joseph Bologna).
I never lie and I have to admit that strangely, I enjoyed 'Big Daddy'.
I liked it because there are many characters who hold their own with
Sandler and actually upstage him on many occasions, especially the
Sprouse twins (Cole and Dylan) who play the five year old boy named
Julian at the center of the film's story line and emotional core who
simply steals hearts.  And the other supporting characters save this
film from being a total comedic misfire.  As you're watching the
courtroom climax scene, it is definitely silly and plays like camp
comedy but since this is the intention, it works!
'Big Daddy' is written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler and
is directed by Dennis Dugan and Sandler is one of the executive
producers and doesn't look as if he wants total control over the film
this time and gives the entire cast a fair shake and by violating the
first rule of show business that states you should never follow the act
of animals or children, Sandler mixes the innocence of the latter with
his own roadhouse humour and comes up with a mildly pleasing winner.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
If you've seen one Tony Scott film you've seen them all, right?  If
you've seen one Jerry Bruckheimer film you've seen them all, right?  If
you like formula concoctions with loud noise, rapid editing and a swift
pace then you'll enjoy 'Enemy of the State', right?  Only once.  This
latest entry into the fast food
market of film is made in the best tradition of Tony Scott's theme of
slick machismo complete with shadows given off by window blinds, the
exploitation of women (where can I find a lingerie store like the one in
this film, darn I'm a hypocrite) and, of course, enough guns,
explosions, chases, and slimy bad guys to fill a dozen movies with only
a couple of good guys to go around.  Although, this time, there is a
nasty looking scene where a boom mic is visible not once but a couple of
times.  It occurs as Will Smith is talking to a mobster about 50 minutes
into the movie.
I don't think I've ever seen a film where the bad guys execute their
evil plans believing all the while that they're doing the right thing
for the good of their country.  Jon Voight portrays a sinister NSA
(National Security Agency) agent who, along with some henchmen, murder a
Congressman who refuses to go along with a telecommunications bill that
will give the government greater power to invade the privacy of its
citizens in the name of national security and their hope is that it will
reduce crime, terrorism, internet mischief and other paranoia they
perceive the be a threat.  Evil for evil is their motto.  It's just too
bad for them that the murder was caught on tape by a hidden camera, used
by a nature photographer and environmentalist whose life is now in
danger.
Will Smith portrays a hot shot Washington D.C. attorney and the man with
the deadly evidence is a friend of his who slips it into Smith's hands
without his knowledge.  Smith now becomes the target of the government's
pursuit of the evidence and there is no shortage of technology with
which to aid them.  Complicating Smith's life is his past as we find out
he had an adulterous affair with a woman from law school and his wife is
suspicious he is fooling around with her again.
There is no surveillance you've ever seen like the type you will see in
this movie.  Cameras that can peek through concrete walls, huge
government database systems that can tap a person's call, bring up their
entire life's history, wiretap them and take pictures of their location
using a satellite 155 miles above the Earth.
Gene Hackman plays a former NSA agent who assists Smith in his evasion
of the government and Hackman has his own agenda for doing so.  Hackman
and Voight are the real actors and characters that make the picture
work.  Smith is a good leading man but there is no substitute for
experience and Voight and Hackman simply upstage him at every turn.
There is also a sub plot involving the mob who make for interesting
allies in the film's climax similar to the guys who helped Arnold
Schwarzenegger in the climax of 'Eraser' but I'm not sure there is a
need to find such witty qualities in organized crime.
Gene Hackman's role is under written as he doesn't appear in the film
until the first 57 minutes and then he is still under used.  A one hit
wonder story can get tiresome after a while and this film is no
exception.
The only redeeming quality the film has is that it points out that even
though citizens of a great country like the United States know that
their country can keep surveillance on them so closely, I don't think
they realize that the technology used in this film is so state of the
art and seeing Gene Hackman in this film brings back memories of his
role as the wire tapper in 1974's 'The Conversation' and one mug shot of
Hackman in the film, used by the government, looks exactly like his
character from that film so I wouldn't be surprised if it was an inside
joke in getting film buffs to find it.
The argument of privacy vs. safety would have been better made in an
academic film rather than a technical one where intelligence is used
this time around as an oxy moron and the audience is so overwhelmed
technically, that they may miss the film's entire point if they don't
focus on the film's message which often gets lifted away with the force
of a tornado like feel and pace.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
'Hilary and Jackie' is the stuff that sibling rivalries are made of.
Pleasant ones that is.  As one of the most human stories of 1998, the
film has the classic detail of what is supposed to happen while
preparing a film script to go before the cameras.  Director Anand Tucker
has pictured the entire structure of the film inside his head perfectly
and has elevated it to the screen with a unique and even structure that
tells an old fashioned tale with the highest of culture.  And, like
1996's 'Shine', Tucker makes the film about family even though it will
be mistaken by many to be about music, which is its secondary theme.
No technical aspect of a motion picture is more important than the use
of its music soundtrack.  I remember some years ago at the Oscar
ceremonies that a clip was shown from several motion pictures without
their music background and the audience laughed at how preposterous it
was and then broke into applause when the same scenes were shown with
their music included, showing a stark contrast that allowed people to
breath a sigh of relief at just how important music is to a film.
'Hilary and Jackie' has a beautiful classical score that overwhelms the
audience with genuine emotion and makes it even more memorable than it
would be with a lesser emphasis on musical harmony.
Jaqueline du Pr (Emily Watson) is a cellist and her sister Hilary
(Rachel Griffiths) plays the flute.  From the time they were children,
their parents instilled in them a sense of musical pride and guided them
through their studies to the level of professionals when they were still
in their teens.  Based on a true story set primarily in the 60's and
70's, the film has exquisite cinematography that sings a harmonic tune
all its own.
The two women marry early in life and and while Hilary is clearly the
more mature of the two, talent is surely abound in all forms of human
personality.  The true line that tests the theory of genius being formed
on the brink of the human mind gone mad, the film touches on this fact
without becoming heavy handed and the film proclaims that sometimes one
needs family around them when all other forms of personal contact seem
meaningless.
Children are forthcoming in their marriages and as the film progresses,
the story throws itself deeper and deeper into the ocean in personal
relationships that never seems tiresome or too intrusive but rather a
theme that many can relate to.
Emily Watson made her film debut in 1996's 'Breaking the Waves' and
received an Oscar nomination for it.  This film (her 5th in three years)
will almost certainly bring her her second nomination and she is even
more powerful in this movie than in 'Breaking the Waves'.  Her portrayal
of Jaqueline du Pr in 'Hilary and Jackie' is complex, showing her
genius for playing the cello while growing to despise playing it later
in life.  But this fact is never quite put across in a convincing manner
and that isn't a negative reflection on the film.  It simply means that
Jaqueline du Pr, I believe, really wanted to play but was afraid of
success and how her life might change while mastering her craft.
Without giving too much away for those unfamiliar with how this true
story ends, let's just say that after viewing this film, you will not
only have a deeper appreciation of music and film, but these things will
seem small when seeing just how large the human heart can be.

Title
Review for Air Bud (1997)
Family film entertainment like any other form of movie presentation is judged
differently by different people and while some films aimed directly at
children are unappealing to older teenagers and full grown adults, I must
admit that as an adult I absolutely loved 'Air Bud'.
Cynics who believe that family films are too cute to be considered 'serious'
entertainment are entitled to their opinion but 'Air Bud' is an extremely
well crafted movie with an admittedly worn out but sometimes refreshing
reminder that dog really is man's best friend. There are no special effects
in this movie using computer generated pretender devices but rather a golden
retreiver with a snout for sinking basketballs with a ration of close to
100%.  I'm sure he's missed a few shots in real life but in the movie he has
a talent that is harnessed in the right place at the right time.
The film begins with a clown (Michael Jeter) who uses his feeble skills in an
attempt to entertain children but he is terrible at his profession and
birthday parties only become perky when he introduces kids to his golden
retreiver, Buddy who performs tricks to the delight of the youngsters.  He is
a cruel and abusive owner and Buddy's cage falls off his pick up truck on the
way home one day and Buddy is free and becomes adopted by a young boy named
Josh (Kevin Zegers).  Their friendship unfolds rather slowly until trust is
developed and Josh begins to play with Buddy using his basketball.  The
procedure is simple: toss a ball to Buddy and his snout will knock the ball
up and into the net everytime.  Josh is also trying to make it on the
school's basketball team and doesn't have much luck with a hard edged coach
who is eventually fired and replaced by the school's janitor who used to be a
pro basketball player for the New York Knicks back in the 1950's.  Buddy
becomes the team's mascot as Josh joins the team and the new coach teaches
values and principles to Josh which he applies accordingly.
Actor turned director Charles Martin Smith (you remember him as Toad in
'American Graffiti' and as the accountant Oscar Wallace in 1987's 'The
Untouchables') does a wonderful job capturing expressions from the dog's
every move and builds a bondable story utilizing the animal to stand out from
all the humans.  It's intelligently made and can be enjoyed by the youngest
child and the oldest adult.  It's a movie free of corporate advertising and
marketing at fast food restaurants and that's rare for a Disney production so
they deserve high marks for this one and it's probably the best Disney
production since 1994's 'Angels in the Outfield'.  In a summer of explosions,
special effects and rare family entertainment, 'Air Bud' is a pleasant,
harmless and emotional comfort which is no classic but is a film that I hope
becomes passed down along with other quality films such as 'Babe', 'Aladdin'
and 'The Lion King'.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
     To truly enjoy 'Starship Troopers', you have to leave all thought of
plotting and character development at the door.  You also have to remember
that with a budget of 100 million dollars, there isn't a lot of money left
to hire big name stars.  The real stars of this movie are the special
effects which rank as both ground breaking and mind numbing.  The entire
film is a constant barrage of extreme violence and frightening pops of large
alien insects which devour humans by breaking apart their bodies and the
audience sees it all in full motion but the editing is appropriately handled
through fast cutting and you have very little time to think about what
you've just seen before the next scenario begins.
     Director Paul Verhoeven ('RoboCop', 'Total Recall', 'Basic Instinct')
formulates his movie in his typical visual manner when dealing with science
fiction which relies heavily on futuristic shock value in a world he creates
based on academic predictions of things to come.  His vision of the future
is often bleak like it was in 'RoboCop' but when sticking to a present day
Earthly film like 'Basic Instinct', Verhoeven exploits sex as much as he
does violence in his other films.  Some would accuse him of being excessive
in his display of these elements but all directors can't be subtle.  While
I've never found any statement in his films, I have generally been
entertained and knew what to expect coming in to this one.
     A group of fresh faced college graduates decide to enlist in the
futuristic military based on Earth but the technology in the future allows
them to explore regions of the universe presently unthinkable.  There is a
planet sending meteors to Earth which contain giant insect creatures which
kill Earthlings by the millions and the new recruits look at their
enlistment as more of an adventure rather than as an entrance way to Hell.
     The cast is headed by Casper Van Dien who plays Johnny Rico, a grunt
private who works his way up the military ranks as the film progresses.  His
fellow colleagues are Dina Meyer and Jake Busey and the girl he always loved
(Denise Richards) has joined a 
different branch of the military and they rarely see each other.  Another
colleague
(Neil Patrick Harris) has joined military intelligence and is key to the
film's resolution.  The military officers in the film (Michael Ironside and
Clancy Brown) are casted appropriately and are totally believable.
     The technical aspects of 'Starship Troopers are of the highest calibre
and I predict Academy Awards and possible wins for the special effects and
thunderous soundtrack which puts you into the action as if you're on screen
with everyone else in the film.  This upscale production has breathed
continuing life into the science fiction genre and while Hollywood
technology is better than ever and movie screenplays are worse than ever,
'Starship Troopers' demonstrates that the former can be a bonus to a movie
going experience.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Palmetto (1998)
Member of the INTERNET MOVIE CRITIC'S ASSOCIATION at:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
The talent that Woody Harrelson has in entertaining movie audience's is
that he has an endless amount of daffy charm and exuberant personality
that it makes him one of the few actors that has made a successful
transition from the small screen to the big screen.  After an Oscar
nomination for 1996's 'The People vs. Larry Flynt', Harrelson has earned
the respect of his peers and is well on his way to a great career.  When
I saw him in 1992's 'White Men Can't Jump', I was taken by his penchant
for playing losers and 'Palmetto' is a great role for Harrelson to strut
his stuff.
'Fargo'.  A movie about a man who hires two thugs to kidnap his wife and
things go wrong.  Do things ever go right in a crime movie?
'Palmetto'.  Cleverly disguised as a 'Fargo' wannabe.  Set in an
opposite climate ('Fargo' was set primarily in upstate Minnesota in the
dead of winter) and this movie is set in the steamy town of Palmetto,
Florida and the movie is different from 'Fargo' but strangely, for some
sub-conscious reason, I thought of 'Fargo' as I was watching this movie.
Woody Harrelson stars as a former convict whose conviction is over
turned after two years in the slammer and he is released.  He's a
journalist who was framed for an article he wrote exposing political
corruption at the municipal level and he returns to his female companion
(Gina Gershon) and tries to re-capture his former life before jail.
Upon his release, he meets up with a sultry woman in a bar (Elisabeth
Shue) who propositions him to play a part in a kidnapping scam for which
he will receive 10% of $500,000.00.  At first he turns down the proposal
but later finds it to be an irresistible way to pay "the system" back
for the two years of his life stolen by the justice system that kept him
in prison.
The plan calls for Harrelson to act as the bag man in the kidnapping of
Shue's stepdaughter.  Harrelson is supposed to act as the threatening
voice on the phone and will pick up the ransom money.  There are many
plot twists and turns that will tease and tantalize the audience in its
running time of nearly two hours and the film has a solid plot, doesn't
suffer from over length and is unpredictable.  Its underlining strength
comes from the fact that the film isn't over done and has basically only
two or three characters at the most on-screen at one time with a couple
of exceptions.
Shades of 1981's 'Body Heat' and 1990's 'The Hot Spot' shine through but
director Volker Schlondorff's sure-footed direction is on-target and the
film is based on the book 'Just Another Sucker' by James Hadley Chase.
Gina Gershon's character is somewhat sedated and perhaps unnecessary but
the real surprise in this film is Elisabeth Shue who puts her best foot
forward since her Oscar nominated role in 1995's 'Leaving Las Vegas' and
her character is that of an evil woman with a slightly psychotic twist
combined with a feeling of superiority and lack of conscience.
Not a great film but a rigorously solid one, 'Palmetto' is a film about
white trash at its sleaziest.  A good example of immorality played up
with little violence and a lot of sexual innuendo.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for True Grit (1969)
A retrospective movie review by Walter Frith
The life and career of John Wayne (born in Winterset Iowa on May 26, 1907 and
given the name Marion Michael Morrison) came to a glorious peak of sorts when
he received the Best Actor Academy Award for his portrayal of a crusty, hard
drinking and at times, no nonsense federal marshal named Rooster Cogburn in
the old American west in 'True Grit'.  Having beat out both Jon Voight and
Dustin Hoffman for that prize for their work in 'Midnight Cowboy', Wayne's
deserving win came as a surprise to some and as an expectation by most.
  Wayne's career began in 1928 in a bit part in a film entitled 'Hangman's
House' that was directed by John Ford who would work with Wayne on a much
larger scale in some other classic films such as 'Stagecoach' (1939) and 'The
Quiet Man' (1952).  Ford's talent as a director would earn him a record four
Oscars for Best Director and it is a record which holds to this day.  Ford
died in 1973 and is truly one of the most influential filmmakers of the 20th
century.  Wayne was made a much better actor than he realized he could ever
be through the teachings of Ford.
John Wayne's last film was in 1976 entitled 'The Shootist' in which he played
a legendary gunfighter dying of cancer.  While making that film, Wayne was
dying of cancer himself and Wayne sadly passed away in 1979  and he is a
monument to film history which generations to come will learn to appreciate.
 One of Wayne's last public appearances was in 1979 at the 51st Academy
Awards in which he presented the Best Picture Oscar to 'The Deer Hunter'.  
'True Grit' which also starred Kim Darby, Glen Campbell (yes, that
'Rhinestone Cowboy' Glen Campbell), Strother Martin, Dennis Hopper and Robert
Duvall was the story of revenge enacted with the help of the law which
further testified to the lawlessness within the law tolerated by men with
badges in the old west.  Darby starred as a young woman tracking the murderer
of her beloved father and her personality was that of a strong willed, hard
headed lady with determination and justice on her mind.  She enlists the help
of Wayne and reluctantly that of a Texas ranger (Campbell).
Hokey at times but pleasantly entertaining for the most part, especially in
the last half hour, 'True Grit' featured rousing scenes of frontier
excitement in glorious cinematic fashion with elaborate cinematography of
western skies, mountains and landscape perfect for a western classic. 

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
     Stan Laurel and Oliver Hardy would probably enjoy 'Mouse Hunt'.
The humour is designed to be something straight out of one of their
movies.  The great slapstick duo of film's early years cannot be
compared to anyone so the comparison to them is only in the style of
comedy projected by this movie.
     Two brothers (Nathan Lane and Lee Evans) have inherited two things
upon the death of their father (William Hickey).  The first is a string
factory falling on hard times and the second is a creaky and neglected
mansion built in 1876.  At first thought, it appears that the house is
worthless but upon further examination of some blueprints they discover,
it occurs to them that the year 1876 was the American centennial and
they also discover that the house was built by a world renowned
architect admired by the wealthy.  One man offers the brothers a
substantial amount for the dwelling and tells them that he has over 40
other houses designed by the same architect.  They decline his offer
because they feel they can get more by auctioning it off.
     Embarking on a much needed renovation, the brothers find there is a
slight problem which may lower the property value of their house; a
mouse!  They feel that the problem could be more than one mouse but it
turns out from the audience's look at the film that there is indeed only
one mouse who feels the two brothers are the invaders and not him.  The
mouse is extremely clever as he avoids traps and leads the brothers into
creating more destruction for themselves in their attempt to catch him.
The mouse steals an entire block of round cheese by rolling it like a
wheel.  He has the brothers fall victim to their multiple mouse traps
and he even outsmarts an expert exterminator (Christopher Walken) in a
key role approaching it like he was a bounty hunter.
     'Mouse Hunt' is a good family film addressing the necessary comic
turns comparable to the dark punch of a boxing glove and Lee Evans is
hilarious as the better of the two brothers named Smuntz.  Sounds like a
name perfect for comedy.  The interesting thing about the movie is that
the scenes with the rodent rascal are done three ways.  With a real
mouse, a mechanical one and a computer enhanced one for those scenes
that look cartoonish and that is much of the films content.  Much of the
humour is dark but also very cute with special appeal to children and
while it is a cross between a road runner cartoon and a Laurel and Hardy
slapstick feature, it still is worth a look.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
Director Ulu Grosbard has only made seven movies in the last thirty one
years and one of them is 'The Deep End of the Ocean'.  Grosbard's career
began in 1968 with 'The Subject Was Roses' when he directed Jack
Albertson to an Oscar for Best Supporting Actor.  The first film I saw
in a theatre directed by him was 'True Confessions' in 1981.  His other
four films are 'Who Is Harry Kellerman and Why Is He Saying Those
Terrible Things About Me?' (1971), 'Straight Time' (1978), 'Falling in
Love' (1984), and 'Georgia' (1995).  Grosbard's style is very leisurely
and his films have a tendency to look like television projects so why is
'The Deep End of the Ocean' such a wonderful film?  Because in many
ways, it breaks your way of thinking when it comes to having children.
Some people really want children but find the idea of raising them to be
a scary thought.  Others have no problem with it while others live
through the nightmare of losing them and not knowing for sure what
happened to them.  This is what happens to an average American family in
a movie that has no high or low points that stand out above the rest of
its running time and while the performances are solid, the story is
cleverly told mainly from the perspective of only one parent.
The film begins in Madison, Wisconsin in 1988.  Beth (Michelle Pfeiffer)
and her husband Pat (Treat Williams) are an average couple whose three
children range in approximate age from six months to three and seven.
Pat leaves for a business meeting in Chicago while Beth is to attend her
high school reunion.  While she's there, her three year old becomes
separated from her and no one can find him.  The usual panic sets in
complete with the trauma that will be experienced by any mother with
feelings in such a predicament.  Beth even becomes hysterical at one
point and has to be restrained and sedated by paramedics.  The story
then jumps ahead nine years and as her children have grown older, so has
Beth's memory.  She thinks about her son missing son Ben everyday and
looks very unhappy with life and her husband tells her she's made a
career out of looking unhappy.  Beth's feelings have interfered with her
marriage and her eldest son Vincent (Jonathan Jackson) has become
something of a teenage delinquent who likes mischief with cars.  One
day, Beth's daughter Kerry (Alexa Vega) talks to a boy at the front door
whom she knows that wants to know if the lawn needs mowing and Beth
comes to the door and instantly recognizes him as an older version of
her missing son.  Through a re-opened police investigation led by
Officer Bliss (Whoopi Goldberg), the boy turns out to be Ben (Ryan
Merriman) who goes by the name Sam and he is re-united with his
biological family but doesn't remember who they are.  The adjustment is
not easy and this is the central point of the film and how things become
resolved.
On the surface, you have to give this film credit for its original
subject matter.  An idea that is excellent in its conception and pretty
well executed.  It's written by Stephen Schiff based on the best selling
novel by Jacquelyn Mitchard.  I had a problem with the odds in which the
boy is re-united with his family.  Could they be in the millions?
Billions?  Certainly a stretch in credibility damages the film's
character and this is the key to enjoying the film as to whether or not
you can overlook this flaw.  Another factor that seemed out of place was
the re-action Ben's siblings have to the news of his return.  Not as
delighted as the parents are and their lives just go on as if very
little has changed.  Perhaps it's just in their nature and I suppose
this argument is borderline in making a case for the movie but I
genuinely felt moved by the story and the film is perfect for the
average movie goer who doesn't see a lot of movies and it doesn't insult
your intelligence the way many films released this time of year do.
I enjoyed the performance of Treat Williams in this film.  Mainly an
under rated actor, he is diverse in his roles and I enjoyed him since I
first saw his work as a corrupt cop in 1981's 'Prince of the City'.
Although 'The Deep End of the Ocean' is told mainly from Pfeiffer's
point of view as the parent responsible for her son's disappearance,
Williams plays a good supporting role and the husband and wife team
these actors play, they manage to distinguish themselves from each other
and that is the film's most impressive offering.  As the film looks for
resolution in the final twenty minutes, it reminds us that the most
wonderful thing in the world can indeed be to have children and one of
the worst things can be losing them.  'The Deep End of the Ocean' is a
film that will make you want to hug your kids just a wee bit longer the
next time you prepare them and send them off for the day to school.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mississippi (1996)
As we move closer to the 21st century we are reminded that racial tensions
still remain high around the world.  'Ghosts of Mississippi' is a story
dealing with the aftermath of assassinated American Civil Rights leader
Medgar Evers who was shot in the back with a high powered rifle in the
driveway of his home as he arrived from work late one evening in June of
1963.  Byron De la Beckwith, the man accused of the crime (portrayed
chillingly and absorbingly by James Woods) was given two trials and both
ended in hung juries.  Twenty five years later the case is re-opened through
the persistance of Evers' widow (Whoopi Goldberg) with the help of civil
rights organizations seeking a conviction and De la Beckwith is again tried
by the District Attorney's office in the hands of Alec Baldwin and Craig T.
Nelson.  This is a low key and very sedated picture to be admired for its
attempt rather than for its execution as most of the scenes are quite subtle
and director Rob Reiner ('Misery,' 'A Few Good Men,' 'The American
President') demonstrates his diversity with the courtroom by making the
scenes appear realistic with little or no outbursts of fiery dialogue and
sometimes pretentious emotion as was the case in 'A Few Good Men' which
featured a harrowing courtroom climax.  Reiner chooses to tell the story in
'Ghosts of Mississippi' as one of truth since it is based on an actual event
and Reiner does a good job with the characterizations but could have drained
a bit more from Alec Baldwin and Whoopi Goldberg and it's James Woods who
steals the show as an unrepentant racist convinced he will never be convicted
of killing a black man in the state of Mississippi.  Perhaps 'Ghosts of
Mississippi' will play better on home video as it could easily pass for a
television movie of the week.  For a different look at how courtroom
procedures are usually undertaken and for reasonably satisfying entertainment
which unfortunately for some may leave them a bit flat, 'Ghosts of
Mississippi' is a movie which will seem different than most others of its
type.  I suppose in some ways that's a good thing.

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
'A Life Less Ordinary' is such a quirky film with jabs of satirical themes
that I could have sworn I was watching a film by the Coen brothers.  In fact,
this movie is the latest from 'Trainspotting' director Danny Boyle.  That
film's writer, John Hodge, is responsible for the screenplay here as well.
 To describe 'A Life Less Ordinary' is to put a puzzled look on your face as
you say, "Yeah, that's really what it's about".
Heaven is the setting for some of the film's opening scenes where St. Gabriel
(Dan Hedaya) is about to give a mission to two less than squeaky clean angels
(Delroy Lindo and Holly Hunter) who have to return to Earth and cause two
people to fall in love if they want to get back into Heaven and stay.  
Ewan McGregor ('Trainspotting') plays a janitor who works in a building owned
by a tyrannical businessman (Ian Holm) and loses his job when the boss
replaces all the cleaning staff with robots!  Yes, little robots who bleep,
turn and perform their duties accordingly.  Needless to say, this causes
McGregor so much anger and grief that he storms into the boss' office and
demands his job back.  His timing is somewhat awkward.  It comes just as Holm
is telling his daughter (Cameron Diaz) that she will learn responsiblity by
going to work at the company and will stop living off of her trust fund.  She
takes pity on McGregor who ends up being swarmed by security guards inside
the office and he takes her hostage and the two of them eventually take
refuge in a broken down shack in the heart of the countryside.  All along,
the two angels (Lindo and Hunter) are watching them and try to set up a
scenario where McGregor and Diaz will fall in love.  If you have to wonder
whether or not they DO fall in love, then shame on you.  
I immediately started getting flashbacks of 1994's 'The Chase' with Charlie
Sheen and Kristy Swanson as Sheen played an armed robber who holds up a
convenience store and when the police intercept him, he takes a little rich
girl (Swanson) hostage.  Ditto here!  'A Life Less Ordinary' is nothing more
than a hostage movie where the romance is implausible and unconvincing.  It
tries to entertain lightly but comes off as a silly and innocuous with no
real reason to exist except to tell a story which has very little originality
and even less edge.  
Relax.  Ewan McGregor will be featured as a young Ben (Obi-Wan) Kenobi in the
next 'Star Wars' trilogy but Cameron Diaz's act is starting to wear thin as
she tries to act seriously and when she displays anger in films, she really
makes me laugh.  'A Life Less Ordinary' demonstrates one thing.  While the
title suggests it's less than ordinary, it turns out to be just the opposite.

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
The untimely death of Matthew Sheppard in Wyoming a few years ago made
headlines around the world.  Sheppard was killed for no other reason other
than the fact that he was gay.  'Boys Don't Cry' focuses on the same subject
matter and reverses genders in its story of friendship gone terribly wrong
and is also based on a true story.  It attempts to follow a similar path in
the way it looks pursuant to the 1991 film 'My Own Private Idaho' which
starred  Keanu Reeves and River Phoenix.  That film was about a male
prostitute making his way around the country and finding whoever he could in
order to make a living selling his body.  While different from 'Boys Don't
Cry' in its subject matter, it still looks and feels very similar.
Actress Hilary Swank is scooping up virtually every major award for her
portrayal of Teena Brandon, a lonely ne'er-do-well that has had run ins with
the law and is struggling sexually to find her identity.  She tries to pass
herself off as Brandon Teena, a man, and falls in love with someone that
provides tragic consequences.  The film did disappoint me somewhat by
surrounding itself with American mid-western folks perceived as white trash.
Some, of course, are but there is good and bad in everyone and the film has
no positive characters in it, they are all deeply flawed individuals so this
makes the challenge of telling the story an uphill battle by putting the
audience in a very bleak story that will stay in their minds long after the
curtain drops.  The characters in the film smoke too much, drink too much
(which includes giving beer to infants), dress typically trashy and act with
little regard for self respect, let alone respect for anyone else.  I
suppose if the story is true, the right circumstances have to be re-created
but it still left me saying "*blah*".  The saving grace of this film is the
acting.
Teena Brandon (Hilary Swank) is seen near the beginning of the film fleeing
from rednecks that want to kill her after she comes on as a man to a young
teenaged girl and has to hide with a friend who will protect her.  She has a
date in court but may not show up which could lead to a bench warrant issued
for her arrest.
Teena Brandon now becomes Brandon Teena as she passes herself off as a man
and makes friends with some equally ne'er-do-wells.  There are Tom and John
(Brandon Sexton III and Peter Sarsgaard) and the girl Teena falls in love
with, Lana (Chloe Sevigny), who is the only person that truly understands
Teena and her performance is a great supporting effort with good chemistry
along side Hilary Swank and the two of them are Oscar bound.  They (all the
young, free-minded characters) joy ride without seat belts while drinking,
the girls wear too much make-up and look like they have had one too many
trips to the local donut shop and the mother of one of the girls shows
exactly where this bad behaviour on the part of her daughter and her friends
came from.  The film is a series of emotions expressed by all members of the
cast as Teena's masquerade begins to fall apart and many hateful and
eventually harmful things happen to her.
The film is progressively honest and doesn't hold one false note in its
portrayal of these people and sophomore director Kimberly Peirce (1994's
'The Last Good Breath') has found a raw and pinching nerve to rely on that
grabs the audience by the collar and doesn't let them go.  The film is bound
to generate controversy.  There is a rape scene that reminded me of 1988's
'The Accused' with Jodie Foster.  That film had Foster being gang raped
after teasing some men in a bar and some wondered if it was really necessary
to show the actual rape scene rather than imagine what it would have been
like for the victim.  Sometimes what we don't see on the screen can actually
be more powerful than what we do see if the actors can convey their emotions
and act out the stories they are telling.
The audience I saw 'Boys Don't Cry' with sat stone faced through its running
time.  I saw it at an art house with few seats in the theatre, and with a
crowd that obviously knows how to appreciate a small, honest and low
budgeted film like this.  Definitely not a mainstream motion picture, its
conclusion will be discussed for years among knowledgeable movie fans who
see the performances as a work of art and the work of true professionals.
There is Oscar buzz being generated and the cast deserves one big Oscar as
none of them do it alone.  Uniquely satisfying!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
Sylvester Stallone has vowed that 'Daylight' will be the last big booming
action picture of his career.  Stallone made this decision while his
newborn daughter underwent emergency heart surgery earlier this year.  As
Sly approaches 50 this would be a good move and a chance for him to branch
out and search for the true acting ability he has despite what some
critics have said about him.  His roles in the original 'Rocky,' 'Paradise
Alley,' and 'Nighthawks' demonstrate that Stallone can do well at the
craft of acting.  'Daylight' takes place in New York City and one late
afternoon a horrifying accident takes place in the Lincoln tunnel which
connects New York and New Jersey underwater.  It was built around World
War I and is unstable in many places.  Hundreds are killed in the fiery
flash of action and the tunnel is sealed at both ends.  Stallone is a New
York City cab driver who arrives caught on the scene and offers his
services.  Unusual you say?  Perhaps, but Sly is a former EMS (Emergency
Medical Service) tactician who was fired by the city after a rescue under
his command killed several people.  Only a handful of survivors remain and
Stallone does his best to rescue them all.  This movie immediately put me
in mind of 'The Poseidon Adventure' (1972) in which a handful of survivors
tried to make it out from a luxury cruise liner which capsized.  Combine
that with stunts seen in other action/disaster films over the years and
you have the makings for a somewhat unoriginal but entertaining film with
graphic and stunningly realistic special effects courtesy of ILM. 
'Daylight' is from director Rob Cohen ('Dragon: The Bruce Lee Story') who
has woven an exciting action film together with somewhat shallow
characters but the scenes of rescue and survival are credible and this
film is a must for loyal Stallone fans while the rest of us are likely to
come out satisfied but will digest it quickly with our fast food treat we
like to get after the movie is out.  Other cast members are Amy Brenneman,
Viggo Mortensen, Dan Hedaya, Jay O. Sanders, Karen Young, Claire Bloom,
Barry Newman and Stan Shaw.

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
'Girl, Interrupted' asks us to recall the feelings we have for another film
about mental illness and the institutions that thrive on it and that film
is, of course, 'One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest'.  Anyone who doesn't have a
re-collection of that film before, during or after 'Girl, Interrupted', is
not a movie fan or has a very short memory.  This film is taken at a mental
institution in the 60's.  So was 'Cuckoo's Nest' (although it was made in
1975).  This film has a large supporting cast aside from the main lead and
supporting character.  So did 'Cuckoo's Nest'.  This film has a field trip
where the characters are briefly free from the rules.  Ditto for 'Cuckoo's
Nest'.  This film has a head nurse who looks after the patients along with a
mousy assistant.  So did 'Cuckoo's Nest'.  So what's the attraction?
Primarily that 'Girl, Interrupted' is a true story, although it is a thin
one with all the trappings you would expect from a writer whom I suspect,
took liberties with the truth because some of the things we see in this film
are in direct relation to 'Cuckoo's Nest'.  All right, enough about the Jack
Nicholson/Milos Forman classic and let's get down to business.
Winona Ryder plays Susanna Kaysen, a young woman who displays suicidal
tendencies by downing a bottle of aspirin with a bottle of alcoholic.  She
checks into a mental hospital and begins therapy where she is diagnosed by
her physician as having Borderline Personality Disorder.  Oh, the irony of
it all.  Throughout it all, we wonder if this is really the case or if
Susanna is just a mixed up young woman who simply is succumbing to the
pressure of sorting out her chaotic life with pressure from her upper middle
class family not making it any easier for her.
Among the many people Susanna meets is Lisa (Angelina Jolie) who has a bumpy
first encounter with Susanna.  Susanna is given a room where a friend of
Lisa's used to reside.  Lisa is brought back to the institution after being
gone for a long period of time (she escaped) and violently confronts Susanna
as to why she is taking up the space occupied by her friend.  We learn that
the friend committed suicide and Susanna has taken her place.  Lisa displays
psychotic qualities that make her a danger to the outside world.  She has no
regard for peace and tranquility.  She is a psychotic.  Her body is in a
constant state of anarchy.  She has to be restrained at several points in
the film and threatens at one point to kill herself but gives in easily,
making her mental disorder all the more bizarre.
Like any film that has some sort of plot about mental illness, 'Girl,
Interrupted' forces us to take a look at ourselves and ask if, perhaps, we
need to evaluate our own lives.  In Canada, 25% of the population at some
point in life, will suffer from some sort of mental illness.  Many don't
realize that this DOESN'T mean being crazy.  It simply means suffering a
certain dismal aspect on the part of the mind.  Some suffer from depression,
some paranoia and some from sharp and severe mood swings.  Actually, Winona
Ryder's portrayal of Susanna seems quite normal compared to her friends in
the institution.
Director James Mangold ('Copland') directs the film in a pretty even
fashion, building his climax to a satisfying, if somewhat "all seen before"
conclusion.  The film is written by Mangold, Lisa Loomer and Anna Hamilton
Phelan based on the novel by Susanna Kaysen.
To its obvious credit, the saving grace in 'Girl, Interrupted', comes from
its bonding of the characters involved.  There is a genuine goodness in the
fact that deep down inside many of them are little girls living inside the
bodies of grown women.  The film, while diving right into the subject of
mental illness, also has a certain innocence about it that makes it warm and
likable to a large extent.  It is no classic but it is a film that is of
high social merit and has to its further credit the ability to pace itself
at a good level and it avoids being pretentious.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
'There's Something About Mary' (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
Say hello to Ted.  He's a nerdy little yet well meaning guy who is about
to go to his high school prom in Rhode Island in 1985.  Never dreaming
he'd get a decent date for the occasion, Ted (Ben Stiller) is
overwhelmed when beautiful Mary (Cameron Diaz) asks HIM to go to the
prom with her.  Mary is the object of every guy's desire with her
beautiful long hair, sparkling eyes and cheery smile and Ted, complete
with braces, uncropped and mop like hair, still can't believe she wants
to go with him.  Upon picking Mary up for the dance, Ted uses the little
general's room and upon "zipping it up too fast", he has an accident
with his anatomy and can't go on his dream date.  This prolonged scene,
which is an exercise in extreme bad taste (but you'll love it), has
everyone looking on, based on their own bizarre curiosity.  Mary's mom,
step dad, a police officer, a fireman and Mary herself.  Poor Ted.  He's
not a loser, just a guy who runs into some bad luck.
Fast forward thirteen years to the present day.  We discover that Ted,
still living in Rhode Island, is still on the road to nowhere and has
periodic conversations with his friend Dom (Chris Elliott) about life in
general and after all these years, Ted still can't forget about Mary and
hires a shady private investigator named Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), to
look her up and report back to him.  Upon finding Mary living in Miami,
Healy begins falling for Mary himself and reports back to Ted that she's
fat, has four kids by three different men and is confined to a wheel
chair.  This doesn't detract Ted from finding Mary.  Mary, we discover,
as Ted does eventually, is actually a successful orthopedic surgeon,
with lots of friends who brings companionship and conversation to her
lonely and pathetically youth obsessed elderly neighbour named Magda
(Lin Shaye).
The Farrelly brothers, Bobby and Peter, whose previous film credits
include 'Dumb and Dumber' and 'Kingpin', strive to push the envelope
towards extremely crude humour and this time they miss the mark for
several reasons while still making a reasonably good film in many
resepects.  First of all, the film has long stretches where nothing
really funny happens and there are two scenes in particular that
actually drove me to almost vomit.  Many patrons of the performance I
attended were shocked as many of them were heard screaming instead of
laughing in many of the film's scenes of gross out humour.
I love politically incorrect humour.  One of the problems with political
correctness is that is robs people of being themselves and at the same
time it gets them labeled by supporters of the movement  who become
hypocrites themselves by knocking people who refuse to follow the rules
of p.c.  But even my love for politically incorrect humour can be
stretched too far as it is in this film.
'Dumb and Dumber' and 'Kingpin' had some really funny moments without
repelling movie goers.  Not so with 'There's Something About Mary'.  The
film actually repels and tries to hard to be funny and Ben Stiller is
rather flat and unfunny and isn't really suited for the part as well as
some other more colourful actors could have been.  Cameron Diaz and Matt
Dillion aren't funny either and that brings further hindrance to the
film.  If sight gags and repellent humour can be perceived as funny
without much input from the cast, the camera gets most of the credit
that really ISN'T funny.  In fairness, there some really funny moments
in this film but they are overshadowed by the ones that cross the line.
Jokes about mental retardation, crippled people, sperm and cruelty to
animals will appeal to some and the belly laughs could have been there
with less effort and more concentration on making it look easy rather
than by using a polo mallet on our private parts.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
What an enigma.  It's 89 minutes of my life that I can't get back.  I
just can't figure out how such a skillful pair of performers like Ralph
Fiennes and Uma Thurman can let themselves be a part of such a mess like
'The Avengers'.  Even a veteran like Sean Connery looks awkward in this
film and let's face it, has Connery had a really GOOD film since 1990's
'The Hunt for Red October'?  Connery has made some bad decisions as an
actor like appearing in that horrible 'Highlander' sequel in 1991, and
now that I think of it, I wasn't that impressed with the first
'Highlander' movie in 1986 but such films like 1992's 'Medicine Man',
1993's 'Rising Sun' and 1995's 'Just Cause' all had potential but looked
more like they were cranked out in the usual Hollywood fashion in the
fast food section of motion pictures.
Warner Brothers refused to show the movie to critics a short time ago
before its major release and for good reason!  Of course, the usual
corporate line to put a spin on things, as voiced by one Warner
executive was that the reason why there was no previews beforehand was
because Warner Bros. was afraid that critics would compare it to other
films and to the original t.v. series.  Ha, ha, ha!  What an insult to
people's intelligence.  Ok, so I'll never work THERE.
Beginning with opening scenes that are relatively entertaining (the
first ten minutes had me watching hopefully), 'The Avengers' quickly
dissolves into another formula comic book style movie with lavish sets,
impressive costume designs and other forms of eye candy that can't hide
the fact that the film doesn't know which direction it's going in
because it doesn't know where it's been.  It's an abstract form of
so-called entertainment that wallows in the excessive boredom seen last
year in 'Batman and Robin' where an abysmal script and wooden direction
ticked off even the casual movie fan.
This big screen version of 'The Avengers' is based on the television
series from the 1960's which starred Patrick Macnee and Diana Rigg.  The
series ran from 1961 to 1968 and Rigg came in in 1966.  Prior to that it
was Honor Blackman who starred along with Macnee.  In this version, John
Steed (Fiennes) and Dr. (Mrs.) Emma Peel (Thurman) are two highly
skilled British secret agents who are introduced to each other and are
given an assignment to work on a case involving the manipulation of the
world's weather.  Snow storms, twisters, warm weather, rain, lightening
and thunder are all present right behind each other in bizarre fashion
controlled by a mad scientist named Sir August de Wynter (Sean
Connery).  de Wynter's plot is to manipulate the governments of the
world into buying his weather, presumably the safe and normal kind and
if not, he says hundreds of millions will drown, burn, freeze etc.
Director Jeremiah S. Chechik ('Benny and Joon', 'National Lampoon's
Christmas Vacation') doesn't know what he's doing here.  He has no idea
where to take a movie and how to distinguish his characters from each
other and throw in his version of sub text like any creative director
would.  Screenwriter Don MacPherson's dialogue is pompous in an annoying
sort of way and his story development is about as slow as opening a can
of food with a manual can opener rather than by using an electrical one.
What's really disappointing about this version is the performance of Uma
Thurman as Peel.  In many ways, she sounds a lot like her Poison Ivy
character from 'Batman and Robin'.  In fact, if you were to blindfold
even the most high brow critic, it is my belief that he or she would
have a hard time distinguishing between the two characters.
Fiennes is wooden and his showdown with Connery in the film's climax is
laughably short, predictable and badly edited.  Every character in this
movie looks like they're reading their lines from cue cards.  The film's
continuity is also scattershot.  In a freezing blizzard, Steed and Peel
are speaking to each other and they aren't shivering and their warm
breath in contrast to the cold air isn't even visible!  One shot has
Steed taking off his hat which is covered with fake snow, and it looks
fake, and suddenly as the snow keeps falling, only a couple of flake's
manage to find their way onto his neatly combed head of hair.  DUH!
I recently read that original star Patrick Macnee actually approves of
this movie because Steed doesn't carry a gun like he never did on the
t.v. show.  Wow!  There's a ringing endorsement.  I'll take Dirty Harry
and his magnum or John McClane and his machine gun any day and in
keeping with the dignity of the English culture, I'm sure even the most
loyal British movie fan would be dying to rent a James Bond movie,
complete with guns and weaponry used stylishly by Connery and Roger
Moore after seeing this movie where Steed's trusty umbrella seems to be
lethal on his foes.
For fun with an umbrella, I recommend turning on any re-run of the
1960's television series 'Batman' and seeing Burgess Meredith "Wah, wah
wah!" his way through an episode as the Penguin, using his umbrella.
It's more enjoyable and entertaining than this turkey of a movie where
the real asset is...well, there really aren't any!
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Title
Review for Cool Hand Luke (1967)
Of all the films that were released in 1967 few had the power and stamina of
displaying detailed characterizations in the manner of which 'Cool Hand Luke'
did.  Its strong message of individuality was a welcomed choice in the 20th
centrury's most turbulent decade which of course were the 1960's.
Based on the novel by Donn Pearce and adapted for the screen by Pearce and
Frank R. Pierson and Oscar nominated for Screenplay Adaptation (Pierson would
go on to win the Original Screenplay Oscar for 'Dog Day Afternoon' in 1975),
 'Cool Hand Luke' opens with a lazy and most effective scene showing Luke
Jackson (Paul Newman in an Oscar nominated performance many feel he should
have won for) cutting the heads off of parking meters in a drunken haze in
the confines of a small southern town.  Promptly picked up by the police and
sentenced to two years for maliciously destroying public property while under
the influence, Luke is transported to a prison camp led by a character named
Dragline (George Kennedy who won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar).  Dragline
rules with an iron fist over the gang but manages to maintain many friends
and constantly earns the respect of his fellow prisoners.  The scene in which
Luke is brought to prison sets the tone for the entire film as director
Stuart Rosenberg sternly outlines the discplinary policy of the facilitie's
captain (Strother Martin) and its guards whom the prisoners are told to refer
to as 'boss'.
Luke's mission is to immediately challenge Dragline for leadership of the
gang and a conflicting scene involving a boxing match between the two puts
Luke on good terms with the other prisoners and this is also noticed by the
guards themselves.  Dragline ends up becoming Luke's friend and protector and
the film becomes a series of rebelious acts executed by Luke.  One somber and
heartlfelt scene has Luke in contact with his mother who comes to visit him
and she is dying, presumably of lung cancer as we see her coughing and chain
smoking her way to the grave.  He refers to his mother on a first name basis
and the scene has a further impression later in the film as Luke comes to
terms with her death.  It's one of Newman's finest moments on film.
'Cool Hand Luke' is easily recognizable as social commentary but it also has
a sense of humour and knows how to be entertaining on a general level.  This
is shown in the film's most classic scene, the egg eating contest.  Luke
challenges the disbelievers in the camp into proving he can eat fifty
hardboiled eggs in one hour and every cent in camp rides on his bet.
The talented cast of 'Cool Hand Luke' includes such character actors as J.D.
Cannon, Lou Antonio, Jo Van Fleet, Wayne Rogers, Ralph Waite, Harry Dean
Stanton and a very young looking Dennis Hopper.
Director Stuart Rosenberg's heavy handed direction is appropriate for this
film which creates a clandestine environment of prison abuse and prisoner
defiance and leaves the audience with many questions of whether prison
reforms or give its convicts the impression that for every violent action,
there can be an act of equally violent reaction.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Pixar animation and Walt Disney Pictures presents 'A Bug's Life'.  The
film is a rousing pleasure to watch, to listen to and to think about
after it's done.  There isn't much to think about in a philosophical
sense but the brilliant attention to detail using the most advanced and
state of the art special effects and computer techniques available have
you guessing just exactly how it was all done.
Similar to 'Antz', also released recently, 'A Bug's Life' details the
antics of an ant colony.  The main character, voiced by Dave Foley is
named Flick and he's the nerdy little foul up whom you would never
expect to be a hero.  Other prominent characters that celebrities lend
their voices to for the production are the Princess (Julia
Louis-Dreyfuss), her mother the Queen (Phyllis Diller) and their
relationship with the good guys (other insects) and the bad guys, a
swarm of grasshoppers led by Hopper (Kevin Spacey).  A minor character,
Mr. Soil, is voiced by Roddy McDowell, a classic actor making his last
contribution to motion pictures as he died earlier this year from
cancer.
After a major foul-up by Flick, the colony loses all food collected for
the grasshoppers, (after all, grasshoppers ARE above ants in the food
chain), Hopper orders the ants to begin again and says that his army
will destroy the ants if they come back at the end of the rainy season
and there isn't any food.  After a trial, Flick is banned from the
colony and finds himself on his own where he befriends a group of other
insects connected to a flea circus.  Prominent among the characters are
a butterfly (Madeline Kahn), a walking stick bug (David Hyde-Pierce), a
ladybug (Denis Leary) and a black widow spider (Bonnie Hunt).  Flick
recruits them in a comical way to return with him to the colony and
stand up to Hopper and the others when they return to bully the ants for
food.
I give much credit is given to Pixar and Disney for making the
potentially hideous insects adorable and cute for kids to laugh at and
become wide-eyed.  One of the most hideous creatures in nature is the
spider but it's drawn so well in this movie, that you can't take your
eyes off the screen for it or any other optical candy intended for
adults as much as it is for kids.
'A Bug's Life' is directed by John Lasseter ('Toy Story') and Andrew
Stanton and the screenplay is by Andrew Stanton, Donald McEnery and Bob
Shaw.  Cleverly used in the film, and it should be in all films of a
cartoonish nature, are the ingeniously used clichs thrown in such as a
bug being attracted to a bright light, how they hang around food
containers that become trash etc, etc.  Especially nice is the film's
running time which actually exceeds 90 minutes and gives the audience
its money worth and isn't 70 or 80 minutes in length.  I guess that
explains why they used a lot of t.v. actors.  Their scale of pay
wouldn't cost as much as a big name such as Tom Hanks, whose character
voice of Woody in 'Toy Story' probably commanded a high salary so more
money is available for a longer running time in this production.  'A
Bug's Life' is perfect for the attention span of children and the
satisfying appetite of adults.  A charming romp all the way which don't
require being written about at great lengths.  Just enough to highly
recommend it.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm
